CREATED AT: 2023-01-21 19:13:17.698438
BASE DOMAIN: https://www.fortum.com


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com
Stock exchange and investor news
All stock exchange and investor news
Covid-19 response at Fortum Group
More information about the AGM 2022
Fortum's Annual General Meeting 2022
Fortum Circo® Recycled Plastic
Battery recycling eases raw material shortage
Legal information
Fortum has completed the divestment of Uniper
Fortum's Annual Review 2021
Employees
Media contacts
Follow Fortum on LinkedIn
Licensing and safety design
In focus
Corporate governance
Go to the newsroom
About us
Contact us
15 December 2022, 15:00
Fortum, Uniper and the German State have signed the final stabilisation agreements – Fortum sells all of its Uniper shares after the Uniper EGM
Kari Kankaanpää
Corporate press releases
All other news and articles
09 December 2022, 09:38
Covid-19 information
Legal Notice
Strategy
Our purpose is to drive the change for a cleaner world. We are securing a fast and reliable transition to a carbon-neutral economy by providing customers and societies with clean energy and sustainable solutions.
Good production year 2022 at Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant
05 January 2023, 13:00
New EU regulations promote the recycling of battery materials
Sales, EUR million
Read more
Fortum Battery Recycling
Data privacy and cookies
26 September 2022, 13:47
Investors
Topical
Latest from the ForTheDoers blog
© Fortum 2023. All rights reserved
Share information
~
Countries where we have core operations
29 December 2022, 15:30
08 December 2022, 19:00
Fortum is committed to protecting the health and safety of our employees, partners and customers, and the societies in which we operate.
20,000
Skip to main content
Fortum’s and Fjernvarme Fyn’s joint carbon storage project to receive Danish Business Promotion Board funding
Fortum and EDF sign Framework Cooperation Agreement to explore joint opportunities in new nuclear
Sales contacts
Our energy production
Main menu
Latest news and releases
Raise a concern
Follow Fortum on Twitter
Find charging stations
This is Fortum
For a cleaner world | Fortum
Tero Holländer
Energy production
112,400
News and publications
Our offices
Services
Turbines and generators
Fortum worldwide
Fortum in 2021
REPowerEU and its impact on the green energy transition
Investor Relations
All press releases
14 October 2022, 11:53
The Finnish Government has published its proposal for windfall tax law - Fortum to assess the proposal
Sustainability
Other news and articles
Give feedback
For a cleaner world
Back to top
Fortum CEO Markus Rauramo’s statement on the Group’s Russian businesses
Fortum Group in Russia
Investors - In focus
Read about Fortum's financial year 2021
Power plant O&M and performance
Follow us on social media
ForTheDoers blog
Calendar and events
19 December 2022, 10:45
Reports and presentations
Careers
21 December 2022, 17:00
03 January 2023, 12:30
Supplier inquiries
Fortum and Kärnfull Next to jointly explore opportunities in Sweden for Small Modular Reactors
03 January 2023, 15:41
Fortum and Blastr have signed a letter of intent to use the Joddböle site in Inkoo for green steel production
Follow Fortum on YouTube
Go to AGM page
10


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/battery-recycling
Watch the video to learn more!
Fortum
Battery Recycling | Fortum
End of life services for lithium-ion batteries
Contact by phone
Our low-CO2 recycling processes turn lithium, cobalt, manganese and nickel back into raw materials for new batteries.
Read our current news and releases related to batteries
Climate and resources
Learn more
We are expanding our battery recycling capacity with
A new state-of-the-art hydrometallurgical plant being built in Harjavalta, Finland
A solution for every stage of the battery life cycle
We provide a safe, sustainable, and cost-effective service for handling, transporting, and recycling of lithium-ion batteries – from EV batteries to industrial-sized batteries.
battery recycling technology, we recover the valuable battery materials for reuse in the production of new batteries.
We have developed a cutting-edge technology to recover up to 95% of the critical metals in the battery's black mass.
Interested in collaboration possibilities with us?
Recycling solutions for battery manufacturers
As an energy and circular economy company, we offer advanced expertise at every stage.
Battery related news
hydrometallurgical technology, where up to 95% of valuable metals can be recovered.
We are revolutionising the lithium-ion battery value chain for electric vehicle and industrial use batteries. Our low-CO2 battery recycling solution makes it possible to recycle over 80% of the battery, and 95% of the valuable metals contained in the battery's black mass can be put back into circulation.
Always the latest technology backed by our own R&D
Our low-CO2 lithium-ion battery recycling technology
We use a combination of mechanical and hydrometallurgical technologies to recycle the battery materials. With our cutting-edge, low CO
Sustainable, low-CO2 recycling solution
We extend the battery life-cycle by piloting several second-life solutions for lithium-ion batteries that no longer fit for their original use and purpose.
Lithium-ion batteries play a key role in enabling the transition to clean energy and the growth of e-mobility. At Fortum, we are forerunners in battery recycling and have developed a cutting-edge low CO
Second life solutions for batteries
2
We provide recycling solutions for battery production scrap as well as hazardous waste management of challenging waste streams.
Play video
Battery Recycling
Our offering for battery recycling and second-life solutions
Why do we care about batteries?
Battery news and releases
Development tools and methods
Contact us to discuss more!
Ready for the future


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo
Circular economy
We have developed Fortum Circo recycled plastic as a sustainable substitute for virgin materials. We have made no compromises with it. Fortum Circo recycled plastic granules are readily available and suitable for your processes and products. And if they aren’t the right fit, we will tailor them to match your needs. The production of Fortum Circo takes sustainability factors into account from beginning to end. We guarantee that also your supply chain stays traceable and transparent. Fortum Circo is sustainable in every sense: it is made with no compromises.
Why Fortum Circo® plastic recyclate?
The origin of the feedstock material and the way the plastic waste is treated plays a key role in the sustainability of the recyclate and its production. By having the whole recycling process in our own hands, we guarantee the sustainability.
Quality
Customer references and news
Submit a contact request and we will contact you!
Recycling & waste
The origin of Fortum Circo
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic can be used in a wide variety of products. Learn about Fortum Circo customer reference cases, news and other current issues.
recycled plastic is post-consumer recycled (PCR) plastic, which is sorted and processed in Fortum's state-of-the-art plastic refinery into recycled raw material.
Fortum Circo recyclates are very versatile. The granules can be customised to different compounds and adapted into existing processes, so there is no need to invest in new moulds or equipment.
Interested to know more about Fortum Circo®?
Fortum Circo® is a plastic recyclate produced from post-consumer plastic waste. With consistent and high quality, versatility and solid availability, Fortum Circo recycled plastic can be used in a wide variety of products and also customised into compounds to meet specific needs and requirements. Fortum Circo is made with no compromises: it is a safe and reliable solution for sustainable plastics production.
Recycled plastics - Fortum Circo®| Fortum
Versatility
Fortum Circo® is sustainable in every sense
Fortum Circo recycled plastic fits for a wide variety of applications. Fortum Circo recycled plastic granules are available in basic grades and can also be customised into compounds.
Contact
Share
Fortum Circo® approved for EU Toy Safety Standard
We guarantee the consistent, high quality of Fortum Circo recycled plastics from batch to batch and from month to month by having the entire recycling chain, including the sorting of waste plastics, washing and compounding, in-house.
Recycled Plastics - Fortum Circo®
Fortum Circo® Recycled Plastics
Fortum Circo® is made with no compromises
Find contractor
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic granules
®


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/recycled-plastic-granules
Fortum Circo® HDPE is a sustainable and reliable material for extrusion-based applications, such as blow moulding or profile and pipe extrusion.
Fortum Circo® HDPE
Fortum Circo® PP is a sustainable and reliable material for injection moulding applications.
Download
Fortum Circo® LDPE
Fortum Circo® PP-T is a compound of recycled plastic reinforced with talc for injection moulding applications with enhanced stiffness.
Fortum Circo® PP-CF
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic granules are a sustainable solution to replace virgin plastics. Post-consumer plastic-based Fortum Circo recycled plastic is a versatile raw material that is available in basic grades: PP, HDPE and LDPE and in customised compounds to accommodate other requirements in terms of technical and environmental properties.
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic is a post-consumer plastic packaging waste-based raw material that is available in three basic qualities: PP granules, HDPE granules and LDPE granules. The recycled plastic granules are a safe and reliable raw material choice suitable for a wide variety of applications. Fortum Circo recyclates can be used as a sustainable substitute for virgin plastic, as the climate change impact of Fortum Circo basic recyclates is less than half that of virgin material.
Recycled plastic granules | Fortum
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic compounds
Fortum Circo® LCA study
Fortum Circo® PP-CF is a high-performance compound of recycled plastic reinforced with cellulose fibre for injection moulding applications with a close-to-zero carbon footprint.
Fortum Circo® compounds can be customised to meet your specific needs and requirements in Fortum Circo®Lab, our co-creation programme.
Fortum Circo® LDPE is a sustainable and reliable material for extrusion-based applications, such as blown film manufacturing.
Fortum Circo is a safe and sustainable alternative to virgin plastics. Download Fortum Circo® Life Cycle Assessment Study to learn more about the environmental effects of Fortum Circo recyclates and the benefits of using it compared to virgin granulates.
Fortum Circo® PP-T
Recycled plastic granules
Fortum Circo® compounds are made of post-consumer recycled (PCR) plastic and supplemented with selected additives to improve the technical and environmental properties of the material. Compounds offer improved properties, such as higher stiffness, rigidity and impact strength, and are developed to meet also the technical, aesthetic and haptic requirements of demanding applications. Fortum Circo compounds are available in selected material series, but the material can also be customised to meet specific needs and requirements in terms of mechanical and environmental properties, processability, colour and other features.
Your Fortum Circo® compound
Fortum Circo® PP
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/fortum-uniper-and-german-state-have-signed-final-stabilisation-agreements-fortum-sells-all-its-uniper-shares-after-uniper-egm
Distribution:
19 December 2022, 10:45 EET
www.fortum.com
Release category: Other information disclosed according to the rules of the Exchange
of the EGM’s proposals. The resolutions made by the Uniper EGM and the final implementation of the package remain conditional upon the approval of the State Aid clearances from the European Commission. As communicated earlier, the completion of the stabilisation package is expected to take place before the end of 2022.
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 19.12.2022 AT 10:45 EET
“Due to Russia’s attack war on Ukraine and the resulting European energy crisis, our operating environment has changed drastically in 2022. At Uniper’s EGM today, we will vote for the transactions that seal the sale of Fortum’s shares in Uniper to the German State. This is not what we had in mind when we became the main shareholder and confidently started our joint journey with Uniper. Since the transaction became inevitable I can only thank all parties for their commitment to finalise the agreements," says Markus Rauramo, President and CEO of Fortum.
Vice President, Investor relations and Financial Communications
The Uniper Extraordinary General Meeting (EGM) on the stabilisation measures is held today on Monday 19 December 2022. The EGM will resolve on the capital increase of Uniper and all newly issued shares will be subscribed by the German State for EUR 1.70 per share. After the equity capital increase, the German State acquires all of Fortum‘s approximately 293 million shares in Uniper SE for EUR 1.70 per share, a total consideration of approximately EUR 0.5 billion. Uniper will repay the EUR 4 billion shareholder loan, which Fortum has granted to Uniper.
Ingela Ulfves, VP, Investor Relations and Financial Communications, tel. +358 40 515 1531
Fortum, Uniper and the German State have signed the final stabilisation agreements – Fortum sells all of its Uniper shares after the Uniper EGM | Fortum
Further information:
On 21 September 2022, Fortum, the German State and Uniper signed an agreement in principle on the long-term solution for Uniper.
, Vice Chair of the Supervisory Board, as well as Fortum’s General Counsel
, who has been Chair of the Supervisory Board, Fortum's CFO
Nasdaq Helsinki
Stock exchange release
Rauno Tiihonen, Manager, Investor Relations, tel. +358 10 453 6150
Carlo Beck, Manager, Investor Relations, tel. +49 172 751 2480
Markus Rauramo
Release
Share this:
Esa Hyvärinen
Following the change of control in Uniper to the German State, Fortum's representatives on Uniper's Supervisory Board will resign: Fortum's President and CEO
Fortum Corporation
(PDF, 805 KB)
and Head of Fortum’s CEO Office
The exit from Uniper enables Fortum to refocus on clean Nordic power generation as its core business. Fortum is currently reviewing its strategy with the main focus on clean power generation. The divestment of Fortum’s operations in Russia is ongoing.
Fortum, the German State and Uniper have signed the final terms of the comprehensive stabilisation package.
Bernhard Günther
.
Main media
From the EUR 4.0 billion parent company guarantee facility that Fortum has granted to Uniper, a total of EUR 3.0 billion will be released by year-end 2022. The remaining approximately EUR 1.0 billion, with a full German State back-to-back guarantee (indemnity), will be released latest at the end of June 2023.
As the majority shareholder of Uniper, Fortum will vote in
Ingela Ulfves
Nora Steiner-Forsberg
As part of the signed package, Fortum has the right of first offer in case Uniper intends to divest all or parts of its Swedish hydro and nuclear assets until the end of 2026.
“In the new year I look forward to sharing Fortum's new strategy. With our strong and well-performing Nordic clean generation business, we are able to forge a path towards a sustainable future. Fortum’s CO
-free generation assets are needed more than ever,” he concludes.
favour


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext
Fortum eNext drives the change towards a cleaner world by applying our engineering expertise and long experience to maximise the performance of your turbines, generators and related systems.
Future-proof performance through skilled experts
customers worldwide
Customer reference stories
Securing the long-term benefits of your Energy-from-Waste Plant
See more news
Keep informed on our latest news and insights
84
05 November 2021, 12:45 EET
Our customers' willingness to recommend our services
Modernisation of steam turbine automation brought flexibility to production – Case Neve, Finland
Fortum Turbine and Generator Services completes the acquisition of Generator Service Sweden AB’s business
Read more customer stories
Read more about Fortum eNext
With long and extensive experience in plant perfection, we help you manage your steam and gas turbines, generators, and automation and protection systems - from maintenance planning and optimising risk levels to implementing overhauls, modernisations and repairs.
We are ready to support you throughout the whole life cycle of a power plant
Fast reaction to findings prolonged turbine major overhaul by only four weeks – Case Umeå Energi, Sweden
Optimising power plant performance and operations
Turbine and Generator Services
Designing and manufacturing a completely new GTP-type generator rotor – Case Suzano S/A, Brazil
Subscribe our newsletter
Power plant services
Latest news
IN FOCUS
Customer release
Environmental Performance
30
Read the article
01 September 2022, 06:00 EEST
Fortum eNext supports power and heat producers in maximising the avail­ability and perfor­mance of their assets. Building on the heritage and know-how of running and optimising our customers’ and our own opera­tions, we offer expert services in power plant opera­tions, mainte­nance, and moderni­sa­tions. As an independent service provider we handle equipment origi­nally supplied by a wide selection of different OEM's, bringing in our extensive engineering expertise. We see our customers' situation from the owner’s perspective, striving for the most economical and techni­cally best suitable solution for each case.
Together with our customers we are tackling the challenge of providing clean, reliable and affordable energy to end users. This includes developing low-carbon solutions for local energy systems and electrifying customers’ processes.
Smart energy engineering solutions for your assets
Turbine control and protection systems should be included in the maintenance strategy
%
2000
Customer takes O&M into own hands – recommends Fortum eNext as service supplier
Fortum eNext - Get ready for tomorrow’s energy production
09 September 2021, 10:17 EEST
Fortum eNext – For thermal power plants
countries with successful project implementation
05 October 2021, 14:07 EEST


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/ume%C3%A5-energi
Site:
Teemu Heinonen
, Operations Technician at Umeå Energi.
Umeå Energi Dåva 2 plant
+358 50 454 2134
[at]
Go to Fortum eNext main page
Fortum eNext reacted fast to the findings and provided descriptions of the damage along with recommendations on how to repair the damage in the most cost- and time-efficient way. The overhaul was first extended by six weeks, but in the end the solution prolonged the overhaul by only four weeks.
Fuel:
Fast reaction to findings prolonged turbine major overhaul by only four weeks – Case Umeå Energi, Sweden | Fortum
A strong maintenance partner is crucial to maximising your plant’s output and minimising its risks.
Turbine:
Tel:
[dot]
com
The scope of the operating hour-based major overhaul had to be broadened on very short notice when findings requiring extensive repairs were discovered in the turbine. Thanks to rapidly including the unexpected work into the plan, the overhaul was ultimately prolonged by only four weeks.
teemu
Fuel power:
Customer Reference Stories
Case description
105 MW (75 MW heat, 30 MW electricity)
Fluidized-bed boiler
: Umeå Energi, Sweden
”During the work, we were able to quickly handle the findings that required action. Fortum’s team on site handled their job extremely professionally,” says
Umeå Energi was looking for a qualified supplier to perform a regular operating hour-based major overhaul on the Siemens SST 600 turbine at the Dåva combined heat and power plant (CHP) just outside the city of Umeå. Fortum eNext’s assignment consisted of the unit to be dismantled and inspected, its parts cleaned and repaired where necessary, and, finally, reassembled.
Read more on the topic
Turbines keep power plants running
Read the story
Siemens SST 600
Want to learn more? Read also the longer case description.
Customer
Turbine revision returned the guaranteed efficiency values – Case Jyväskylän Voima, Finland
Customer case Jyväskylän Voima, Finland
Without any hiccups, a turbine major overhaul normally takes around one month. But it is very common that opening the machine uncovers something surprising – as was the case with this turbine. As the dismantling work progressed, findings requiring extensive repairs were discovered in the rotor, stator, and control valves.
Contact our specialist for more information
heinonen
Senior Product Manager, Turbines
John Josefson
Boiler:
2010
Biomass
fortum
Dåva 2 CHP in Umeå, producing electricity and heat for the surrounding community
Read the full story
Explore our services for turbines
Commissioned:
References


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/charging-locations
Charge your EV
News
Download Fortum Charge & Drive app to see our charging network.
The app is free and available from AppStore or Google Play. You can view, filter, and find all the charging stations in the app. You can also order a charging key from within the app.
Add payment
How to charge with Fortum Charge & Drive
Pay for charging with the app or RFID charging key at any Fortum Charge & Drive charger. If you have problems, just call your local customer support (contact details at the bottom of this page).
Charging locations
Download app
Contact Fortum Charge & Drive
Vehicle charging
Get in touch to learn more
Sign up here
In your app profile, add a credit card to your virtual key or RFID charging key. You can add different credit cards for different keys; handy for e.g. company receipts and bookkeeping.
Subscribe to the Fortum Charge & Drive Newsletter
My fortum
Affordable
Charging locations | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production
3,497
1,070
99.5
A renewable and CO₂-free way to produce electricity
Fortum's power generation capacity, 31 Dec 2020
6,401
3,061
888
3,222
455
Adding biomass to the fuel mix for Combined Heat and Power (CHP) reduces CO₂  emissions.
Fortum's production volumes (2021)
Poland
-
1,487
87.7
35
Get to know our power plants
8,249
More about wind power
Combined heat and power (CHP)
Nuclear
A renewable and important way to produce electricity in the future
Finland
136
Fortum's heat production capacity, 31 Dec 2020
Energy availability of hydropower plants (excl. Uniper)
TOTAL
1,133
61
Uniper power generation
A steady source of CO₂-free renewable energy
Solar power
525
MW
Nuclear and hydro power plants give us the stability and flexibility to meet increasing energy demand.
565
1,595
1,162
Load factor of the Loviisa nuclear power plant, Finland
15,718
heat (TWh)
Our mission is to engage our customers and society to drive the change towards a cleaner world.
11,596
8,439
Condensing power
941
Explore our new vision and join the change
Modern life requires more energy than ever before. To meet this demand, we use reliable production methods like hydro power and nuclear power. But at the same time, we aim to accelerate the transition to a clean energy future by investing heavily in solar and wind power.
250
Meeting demand
12,151
Wind power
3,980
Get to know our hydro, wind, solar, nuclear and CHP power plants.
78.0
Russia
Energy availability of combined heat and power (CHP) plants (excl. Uniper)
6,383
428is
A stable and reliable CO₂-free source of energy
93.2
Uniper power plants
4,895
11,010
285
Our aim is to move towards a low-emission energy system and optimal resource efficiency.
Norway
1,991
Netherlands
Heat
Our energy production methods
375
power (TWh)
More about solar power
See how we're decreasing our environmental impact
Read reports
More about hydropower
1,134
Making progress
Combined Heat and Power
28,160
3,361
1,061
More about nuclear power
24.9
1,417
More about CHP
9,873
High operational excellence ensures reliable operations
50,297
1,553
Hydropower
Other
101
Production capacities
4,848
Chevron down
19,511
Low emissions
Germany
United Kingdom
Fortum's energy production | Fortum
Sweden
Nuclear power
More efficient fuel-based power generation with lower CO₂ emissions
355
Our power plants
of total power generation CO₂ free
CO₂-free, renewable energy is the way forward and we’re leading the change for a cleaner world.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/nuclear
We are among the world leaders in nuclear waste management and final disposal
A nuclear power plant uses heat from a nuclear reaction to create high pressure steam which is put through a turbine to generate electricity. Light water reactors, such as the pressure water reactors at Loviisa nuclear power plant, use enriched uranium as fuel.
19%
Always on
Climate change and the transition to a low-carbon energy system means that reliable, emission-free power generation is more important than ever. As a CO
What is nuclear power?
-free energy production method, nuclear power is a key part of our strategy for a clean-energy future and supports achieving Finland’s and Europe’s carbon neutrality targets.
Proven safety
Nuclear power is a future energy form that is constantly developing, and small modular reactors are an example of the latest innovations in the sector.
It is mainly used to produce electricity, but heat generated by the nuclear reaction can also be used to provide heating for homes in a residential area (district heating).
More news on nuclear
Nuclear power generates electricity without releasing harmful emissions into the air and helps to achieve carbon neutrality targets.
Clean energy
nuclear power produced
FAQ - Nuclear power
Read more about Loviisa nuclear power plant
Fortum’s nuclear operations – Safety and quality policy
Reliable
Stable and reliable
Nuclear power and the environment
Press release
The main environmental impact of nuclear power is related to building the plant, fuel procurement and the thermal load of cooling water discharged into the sea during operation.
Read more about Nuclear services
40 years of clean power
Extensive employee training with our plant operation simulator continues to strengthen our safety-oriented work culture and large annual investments in plant modifications ensure that all aspects of daily operation are considered as we continuously improve safety.
Press release 18 March, 2022
Is nuclear power safe?
Nuclear safety is based on multiple isolation and parallel safety measures. Systematic maintenance and modernisation as well as training of personnel guarantee operation in line with current standards and strengthen safety-culture.
CO2-free for climate
4,560 MW
Small modular reactors - nuclear power's new flexible generation
Read the release
For nuclear power plants
Our nuclear power plants provide a steady and reliable supply of electricity to the society. It improves energy self-sufficiency and security of supply.
New contract
How does nuclear power work?
How nuclear power supports energy security of supply and our journey towards a carbon-neutral society.
Nuclear power production is based on the utilisation of the thermal energy generated by a controlled chain reaction. A nuclear power plant works much like a conventional power plant, but instead of burning  e.g. coal, natural gas or peat, a nuclear power plant uses uranium as a source of energy.
10 things to know about nuclear power in the 2020s
More information about our operations
Online news
Topical in nuclear
Waste management
Nuclear power plays an important role in clean energy production. As a reliable, CO2-free energy source, it helps satisfy today’s electricity needs and improve security of supply while mitigating climate change. Over its lifecycle, nuclear power has a carbon footprint as low as wind, hydro and solar power.
share of Fortum's total power generation
Safety and quality
Safety
40 years of safety
A steady source of electricity is critical during periods of increased energy consumption. And unlike other CO2-free production methods, we can count on nuclear power because electricity is generated at a consistent rate regardless of weather conditions. Nuclear helps to improve energy self-sufficiency and security of supply.
nuclear generation capacity
We offer services for the whole life-cycle of nuclear power plants
36.4 TWh
Light water reactors, such as the pressure water reactors at our Loviisa NPP, are simple in their basic characteristics and inherently stable. Their natural safety characteristics, which are based on physical feedback loops that moderate the increase of power output, together with the basic design of the reactors make the uncontrollable increase of reactor power output impossible. Light water reactors are very suitable for energy production, and they have proven safe and reliable, which explains their popularity. For these reasons, the further development and construction of new nuclear power plants has mainly focused on light water reactor technology.
21 December 2022, 14:00
Fortum submitted the Loviisa nuclear power plant operating licence application to the Finnish Government
Multiple isolation, redundancy and extensive training ensure that nuclear power is safe.
Nuclear waste management
The second Nordic Nuclear Trainee Program started
What is nuclear energy used for?
Nuclear | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services
Nuclear Services | Fortum
Fortum has more than 40 years of experience in designing, licensing and operating nuclear facilities and supplying related services and technologies. Our expertise covers the whole life-cycle of nuclear power plants from new builds to decommissioning and final disposal of nuclear waste.
Our Nuclear Services expertise areas
Unique customer value by innovations
Fortum and Uniper start cooperation in nuclear decommissioning and dismantling services
09 June 2020, 10:00 EEST
Fortum’s waste solid­i­fi­cation technology (LOCKIT®) enables cost effective solutions for low- and inter­me­diate- level waste solid­i­fi­cation.
Fortum and Uniper Sweden sign an agreement on a dismantling project at Oskarshamn and Barsebäck nuclear power plants in Sweden
For more than 30 years, Fortum has been a forerunner in nuclear decom­mis­sioning and waste management.
26
Apros® – Advanced Process Simulation Software
LOCKIT® – Nuclear Waste Solid­i­fi­cation
How to improve nuclear industry competitiveness in western countries
Nuclear and Radioactive Waste Management
Our Nuclear Services products include
Nuclear Newbuild
Apros® Nuclear is a comprehensive, accurate and user-friendly tool for modelling and dynamic simulation of nuclear power plants.
Contact by email
We have almost over 40 years of experience on designing and operating interim spent fuel storages and final disposal facility for low and inter­me­diate-level radioactive waste.
BORES® – Liquid Waste Treatment
Artificial Intelligence Facilitates Fortum’s Requirements Engineering
We have a strong track record in nuclear innovation. Our proprietary technologies like NURES® for nuclide removal, Apros® for dynamic process simulation, ADLAS® for licensing and ReMaint® for maintenance optimisation, enable us to deliver unique customer value and benefits. Supported by the extensive network of our highly skilled partners, we can deliver our services around the world.
We have innovative solutions for radioactive liquid purification and waste solidifications as well as a long hands-on experience in waste management.
Radioactive Waste Storage and Disposal
LOCKIT®
Contact our experts
ForTheDoers Blog
700
+
For Nuclear Power Plants
ADLAS® – Licencing and Safety Design
07 September 2021, 13:00 EEST
BORES®
Articles, blogs and case-studies
Years of experience in designing, licensing and operation of NPPs
Read more about our selected success stories
Reference list
ADLAS®
28 January 2022, 10:00 EET
Fortum ADLAS® is a proven and efficient Systems Engineering approach to formulate Nuclear Plant requirements and a systematic configuration management method.
The average overall customer satisfaction index for Fortum’s expert services and products is rated “Best in class” by customers worldwide.
Customer's perspective
Our key product for process simulation and safety analysis is Apros® - Advanced Process Simulation Software.
Latest news and events
40
03 June 2020, 10:47
Fortum and Fermi Energia complete licensing model study for SMR deployment in Estonia
As an owner and operator of nuclear facilities, we have the ability to look at the needs and solutions from the customer’s perspective. This saves our customers’ time and money as well as guarantees the high quality of the solutions delivered. Through our long-standing experience and performance track record, Fortum Nuclear Services has become known as a trustworthy and highly valued service provider and partner.
Apros®
NURES®
Customisable solutions for purification of radioactive liquid waste through use of highly selective ion exchange materials.
Process Simulation and Safety Analysis
We have more than 40 years of experience in operations and maintenance with record high availability.
First small nuclear reactor in Finland in 10–15 years?
Operating Nuclear Power Plants
NURES® – Liquid Waste Treatment
Experts working with nuclear
Customisable solutions for separation of boron from radioactive liquids.
NS_landingpage_hero
We have expertise and proprietary technologies that help manage newbuild projects and reduce risks of project delays.
Worldwide access to nuclear excellence
Nuclear Services
Countries where our expertise has been utilised
To our contact page
Nuclear Decommissioning


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-waste-management/nures
Complete liquid waste treatment service, including:
10-20
Role at company/organisation
Service flow rate typically, BV/h​
Antti Ketolainen
What is NURES®?
300
other size options, mm
Atomflot, Russia (1996 - 1997)
Name
27
Fukushima Daiichi Nuclear Power Plant: Treating with NURES®
100% Inorganic
Treatment of liquid from a Fuel Element Debris (FED) treatment system with CsTreat® and CoTreat®.
Operating pH area
Bradwell Magnox NPP, UK (2013– 2017)
A tailored solution for your needs
Partial or full liquid waste treatment process, including:
Contact NURES- and BORES- product team:
of evaporator concentrates have been purified by 2009 with 232 litres of CsTreat®. Savings compared to cementation are over 50 million euros.
Fuel source flexibility
Complete process system
10 - 2000
CsTreat®​
Liquid treatment from fuel element debris
Suitable for both column or bed operations
1-13 (optimal <8)
Decontamination factor typically
Radioactive Cobalt​​
Paldiski, Estonia (1995)
High purification levels with many different liquid characteristics
1-13
Grain size typically, mm
of liquid waste in the Paldiski Naval Base (former Soviet Naval Training Centre) with only 12 litres of CsTreat®
Cost efficient
Bulk density, kg/l
Company/Organisation
The following NURES® Publications are free to download, but we would like to better serve you by getting the contact information of those interested in our products. Please fill the following form and you will be redirected to our downloads page.
0.88
Titanium Oxide
Treatment service
Planning
Max. operating temperature, °C
Fukushima, Japan (2011 – 2012)
1310 m
Pu, Zn
Hazardous waste and detoxification
Feasibility study including both desktop research and laboratory tests
Bottle-neck identification
Installation and commissioning of the process system
Cleaning of sodium coolant from PFR and DFR with CsTreat®.
Based on
NURES® publications
CoTreat®
Savannah River, USA (1999 – 2000)
Process system delivery
Operation and maintenance of the system
NURES® Key Figures
Our related products
Read more about the Data Privacy at Fortum here.
Most disturbing factors
Zirconium Oxide
SbTreat®
Format
Strontium
Removes
Tusa, Esko - Harjula, Risto - Yarnell, Peter (2007) Fifteen Years of Operation with Inorganic Highly Selective Ion Exchange Materials. WM'07 Conference, February 25 - March 1, 2007, Tucson, AZ.
Manufacturing of complete process system or select components
Decommissioning and Waste
Stable during interium storge and compatible to most solidification recipes
Not disturbing conditions
Specification and testing of treat suitability
Download here
High salt concentrations
CsTreat®
NURES® treats radioactive liquids with a higher selectivity and to a smaller waste volume compared to any competing organic resin or inorganic ion exchanger on the market.
Cesium (Cs-134, Cs-137)
Calcium, Magnesium
NURES® purifies your radioactive liquids
M
Technical support for application
NURES® customers worldwide
Callaway, USA (1996 – 1999)
of reprocessing liquid with 7 GBq/l of Sr and 7 GBq/l of Cs purified to lower activity enabling cheaper further treatment.
Dounreay, UK (2002 – present)
I agree that my personal data is collected with this form
0.30 - 0.85
pH, colloids, Calcium
A custom solution tailored to significantly reduce your interim and final storage volumes of radioactive waste
Increased efficiency
Consultancy services regarding liquid waste treatment, including:
1
20 - 1000
Robust and Effective
SrTreat®
Planning of liquid waste treatment
NURES® has been used around the world - See a list of selected references
Stable
NURES® technology purifies your radioactive liquids efficiently with lower costs. It is based on patented, 100% inorganic, highly selective ion exchange (“IX”) materials. The Treat-series IX materials have been developed from a nuclear power plant operator’s perspective since the 1980s. NURES® technology is proven in the most challenging conditions at our customers’ installations, including the liquid treatment at the Fukushima Daiichi site where extremely stringent purification criteria have been applied. We thrive to deliver the best possible radionuclide purification technology to our customers with continuous R&D activities and product development.
Cleaning of cooling water reverse osmosis reject. CsTreat® and SrTreat® are used in ALPS to reach a non-detectable level of Cs and Sr.
70 m
Data for the ion exchange materials: CsTreat, SrTreat, CoTreat and SbTreat
corrosion products (e.g. Mn-54, Fe-59, Ni-63, Zn-65), transuraniums            (e.g. Pu-236)​
Depends on liquid composition, can be calculated from chemical parameters
Nuclear Waste Management
of floor drain wastewater was purified with 250 litres of CsTreat®.
Antimony (Sb-122, Sb-124, and Sb-125)
Can also be used for
Ferrocyanide
Lehto, Jukka - Brodkin, Leena - Harjula, Risto and Tusa, Esko (1999) Separation of Radioactive Strontium from Alkaline Nuclear Waste Solutions with the Highly Effective Ion Ex-changer SrTreat, Nuclear Technology, vol. 127 July 1999, pp. 81-87.
Yes
200
Email
Inorganic
Demonstration to remove cesium from R-Reactor Disassembly Basin. 24 000 m3 was treated.
NURES® – Technology for Radionuclide Removal
​>7 (optimal >10)
NURES treat materials
The data collected in this form is used to respond to your feedback or inquiry. The data will be stored for approximately one year and may be used in analysing what kind of feedback we receive.
Solid granules
< 0.15 mm or 0.15 - 0.25 mm
1000-10000, highest achieved 8,000,000
Contact details
Customisable
Tc-99 (pertechnetate)
Cubic meters of water purified so far
Sellafield THORP, UK (2005 – 2007)
NURES® Publications
More about Nuclear Services
REMAINT nuclear outage concept
Potassium
Publications
Phosphate
200-2000, highest achieved 165,000,000
100
Fukushima, Japan (2012 – present)
0.67
nures
Delivery of treat materials as-is or packed in a column, including:
Manufacturing and delivery of the treat material
3
Tusa, Esko - Efficiency Of Fortum's CsTreat® And SrTreat® In Cesium And Strontium Removal In Fukushima Daiichi NPP, ENC2014, European Nuclear Conference, 11-14 May 2014, Marseille, France
Harjula, Risto - Paajanen, Airi - Lehto, Jukka - Tusa, Esko and Standring, Paul (2003) Testing of CoTreat Inorganic Ion Exchange Media for the Removal of Co-60 from Thorp Pond Water. WM'03 Conference, February 23-27, 2003, Tuscon, AZ.
Leave this field blank
THORP Feed Pond decontamination with CoTreat®.
Cs and Sr purification of liquids from nuclear ice breakers.
Cost estimation and volume reduction options
4-8 (optimal 5-7)
JAERI, Japan (1997 – 1998)
Download all NURES® Publications
Cleaning of spent fuel pools.
Loviisa, Finland (1991 – present)
Capacity, BV and l/kg
Senior Manager
Detailed data
Cleaning of 760 m
3000 m
Paks NPP, Hungary (2003 – present)
Cost Savings
80
Fukushima cesium and strontium removal with NURES®
Bradwell Magnox NPP, United Kingdom
Cs removal and boron recovery from evaporator concentrates.
NURES® treat materials
Tajiri, H - Mimori, K - Miyajima, K. - Uchikoshi, T. - Mizubayashi, H. Tusa, E. (2000) Experience of Test Operation for Removal of Fission Product Nuclides in TRU-Liquid Waste and Concentrated Nitric Acid Using Inorganic Ion Exchangers. WM'00 Conferenc
NURES® – Technology for Radionuclide Removal | Fortum
Available publications:
Countries where NURES® is in use
0.25 - 0.85


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/news-and-publications/media-contacts
Media contacts | Fortum
pauliina
hetta
Kati Suurmunne
+358 40 720 1775
Investor Relations Manager, Financial Communications and Private Investors
Customer service
huittinen-naskali
Newsroom
mark
Financial Communications
+358 40 570 4292
(requests for interviews with the CEO)
News Desk Finland
per-oscar
Media room
Head of News Desk
+46 702 147 545
Hetta Huittinen-Naskali
Vice President, Group Communications
nora
+358400339597
Call our Newsdesk
autio
Non-urgent enquiries
Per-Oscar Hedman
News Desk Sweden
+358 40 588 9112
Nora Hallberg
hallberg
Our mailbox is monitored daily from Monday to Friday. We will answer as soon as we can.
VP, Executive Communications
Our Newsdesk is available to answer all media requests.
vuosio
News Desk
+358 50 453 2383
suurmunne
Latest news and publications
Group Communications
kati
hedman
+358 40 198 2843
Mon - Fri
newsdesk
Mark Autio
Pauliina Vuosio
9:00 - 16:00 (GMT +2)


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators
Jyväskylän Voima Oy, Finland
Turbine and Generator Services | Fortum
Turbine and generator workshops
More than just keeping your main rotating equipment in operation
Full range of services for turbines and generators
Neve, Finland
Generator maintenance and repair
Our skilled experts, optimised maintenance intervals and higher level of plant availability guarantee peace of mind
With more than 30 years of experience in providing turbine and generator services, Fortum eNext is uniquely positioned to support thermal power producers in their turbine generator maintenance management. As an OEM-independent service provider, we always offer the best technical – and most economical – solutions for each customer’s environment and needs. Our offering includes such services as turbine plant relocation, generator stator and rotor rewinding, turbine rotor re-blading, turbine casing erosion and corrosion repair, and turbine automation as well as control and protection systems modernisation. Our services are typically provided during standard minor and major overhauls, which means delivering against tight deadlines; this requires agility, first-rate project management and an extensive and specialised partner network.
An essential part of Fortum eNext’s turbine and generator expertise is providing services and modernisations for monitoring, control, and protection systems. These systems guarantee the performance of your rotating main equipment and are in a key role when looking for more visibility, reliability, and safety.
One-stop shop
Turbines and generators are special equipment whose maintenance requires special competence. A Long-Term Service Agreement (LTSA) with an experienced service provider like Fortum eNext offers comprehensive equipment lifecycle management and maintenance – from maintenance planning and inspections to overhauls and spare parts management.
Newly built, repaired or renovated rotors require dynamic balancing to ensure a safe and reliable operation. Balancing minimises the vibration transmitted from the rotor to its bearings, the stator and other surrounding equipment, thereby increasing the lifetime, reliability and efficiency of the rotating machinery.  For generator rotors in particular, electrical testing of rotor function has also become a standard practice.
Efficiency enhancements
General Manager, Sales
TURBINE MAINTENANCE
Peace of mind
Back to Fortum eNext main page
Our capabilities are built on a strong local presence in Finland, Sweden and Germany, and two dedicated workshops ready to support turbine generator owners on a global scale.
Designing and manufacturing a completely new GTP-type generator rotor
As an experienced and reliable service partner, our support extends beyond keeping your main rotating equipment in operation. We help you adapt to the turbulent energy production environment and improve your plant’s performance by ensuring efficient use of resources, optimising the service life of turbine generators, securing their availability and optimising risks to an acceptable level. This in turn drives your business growth.
mats
Fortum eNext’s turbine plant expertise covers services including small inspections, large overhauls, upgrades and modernisations. As an OEM-independent service provider, our knowledge of the world of steam and gas turbines is comprehensive.
When it comes to best-in-class lifetime management for your rotating main equipment, it's our job to offer the best technical – and most economical – solution for each specific customer environment. Explore our comprehensive services for turbine and generator maintenance, upgrades and modernisations.
BIR Avfallsenergi AS, Norway
Stay informed on Fortum eNext news and updates
Fast reaction to findings prolonged turbine major overhaul by only four weeks
Long-Term Service Agreement for turbines and generators
turbine to the grid.
What are the most common types of steam turbine failures and what kind of reasons are causing those?
Operating environment for power producers is changing rapidly: renewable energy solutions are on the rise, production facilities are aging, and production optimisation needs are driving plant owners to use rotating main equipment outside of the designed values and go from steady state operation to cyclical operation. Greater focus on cost efficiency and diminishing expertise on turbines and generators within customers’ own staff increase the challenge even further. In this environment, a partner that provides holistic support in improving the performance of customer assets is invaluable.
Managing the life cycle of high-value and high-risk turbomachinery
rombe
+46 70 385 2353
Fortum eNext has two dedicated workshops in Scandinavia, ready to support turbine generator owners.
A full range of capabilities from site service, engineering and workshops to modernisations at your use
Customised OEM-independent services based on actual equipment condition and operational priorities save both time and money
Umeå Energi, Sweden
Fortum eNext’s generator expertise is based on offering a full range of maintenance services from standard overhauls to upgrades, modernisations and delivering new components tailored to specific needs. With help from a knowledgeable partner, you can get the most from your high-value turbomachinery.
A unique service offering
Mats Rombe
Helen Oy, Finland
Download the white paper
High-speed balancing of generator rotors
Extensive experience in providing turbine and generator services
Flat
Experts and workshops close to customers
Automated remote monitoring with a real-time data stream enables instant reaction to abnormal operational situations and anomalies of turbines and generators, decreasing downtime as well as maintenance and overhaul costs efficiently. The safe and secure cloud-based solution is easy to take into use.
Explore our customer reference stories
Suzano S/A, Brazil
Prolonged generator lifetime after resolving persistent vibration issues
Modernisation of steam turbine automation brought flexibility to production
Turbine maintenance and repair
Explore our services for turbines and generators
Turbine revision returned guaranteed efficiency values
Turbine and generator control and protection systems
Remote monitoring and diagnostics for turbines and generators
From maintenance planning and optimising risk levels to implementing overhauls, modernisations and repairs, we offer a full range of services for steam and gas turbines, generators and automation and protection systems, all the way from the


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators/workshops
What we mean by re-engineering?
Read more about high-speed balancing of rotors
Turbine services both for smaller and bigger needs
Our workshop in Naantali, Finland has expertise from small to big turbine parts. The overhead crane has lifting capacity up to 50 tons.
Contact our specialist
Full-scope turbine and generator maintenance services from our workshops
Mats Sjögren
Re-engineering refers to the ability to not only reproduce, but also improve a component. This requires extensive engineering know-how and know-why, and in combination with fleet experience is a powerful tool for improving generator reliability.
Watch the video and see how we work at our Naantali workshop to provide a longer, care-free life for turbines
sjogren
Back to Fortum eNext Turbine and Generator Services main page
Reverse engineering
Generators have been produced in Västerås, Sweden, for more than 130 years. This experience, know-how and commitment now live on in Fortum eNext’s workshop, designed for full-scope generator maintenance services. The workshop is fully equipped to repair and rewind both rotors and stators. Next to the workshop facilities, Fortum eNext also operates the only independent high-speed rotor balancing facility in the Nordic countries, expanding the service capabilities even further.
The workshop in Naantali, Finland, is designed for full-scope turbine maintenance services, and is also equipped with servomotor testing and service facilities. Logistically, the workshop is in an excellent location near Naantali harbour by the Baltic Sea and close to the main road network.
+46 768 175 263
reproduce a component with its original design.
Extensive engineering capabilities
Read more about our turbine services
General Manager, Turbine and Generator Services
Extensive capabilities at our rotor balancing facility
By using reverse engineering, we ensure fast access to the necessary spare parts through modelling and in-house manufacturing.
Re-engineering
Reverse engineering refers to the ability to
Turbine and generator workshops | Fortum
What we mean by reverse engineering?
Our generator workshop in Västerås, Sweden, can balance rotors up to a limit of 110 tons and speed up to 4300 rpm.
No matter whether your equipment maintenance requires reverse engineering or re-engineering, we have the competence to help you. Thanks to our extensive experience and expertise in turbines and generators, we can serve our customers using both methodologies depending on the need.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/corporate-governance
Corporate governance at Fortum is based on Finnish laws and the company’s Articles of Association. Fortum complies fully with and has prepared this corporate governance statement in accordance with the Finnish Corporate Governance Code 2020, which is available on the website of the
Fortum's Corporate Governance Statements
Corporate Governance Statement
Well-defined and transparent corporate governance provides a structure for responsible, value-oriented performance and supervisory functions of the company. Corporate governance is an imperative that works for the benefit of Fortum's shareholders, financial markets, business partners, employees and the public. The Board of Directors and the President and CEO's responsibility for the administration and management of the company is regulated in the Finnish Companies Act, which the Finnish Corporate Governance Code supplements.
Investors: Corporate governance | Fortum
Securities Market Association
See the statements in the archive
Fortum Corporation's shares (FORTUM) have been listed on Nasdaq Helsinki since 18 December 1998. Fortum's industrial sector, according to the Global Industry Classification Standard, is Electric Utilities. The State of Finland is the majority owner in Fortum with 50.76% of the shares as of 31 December 2020.
Fortum Corporate Governance Statement 2021
Fortum prepares the consolidated financial statements and interim reports in accordance with the International Financial Reporting Standards (IFRS), as adopted by the EU, the Finnish Securities Markets Act, as well as the appropriate Financial Supervisory Authority’s regulations and guidelines and Nasdaq Helsinki’s rules. The company’s operating and financial review and the parent company financial statements are prepared in accordance with the Finnish Companies Act, Accounting Act, Securities Markets Act, and the opinions and guidelines of the Finnish Accounting Board. The Financial Statements are also published in accordance with the European Single Electronic Format (ESEF) reporting requirement. The audit firm, Deloitte Oy, has provided an independent auditor’s reasonable assurance report on Fortum’s ESEF Financial Statements in accordance with ISAE 3000 (Revised). The auditor’s report covers the consolidated financial statements and the parent company financial statements.
The corporate governance statement is issued separately from the Operating and Financial Review, and it has been reviewed by the Audit and Risk Committee of Fortum's Board of Directors.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/values/code-conduct/raise-concern
Could the action or behaviour negatively affect Fortum’s public image?
In addition to the internal reporting channels, Fortum’s externally managed SpeakUp channel is available for external stakeholders who may prefer to express their concerns anonymously.
Code of Conduct
Does the behaviour go against any laws, Fortum’s Code of Conduct, or Fortum Group's values?
SpeakUp for external users
If the answer to any of these questions is yes, or if you have a question or concern about what is considered appropriate conduct or suspect that the Code of Conduct is being violated, contact us, raise a concern, and report it.
Raise a concern | Fortum
Inside the company, if anyone has a question or concern about what is considered appropriate conduct, or if they suspect that the Code of Conduct is being violated, they can contact a manager, Fortum’s People Function, the Group Compliance Function, or Company management, or they can use our anonymous SpeakUp channel.
The concerns may relate to matters concerning accounting and financial records and practices, for instance, or to fraud and financial irregularities, securities issues (this reporting channel constitutes the independent reporting channel for reporting suspected violations of rules and regulations regarding financial markets under the Finnish Securities Markets Act, Chapter 12, Section 3), conflicts of interest, and illegal acts, including bribes.
See when and how to report
Fortum considers the misuse of any of these channels as unacceptable.
All compliance concerns raised at Fortum are reviewed according to the established internal processes. Fortum handles all reports with the highest integrity. In the investigation of compliance concerns, Fortum ensures confidentiality for all parties involved. We do not take disciplinary action against the person or persons accused of misconduct or noncompliance until the investigation process has been completed. However, making a complaint that one knows to be false is a misuse of these reporting channels and may also carry consequences.
The SpeakUp® system is available in 70+ languages and in 200+ countries.
Privacy and security are safeguarded – the infrastructure is in The Netherlands; data protection and IT security are priorities.
About SpeakUp®
Fortum SpeakUp tool is the strongly recommended channel for whistleblowers, available for all employees and externals. There is also available
five company-based whistleblowing channels
What kind of issues can you raise?
When deciding to proceed with a particular course of action, seeking advice, or reporting a possible violation, answering the following three questions may help. These questions are not exhaustive but instead aim to provide general guidance.
SpeakUp for employees
Our values
Use the SpeakUp toll-free phone lines or web services assigned to the specific country
for companies over 250 employees, as per the new EU Whistleblowing directive.
The user can leave a report via phone or web. The SpeakUp phone and web applications work in exactly the same way.
Could the action be perceived negatively by others, such as colleagues, customers, or the media?
We are all responsible for complying with legal obligations and our Code of Conduct, and for preventing and reporting any potential violations in a timely manner using the provided channels. It is the duty of Fortum’s managers to make sure that these channels are well known by all employees.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/values/code-conduct/raise-concern/country-speakup
We invite all employees and other stakeholders to raise concerns and when necessary report anonymously via SpeakUp tool. The aim should always be to improve our company in doing business the right way, responsibly.
Fortum SpeakUp tool is the strongly recommended channel for whistleblowers, available for all employees and externals. There is also available five company-based whistleblowing channels for companies over 250 employees, as per the new EU Whistleblowing directive. If you prefer to use any of these please use any of these addresses:
Country-based SpeakUp channels
FortumOyj
SpeakUp
FortumSverige
FortumWasteSolutionsOy
FortumPowerandHeatPolska
FortumPowerandHeatOy
Country-based SpeakUp channels | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/news-and-publications/covid-19-information
Task Force has organised town hall meetings with Q&A sessions for Fortum employees. In addition, Pandemic newsletters have been sent to all Fortum employees. Information on the pandemic has also been available on the corporate intranet for all employees in six languages. The practices taken into use at Fortum offices and sites to combat Covid-19 and safeguard the health of personnel include the requirement or recommendation, depending on guidelines given by the local authorities, to work remotely in those positions where a physical presence is not required.
Both companies keep on monitoring the medical situations in the countries we operate.
What happened to electricity prices?
17 May 2021, 10:05
Giving medical updates regarding testing and vaccines
Employee communication and practices during the pandemic
Fortum Executive Management support is provided by Senior Vice Presidents for People and Corporate Affairs, Safety and Sustainability.
Maintaining situational awareness regarding the pandemic
Communicating best practices and lessons learnt in tackling the pandemic at the workplace
Distanced but not alone – Fortum supports remote working
31 May 2021, 10:33
28 June 2021, 11:00
Issuing instructions for safe work arrangements at offices and sites, as well as guidance for remote working
At Fortum, excluding Uniper, the Covid-19 Task Force comprises experts from Corporate Security, Occupational Healthcare, People Function, Corporate Communications, Corporate Risk and Compliance, Public Affairs, Corporate Procurement, and the Business Technology units. The Task Force is led by the Vice President of the Security unit.
The company has implemented several measures to support employees working remotely; examples include cloud-based IT solutions and HR processes that support wellbeing and flexible mobile work arrangements.
Fortum to support Save the Children’s Covid-19 relief work in India
Hybrid work – a true win-win?
At the beginning of the pandemic, coordination teams consisting of senior management were established in both companies to closely monitor the development of the pandemic and to agree on related actions.
Blog
Following up on the requirements and recommendations issued by the local authorities in different countries
Helping our societies
12 June 2020, 11:40
COVID-19 information
News and articles related to COVID-19
07 December 2020, 08:21
Pandemic coordination at Fortum
Fortum and Uniper share a similar approach in protecting employees and operations from the effects of the Covid-19 pandemic.
In an unpredictable world, Fortum is ready – and here’s why
Brand Hub
At sites where remote work is not possible, we have implemented special precautionary measures, such as arranging staggered arrivals, breaks and lunch hours, maintaining physical distance, encouraging the use of face masks and organising enhanced cleaning. Hand disinfectants, face masks, protective gloves and disinfectant cleaning wipes are provided at Fortum offices and sites.
Read the report
22 December 2020, 10:42
Fortum’s support to Nordic societies during the Covid-19 pandemic
Societal work in the middle of a pandemic
The role of the Pandemic task Force
Covid-19 response at Fortum Group | Fortum
The Task Force supports Fortum’s business divisions and support functions by:
Load more


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/unpredictable-world-fortum-ready-and-heres-why
What surprised me when I transferred to Fortum after 40 years in military and state administration was the incredibly high work ethic of everyone working here. The amount of know-how we have across our operations is immense. There is a constant drive forward and high trust between the personnel and the top management. Credit for this must be given to CEO Markus Rauramo’s focused and strategic but also humane leadership.
For over five years, I have had the opportunity to work in an innovative, rapidly developing company – and now for a year the biggest company in Finland. During this time, Fortum has shown its ability to evolve, changing its corporate culture to meet today’s needs. The global energy business landscape continues to change, but I have strong faith that Fortum Group and its skilled people are ready to face tomorrow’s challenges and succeed.
To prepare for the move, we initiated the Fortum Way of Working, or WoW project, which changed our culture profoundly. In addition to the previously distant top management making itself more accessible, we levelled out the way of working throughout. This led to a comfortable, empowering and less tense working environment that encouraged innovation. It also gave us a push towards our strategic goal which was to broaden our business portfolio and operational flexibility and speed up the energy transition in Europe.
Hybrid working requires a new approach
Local projects
Senior Vice President, Corporate Affairs and Communications
COVID-19 was a wake-up call to the world, challenging every company to examine and reshape their ways of working. Fortum has been one of the top companies organising and carrying out Group-wide steering actions from the early stages of the pandemic. Now that we are seeing the light at the end of the tunnel, we’ve turned our attention to a hybrid working model. In our Workforce 2.0 working group, we believe that hybrid working will be a key element in tomorrow’s working life.
Get to know our bloggers
If we build on these three factors, we will make great progress in the transition. I come from a military background and find that a similar idea to the Cadet Oath holds true here, as well: those who carry out the transformation responsibly, with attention to the needs of the people, nature, the concerns of the state leadership and the society, will ultimately win.
Authors
These five years have seen a massive change process at Fortum. It was a change that the world required from us, but I am genuinely proud of what we have achieved together. As I retire from Fortum, I am confident that the company will continue to succeed, guided by modern leadership based on situational awareness, working with a hybrid model, building a responsible energy transition. I leave all this in the capable hands of my colleagues and wish everyone a wonderful summer.
Responsible energy transition means looking at the big picture
In an unpredictable world, Fortum is ready – and here’s why | Fortum
Read more posts
Arto Räty
I started my journey at Fortum five years ago, in a company that was utterly different from today’s Fortum. Fortum had recently sold its electricity distribution businesses in Finland, Sweden and Norway for over nine billion euros. There was money in the bank and ideas about the future, but the corporate culture was in need of an overhaul. Things began to change when Pekka Lundmark, with his digital mindset, took over as CEO. Fortum’s leadership culture, in particular, underwent a transformation. The head office in Finland was moved and renovated in under a year and our major offices in other countries followed soon after.
There are still many uncertainties in the energy transition. Coal is a done deal and will be phased out, we all agree on that. Natural gas as a fossil fuel is a challenge that is still partially unsolved. The best solution candidate right now is hydrogen. There are issues with commercial viability, but I strongly believe that society will solve them. In ten to twenty years, hydrogen will be a major factor and Fortum Group will be in a strong position through its expertise in the area.
Motivated, skilled people are the heart of Fortum
We are working hard to create an emission-free world, and sustainability is something we all believe in. However, there are different players in the energy sector. Some have chosen to sell off the parts of their business that cause environmental concern. Others have jumped on board with solely renewable production. We chose to focus our efforts on a controlled transition, taking equally into account sustainability considerations, security of supply and the affordability of energy.
This means that leadership culture must again change. Leading people in different locations, variably online and face-to-face, simply cannot be done in the same way as you would lead people who are all constantly at the office. Individual KPIs and support, attention to well-being and self-leadership are all vital factors of success in a hybrid working environment. So are life-long learning, re-skilling and up-skilling. The world is changing, and we will change with it, of that I have no doubt.
Member of the Executive Management team
What I believe I have brought to the company is the importance of situational awareness and clear governance, which sets mandates and coordination points, providing freedom to work independently within this framework. I’ve done my best to bring about a more relaxed way of working and stronger trust between people. Chairing both the WoW project and the Workforce 2.0 project has been a rewarding experience, showing me that if there is a will, a surprisingly quick change in the culture is possible.
To the blog frontpage


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/news-and-publications/forthedoers-blog
Eveliina Dahl
Timo Piispa
Reetta Hämäläinen
Join the dialogue on Twitter:
Monika Kuusela
Matti Kattainen
Lari Järvenpää
Ulla Rehell
Tuomas Hytönen
Receive latest topical articles and blog posts to your email
22 June 2022, 11:07
Michael Vann
17 May 2022, 12:03
25 March 2022, 10:34
Merja Paavola
Publish year
@Fortum
Pekka Lundmark
31 August 2022, 16:35
Data centers and district heating – a perfect match
Eero Vartiainen
Risto Penttinen
Sirpa-Helena Sormunen
Mikhail Mikhaylov
Mika Ylinen
Subscribe to ForTheDoers newsletter
Arun Aggarwal
A stronger role for small nuclear reactors in the future energy system
2022
Juha Ruokonen
Dmitriy Borovikov
In questions of energy availability, rely on hydro
Juha Luomala
Ilari Alapera
2017
Kari Kautinen
Truls Jemtland
Antti Kaikkonen
2020
Jukka Hautojärvi
Filter
#ForTheDoersBlog
Catarina Nauclér
Back to filters
Vesa Ahoniemi
2018
Heikki Keskiväli
Jussi Mäkelä
Paula Varhe
Kalle Saarimaa
Joonas Rauramo
Reijo Salo
Kalle Kuokka
Search
2019
Harri-Pekka Korhonen
ForTheDoers blog | Fortum
125 results found
Kristina Kinik
Viki Kaasinen
Read the blog post
Anne Malorie Geron
Mats Persson
Elba Horta
Per Langer
Sustainability collaboration in exceptional circumstances
ForTheDoers is Fortum's channel for corporate blog. Here our experts and members of our management team discuss different aspects of climate change towards a cleaner future for us and the next generations.
2021
Heidi Backman-Husenius
Konsta Värri
Mervi Hynönen
Alessandro Ferraris
Juha Kansikas
How does Fortum manage electricity price risk?
Marjut Lovio
Antti Rantakaulio
Blog author
Simon-Erik Ollus
Heli Antila
Tatu Hocksell
Jacek Ławrecki
12 September 2022, 13:24
Anssi Paalanen
Satu Poutanen
Mikko Kattelus
27 April 2022, 09:43
Shikha Mittal
Select
Tatu Kulla
-
                Select
                -
Why is electricity traded on exchanges?
Thomas Buddas
Peter Röttgen
Search with keywords


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/newsroom/forthedoers-blog/data-centres-and-district-heating-perfect-match
Naturally, the process did take some time and effort. However, if Europe wants to find alternatives for gas heating, new infrastructure will be needed in any case, no matter what solution is applied. The current electricity grid in Central Europe is not as robust as it needs to be considering the increased pressure caused by, for example, the electrification of transport. Investments must be made in both electricity and heating infrastructure if Europe is to keep up with its decarbonisation schedule.
timo
Critics may argue that data centers consume vast amounts of electricity, adding to the rapidly growing demand. However, we cannot go back to the times when hospital records and tax reports were kept in paper files. Data centers are vital for today’s society to operate and develop – so let’s make the most of them by tapping into the side streams too instead of wasting them.
Investment boost for renewables
In the growing data centre industry, operators such as Microsoft are committed to using 100% renewable energy. This means that the energy is sustainably produced, however, without heat capture it is not necessarily used efficiently. A vast majority of data centers still release the waste heat generated by their servers into the atmosphere, where it dissipates.
VP, Heating and Cooling Finland
Read more about data centres
The data centre that provides the heat also needs to be close enough to the local community so that the heat can be transferred into the system. Data transfer and electricity grid connections must be taken into account too.
The solution is extremely scalable. The project to circulate waste heat will provide heating for around 40 percent of the 250,000 residents in our district heating network. This is a major step to make our district heating system CO2 neutral. Smaller-scale versions are completely possible – we have already connected smaller centers to the network since they too need cooling. Bigger ones work just as well. The challenge is not size – it’s the location.
piispa
Also, all major data centre operators are committed to using clean energy, and by making power purchase agreements with new wind parks as they typically do, they are further boosting investment cycles and enabling more renewables. This type of modern industry is in fact promoting the energy transition – while, in this project and hopefully many others to come, creating circular economy opportunities for the energy sector. A win-win, don’t you think?
Data centers and district heating – a perfect match | Fortum
The released heat does no harm in the atmosphere – we are talking about relatively small volumes of heat energy, not emissions. But it is still wasted, when instead it could be used for district (i.e. centralised) heating. Gas is still a prevalent source of heating energy across Europe, but it could be replaced in many places by a system similar to the one we have in the Espoo, Kirkkonummi and Kauniainen area. Waste heat distributed via a district heating system is much cheaper than developing and using geothermal heat, for example, and more flexible. Capturing and using the excess heat would improve the energy efficiency of the data centre while benefiting the whole society.
In Espoo, we started out by applying for building permissions and zoning that would serve the needs of both the data centre operator and Fortum. We have worked in close collaboration with the city of Espoo and the municipality of Kirkkonummi to create an environment that is optimal for this kind of joint project.
To data centres main page
To transfer the excess heat to clients, one needs a district heating system with enough heat demand. While these are quite commonplace in the Nordics, they are much less so in continental Europe. However, this might change in the future as the transfer away from gas has become a more pressing issue due to the current geopolitical situation. New district heating systems are most likely to be built in growth areas with a sufficiently large customer base.
Location matters
We are standing at the intersection of two global megatrends: digitalisation and the energy transition. It is clear that the need to process and store data will only increase as more and more information is digitised. The demand for cloud services keeps growing and new data centers are built around the world at an increasing pace. At the same time, we continuously seek new solutions to replace fossil fuels across the energy system, as well as in other areas such as transportation. In achieving carbon neutrality in the energy system, the concept of circular economy is particularly attractive.
In March, Fortum and Microsoft announced our joint plan for a ground-breaking data centre region in the Helsinki, Finland metropolitan area. The data centres will use 100% clean electricity and the waste heat they generate will be used to heat homes, as well as business and public premises in the area. I must say I am immensely proud of this project – but I believe it’s only the beginning.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/data-centres-helsinki-region
programme, Fortum’s district heat in Finland will be produced coal-free by 2025 and carbon-neutrally before 2030. A significant part of the programme’s targets can be achieved by utilising the waste heat from Microsoft's large-scale data centers.
Important project for the regional wellbeing
Increases recreational opportunities
Director, Industrial Heat Recovery, Heating and Cooling Finland
40 percent of all district heat needed in the area. Recycling excess heat from emissions-free electricity used by the data centers will significantly
Emissions-free electricity makes district heating cleaner
of Finland’s new emission reduction target can be covered by the data centre heat
Energy market data
About 40%
Fortum and the City of Espoo have committed to carbon-neutral district heating during the 2020s in the network that operates in the Espoo, Kauniainen and Kirkkonummi regions. The development work has since been accelerated with an intermediate goal to discontinue the use of coal in 2025. The accelerated project for carbon-neutrality in 2020's is called Espoo Clean Heat.
Head of Strategy Deployment, Generation
Read more about data centers
Microsoft's data centre region not only supports climate targets but also further digitization of businesses and the whole society. They enhance local employment as well. Massive data centre investments will create local jobs and new training opportunities. A large data centre typically employs directly 100-300 people with various educational backgrounds. Indirectly, the number of new jobs is manifold – and even higher during the construction phase.
Fortum already produces district heating by utilising the waste heat from Espoo’s waste water treatment process and from three smaller data centers. Microsoft's planned data centers would enable the phase out of all coal and some gas in the region’s district heating network.
eventually provide
Reduces emissions from heating
antti
kaikkonen
Read the press release
tons of yearly CO2 emissions can be cut with the data centre heat
Supports the economy and employment
In the
Society and people
Fortum and Microsoft's data centre project advances climate targets
The project is one of a kind: there is no data centre heat recovery concept of a similar scale anywhere else in the world.
We are at the intersection of two global megatrends: digitalization and the energy transition. The demand for cloud services keeps growing and new data centers are built around the world at an increasing pace. At the same time, we seek new solutions to replace fossil fuels across the energy system, as well as in other areas. In achieving carbon neutrality in the energy system, the concept of circular economy is particularly attractive.
Data centre project benefits:
Ilkka Toijala
Fortum and Microsoft's data centre project advances climate targets | Fortum
How it works: Recycling excess heat from data centers
mitigate the region’s total emissions and helps to keep district heating price competitive.
Espoo Clean Heat
In terms of climate change mitigation and energy efficiency, it makes most sense to locate large data centers in places where the waste heat generated by the cooling of the servers can be captured and used, for example, for district heating to as many customers as possible. Therefore the location of the data centers require proximity to a district heating network, a large enough plot, access to a secure supply of carbon-neutral electricity and a strong data network.
2-3%
Microsoft along with other leading data centre operators also aim to reduce their own carbon footprint – and the easiest way to do that is by using zero-emission electricity. If waste heat from data centers is available for use in district heating network, fossil fuel-based heat can be replaced with heat from clean electricity, and the overall role of clean electricity grows. This increases not only Fortum's but also Microsoft's sustainability even further.
of the area's district heat can be provided by the new data centres
toijala
Fortum and Microsoft join forces for sustainable development
Data volumes and digitalization are growing everywhere. To accommodate this, data centre operators are looking for the best locations to build more data centers. In the Finnish capital region, Fortum and Microsoft plan to take sustainability to an entirely new level by heating buildings with excess heat from new data centers. This will reduce emissions from heating on a massive scale.
icrosoft is planning to build a data centre region
The locations of Microsoft's data centers were chosen with this in mind. M
How do data centers impact the climate?
in the cities of Espoo and Kirkkonummi, where it can
Data volumes are growing exponentially worldwide, and the use of cloud services is on the rise. This will quickly expand the need for powerful data centers. Finland has excellent opportunities to mitigate the climate impacts of digitalization: we can offer data centers clean electricity and use the waste heat generated by the centers to replace coal-based heat production.
The planned data centers require plenty of secure electricity and will have a direct power supply from Finland's electricity transmission grid, provided by Fingrid.
400,000
Transferring excess heat from data centers to buildings
Data centers provide heat to district heating customers
ilkka
Biodiversity is extremely important for Fortum, Microsoft and the cities of Espoo and Kirkkonummi. Great efforts have been made to accommodate biodiversity needs and new development as sustainably as possible. Recreational areas have also been maintained or even improved around the data centre region.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/03/fortum-and-microsoft-announce-worlds-largest-collaboration-heat-homes-services-and-businesses-sustainable-waste-heat-new-data-centre-region
17 March 2022, 10:08 EET
The concept is unique in that the location for the data centre region was chosen specifically with waste heat recycling in mind. It makes use of Fortum’s existing district heating infrastructure, the second largest in Finland, for heat capture and distribution. The infrastructure includes about 900 km underground pipes that transfer heat to approximately 250,000 users in the cities of Espoo and Kauniainen and the municipality of Kirkkonummi. Fortum has collaborated with the local cities and municipalities for several years in order to pave the way for these investments.
Fortum News Desk,
Mika Lintilä
, President of Microsoft Western Europe. “We are incredibly proud of the novel way this datacenter will sustainably power Finnish digital transformation, while also heating Finnish homes and businesses and helping cities achieve their emissions targets. In this unique collaboration, Microsoft and Fortum combine their world leading expertise in cloud computing and sustainable energy solutions, transforming the design thinking of datacenters of the future.”
Nebahat Albayrak
(
“Developing solutions for the global climate challenge together with partners is a strategic priority for Fortum, and we are proud to embark on this exceptional journey together with Microsoft. Sometimes the most sustainable solutions are simple ones: By tapping into waste heat from data centres, we can provide clean heat for homes, businesses and public buildings in Espoo’s and the neighbouring communities’ district heating network in Finland, and reduce about 400,000 tonnes of CO2 emissions annually. This is a significant step for a cleaner world, made possible by our joint ambition to mitigate climate change,” says
Once the new data centre region’s waste heat capture is in operation, a total of about 60 percent of the area’s heating will be generated by climate-friendly waste heat. Of this, 40 percent results from the data centre region and the rest from other waste heat sources such as purified waste water.
, Minister for Economic Affairs of Finland.
Fortum and Microsoft announce world’s largest collaboration to heat homes, services and businesses with sustainable waste heat from new data centre region
Communications
“The decision to invest in a data centre that also provides surplus heat to our cities and homes is a win-win. It will accelerate Finland's digital growth while making our energy system greener. I also hope that this collaboration can serve as a model to other countries and cities looking means to achieve the double transformation of climate neutrality and digital competitiveness,” says
The joint project takes place at the intersection of two megatrends: digitalisation and the energy transition. Fortum and Microsoft are bringing together world-leading expertise and innovation in heating, energy efficiency solutions and cloud technology and support the growth and competitiveness of the Helsinki metropolitan area, and of Finland, through sustainable decarbonisation and digitalisation.
Sanna Marin
, President and CEO of Fortum.
)
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 17.3.2022
“It comes naturally to us Finns to search for partnerships and solve global issues together. Fortum’s work is an excellent example of this: it has developed this project with long-term climate targets in mind and has found a world-class partner in Microsoft, says
District heating is the most popular method of heating premises in Finland. A district heating system is infrastructure used in cities that generates and captures heat and distributes it to buildings on a large scale. Heat is transferred in hot water that is pumped through pre-insulated underground pipes. The new generation of district heating is based on replacing fossil fuels with smart and flexible solutions, such as renewable electricity, heat pumps and waste heat utilisation. Artificial intelligence will optimise the operations of the entire system.
, SVP Corporate Affairs, Safety and Sustainability at Fortum.
Fortum and Microsoft have today announced a unique collaboration project, whereby Fortum will capture the excess heat generated by a new data centre region to be built by Microsoft in the Helsinki metropolitan area in Finland. The data centres will use 100% emission-free electricity, and Fortum will transfer the clean heat from the server cooling process to homes, services and business premises that are connected to its district heating system. The waste heat recycling concept from the data centre region will be the largest of its kind in the world.
, +358 40 198 2843
, Prime Minister of Finland.
“Finland is at the forefront of digitalization and innovation, and the nation’s world-class companies and forward-looking public sector organizations are leading in the digital transformation of their sectors,” says
Fortum and Microsoft announce world’s largest collaboration to heat homes, services and businesses with sustainable waste heat from new data centre region | Fortum
Cindy Rose
“If we are to limit global climate warming to 1.5°C as required by the Paris agreement, we need innovative thinking to drive change at higher pace and bigger scale. This investment in the data centre region is a flagship example of climate action and circularity. The project is the first of its kind of this size, but we hope to inspire further development in the use of waste heat to deliver clean energy,” says
Sustainable digitalisation calls for innovative thinking


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/give-us-feedback
Products and services
General feedback
Select the category
Give as feedback
The data collected (name, phone number, e-mail) is used to respond to the feedback or inquiry in question. The data will be stored for approximately 1 year and may be used in analysing what kind of feedback we get.
Yes, I want to have a copy of my feedback to my e-mail
First name
E-mail address
Give us feedback | Fortum
Telephone number
Your comments and questions on our web site are welcome. Please leave your feedback and choose one of the categories listed bellow. The required fields are marked with the red asterisk.​​​ Please notice that services and feedback forms for residental customers are available on separate local web sites.
Last name
Give us feedback
Images and documents


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/reports-and-presentations
Privacy Notice Fortum EGM 2022
pdf,
        797.56 KB
Fortum investor presentation January 2023
2008
2012
Uniper transactions
2013
1999
2015
Webcast of January-September 2022 Interim Report investor/media teleconference
Investors reports and presentations | Fortum
Q3
Category
Q2
2001
pdf,
        266.55 KB
Fortum illustrative financial net debt 6 October 2022
This archive contains financial reports, presentations and webcasts as well as sustainability reports published by Fortum. When searching for a particular publication, select a category and year to limit the number of search results. By default, the latest publication is always on the top of the list.
2002
Fortum investor presentation November 2022
Filter by category
Other investor material
pdf,
        1.13 MB
pdf,
        2.78 MB
AGM
Q4
2003
Annual Report
pdf,
        171.04 KB
Document
pdf,
        299.51 KB
Fortum Q3 2022 quarterly tables
pdf,
        106.39 KB
Capital Market Day
Written response to a shareholder’s question at Fortum Corporation’s Extraordinary General Meeting 2022
Q1
xlsx,
        707.15 KB
Fortum January−September 2022 Interim Report
Transcript of January-September 2022 Interim Report investor/media webcast
2016
pdf,
        190.51 KB
Fortum January−September 2022 Interim Report presentation material
Interim Report
pdf,
        4.32 MB
Fortum has signed a bridge financing arrangement with the Finnish state
Fortum Corporation Board Statement on Material Events
Investor presentations
External link
Quarter
pdf,
        190.93 KB
xlsx,
        287.6 KB
2007
pdf,
        175.57 KB
Advance voting form Fortum EGM 2022
pdf,
        317.5 KB
Fortum investor presentation December 2022
2005
S&P Research bulletin September 2022
2009
pdf,
        1.24 MB
Fortum restated comparison figures to reflect the divestment of Uniper
Decisions Regarding Distribution of Funds by Fortum Corporation after the end of the Latest Financial Period
Fitch Special Report Uniper Exit Is Credit Positive for Fortum September 2022
Proposal on a Directed Share Issue Without Payment
CEO presentation at Fortum Extraordinary General Meeting 2022
pdf,
        2.96 MB
Sustainability Report
pdf,
        133.03 KB
pdf,
        64.31 KB
1139 results found
2014
Chair of the Board of Directors presentation at Fortum Extraordinary General Meeting 2022
xlsx,
        21.12 KB
2011
Fortum investor presentation October 2022
Remuneration Statement
2023
Show filters
Representative of the State of Finland presentation at Fortum Extraordinary General Meeting 2022
Fortum EGM 2022 minutes of the meeting
pdf,
        2.67 MB
Voting Result upon Resolving on the Directed Share Issue without Payment at Fortum EGM 2022
Year
Credit Rating Report
pdf,
        168.45 KB
1998
2004
2006
Tax footprint


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/careers
Recycling & Waste
As a technology expert in nuclear, you could be implementing Fortum’s nuclear power projects. This means demanding tasks related to power plant operations and maintenance at our own and co-owned power plants. We support and carry out sales of world-class nuclear power services globally and actively develop new innovative products and services for our customers’ needs.
Trading
Consumer Solutions
More than an employee
Apply here
Explore how our people work for a cleaner world
Customer in the center of everything we do
Solar and wind
Our company blog written by our own experts
Opportunities for student
Looking for a trainee position, summer job or starting your thesis
The greatest challenge
Tony works in the Waste to Material Program.
What's your area of expertise?
Recycling and waste services
Solar & Wind
Hydro power
District heating
We have total of 159 hydropower plants in Finland and Sweden. Added to this we are co-owner in several hydro power plants. We believe hydropower is a necessary form of electricity production in the transition to a sustainable society. Working with its development is being a part of creating a cleaner world and a carbon-free future.
Our vision and strategy
Heating and Cooling main operations in Finland are within Espoo district heating network area where we produce both heating and cooling and thereby related products and services to our customers. We are currently in a major transformation phase where achieving our Clean Heat targets are reshaping our operating environment and ways of working extensively. In Espoo Clean Heat implementation, we play an instrumental role in advancing projects towards coal phase out by 2025 and decarbonized heating and cooling production within this decade.
Our nuclear expertise covers the whole life-cycle of nuclear power plants
Do you want to work in our consumer business?
Trading and Asset Optimisation (TAO) organisation optimises the best price for electricity production and consumption and hedges earnings from these operations with commodity derivatives far into the future. About 95 TWh of physical electricity trading and about 200 TWh of trading in commodity derivatives pass through TAO each year.
Meet us
Leading the change towards optimal use of resources
Do you want to take an active role for a cleaner world?
Are you a student?
"I have to admit, it's pretty neat to be part of this. I used to play in rock bands which was great, but the impact here is just somewhat different."
Career in renewable and clean energy
The world needs curious changemakers to solve the greatest challenge of our time. At Fortum, we are securing a fast and reliable transition to a carbon-neutral economy with clean energy and sustainable solutions. Our people are at the heart of making this happen.
The core of our business is to provide electricity and related value-added services as well as new digital services to both private and enterprise customers. In Consumer Solutions we work across brands, countries and campuses, but all towards the same goal – making our customers happy. Through cross-functional collaboration, sustainability focus, as well as agile and lean working methods, we strive to make our customers’ increasingly digital lives easier with our services.
Life at Fortum
Check out our open positions and apply now!
Our nuclear expertise covers the whole life-cycle of nuclear power plants, from new builds to decommissioning and final disposal of nuclear waste. We actively manage and develop our co-owned nuclear assets in the Nordics and offer services to the nuclear industry globally.
Career at Fortum
Meet Bóas – one of our passionate and curious people. Check out how Bóas is working with his team in revolutionizing battery recycling. Other faces of transition and their stories can be found
Read the blog
We care about our people inside and outside of office hours because they are important at work but irreplaceable at home. A safe and healthy working environment is a priority for us, and a holistic approach to wellbeing is part of our culture.
Vision and strategy
Get to know us better
Decarbonizing heating and cooling
Career at Fortum | Fortum
Within consumer business you have an opportunity to work with our electricity and gas retail businesses in the Nordics, Poland, and Spain, including the customer service and invoicing businesses.
Seize the opportunity to join a rapidly growing business and take on a position with great responsibility and possibility to influence further growth – both ours and yours.
With our strategy we drive the change for a cleaner world
Yu-Hsuan and Gabriella talk about their work in the heart of the energy market.
Loviisa nuclear power plant has been producing electricity safely for over 40 years. The power production covers ~10% of Finland’s electricity production. Loviisa NPP employs over 500 engaged people who ensure safe and reliable energy production.
As a reliable, CO2-free energy source, nuclear power helps to satisfy today’s increasing electricity needs while mitigating climate change. Fortum has over 40 years of experience designing, licensing, and operating nuclear facilities and supplying related services and technologies.
CO₂-free, renewable energy is the way forward
IT, digitalization & innovation
FAQ
Hydropower is the backbone of the Nordic energy system. It is a steady source of power that produces no CO2 emissions. And with only water as an input, the low operating costs of hydropower stabilise the price of electricity for everyone.
We provide district heating in a number of cities in the Nordic countries, Poland and Russia. District heating is a convenient and reliable form of heating. It is also good for the environment, since the heat increasingly comes from recycled energy.
Fortum’s Wind and Solar organisation is responsible for the development of wind and solar business. Our aim is to grow especially in our home market where conditions for wind power are excellent. Wind and solar power play a crucial role in decarbonisation of our societies.
To reach our goals, we embrace a culture of openness. We believe that diversity and inclusion inspire all of us to innovate and grow together. Therefore, we are committed to building teams where everyone feels included and is treated equally.
Digital payment
Our people and culture
With us, you can take an active role in driving the change for a cleaner world. We offer great opportunities for people with different sets of skills and backgrounds. You can be an experienced energy expert or new to the industry. We value your curiosity and will to make your impact visible where it matters – keeping societies running with clean energy and sustainable solutions.
More about our recruitment process & contact
We operate in several commodity exchanges such as Nasdaq Commodities and ICE, as well as physical electricity markets, Nord Pool and TGE (Polish Power Exchange). We also operate Fortum's hydro plants to enable the total optimisation of our hydro fleet in the volatile energy market. An in-depth understanding of the electricity business and market knowledge are essential parts of TAO's business. In addition, TAO Ventures pilots new start-ups such as Fortum Spring.
Digitalization is a key-enabler in the transition for a cleaner world
Power trading services
The greatest challenge of our time awaits you
Meet Jorge, our Agile Coach working in Business Technology.
In-depth understanding of the electricity business
A culture that helps you succeed
Hear Helena talking about her job as Dam Safety Engineer.
The Business Technology community is a diverse group of people with multiple skills and backgrounds: innovation, startups, software development, data management, IT, cyber security, design, project management and business relationships, are just a few examples of what your work with us could entail.
Hydro
Collaboration partners
Our 400+ employees in Business Technology support Fortum in becoming a digital winner in the age of electricity. Join us in supporting our businesses, improving and transforming their operations through digital technologies, innovating everywhere and commercializing our innovations and ideas to generate new businesses or revenue streams. Our work truly impacts the whole of Fortum.
Working at fortum
Heating & Cooling
Get to know your future colleagues
Explore open jobs
We lead the change towards a low-emission energy system and optimal use of resources. Our goal is to support our customers’ business by conserving natural resources and promoting circular economy. We work together with our customers to build smart and sustainable solutions for ensuring the circulation of valuable materials and the removal of harmful substances from the material cycle​.
here


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/careers/meet-our-people
Meet our people | Fortum
Interested to know what it's like to work at Fortum? Hear our employees talking about their purpose, the company culture, and what inspires them in their daily work.
Meet our people
Enabling the production of fossil free energy brings purpose for Helena’s work. As a Dam Safety Engineer in hydro power, she is able to work with varying assignments in one of a kind environment.
Yu-Hsuan, Portfolio Manager and Gabriela, Power Market Analyst feel that working in the heart of the energy market requires creativity and problem-solving skills. A good team spirit makes a real difference.
Caroline works as a Project Portfolio Manager in Fortum's wind and solar business. In her job she is able to work for her passion of building a more sustainable society.
Explore jobs here
Emmi works as a Sales Manager in Fortum's Heating & Cooling business. Interacting with customers and working for a more sustainable future - this is the power duo that inspires Emmi in her job.
As an Agile Coach Jorge aspires to help others to do their job more efficiently. For him it’s important that he is able to combine the different roles he has - as an Agile coach at Fortum and as a dad.
Tony works as a Program Director in Waste to Material program at Fortum. For Tony, trust and respect are present in their small startup-like team, but he also feels that the company culture enables him to work at his best.
Interested to join our team? We are constantly looking for new talent!


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/all-contacts/fortums-offices
Level 6, DLF Cyber City, Phase 2
FRANCE
11415 Tallinn
Gurgaon 122002, Haryana
Bo'ness Road, Grangemouth
sanjay
Fortum Finance B.V. (FF BV)​
RU-454090 Chelyabinsk
Tel. +33 1 7092 3814
Utilities Control Building
Contacts:
Lõõtsa 2 B, 5th floor
verena
Tel. +372 5565 8961
75009 Paris
Lenina prospekt 28 D
Fortum locations
INDIA
Fortum Generation AB
Fortum's offices
Deilbachtal 173
Fortum France SAS
ul. Antoniego Slonimskiego 1A
Tel: +49 173 601 5436
Shannon, Co. Clare, V14 E370​
P.O.Box 100
GB-STIRLINGSHIRE FK3 9XQ
SWEDEN
Fortum Corporation (headquarter)
GREAT BRITAIN
ul. Harc. A. Gradowskiego 3a
Peterborough
Fortum Norway
10 Presnenskaya emb., 10 Tower B
ul. Emilii Plater 53
Tel. +48 71 340 55 50
FI-00048 FORTUM
Kuulojankatu 1
RU-123317 MOSCOW
Fortum India Pvt. Ltd.
0277 Oslo, NORWAY
Fortum Finance Ireland DAC (FFI DAC)​
Sanjay Aggarwal
18 Rue de Londres
daniel
50-304 Wroclaw
ESTONIA
Tel. +358 10 4511
Shannon Airport House, Shannon Industrial Estate ​
42-200 Czestochowa
aggarwal
Franziusstraße 2
ul. Rejtana 37/39
SE-169 68 SOLNA
+91 124 441 8800
Fortum TGS Germany GmbH
Tel. +47 21 49 69 10 (customer service)
4822 NK Breda​
Estonia
Tel. +7 495 788 4588
09-402
Verena Quiskamp, Sales Manager
Tel. +358 10 7551 000
Belgium
Peterscourt
City Road
Your browser does not support iframes, but you can visit
All contacts
Tel. +46 8 671 70 00
Fortum Power and Heat Oy
France
Fortum Hedging AS
Fortum Oslo Varme
brueckner
Keilalahdentie 2-4 (CD building), Espoo
Managing Director, Fortum India
Askekroken 11
kontakt
quiskamp
Rue de la Loi 227
FI-11120 RIIHIMÄKI
RUSSIA
Tel. +48 24 366 04 51
Fortum Markets AB
Tel. +48 22 460 46 70
PE1 1SA
Eco-Innovation Centre
40219 DÜSSELDORF
Fortum Power and Heat Polska Sp. z o.o
Tel: +49 160 571 7720
Fortum Deutschland SE
GERMANY
Great Britain
00-113 Warszawa
The Oberoi Centre, Building No. 11
Tel. +47 22 43 59 80 (customer service)
BELGIUM
Lage Mosten 55
Registered office: 24 Old Queen Street, London, SW1 9HP. Company registration number 2564354
Fortum O&M (UK) Ltd
The Netherlands
Fortum Sverige AB
Fax. +7 495 788 4589
Fortum Service Deutschland GmbH
Rättarvägen 3
India
Daniel Brückner, General Manager
45257 ESSEN
Ireland
FortumDeutschlandSE
Fortum Waste Solutions Oy
PAO Fortum
Grangemouth CHP Plant
Fortum Eesti AS
Our offices | Fortum
B-1040 BRUSSELS
P.o. Box 30
Fortum Consumer Solutions AS


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/investor-relations
Investor Relations Specialist, meeting requests
+49 172 7512480
+358 50 478 5645
If you would like to be included in the distribution list of our releases, please fill out the subscription form
liflander
investors
Subscribe
Investor relations
Carlo Beck
Contacts
+358 40 643 3317
Contacts: Investor Relations and Financial Comm| Fortum
ulfves
pirjo
Investor Relations Specialist
ingela
lehmuskumpu
Visiting address: Keilalahdentie 2-4, 02150 Espoo, Finland
+358 10 453 6150
rauno
beck
Heidi Lehmuskumpu
Subscribe to releases
tiihonen
heidi
Investor Relations and Financial Communications
Investor Relations Manager
or send email to
Vice President, Investor Relations and Financial Communications
carlo
Rauno Tiihonen
+358 40 515 1531
Pirjo Lifländer


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/media/subscribe-releases
Preferred feeds
Please fill in the form below and follow the instructions on the next page.
Suomeksi
Language
Get our latest news and releases delivered to your e-mail.
Press releases
Subscribe to press and stock exchange releases
English
Subscribe to press and stock exchange releases | Fortum
Investor news


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/all-contacts
Public affairs handles issues related to current and upcoming energy-related policies and legislations.
Plants, sites and offices
Electricity and heating
Contact Fortum | Fortum
Public Affairs
If you are experiencing a power outage, please contact your local electricity distribution company for more information. Fortum does not operate electricity networks any longer.
To find the customer service contact information related to your electricity and heating contracts, please visit our local sites by choosing the right country from the globe icon on top of the page.
For general inquiries, please contact our switchboard, tel. +358 10 4511.
Sustainability is an essential part of our company. If you have questions or would like to leave feedback on our sustainability, environmental or safety efforts and conduct, you can find the right contacts here.
At Fortum’s Investor relations, easy access and transparency are essential values in our communication. You can find contact information for IR and Financial communications here.
Public Affairs contacts
Contact Fortum
Headquarters
Frequently asked questions
Investor Relations contacts
You can find your local office here.
We reply to enquiries from the media through telephone and email. You can find all our media and communications contacts here.
Recycling & Waste contact
+358 10 4511
Fortum Group
Find the contact information for our sales people in solar solutions, recycling and waste, power solutions, nuclear services and electricity supply here.
See a map and detailed instructions on how to get to our head office
Sustainability contacts
Recycling and waste sites
Fortum's new headquarters is situated at Keilalahdentie 2-4, 02150 Espoo, Finland, near the Länsiväylä motorway. We recommend arriving by public transport or taxi. If you take the metro, nearest stop is called Keilaniemi. Bus stops are located on Länsiväylä, walking distance away.
We have recycling and waste business in Nordic. You can find our recycling and waste sites as well as contact information here.
Keilalahdentie 2-4, CD building
Our customer service for waste solutions in Finland, Sweden and Denmark is here to help you with any inquiries you might have related to our recycling and waste services. You can find the right contact details here.
Offices
Recycling and waste
02150 Espoo, Finland
Media and communications
There is a power outage. Who do I contact?
Investor relations and financial communications
Power plants
How to get to our new head office?
We have core operations in 10 countries. You can find all our power plant contacts here.
See a map and instructions on how to get to our head office


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/sustainability/sustainability-contacts
ulla
Sustainability contacts | Fortum
+358 40 742 8814
rehell
paatelainen
+358 50 383 9426
Contact us on any questions or inquiries related to sustainability at Fortum.
Vice President, Sustainability
Leena Paatelainen
Assistant, Sustainability
leena


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/sustainability
Read more from the Sustainability report
Fortum was ranked 22nd overall and the best of the Finnish companies in the European Women on Boards Gender Diversity Index 2021
The
of own personnel and contractors remains Fortum’s top priority, and in 2021 we launched the Safety Ground Rules to support the improvement of Fortum’s safety performance. Together with Uniper, we also initiated the alignment of several key safety processes.
The number of major voluntary measures enhancing biodiversity conducted in 2021
Scope 3 greenhouse gas emissions reduction by 35% by 2035 at the latest (compared to base-year 2021)
continued in 2021, and Fortum’s top priorities were to ensure the health and safety of its employees and contractors and to maintain business continuity. These goals were well achieved.
Why have Fortum’s carbon dioxide emissions increased in 2021?
Our climate targets
is proceeding well. Fortum’s strategic priority is to transform our own operations to carbon neutral. We have committed to the carbon neutral (Scope 1, 2 and 3) target globally, in line with the goals of the Paris Agreement, by 2050, and in our European generation (Scope 1 and 2) by 2035.
13
biodiversity target
What is the role of diversity and inclusion in Fortum?
We have made decisions to replace Russian fuels in our other operating countries. In Finland, we do not buy fossil fuels, pellets or biomass from Russia for our power plants in Espoo and Meri-Pori. Fortum buys nuclear fuel for its Loviisa nuclear power plant in Finland from the Russian TVEL (part of Rosatom); it is not possible to quickly change suppliers, due to e.g. the required certification and permitting processes. The fuel agreement with the Russian TVEL is valid until the end of the current operating licences, i.e. 2027 and 2030. In spring 2022, Fortum applied for a new operating licence for both Loviisa power plant units until 2050, and announced that a tendering process will be arranged for fuel supply for the new operating licence period. In November 2022
Sustainability report 2021
The exceptional conditions caused by the
Fortum published its first Climate Lobbying Review; Fortum wants to be a forerunner in driving greater corporate transparency and accountability relating to climate change advocacy
Will Fortum stop imports of gas, coal and nuclear fuel from Russia?
Sustainability report highlights
Biodiversity target achieved; Fortum conducted 13 major voluntary measures that improve the living conditions of species and strengthen populations
New reduction target for Scope 3 greenhouse gas emissions; 35% by 2035 at the latest (compared to base-year 2021)
In addition to the climate targets, Fortum had a
emissions (Scope 1 and 2) in European generation by at least 50% by 2030 (compared to base-year 2019)
However, our climate targets remain. Our target is to be carbon neutral in our European generation already in 2035 and in our operations globally in 2050 at the latest, in line with the goals of the Paris Agreement. We also developed a new target for the reduction of indirect Scope 3 greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions, which play a significant role in our total greenhouse gas emissions
In alignment with the EU’s ambition and the goals of The Paris Agreement, we target carbon neutrality by 2050 at the latest and in our European fleet already by 2035.
The safety of own personnel and contractors remains Fortum’s top priority; in 2021 we launched the Safety Ground Rules to support the improvement of Fortum’s safety performance
to drive the clean energy transition forward and our
What is your hybrid work approach? How are Fortum people doing?
The share of employees that feel they can influence their work, according to a wellbeing survey
We continue to
Reduction of Scope 3 GHG emissions by 35% by 2035 at the at the latest (compared to base-year 2021)
coal-exit
for the design, licensing, and supply of a new fuel type for the Loviisa power plant. The agreement supports Fortum’s aim to strengthen the security of energy supply; the experiences gained from the use of the new fuel will create prerequisites for successful fuel tendering.
Carbon neutral globally (Scope 1, 2 and 3 emissions), in line with the goals of the Paris Agreement, by 2050 at the latest
The survey results show that we have improvement areas. However, we have also made progress. Fortum was the best among the Finnish listed companies in the European Women on Boards (EWoB) Gender Diversity Index, ranking at 22/668. Fortum also had the biggest improvement in gender diversity in top management positions among the Finnish companies. Of all executive positions at Fortum, 44% are currently held by women, while 57% of the members of the Board of Directors and 33% of the members of the Management Team are women.
86%
We are devastated and saddened by Russia’s attack on Ukraine. Both Fortum and Uniper have communicated about business decisions made due to the geopolitical situation. The current developments have added a new variable to the equation of sustainability, affordability, and security of supply of power, which is independence. This is something we will have to consider across Europe as we move forward with the energy transition.
safety
Our coal-exit is proceeding well and within less than one year, we have been able to announce accelerated coal phase-out of six of our coal-fired power plants in Germany and the UK compared to the original timetable. By 2030, Fortum will phaseout or exit about 8 GW of coal-fired power generation. We will also strengthen and grow in CO2-free power generation. Our target is to build 1.5–2 GW of new renewable energy capacity by 2025.
The exceptional conditions caused by the Covid-19 pandemic continued in 2021, and the safety of own personnel and contractors remained Fortum’s top priority. Employee wellbeing programmes highlighted topics related to mental energy, resilience, and physical health. Fortum also launched the Safety Ground Rules to support the improvement of Fortum’s safety performance.
More than two thousand employees conducted the holistic wellbeing assessment. The survey gives a wide overview of the wellbeing status at the individual level but it’s also a tool for developing the wellbeing at the different levels of the organisation. The results of this survey were strong in the areas of life enjoyment, work performance, core wellbeing at work; e.g., 76% of the respondents feel that the work they do is meaningful to them and 86% feel they can influence their work.
Diversity and inclusion are key to our long-term success as a company in all our markets. The diversity, equity, and inclusion (DEI) survey conducted by Boston Consulting Group and United Nations Women showed that 93% of Fortum respondents see DEI as critical for future competitiveness, 84% report that our culture is inclusive and 56% believe that Fortum has a clear diversity and inclusion strategy and objectives.
In 2021, Fortum continued to implement its strategy to drive the clean energy transition forward. Fortum’s strategic priority is to transform our own operations to carbon-neutral. We have committed to the carbon neutral (Scope 1, 2 and 3 emissions) target globally, in line with the goals of the Paris Agreement, by 2050 at the latest. In addition, we have the following ambitious climate targets:
Year 2021 in short
Learn more about our sustainability performance in 2021
Covid-19
Reporting entity 2021
We designed Fortum’s hybrid work principles in which we recommend our workforce to work and collaborate at least two days in the office and the rest of the workweek based on the team’s decision and preferences. Flexibility is the key in the model, and we believe in collaboration and physical meetings.
After the drop in 2020, energy consumption in our market areas increased in 2021 as economies recovered and societies learned to cope with the Covid-19 pandemic. For securing the electricity supply, authorities ordered that reserve coal power be taken into use in Germany. This together with the recovered economy and increased fossil-based power generation in Europe and Russia resulted in an increase in our direct Scope 1 emissions.
Sustainability Highlights 2021
implement our strategy
Sustainability report highlights | Fortum
Reduction of CO2 emissions (Scope 1 and 2) in European generation by at least 50% by 2030 (compared to base-year 2019)
Carbon neutral (Scope 1 and 2) in European generation by 2035 at the latest
What are the key topics on Fortum’s sustainability agenda?
for 2021, which was achieved by conducting 13 major voluntary measures that improve the living conditions of species and strengthen populations. During 2022, our target is to develop a science-based strategy to measure and enhance the biodiversity impacts of the Group’s operations and new developments.
Sustainability report lander
Sustainability report
Transform our own operations to carbon neutral
Reduction of CO
Fortum continued Workforce 2.0, a strategic initiative to analyse what structural long-term changes we need to implement in our ways of working. The initiative collaborated to some extent with Uniper’s equivalent initiative called NeNo – New Normal.
Our Annual Reporting 2021
In Finland, we will not buy coal, pellets or biomass for our power plants in Espoo and Meri-Pori from Russia for the time-being. For our Loviisa nuclear power plant in Finland, we currently procure fuel from the Russian fuel company TVEL. The current contract is valid until the end of our current operating licenses, i.e. until 2027 and 2030. Currently the plant has nuclear fuel in storage for up to two years. There are also alternative suppliers in the market that can cater for Loviisa.
Fortum achieved its 2021 biodiversity target of conducting a minimum of 12 major voluntary measures that improve the living conditions of species and strengthen populations. Adding to our existing climate targets, Fortum set a new target to reduce Scope 3 greenhouse gas emissions by 35% by 2035 at the latest (compared to base-year 2021).
Sustainability 2021
pandemic
Fortum signed an agreement with Westinghouse Electric Company


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal/privacy
About our use of cookies
Fortum Legal
Denmark
Contract comparison
Further information and contacts
We take data protection and people´s privacy very seriously. At all times, Fortum processes personal data in a manner that ensures information security.
You can
We collect data which is necessary for the relationship you have with us; for example, if you are becoming a customer, visiting our online services or looking for a job.
We use cookies or similar techniques on our websites.
Services for customers
Privacy notice for job applicants
Privacy notices
Learn more about our Privacy Policy
Personal data is always bound to confidentiality and the access is limited only to authorized persons within Fortum and its partners. We fulfil the necessary technical and organizational measures, to ensure that privacy is respected.
Privacy notice for customers
Privacy notice for employees
If you accept all cookies the website works as expected and you will have access to all the functions on our website.
Common for all our personal data processing is that it is carried out with appropriate safeguards and following the fundamental principles in data protection legislation.
Read our privacy notices.
Limitation of data
You will find your local privacy information at the company's website:
Personal data protection | Fortum
Our protective actions
Our Privacy Policy is to be followed by all Fortum divisions and functions and by suppliers and external persons working for Fortum.
We offer various services and products in our different markets. For local information on what personal data we collect and process in our different applications and services and exercising your rights, please go to our local sites.
to send questions and comments regarding Fortum’s privacy approach.
View
You have the opportunity to accept all cookies from the cookie banner visible at the bottom when you enter the website or you can enter the cookie preference centre to choose which cookies you activate and which ones you keep inactive.
Fortum Group Privacy Policy
Learn more about how Fortum Group companies process and use your personal information in Fortum’s Privacy Notice below. Find more detailed information about customer data processing and contact details from your local companies’ sites.
We monitor the access rights so that only the authorized persons have access to the personal data. We use firewalls, pseudonymisation of data, provide detailed instructions and training for personnel on the protection of personal data, and we carefully select our service providers.
Contact Privacy Office
Individual data
Data privacy in our different markets
We need to collect and treat your personal data for many different purposes and in several ways. For example, we collect information in the relationship we have with you to manage our customer relationships, employment relationships, or other business relationships we have with our external stakeholders.
How do we protect your data?
Fortum takes privacy seriously and complies with privacy laws. As a result, customers, employees, and other stakeholders can trust that we manage data privacy correctly and transparently. Ensuring the individual's right to data protection is embedded in Fortum's shared corporate values of curiosity, responsibility, respect and integrity, which form the ethical basis for all work at Fortum.
Learn more about our privacy approach in our Privacy Notice below.
We care about your privacy
A clear purpose for the information collected
Fortum processes personal data only for specified, explicit and legitimate purposes and only when valid legal grounds exist.
What data do we collect?
Read more and manage cookies
Privacy notice for Suppliers and Externals
You are also able to reach Fortum’s Data Protection Officer through the channels provided above.
Confidentiality and information security
Your personal information usually reach us through our customer relationship. Examples of personal information are name and contact information, billing address or IP address.
We take your data privacy seriously. Below, you can find information about how we collect, process and use the data which you provide to us.
How do Fortum Group companies process personal data?
Contact information


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal/privacy/fortum-group-privacy-policy
Fortum processes personal data transparently
Fortum Group Privacy Policy | Fortum
Business ethics
The division heads are responsible that appropriate processes are in place and adequate resources are available to fulfil and monitor privacy compliance requirements.
Data privacy
Privacy embedded in Fortum´s business operations
Fortum processes personal data only for specified, explicit and legitimate purposes, and only when there are valid legal grounds for it. When acting as a controller and selecting new suppliers and other partners, Fortum pays special attention to the suppliers' ability to comply with the data protection laws. When acting as a processor, Fortum is committed to processing personal data in accordance with the data protection laws and the documented instructions of the controller.
Fortum has a line responsibility in privacy compliance governance. The management of the divisions and the Group functions, and ultimately the President and CEO and the Board of Directors, are accountable for privacy compliance at Fortum.
Fortum takes privacy seriously and complies with the privacy laws. Customers, employees and other stakeholders can trust that we manage data privacy in a correct and transparent way. Ensuring the individual's right to data protection is embedded in Fortum's shared corporate values of curiosity, responsibility, respect and integrity, which form the ethical basis for all work at Fortum.
Corporate Privacy Office is responsible for managing and monitoring privacy at the Group level. This includes the Privacy Policy and related Group-level instructions and manuals. Corporate Privacy Office is also responsible for monitoring the policy implementation and for performance reporting on a monthly, quarterly and annual basis.
Latest updated: 1 May, 2018
The President and CEO is responsible for privacy in Fortum and approving the Group Instructions for Privacy.
This policy is reviewed on an as-needed basis by the Fortum Executive Management (FEM). Any amendments to this policy are approved by the Board of Directors.
All Fortum employees and external persons working for Fortum have the responsibility to comply with privacy related laws, regulations and all Fortum's instructions.
For Fortum, transparency regarding the processing of any personal data is part of our business conduct. Fortum runs its business with a high ethical manner and provides transparent information about the purposes of data processing to customers, employees and other stakeholders. Fortum offers all stakeholders the opportunity to influence the processing of their personal data.
Requirements set in local data protection laws and regulations shall be duly complied with. The data protection principles and rights of the individual that Fortum endorses in the area of privacy are further explained at Fortum's website www.fortum.com.
Learn how we collect, process and use the data
Fortum demonstrates its compliance
Our Privacy Policy is to be followed by all Fortum divisions and functions, as well as by suppliers and external persons working for Fortum.
Fortum’s Board of Directors approves the Privacy Policy and reviews Group's annual privacy performance and reporting.
Fortum ensures that all customers, employees and other stakeholders can trust that Fortum takes privacy seriously and complies with the privacy laws. Ensuring the individual's right to data protection is embedded in Fortum's shared corporate values of curiosity, responsibility, respect and integrity, which form the ethical basis for all work at Fortum.
The Fortum Group Policy for Privacy is defined in this document, which is endorsed by Fortum's Board of Directors, and is to be followed by all Fortum divisions and functions and by suppliers and external persons working for Fortum.
Fortum respects the rights of the individuals in terms of personal data processing and by providing information transparently; individuals are able to exercise control over their personal data. Fortum does not process individual's personal data in ways that have not been communicated to the individual, nor collects unnecessary data not needed for providing and developing our services.
Responsibilities
Privacy at Fortum
At all times, Fortum processes personal data in a manner which ensures information security. Personal data is always bound to confidentiality and the access is limited only to authorized persons within Fortum and its partners.
Privacy notice for consultants and vendors
Fortum is committed to demonstrating its compliance with the data protection laws, during the whole data processing cycle. Fortum takes actions to show compliance with the data protection laws by documenting and processing personal data systematically.
Excellence in data privacy is incorporated in our strategy and is an essential part of business operations. Fortum is committed to constantly improve compliance and business processes, when exploring new data-driven opportunities to serve our customers.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal/privacy/privacy-notice-job-applicants
Mergers and acquisitions
9. Cookies
– We will disclose your data to competent authorities, such as the police, to the extent required by law. We may also disclose your personal data in relation to legal proceedings or at the request of an authority on the basis of applicable law or court order or in connection with a trial or authority process or as otherwise required or permitted by law
Fortum company
Fortum Group companies:
Right to restrict the processing
The controller of your personal data is typically the local
Some of our service providers and group companies operate internationally, which means that data is occasionally located outside of the European Economic Area. When personal data is transferred outside the EU or the EEA, Fortum uses appropriate safeguards, such as the standard contractual clauses provided by the European Commission. You can obtain more information about the transfers by contacting our
to whom you have submitted your application, and Fortum Corporation. If you want to exercise your rights or have any queries about the processing of your personal data, kindly contact
– You can ask information about you to be corrected if it is not accurate or needs to be updated.
Personal details:
Authentication information:
Local privacy sites
How to lodge a complaint - If we do not take action in accordance with your requests, we will inform you of the reasons. If you are not satisfied with our response, or with the way we handle personal data, please contact us using the
or contact our
When we use automated decision-making with legal or similarly significant effects on you, we will inform you in advance. If such automated decision-making is not authorized by legislation or necessary for the performance or entering into a contract, we will ask for your consent.
– In certain circumstances, you have the right to have the processing restricted.
including your contact details (such as your name, address, phone number, and email address), demographic data (such as your gender, age, language and citizenship).
data that is collected with cookies or similar technologies about your use of services, including your IP address, cookie ID and mobile device ID.
The main purposes for which we process personal data are listed below:
our cookie policy
People Services
. If you are still unhappy, you can contact the national data protection authority.
such as recruitment agencies, your references and previous employers, medical or health check providers and authorities or other parties providing background and credit checks. We will obtain your consent for such collection when required by applicable law.
You can address any further questions and comments regarding your privacy, including contact with the Data Protection Officer, by using the
7. Does Fortum transfer personal data to third countries?
Contents
When you use our services or visit our websites, Fortum can collect data about your devices using cookies and other similar techniques. Our website may also include cookies and other similar technologies used by third parties. You can get more information about how to manage cookies by reading
12. Controller of your personal data and contact details
customer service
Group companies
If you have any questions about your rights or want to exercise them, please choose one of the options listed below.
Recruitment information:
Fortum has appointed a Data Protection Officer, whom you may contact by using the contact details given in this chapter.
Right to object to the processing
Third parties
such as proof of identity and your national identity number.
Fortum reserves the right to amend this Privacy Notice. Possible amendments to the Privacy Notice will be notified about on our website, or by communicating directly to you.
Recruitment and resourcing:
when you create an account in our recruitment portal, submit us your application or resume or when you otherwise interact with us.
Online data & identifiers:
Authorities, legal proceedings and law
Right to withdraw your consent
. Alternatively, you can contact our
The personal data which we process about you comes from different sources:
15/7/2022
may use your personal data for the purposes defined in this notice based on a legitimate interest to the extent permitted by applicable law.
6. Who can access your personal data?
local customer service
Fortum collects and processes various types of personal data, including:
5. How long does Fortum store your personal data?
Legal obligations:
You can also delete your candidate account or withdraw your application anytime.
such as your application and resume, interview information, video interviews, references from previous employers and other third-party references, information about your competencies, qualifications, skills, work experience, and education. As we take steps prior to entering into a possible employment contract, we may also collect results of the necessary health, drug, background, psychometric, and aptitude tests and credit checks depending on the position for which you are applying, and where necessary for the recruitment activities.
chapter 6
Security of our services and others:
10. Your rights and how to exercise them
privacy contact form
– You are able to take with you the personal data you provided to us. A selected set of the data is delivered in a machine-readable format, where the basis of processing has been consent.
Keilalahdentie 2-4, 02150 Espoo
Creating an employee record:
If Fortum hires you, the personal data you have given during the application process may become part of your employee record and be used to manage your career at Fortum.
– Fortum may share your personal data with authorized third parties who process personal data for Fortum for the purposes described in this Statement. These may include recruitment consultants, test providers, and others who help us fill vacancies and assess the suitability of job applicants. These authorized third parties are not permitted to use your personal data for any other purposes. We require them to act consistently with this Statement and to use appropriate measures to protect your personal data.
Fortum Group companies
Where applicable, we may share your personal data with:
To manage cookies – If you want to manage cookies on our websites use the controls set out in
We will use your personal data for predefined purposes based on legitimate interest and legal obligation. Also, we may use your personal data based on your consent in addition to reliance on a legitimate interest (this especially if additional consents are needed under applicable law).
2. How does Fortum collect information about you?
4. Automated decision-making
Right to correct personal data
, or in writing to the address below:
Right to data portability
You have the following rights regarding personal data that Fortum processes about you. Some rights may not be applicable for example if the data cannot be connected to you.
retention schedule
We process personal data to comply with our legal obligations, for example, accounting and tax laws.
11. Changes to this privacy notice
Third parties:
1. What data does Fortum process?
Subcontractors
– You have the right to be informed about the processing that we do and to request a copy of your personal data.
Fortum Corporation, including its subsidiaries, is committed to respecting your privacy and complying with applicable data privacy laws. This Privacy Notice informs you about how Fortum handles personal data it collects about you in connection with Fortum’s recruitment and resourcing activities.
Privacy notice - Job applicants
– You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data on Fortum’s legitimate interests such as developing of our recruitment process.
We use your personal data to contact you, for instance, to inform you about the status of your application or to obtain additional information. We also use your personal data to set up and conduct interviews and assessments, evaluations, reference, credit and background checks as permitted by applicable law.
– Our
We may use your personal data to improve and develop our recruitment processes and other related services, and to create analytics. We endeavour to use de-identified data when possible.
Privacy notice - Job applicants | Fortum
Identification information:
Right to access personal data
You:
8. How does Fortum protect personal data?
– We use subcontractors to provide services. Such subcontractors may have access to your personal information and are processing it on our behalf but are not allowed to use the personal data for any other purpose than to provide the service agreed with us. We ensure through appropriate contractual arrangements that the processing of personal data is in accordance with this notice. Typical service providers that process personal data include for example recruitment agencies and IT software & service providers
username and password for the recruitment portal, including other details for authenticating and securing our services such as login details and security logs.
Service development and analytics:
Right to deletion
Fortum employs appropriate organizational and technical security measures to protect your data from loss or misuse. We have a cybersecurity governance model which describes roles and responsibilities on the group level, and our instructions give detailed information on how personal data must be handled within Fortum. By conducting awareness programs, we engage Fortum employees in privacy and security considerations. Where we contract with third-party suppliers to provide services that may enable them to access your personal data we require them by contract to have similar security controls in place.
– If you have given consent for data processing, you are always entitled to withdraw your consent.
Fortum deletes or de-identifies personal data when it is no longer necessary for the purposes it was collected for. If Fortum hires you, your personal data may become part of your employee record. For information on how long we hold your personal data, please see our
– Where Fortum decides to sell, or merge or otherwise reorganize its businesses, this may involve disclosing personal data to prospective or actual purchasers and their advisers.
Local customer services for any privacy-related queries
Personal data is used for ensuring the information security of our services, for example, by keeping access logs and system backups, authenticating users, and preventing attacks.
– We will delete the data at your request if it is no longer legitimately needed.
Request forms for individual rights requests
Contact and inform you regarding a different position that you applied for, in case you gave us permission to be contacted for this reason.
which share information for purposes mentioned below in
privacy request form
Data Protection Officer
3. What are the bases and purposes for processing personal data?


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/form/contact-privacy-office
Contact Privacy Office | Fortum
Contact Fortum Privacy Office
E-mail
Attachment
Job applicant
Employee
One file only.
Country and Fortum company your request relates to
Message
Your relationship with Fortum
I want a copy of this message to my e-mail
Partner
Allowed types: gif, jpg, png, bmp, eps, tif, pict, psd, txt, rtf, html, odf, pdf, doc, docx, ppt, pptx, xls, xlsx, xml, avi, mov, mp3, ogg, wav, bz2, dmg, gz, jar, rar, sit, svg, tar, zip.
Your personal data will be used for handling your request.
Topic
Phone number
10 MB limit.
Other…
No
Enter other…
I want to be contacted


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors
Investor Relations (IR) and shareholder information | Fortum
January−September 2022 Interim Report presentation material
View summary
Date
09.30 EET
IR contacts
Extraordinary General Meeting 2022
January-September Interim Report
Release type
Fortum's January−September 2022 Interim Report was published on 10 November 2022.
Fortum's financial calendar in 2023
19.12.2022
Fill in the form
Latest investor presentation
January−September 2022 Interim Report
Reports and presentations archive
15.40 EET
All releases
21.12.2022
(xlsx)
Time
Webcast of the investor/media news conference
Pre result quarterly summary of events
(pdf)
A strategy review for Fortum stand alone is ongoing and is planned to be announced in connection with the full-year 2022 results on 2 March 2023. At the same time, Fortum is reviewing its business structure and operating model.
15.30 EET
(video)
Fortum’s revised strategy and business structure to be announced in March – Tiina Tuomela appointed CFO as of April
Materials:
747 results found
17.00 EET
Latest report
Latest regulatory releases
29.12.2022
Quick links
Fortum completed the divestment of Uniper
Q3 2022 quarterly tables
Subscribe releases
23 November 2022
2.12.2022
10.45 EET
Transcript of the investor/media webcast
16.12.2022


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/calendar-and-events/results-news-conferences/quarterly-summary-events
The record date for dividend payment: 17 April 2023
Operating profit in Q4 2021 included:
Download excel:
Fortum has stopped all new investment projects in Russia
Read more about Fortum's response to the war in Ukraine
The ex-dividend date: 14 April 2023
Transactions in the comparison period 2021
EUR 254 million gain from the sale of the district heating business in the Baltics (City Solutions segment Q3/2021)
3 October–2 November 2023
Since 2022 we have gathered the major events and announcements during the latest quarter to this page.
The Uniper EGM resolved on the capital increase of Uniper and all newly issued shares were subscribed by the German State for EUR 1.70 per share. After the equity capital increase, the German State acquired all of Fortum‘s approximately 293 million shares in Uniper SE for EUR 1.70 per share, a total consideration of approximately EUR 0.5 billion. Fortum received the total consideration of the share transaction which amounted to approximately EUR 0.5 billion. In addition, Uniper repaid the shareholder loan of EUR 4 billion granted by Fortum. From the EUR 4.0 billion parent company guarantee facility that Fortum had granted to Uniper, a total of EUR 3.0 billion was released by year-end 2022. The remaining approximately EUR 1.0 billion, with a full German State back-to-back guarantee (indemnity), will be released latest at the end of June 2023.
Geopolitical situation
Related release 19 December 2022:
January–June Half year Financial Report
Silent period prior to January–March 2023 Interim Report
Announcements during Q4 2022
, with potential divestments of its Russian operations as the preferred path.  We have already made decisions to replace Russian fuels in our other operating countries.
On 21 December, Fortum announced that the company had concluded the sale of its ownership in Uniper SE to the German State. On 19 December, the final agreements of the stabilisation package were signed between Fortum, the German State and Uniper and the Uniper Extraordinary General Meeting made the respective decisions. All required approvals for the completion of the stabilisation package, including the State Aid clearances from the European Commission, had been obtained.
January–September 2023 Interim Report
31 January–2 March 2023
EUR 11 million from the divestment of solar plants in Pavagada and Rajasthan, India (City Solutions)
EUR 17 million from the sale of the 116-MW Capacity Supply Agreement (CSA) backed solar power project to the joint venture with the Russian Direct Investment Fund (RDIF) (Russia segment Q1/2021)
Following the change of control in Uniper to the German State, Fortum's representatives on Uniper's Supervisory Board resigned: Fortum's President and CEO Markus Rauramo, who has been Chair of the Supervisory Board, Fortum's CFO Bernhard Günther, Vice Chair of the Supervisory Board, as well as Fortum’s General Counsel Nora Steiner-Forsberg and Head of Fortum’s CEO Office Esa Hyvärinen.
2 March 2023 approx. 9:00 EET
Fortum consequently restates the comparative consolidated income statement, consolidated statement of other comprehensive income, consolidated cash flow statement and certain key ratios for the year 2021 quarters as well as the first and second quarter of 2022. In the segment information, the Uniper segment is restated as discontinued operations and the Generation segment is restated to include OKG as an associated company instead of proportionate consolidation.
Fortum is closely monitoring the developments caused by Russia’s attack on Ukraine, which has increased the geopolitical tensions, uncertainties and risks in the operating environment. The company is complying with all applicable laws and regulations, including sanctions, and preparing for various scenarios.
The temporary law is anticipated to enter into force at the beginning of 2023 and the tax would become payable in early 2024.
January–December 2022 Financial Statements Bulletin & launch of strategy update
To IR contact details
Comparable operating profit Q1−Q4 2021 included:
Financial calendar for 2023
Decisions by Fortum Corporation's Extraordinary General Meeting 2022
Restated information for year 2021 quarters and first and second quarter 2022
The 8,970,000 new shares issued by the company were registered with the Finnish trade register on 25 November 2022. The total amount of shares outstanding in the company after the registration of the new shares is 897,264,465. The new shares carry full shareholder rights, including the right to dividend, as of the registration date.
Contact Fortum's IR team
EUR 11 million from the divestment of solar plants in Pavagada and Rajasthan, India (City Solutions Q4/2021)
Uniper divestment
Fortum will thoroughly review and assess the proposal’s financial impacts, which will depend on the market development and results of the business operations within the scope of the taxation. Fortum aims to disclose more detailed information on the financial impacts, for example, on the comparable effective income tax rate including this windfall tax in due course, latest in connection with the publication of its full-year 2022 results on 2 March 2023. Fortum annually discloses its tax footprint and taxes borne in its Tax Footprint report.
Related release on 6 September 2022:
Web page where all information on Fortum’s Russian business is gathered
The EGM resolved upon the meeting’s sole agenda topic, in accordance with the proposal of the Board of Directors, on a directed share issue without payment to the Finnish state-owned holding company Solidium Oy. In accordance with the resolution, Solidium is entitled to subscribe up to 8,970,000 new ordinary registered shares in Fortum, which corresponds to approximately 1% of all shares outstanding in Fortum after the execution of the share issue. As a consequence, the shares under control of the State of Finland will increase from 50.76% to 51.26%, correspondingly diluting the ownership of the other shareholders.
11 April–11 May 2023
Restated comparison figures to reflect Uniper divestment
The dividend payment date: 24 April 2023
we announced that we are preparing a controlled exit from the Russian market
5 July–4 August 2023
Fortum has signed a bridge financing arrangement with the Finnish state to cover collateral needs in the Nordic power commodity market
The Extraordinary General Meeting (EGM) of Fortum Corporation was held at the Helsinki House of Culture, Finland on 23 November 2022.
Further, as part of the signed package, Fortum will have a right of first offer in case Uniper intends to divest all or parts of its Swedish hydro and nuclear assets until the end of 2026.
11 May 2023 approx. 9:00 EEST
Fortum’s electricity generation in Finland accounts for approximately one third of total Finnish electricity generation. Approximately 40% of Fortum’s Nordic electricity generation and approximately 30% of electricity customers are in Finland.
The restated key figures for Fortum in total, continuing operations and discontinued operations (Uniper segment) are available in the below tables.
On 21 September 2022, Fortum, the German government and Uniper signed an agreement in principle for a long-term solution for Uniper according to which Fortum fully divests shares in Uniper SE to the German State for EUR 0.5 billion. As part of the agreement, Fortum’s EUR 4 billion loan to Uniper will be repaid and Uniper will release the EUR 4 billion parent company guarantee. Following the agreement, Fortum deconsolidates Uniper and reports it as discontinued operations in the third quarter 2022 interim financial statements.
Operating profit Q1−Q4 2021 included:
Silent period prior to January–December 2022 Financial Statements Bulletin
The Finnish Government published its proposal for windfall tax law - Fortum to assess the proposal
2 November 2023 approx. 9:00 EET
EUR 2,350 million from the sale of the 50% stake in the Swedish district heating and cooling company, Stockholm Exergi Holding AB (City Solutions segment Q3/2021)
Fortum, Uniper and the German State have signed the final stabil­i­sation agree­ments – Fortum sells all of its Uniper shares after the Uniper EGM
On 21 September 2022, Fortum, the German State and Uniper signed an agreement in principle on a long-term solution that allowed the German State to take full control of Uniper.
Quarterly summary of events
and is not providing any new financing to its Russian subsidiaries. On 12 May 2022, in connection to the Q1 2022 interim report,
Silent period prior to January–June 2023 Half year Financial Report 5 July-4 August 2023
January–March 2023 Interim Report
The Finnish Government published its law proposal (HE 320/2022 vp) for a temporary windfall tax on the electricity sector on 29 December 2022. The proposal intends to implement EU’s Council Regulation 2022/1854 on revenue cap and solidarity contribution as an emergency intervention to address high energy prices. This model deviates from the models proposed in other European countries. The tax would apply to companies in the electricity sector within electricity generation, wholesale and partly retail sales in Finland. Pursuant to the proposal, the tax would be 30% of the companies’ net profits generated from the above listed electricity operations in Finland exceeding a 10% return on capital in the fiscal year 2023. The Finnish corporate income tax is 20%, consequently, the total nominal tax rate would be 50% on net profits generated in the scope of the defined windfall tax. The Government has estimated that, under certain assumptions, it would cumulatively collect EUR 0.5-1.3 billion of the temporary tax from industry participants during 2023.
4 August 2023 approx. 9:00 EEST
Results news conferences
Fortum's Annual General Meeting 2023
Comparable operating profit in Q4 2021 included:
Pre January-December 2022 Financial Statements Bulletin
EUR 50 million tax-exempt capital gain of from the divestment of eight small hydropower plants in Sweden (Generation segment Q1/2021)
planned date 13 April 2023
As announced in early March,
the possible dividend-related dates are:
To the release
Silent period prior to January–September 2023 Interim Report
EUR 2 million from the sale of the Sørfjord wind park in January 2021 (Generation segment Q1/2021)
Illustrative information regarding Financial net debt and Adjusted net debt as well as Financial net debt-to-Comparable EBITDA
Quarterly summary of events | Fortum
no transactions


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/summary-of-fortums-responses-to-the-war-in-ukraine
Halting new investments and pursuing divestments:
Gas imports:
We are devastated and deeply saddened by the war in Ukraine and the sufferings it has caused. There is no justification for such military aggression. It is also clear that we cannot continue to do business in Russia as before.
For further information, visit
):
We obviously comply with all applicable laws and regulations, including international sanctions.
Summary of Fortum’s responses to the war in Ukraine
We have taken and published the following decisions since the start of the war (
Gas imports from Russia to Central Europe cannot be easily replaced at present, but Uniper is working to diversify its gas imports, moving into clean gases overtime.
updated: 10 August 2022
On 12 May 2022, we announced that we have decided to pursue a controlled exit from the Russian market. As the preferred path, this decision includes a potential divestment of Fortum’s Russian operations. The divestment process for Uniper’s Russian subsidiary Unipro is also expected to be resumed as soon as possible. These processes may take some time to conclude and are subject to regulatory approvals.
On 22 July 2022, we announced that Fortum, Uniper and the German government have agreed on a comprehensive stabilization package to provide financial relief to Uniper
On 9 June 2022 we announced that Gasgrid Finland and Fortum have signed a Letter of Intent on placing Finland's first floating LNG terminal vessel Examplar at Fortum's Inkoo port. This development enables independence from RUssian pipeline gas.
Security of supply:
. As German's largest importer of natural gas, Uniper  has been hit hardest by the curtailments of Russian gas imports, and as a result has been under extreme financial pressure. Uniper's gas trading activities are critical for Germany's energy supply and play an important role for the European energy sector.
Uniper is increasing LNG imports to Europe and has re-started the planning of the LNG terminal project in Wilhelmshaven, Germany.
30/3/2022
We are in continuous discussions with our respective European governments on how we can support securing energy supply to our European customers.
In Finland, we will not buy fossil fuels, pellets or biomass from Russia for our power plants in Espoo and Meri-Pori.
On 3 March 2022, Fortum announced that it has stopped all new investment projects in Russia. We are also not providing any new financing to our Russian subsidiaries.
Uniper is also looking for alternatives to Russian coal as imports of Russian coal will be stopped in line with the EU and UK sanctions and embargos.
Sanctions:
fortum.com/russia
Fuel purchases for power plants:
Summary of Fortum’s responses to the war in Ukraine | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-russia
On 12 May 2022, we announced that we are preparing a controlled exit from the Russian market
Fortum and Uniper page
Facts and figures
For our Loviisa nuclear power plant in Finland, we currently procure fuel from the Russian fuel company TVEL. The current contract is valid until the end of our current operating licenses, i.e. until 2027 and 2030. The power plant has plenty of fuel in storage, even for a couple of years. On 3 March 2022, we announced
Unipro’s power generation capacity is 11.3 GW and in 2021 power generation totalled 43.2 TWh
Fortum's January–March 2022 interim report
Gas imports to Europe
Country fact sheets
Fortum and Uniper page.
4.7 GW
Fortum subsidiary Uniper writes down its receivable in Nord Stream 2 and gives further details on its Russian businesses
Fortum's Russian heat production capacity
Fortum Russia division's power plants in Russia: Fortum's Russia division has seven thermal power plants in the Ural region and Western Siberia. They have a total power generation capacity of 4.7 gigawatts (GW) and heat production capacity of 7.6 GW. Six of the plants produce both electricity and heat for the market, while one plant produces only electricity.
, with potential divestments of its Russian operations as the preferred path. We have already made decisions to replace Russian fuels in our other operating countries.
Altogether 2.7 GW of the total 13.2 GW still receive higher capacity payments under the CSA scheme
Fortum has over sixty years of experience operating in Russia. Our current business there, as in our other main markets, is providing security of supply, and our customers depend on us for power and heat. We have also built over 1 GW of wind and solar power in Russia, together with our JV partners.
Fortum's subsidiary Uniper is among the largest importers of natural gas and plays an essential role in providing security of supply, especially in Germany.
Fortum Group in Russia | Fortum
Wind and solar power: Fortum’s investments in Russia in recent years have focused on renewable energy. We currently have a portfolio of 3.4 GW of wind and solar plants together with our partners. Over 1 GW is currently in operation, the rest is under construction or development.
Due to the war in Ukraine, we are looking for alternatives to fuel sourced from Russia.
Unipro's power generation capacity
In July 2021, Fortum signed an agreement to sell its Argayash coal-fired combined heat and power plant (CHP) to AO JSC Rusatom Smart Utilities (JSC RSU). The sale, together with the transition to gas at the Chelyabinsk CHP-2, will allow the Russia division to discontinue its use of coal by the end of 2022 and reduce annual CO2 emissions by approximately 2 million tonnes.
Together with the subsidiary Uniper, Fortum’s 12 power plants currently employ some 7,000 people. These plants are owned by our Russian subsidiaries; they are run by Russian management and operate only in Russia. They are mainly powered by Russian natural gas. After this year, only one of the plants will be powered by coal.
7.6 GW
the decision to apply for new operating licences for the Loviisa power plant
until 2050. A new tendering process for nuclear fuel will be initiated simultaneously.
and is not providing any new financing to its Russian subsidiaries. Likewise, Uniper will also not make any new investments in Russia.
Fortum’s Russia division will discontinue the use of coal by the end of 2022
In 2021, Fortum produced 28.6 TWh of electricity and 17.1 TWh of heat
Fortum’s power generation capacity in Russia is 4.7 GW and heat production capacity is 7.6 GW
11.3 GW
In 2021, the Russian operations accounted for approximately 20% of Fortum Group's total comparable operating profit.
Fortum's Russian power generation capacity
Fuel purchases from Russia (updated on 10 August 2022)
Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper also has power plants in Russia: Uniper’s Russian subsidiary Unipro has five thermal power plants with a total capacity of 11.3 GW. The plants are located in Central Russia, the Urals and Western Siberia.
Fortum in Russia
More about Fortum Group in Russia
This page provides the latest information on Fortum Group’s operations in Russia.
As announced on 21 September 2022, Fortum has agreed to fully divest Uniper to the German State. Read more about the agreement:
In Finland, we do not buy fossil fuels, pellets or biomass from Russia for our power plants in Espoo and Meri-Pori.
In Germany, Uniper has announced that it will not enter into new long-term supply contracts for natural gas with Russia. Uniper is increasing LNG imports to Europe and has re-started the LNG terminal project in Wilhelmshaven. Uniper is also looking for alternatives to Russian coal as imports of Russian coal will be stopped in line with the EU and UK sanctions and embargos.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/03/fortum-apply-new-operating-licence-loviisa-nuclear-power-plant
The Loviisa power plant is the first nuclear power plant in Finland. The power plant has two units: unit 1 started operating in February 1977, and unit 2 in November 1980. The operating licences for the units were renewed in 1998 and 2007. The current operating licences must be renewed by the end of 2027 and 2030.The units are VVER-440 type pressurized water reactors.
Ingela Ulfves, Vice President, Investor Relations and Financial Communications
FACTS
Investors and analysts:
Fortum has decided to apply for new operating licence for both units at the Loviisa nuclear power plant until the end of 2050. Over the course of these years, the plant is expected to generate up to 170 terawatt hours of emission-free electricity. By applying for the extension, Fortum wants to support achieving Finland’s and Europe’s carbon neutrality targets and enable the building of a reliable, competitive and sustainable energy system.
Ingela Ulfves, VP, IR and Financial Communications, tel. +358 40 5151 531
Enquiries
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 3.3.2022 8:30 EET
Loviisa nuclear power plant
In 2021, the load factor at Fortum’s fully-owned Loviisa nuclear power plant was 92.9%. The continuous development and modernisation of the power plant enable load factors that are among the best for pressurised water reactors on an international scale. During the past five years Fortum’s investments in the Loviisa power plant have totalled about EUR 325 million. In 2021, the power plant produced a total of 8.2 terawatt hours (net) of electricity, which is more than 10% of Finland’s electricity production. Fortum employs about 700 nuclear sector professionals, 530 of them work at the Loviisa power plant. Additionally, nearly 100 permanent employees of other companies work in the power plant area every day. More information:
When submitting the operating licence application, Fortum will also apply for a licence to use the low- and intermediate-level radioactive waste final disposal facility located in Loviisa’s current power plant area until 2090 after which the facility will be permanently sealed. The final disposal of spent nuclear fuel is scheduled to start in Finland in the middle of 2020s; the repository is the first in the world for spent fuel. Fortum will submit its operating licence application to the Ministry of Economic Affairs and Employment by the end of March; from there it will be sent to the Finnish Government for review. The Finnish Government will request statements from a range of various parties, including the Radiation and Nuclear Safety Authority, and will make its decision based on expert statements. The process is estimated to take about one year.
“I am very pleased that we have now decided to apply for new operating licence for Loviisa nuclear power plant. For Fortum, nuclear power is a key pillar of emissions-free electricity production, and continuing production in Loviisa is above all an investment in securing the supply of clean domestic electricity. As a reliable production form, nuclear power also enables growth of wind power-based energy,” notes Fortum’s President and CEO
Mark Autio, Editor, Fortum News Desk, tel. +358 40 570 4292
The Loviisa power plant was a project, in which the best solutions from West and East were utilised. The degree of domestic origin was approximately 50%. While the reactor and some other main components were from the former Soviet Union, the Loviisa power plant was built to meet the most developed Western safety standards with Western technology. Safety and operability has been continuously improved by major modification projects. In 2018, the plant completed the largest modernization programme in its history with the full renewal of the power plant automation in cooperation with Rolls Royce.
“The economic, political and societal aspects were factored into our decision. We at Fortum are especially pleased that acceptance of domestic nuclear power is now at a historic high among citizens and political parties alike. Our company is a trusted producer of nuclear power,” Rauramo adds.
(PDF, 755 KB)
The lifetime extension of the Loviisa units is a significant investment in Finland. It has substantial economic and employment impacts. Over the past five years, Fortum has already invested some 325 million euros in the Loviisa power plant. Investments related to continuing of operations and lifetime extension will amount to an estimated one billion euros until 2050.
Carlo Beck, IR Manager, tel. +49 172 751 2480
Rauno Tiihonen, IR Manager, tel. +358 10 453 6150
“Loviisa power plant has been generating electricity with nuclear power reliably over forty years, and its annual output accounts for about ten per cent of Finland’s total electricity consumption. Thanks to persistent and responsible development of operations and modernisations, the power plant is in good condition and we can safely continue its operations. We are very pleased that we can proceed with the preparation of the operating licence application,” notes
News Desk tel. +358 40 198 2843,
www.fortum.com/loviisa
03 March 2022, 08:30 EET
, Executive Vice President of Fortum’s Generation Division.
Fortum to apply for new operating licence for Loviisa nuclear power plant | Fortum
Fortum to apply for new operating licence for Loviisa nuclear power plant


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/news-and-publications
Looking for a certain person to talk to?
- On LinkedIn we share updates on our businesses, blog posts, represent our experts, and take part in industry discussion.
- In Instagram we share our innovations, collaborations, and other inspirational content - such as what it's like to work for Fortum.
The latest blog posts and articles in a newsletter to your mailbox
Twitter
Instagram
ForTheDoers is Fortum's corporate blog
Find media contact persons
Go to our media bank
Our latest news to your inbox
Find all the latest news and press releases from Fortum here.
LinkedIn
Facebook
- On Facebook we share stories about our work, events and engage with our stakeholders.
Fortum Newsdesk is at your service in all media related contacts.
Subscribe to our releases
- On Twitter we focus on sharing current news and events.
All news and releases
YouTube
Newsroom | Fortum
- On YouTube we publish informative films about the company, innovations and videos related to all our different businesses.
Stock exchange releases and investor news
Find contact
Fortum Newsdesk at your service
Find our images and logos


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2023/01/fortums-and-fjernvarme-fyns-joint-carbon-storage-project-receive-danish-business-promotion-board-funding
The funding follows the establishment of
Tel: +45 6331 7314,
the strategic partnership
Danish Business Promotion Board
Funding of PtX and hydrogen projects in Denmark
Jens Peter Rasmussen, Head of Waste Management Services Denmark, Fortum.
rasmussen
As a next step of the collaboration, Fortum and Fjernvarme Fyn will carry out an analysis of concrete solutions for implementation in Odense and Nyborg respectively.
jens
peter
Further information
Fjenvarme Fyn provides district heating for the city of Odense. Fortum’s plant in Nyborg treats hazardous waste from many industrial companies in Denmark and supplies district heating for Nyborg. District heating and hazardous waste management are both critical services for society. With the strategic partnership, Fortum and Fjernvarme Fyn are aiming to develop their facilities into low carbon operations that can transform CO₂ into a sustainable raw material which can be reused for instance in recycled plastic or as fuel in industry, transport and shipping.
The companies have concluded a feasibility study that assessed whether it is realistic to proceed with the project on a large scale. Based on the preliminary results, the parties have confirmed that there is significant potential and good synergies in a continued collaboration.
Fortum’s and Fjernvarme Fyn’s joint carbon storage project to receive Danish Business Promotion Board funding | Fortum
between Fjernvarme Fyn and Fortum. The companies decided to join forces with the ambition to capture, store and use CO₂ from Fortum's hazardous waste facility in Nyborg and from Fjernvarme Fyn's waste and biomass-based CHP plant in Odense. The joint target is to capture 480,000 tonnes of CO₂ by 2030, however the long-term potential is up to 900,000 tonnes.
Fortum and Fjernvarme Fyn (Odense, Denmark) has been granted DKK 10.6 million funding from the Danish Business Promotion Board to accelerate the research of best techniques to capture, store and in the longer run recycle the CO₂ from the Odense district heating plant and Fortum’s hazardous waste plant in Nyborg.
05 January 2023, 13:00 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services
We help customers to succeed in major retrofits as well as in optimizing the long-term programs for NPP changes.
Carbon removal
Fortum SmartLiving makes homes more comfortable, safer and helps to save money and to live in more sustainable way.
Decommissioning planning for nuclear power plants
Decommissioning
Living in an energy smart way
Our low-CO2 solution makes over 80% of the battery recyclable and returns the scarce metals used back into circulation.
O&M and upgrades
Fortum eNext builds tomorrow's energy production
Joining the change towards a cleaner world
Solar solutions
Fortum’s approach to decommissioning planning considers nuclear waste disposal and treatment solutions already in the beginning of the NPP operation.
Join the change for a cleaner world | Fortum
Smart solutions
Battery Solutions
Decommissioning and dismantling
Imperative in combating climate change
O&M for thermal power plants
Explore reference cases for our thermal power plant customers around the world
We have developed innovative solutions for radioactive liquid purification, waste solidification, interim storage of used fuel and final disposal of low and intermediate level radioactive waste.
Hazardous waste treatment
We provide full-scope operation and maintenance solutions to run your power plant in a sustainable, safe and most economical manner.
We handle large-scale total demolition or renovation demolition projects, industrial demolition and harmful substance removal with professionalism.
Smart solutions for businesses
We deliver the most advanced and proven O&M technologies and expertise to achieve next level in NPP performance.
Upgrades & refurbishment for nuclear power plants
Fortum Battery Solutions extend the lifetime of lithium-ion batteries
Operation and maintenance
Fortum Circo® is a plastic recyclate produced from post-consumer plastic waste. With consistent and high quality, versatility and solid availability, Fortum Circo recycled plastic can be used in a wide variety of products – from household appliances to industrial and commercial films and blow-moulded articles.
O&M for nuclear power plants
Demolition and renovation demolition
Interested in producing your own solar energy? We offer different kind of solutions for our business customers.
We offer sustainable turnkey solutions of the highest quality for the treatment of your hazardous waste while producing clean energy and by ensuring a safe final disposal.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/newsroom/press-kits/carbon-removal
How can carbon removal help companies become carbon neutral
Puro.earth – neutralising emissions with carbon removal
Press kits
Earth globe
Visit puro.earth website
Environmental friendly
Puro – the world’s first voluntary carbon removal marketplace for businesses
Carbon removal | Fortum
That is the reason why we developed Puro.earth, a marketplace for trading CO2 negative emissions. The purpose of the marketplace is to help companies reach carbon net-zero by making CO2 removals verified, comparable and tradable. Puro.earth issues CO2 Removal Certificates (CORCs) to companies that supply CO2 removal as part of their business. Each CORC represents one tonne of CO2 removed for the long term, and the CORCs can be sold to companies that want to offset their CO2 emissions with factual removal. This lets companies remove carbon no matter what their business is, while operations that have verified CO2-negative emissions can expand their business because of the financial incentive provided by selling their CO2 Removal Certificates.
To prevent the worst impacts of climate change, we need to remove more CO2 from the atmosphere than we are releasing. As a complementary tool to actual emissions reductions, carbon removal is essential for reaching the 1.5-degree target set out in the Paris Agreement.
One of the challenges of developing solutions for CO2-negative emissions is that there is no financial incentive for reducing CO2 in the atmosphere. The EU’s Emissions Trading System (ETS) ensures that some sectors pay a fee for emitting CO2. However, there is no system of payment for reducing the amount of CO2 already in the atmosphere.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/news-and-publications/press-kits
Read more about our wind and solar power production in Russia
Fortum's operations in India are focused on solar power. We have four solar power plants in India: Amrit, Kapeli, Bhadla and Pavagada. We have also agreed with NBCC on developing electric vehicle charging infrastructure across India, and have some R&D projects going on.
Fortum – A Clean Energy Architect for Data Centres
Information on topical issues at Fortum.
Learn more about Fortum being a clean energy architect for data centres
Wind and solar in Russia
Fortum's operations in India
Our mission is to move towards a cleaner world, together. Advancing digitalisation and reducing emissions from energy production are big steps towards this goal. That’s why we want to enable new data centres to be located in the Nordic countries.
Read more about our operations in India
Fortum and coal
Read more about where we use coal and our responsible fuel procurement
The use of coal in energy production needs to be discontinued and we are working towards that. And in places where we still use coal, we do so efficiently and responsibly.
Read about Fortum's research and innovations activities
Research and innovations for a cleaner world
We are a European energy company with activities in more than 40 countries and nearly 20,000 professionals.
Press kits | Fortum
More information on our operating countries
The purpose of Fortum's research and innovations activities is to improve Fortum's competitiveness and to create a basis for new profitable businesses.
We have announced plans to further expand our wind and solar power production in Russia. The plans are in line with Fortum's overall target of creating a multi-gigawatt wind and solar portfolio.
Go to press kit about carbon removal


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/newsroom/press-kits/our-solutions-india
Responsible solar energy in India
Charge & Drive in India
Read more about the cooperation
Read the case story here
Online news 4 February 2022:
Fortum has won the right to build 600 MW solar capacity in India
Kapeli is one of Fortum's first greenfield solar projects, done in 2014-2015. It has an annual yield of 20 GWh/a. The 10 MW solar plant offsets more than 18,000 tonnes of CO2 emissions annually.
Right to build 600 MW new solar capacity in India
Our solutions in India | Fortum
Amrit is Fortum's first power plant in India. It was acquired in 2013. With a nominal peak capacity of 5 megawatts (MWac) and annual production at the level of approx. 9 gigawatt-hours, this plant was constructed as part of the Jawaharlal Nehru National Solar Mission.
Investor news 22 June 2021:
Bhadla solar power plant was commissioned in 2017. Its capacity is 70 MWac, and its annual yield is 158 GWh/a.
Fortum has also embarked upon a journey to transform mobility in India by providing Energy as a Service (EaaS) to electrical vehicles. Starting with a pilot of 4 charging points in October 2017, presently Fortum is operating 116 DC fast public charging points in 10 cities. While these DC charging points serve to 4-wheelers passenger cars, Fortum has also launched a pilot project of battery swapping for 3-wheelers.
Pavagada 1 is Fortum’s fourth solar plant with a capacity of 100 MW. It is located in Tumkur district in Karnataka, India and was connected to the grid in December 2017.
In June 2018, Fortum signed an agreement to sell a 54% share of its solar power company operating four solar power plants in India to UK Climate Investments (40%) and Elite Alfred Berg (14%). Elite Alfred Berg has the option to buy up to an additional 16% from Fortum. The total capacity of this portfolio is 185 MW.
Fortum to divest 500 MW of solar power plants in India – agreement with Actis for solar investments
Jointly owned solar power plants
Fact sheet: Fortum in India
Read the fact sheet
Our solutions in India
In this partnership, Fortum will retain significant minority ownership in the solar power company and continue to provide operation and maintenance services based on a long-term agreement.
Solar power in India
Investor news 8 June 2018:
Find more information about our power plants
In June 2021, Fortum signed an agreement to divest the 250-MW Pavagada II and the 250-MW Rajasthan solar power plants in India to Actis, a global infrastructure investment firm. The divestment will be completed and the capital gain recorded in three tranches; during the second half of 2021 and the first half of 2022. The parties have also signed a comprehensive agreement targeting further investments in solar power plants in India.
Fortum's operations in India, launched in 2012, are focused on solar power. We continue to utilise our key competencies to develop, construct and operate solar power plants in India. In addition, in 2017, we agreed with NBCC on developing electric vehicle charging infrastructure across India. We also have some ongoing R&D projects in India.
Fortum to sell share of 185 MW Indian solar portfolio - aiming at further solar investments
NGO cooperation in India
Divestment of Pavagada II and Rajasthan solar power plants
Corporate responsibility was an important factor in selecting the supplier of Fortum’s Kapeli solar power plant. We require our partners to apply the same ethical business practices that we comply with within our own operations.
Thousands of migrant workers from diverse backgrounds around India were involved in the construction phase of our Pavagada solar plant. Parivartan, a grassroots-level NGO was brought in to help Fortum to draw synergy from the diversity of the workers and to ensure functionality between them.
In February 2022, Fortum won the right to build two solar power parks with a total capacity of 600 MW in Karnataka, India. The projects are expected to be commissioned by 2024. For the development of solar-based power generation, Fortum utilises partnerships and other forms of cooperation to maintain an asset-light structure. The solar power parks in Karnataka, India are planned to be developed together with a partner.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/06/fortum-divest-500-mw-solar-power-plants-india-agreement-actis-solar-investments
"This is an important step for Actis as we further strengthen our presence in India building on our achievements to date. We are pleased to be entering into this transaction with a firm of Fortum’s calibre and competence," says
including the effect of deconsolidating of the net debt, is expected to be approximately EUR 280 million, most of which will be recorded during 2021. The divestment is expected to have a positive impact of approximately EUR 20 million on the City Solutions segment’s results. The divestment will be completed and the capital gain recorded in three tranches; during the second half of 2021 and the first half of 2022.
22 June 2021, 09:00 EEST
(PDF, 781 KB)
, Partner and Head of Energy Infrastructure at Actis.
+358 44 518 1518
Fortum to divest 500 MW of solar power plants in India – agreement with Actis for solar investments | Fortum
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 22 JUNE 2021 AT 9.00 EEST
The parties have also signed a comprehensive agreement targeting further investments in solar power plants in India.
, Executive Vice President of Fortum’s City Solutions division.
Mikael Karlsson
Fortum has signed an agreement to divest the 250-MW Pavagada II and the 250-MW Rajasthan solar power plants in India to Actis, a global infrastructure investment firm. The total consideration from the divestment on a debt and cash-free basis,
Since 2013, Fortum has developed and constructed 680 MW of solar power in India. Over time, the majority of this capacity has been divested to enable further investments with a limited equity exposure, in line with the build-operate-transfer business model.
Ingela Ulfves, VP, IR and Financial Communications, tel. +358 40 515 1531
Måns Holmberg, Manager, IR and Financial Communications, tel.
"I am very happy to announce the transaction with Actis, a large and reputable global investor with a strong presence in the energy sector. We can utilise the strong competencies Fortum has gained over the years in solar development and construction, while utilising the financial strength and track record of Actis to realise the investment potential," says


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal/legal-notice
The use of the website(s) (“Websites”) of Fortum Corporation and its subsidiaries (together “Fortum”) requires following the terms of use set forth below. Do not use Fortum Websites if you do not agree to follow these terms of use.
Fortum shall in no event be liable for any loss or damage of whatsoever nature including, without limitation, indirect and consequential damage, such as loss of revenue, loss of income, loss of profit, business interruption or loss of data, arising from the use of this website or its content or the interruption or unavailability of the same. Neither shall Fortum be liable for any loss or damage caused due to errors, interruptions or unavailability of data systems or data communications or damage caused due to malware or viruses. The aforementioned limitation shall also apply to the third-party websites that are linked or referred to on Fortum Websites. If the applicable jurisdiction does not allow the above limitation of liability, the liability of Fortum shall be limited to the greatest extent permitted by the applicable law.
Code of conduct
Fortum Websites and its content are provided on “as is” basis. Fortum does not give any express or implied representation or warranty with respect to the information included in Fortum Websites, including any representation or warranty as to the accuracy, completeness or reliability of the information. Nothing included on Fortum Websites can be held as a binding offer or commitment of Fortum. Fortum reserves the right to modify these terms of use and Fortum Websites and its content or part thereof at any time without prior notice. Fortum does not make any representation or warranty as to the accessibility of Fortum Websites.
The entire content of Fortum Websites, such as text, graphics, names, images, figures, drawings, logos icons, recordings and software, are property of Fortum and its associated companies, licensors and partners. Any rights not expressly granted herein are reserved. Copying, transferring, modifying, saving, publishing and distributing the content of Fortum Websites or part thereof is prohibited without Fortum's prior written consent. The use of Fortum Websites for personal, non-commercial purposes is permitted. Documents classified as public, such as press releases, may be used for public communications if the source of the information is displayed.
Legal notice
Legal notice | Fortum
Terms of Use
Information Submitted by the User
The user of Fortum Websites is solely responsible for the accuracy and delivery of information and materials submitted to Fortum Websites and that the user is entitled to provide Fortum with such information or materials. The user of Fortum Websites shall take all reasonable measures to make sure that information and materials submitted to Fortum do not contain malware or viruses. Fortum shall be granted with a royalty-free and unlimited right to modify, copy, publish and distribute all information and materials submitted to Fortum Websites, either as such or as part of other materials or documentation, for any and all commercial and non-commercial use to the extent permitted by the laws of Finland.
Applicable Law
These terms of use shall be governed by the laws of Finland.
Please address the enquiries and remarks regarding the Legal Notice to Fortum Corporation, Legal Affairs, PL 100, 00048 FORTUM.
Intellectual Property Rights
Find legal information and resources for Fortum products and services
Disclaimer


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/calendar-and-events
Fortum’s Financial Statements and Operating and Financial Review for 2022 will be published during week 10 at the latest.
On this page, you will find Fortum's financial reporting schedule and calendar for all IR events. You can also add the events to your own calendar.
Fortum's financial calendar
Investors homepage
Fortum's IR calendar
See what's currently in focus
January-June on 4 August 2023 at approximately 9.00 EEST
Fortum's financial reports and presentations
Go to the archive
January-March on 11 May 2023 at approximately 9.00 EEST
Fortum's Annual General Meeting 2023 is planned to be held on 13 April 2023 and the possible dividend related dates are:
Investor calendar and events
Fortum Corporation’s Financial Statements Bulletin for the year 2022 will be published on 2 March 2023 at approximately 9.00 EET.
Fortum's financial reporting schedule in 2023
January-September 2 November 2023 at approximately 9.00 EET
Investors and financials: Calendar and events | Fortum
Fortum will publish three interim reports in 2023:
Investors: In focus


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers
Our General Terms and Conditions
Contractor Safety
See Supplier Code of Conduct
Supplier network
Our procurement target is to enable strong business performance, sustainable purchasing processes and to secure the availability of the right materials and services considering the needs and requirements of our businesses. We aim for open and effective collaboration with our suppliers and seek new suppliers globally to strengthen our network and to create value for both parties.
Please send non-urgent inquiries via e-mail to our procurement.
Becoming supplier
Information for our suppliers | Fortum
If you are interested to become our supplier, please read more about our eSourcing procedures.
General EHS Requirements
Read about becoming our supplier
Invoice us
Supplier Code of Conduct
Our goal is to be a safe workplace. Everyone working for us is expected to know safety requirements applicable to their work and to adhere to them at all times.
Information and Requirements
procurement.fortum@fortum.com
Our purchasing volume is approximately 2-3 billion euros depending on the yearly investment volume. We have over 15,000 suppliers in our supply chain network, covering our main locations in Nordics, Russia, Poland and India. We evaluate the performance of our suppliers and engage our suppliers and businesses in collaboration from individual project execution to continuous portfolio development and R&D.
We are requiring primarily electronic invoices ("e-invoices") from our suppliers.
Suppliers are important part of our successful business
General Terms and Conditions
The terms and conditions between us and our suppliers are agreed in written contracts. Order number must be referred in all invoices.
For suppliers
Become our supplier
Information about invoicing us
We expect our suppliers to act responsibly and to comply with the Supplier Code of Conduct.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/become-our-supplier
The process of how to become our supplier consists of following steps:
Become our supplier | Fortum
Suppliers are an important part of successful business. Through our clearly defined sourcing process we aim to ensure that suppliers provide high-quality, cost-competitive and sustainably produced materials and services for our businesses.
Evaluation and supplier selection
Finalizing the contract
Supplier participation in the tenders
Read more about supplier registration
Read more about public contract notices
Supplier registration
Supplier registration and tendering online
Supplier qualification and compliance with the Fortum Supplier Code of Conduct
Public contract notices


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/public-contract-notices
Public contract notices | Fortum
Our public contract notices and related procurement documents are published through eSourcing tool.
Open contract notices


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/strategy
Fortum is well-positioned to capture the opportunities resulting from the energy transition aimed at curbing climate change. To be successful, the energy transition must balance sustainability, affordability, and the security of supply. The energy transition requires, not only renewables, but also increasingly energy storage, and other flexible solutions to provide the security of supply and to decarbonise also industry, transportation, heating, and cooling. Building on our strengths, our future will be driven by CO2-free power generation, sustainably transforming our own operations to become carbon neutral and engaging customers and society to decarbonise.
Fortum's strategy is to drive the clean energy transition. Aligned with the goals of the Paris Agreement, Fortum targets carbon neutrality at the latest by 2050 with ambitious mid-term targets.
Fortum's Executive Management
On 21 September 2022, Fortum announced that the company has agreed to fully divest Uniper to the German State. The agreed transaction is subject to regulatory clearances and Uniper’s Extraordinary General Meeting. Completion is currently expected by year-end 2022. Read more about the agreement:
Fortum is a European power company with the purpose to drive the change for a cleaner world. Our role is to ensure the security of supply and a fast and reliable transition to a carbon-neutral economy by providing customers and societies with clean energy and sustainable solutions. Fortum’s core opera­tions are located in the Nordics and consist of CO2-free power gener­ation, electricity sales, district heating as well as recycling and waste solutions. We are in the process of reviewing our strategy in light of the changed operating environment.
During 2022, Fortum’s operating environment has drastically changed due to the Russia-Ukraine war. The company is complying with all applicable laws and regulations, including sanctions, and preparing for various scenarios. Fortum has stopped all new investment projects in Russia and is not providing any new financing to its Russian subsidiaries. Fortum is in the process to implement a controlled exit from the Russian market, with potential divestments of its Russian operations as the preferred path.
Fortum's Board of Directors
Read about Board of Directors
Considering the current prevailing uncertainties and the energy crisis in Europe, Fortum will, as a next step, review its stand-alone strategy with the main focus on sustainable power generation, the security of supply and affordable energy. In this context, Fortum’s CO2-free generation assets are now needed more than ever.
We have recently published a new strategy for Fortum Group
Fortum's strategy is to drive the clean energy transition
Executive Management
With our strategy we drive the change for a cleaner world | Fortum
Read about Executive Management
Read about our strategy
In the short-term, Fortum’s priorities are to finalise the divestment process of Uniper, exit from Russia and ensure the Group’s liquidity in the very turbulent energy market with high prices and extreme price volatility.
Board of Directors


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild/adlas
design
Cost-efficient
was developed as a response to these challenges during the Loviisa NPP automation renewal in Finland. Since then it has been used in several licensing projects successfully with Finnish Nuclear Safety Authority (STUK). The method is compatible within most of nuclear regulatory environments.
Background
is a systematic and well documented way to draft the licensing documents using a top-down approach. ADLAS® concentrates on the high level but also gives a solid basis for the lower level documents.
Brochure
Our capability areas are:
Build new energy ventures
Nuclear Safety and Systems Engineering
Learn more about ADLAS®
Increased safety
Fortum ADLAS®
Reduced risk of delays
The Method
The ADLAS® Method
More accurate requirement management for critical systems
engineering
• Control room and procedures architecture
Our expertise and experience in safety design and licensing of nuclear facilities covers the whole life-cycle of nuclear power from new builds to decommissioning and the final disposal of nuclear waste. For decades we have been able to successfully license nuclear facilities and meet the tightest regulatory requirements for nuclear safety. The key contributor for the "once-through" licensing of nuclear facilities has been ADLAS® - Advanced Licensing and Safety Design method for Nuclear Facilities: A systematic configuration management method that has been proven to be an efficient way to formulate nuclear facility requirements. It delivers a complete, unified and hierarchical licensing documentation with clear traceability from plant level requirements to equipment level specifications.
• Functional architecture engineering
ADLAS
Requirements
• Qualification and test concepts
are elaborated in a unified way in order to create transparent requirement hierarchy. Since requirements are set to each level of the hierarchy, Verification & Validation also become hierarchical and predefined.
Suvi Rein
ADLAS can be applied in Control Room Design
• Process, electrical and layout architecture
Fortum ADLAS® Method
Fortum ADLAS® ensures the safety and licensability of your nuclear facility.
• Automation architecture engineering
• Analyses concept specification
Principal Engineer
Rein
Nuclear projects
ADLAS® - Advanced Nuclear Licensing and Safety Design Method for Nuclear Facilities | Fortum
can be used by Owners and Vendors in new builds, major retrofits and license renewals of nuclear facilities.
ADLAS® is a method of designing safety critical systems and preparing licensing documents for nuclear industry and can be applied indepen­dently of project country.
Fortum ADLAS® Background
• Plant level safety design
is applied in all the steps of the process leading to a high safety level in critical systems and an optimised cost level. Due to the nature of the method (traceability of the requirements through the structures), it is well received by regulators and enables once through licensing.
ADLAS® - Advanced Nuclear Licensing and Safety Design Method for Nuclear Facilities
The graded approach
See how the Fortum ADLAS® method works
More Information
Suvi
Graded safety approach reduces investment and O&M costs by avoiding oversising equipment
Services for Nuclear Newbild
have typically faced licensing challenges related to transparency and traceability of requirements and application of defense-in-depth in design. Especially when licensing digital automation systems or when changing the functionality of systems.
Control room design services
Well structured licensing documents with good traceability of requirements


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/operating-nuclear-power-plants/control-room-design-services
Our offering
Procurement specifications
Fortum's control room design services ensure ergonomic, safe and efficient control room solutions for nuclear new build projects, I&C modernisations and control room upgrade projects. Our services cover control room and human-machine interface design, and we can support our customers throughout the project lifecycle.
Support for Nuclear I&C Projects
Solutions for safe, productive and ergonomic control rooms
Control Room Design Services | Fortum
Fortum's services are independent of suppliers which enables customers to select preferred systems, but we have experience of many suppliers and a wide range of control room systems.
Initial clarifications and analyses
Supplier independent
Human Machine Interface design (HMI)
Control Centres and HMI
Fortum is independent of control room technology suppliers, but we have experience of working with many different suppliers and we are familiar with commonly used products. We continuously develop our design methods and tools. For example, we use dynamic control room simulators and AR/VR solutions in control room and HMI testing, verification and validation.
Flexible scope
Virtual panel design and deliveries
Leena Salo
Independent design reviews
Hardware agnostic
Control room end-point visions and concepts
salo
Related products
Control Room Design Services
Control room layout design
Mass market tested
Fortum’s control room design and consulting services cover projects ranging from small improvements to complete control room implementations, including services from pre-engineering to commissioning and licensing.
Related expertise
A well-designed control room enables safe and productive operation of the plant and provides control room personnel with easy to use human-machine interfaces as well as comfortable working conditions. Following ergonomic design principles and taking human factors into account early in the design process not only ensures user satisfaction to control room solutions but also diminishes the need for making costly design changes during and after the project.
Services for Operating Nuclear Power Plants
+358 40 595 2345
We provide easy access to and integration with Fortum’s other products and services, e.g. Human Factors Engineering services, support for I&C projects and Apros® simulator software.
Based on Fortum’s background as a nuclear power plant operator and a license holder, we have the ability to look at control room design from the client’s and end-user’s perspective.
Engineering and training simulators with Apros®
Requirement specifications
For more information:
Fortum’s control room design services cover projects ranging from small improvements to complete control room implementations. We can support throughout the project lifecycle from defining the scope and requirements to verification and validation, testing and commissioning.
Virtual Reality control room simulators, together with our partners
Verification and Validation services (V&V)
End-user's perspective
Manager
Operating Plants
Fortum has a background as a nuclear power plant operator and a license holder with experience of numerous control room modernisation and new build projects. This gives us unique insights in the client’s and end-user’s perspective. We have years of experience of control room and human-machine interface design projects at nuclear power plants and other production facilities and we are familiar with the key standards in the field.
Smoothly implemented nuclear I&C modernisations and I&C design for operating power plants.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/operating-nuclear-power-plants
Our expertise
Equipment Reliability (ER) management
Give your plant personnel a fast, flexible and easy-to-use simulator interface at a low cost.
Virtual Panels
Lifetime extensions
Human Factors Engineering
Our products
As a licensee and operator of Loviisa nuclear power plant and waste management facil­ities, we have more than 40 years of experi­ence in mainte­nance and opera­tions. Operators all over the world encounter different kinds of technical and licensing related challenges, which eventually have impact on power production. Before starting a costly project to streamline the mainte­nance and operation of a nuclear power plant, it is worth to discuss with us about our experi­ences related to the imple­men­tation of refur­bishment projects.
I&C modernization
kymalainen
Nuclear Newbuild and Operating Plants
Newbuild and Operating Services
Licensing
Fortum ReMaint® is to optimise operations and maintenance of nuclear power plants
Our upgrades and refurbishments capability areas:
ReMaint®
We offer Control Room and HMI design accompanied by holistic HFE services suitable as well for New Builds and Decommissioning as operational plants. Our core competence is in Human Factors Engineering, and we know how to make good HMIs and functional workplace designs, supported by V&V activities.
olli
Raed more
ReMaint® Nuclear – Cost Efficient O&M Optimisation
Read the article here
Services for Operating Nuclear Power Plants | Fortum
Safety engineering and safety analysis
+358 50 453 5388
Fortum ReMaint® toolkit is used for optimisation and improving the performance of nuclear power plant.
Optimisation of maintenance is of the essence to increase the performance of a nuclear power plant. Sometimes annual outages include also upgrades and modernisations to increase the nuclear safety and production of the plant. A refurbishment project usually takes a lot of time and, depending on the size of the project, includes various phases. It starts with extensive planning activities including licensing plan and communication with the local nuclear safety authority. Fortum’s experience in driving complex renewal projects consist of several areas and disciplines, such as equipment reliability (ER) management, I&C modernisation, lifetime extension etc. Fortum’s knowhow about nuclear technology and plant performance update serves best when applied at an early stage of the project.
Power uprates
Olli Kymäläinen


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/operating-nuclear-power-plants/human-factors-engineering
Our related expertise
Our services are independent of suppliers, and we have vast knowledge of international standards in the field.
Taking human factors into account early in a nuclear newbuild or modernisation project is one important part of ensuring safety and productivity of plant operation. Integrating ergonomic design into the engineering process helps in creating easy-to-use tools for the end users and diminishes the likelihood of human errors in plant operation and maintenance, but also reduces the need for costly changes to the designed solutions during and after the project.
Fortum’s Human Factors Engineering services can help in large and small projects throughout the plant lifecycle. We can support in creating requirement specifications and executing HFE analyses as well as in development and management of complete HFE programs.
Understanding end-user's perspective
Customer oriented
Our team has years of experience in control room and HMI design, and we are equipped with the skillsets to combine design with HFE activities.
We develop and use efficient tools and processes, such as fast AI guided requirement classification, design stage evaluations using dynamic simulators and VR environments, HFE assessment templates and design processes aligned with requirements set by nuclear authorities.
Our offering:
Style guides
Initial clarifications and requirement specifications
HFE analysis including e.g. operating experience analysis and task analysis
HFE programs and plans
HFE verification and validation (V&V)
Taking human factors into account early in a nuclear newbuild or modernisation project is an important part of ensuring safe, reliable and productive plant operation. Fortum offers HFE services suitable for new build projects, operational plants and plants in decommissioning phase.
Based on Fortum’s background as a nuclear power plant operator and a license holder, we have the ability to look at HFE activities from the client’s and end-user’s perspective. Understanding characteristics, tasks and needs is a key point in all HFE activities.
Human Factors Engineering | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/operating-nuclear-power-plants/nuclear-ic-projects
Project planning with supplier candidates
I&C licensing in Europe
Elaboration of requirements
® simulator software
ADLAS method for licencing
Fortum has a background as a nuclear power plant operator and a license holder with experience of many I&C modernisation projects and I&C design in newbuild projects. This gives us unique insights in the client’s and end-user’s perspective. We have years of experience, extensive know-how regarding I&C licensing and modernisation in a demanding regulatory environment, and we are familiar with the European perspectives and standards. Through the modernisation projects, we have gained knowledge of various methods for project and delivery execution, and we can help our customers avoid the most common pitfalls and challenges.
Validating I&C functions in conceptual design phase
Using emulated automation systems
Life-cycle identification
Fortum is independent of the I&C technology suppliers, but we have extensive experience of working with the key suppliers and are familiar with their most common practices and solutions.
The utilisation of a simulator in I&C projects helps to discover errors in design and system connections earlier in the project, decreases the field test length by allowing testing with the process model, and enables early involvement of the power plant operators.
Schedule management
Evaluation of different kind of design/implementation options
Support for identifying the interface to the existing systems and documents
Fortum ensures smoothly imple­mented nuclear I&C moderni­sa­tions, upgrades and I&C design in newbuild projects by providing services throughout the whole lifecycle of the project from defining the scope and require­ments to testing of the commis­sioning proce­dures and training of personnel.
Support for clarification of delivery scope and defining the task description
Apros
Review of quality processes
Key benefits
Support with supplier assessments
Practical support in interpreting international standards and requirements (IEC nuclear I&C standards, IAEA Guides, etc.)
Architecture level design
Project management
Offering
Modernisation of Loviisa nuclear power plant automation successfully completed
For I&C modernisation projects, integration testing with the existing surrounding systems
and
Support for identification of requirements
Support for Nuclear I&C Projects | Fortum
Supplier chain coordination
Review of I&C design against for example regulatory requirements, European Utility Requirements (EUR) Rev.E or IEC standards (compliancy, gap analysis, improvement plans, etc.)
Dynamic Human Machine Interface (HMI) testing during design phase
ADLAS method for systematic requirement traceability and licensing
Conceptual phase design: agreement of lifecycle and quality and qualification steps
Engineering and design management
Elaboration of requirements for I&C architecture based on native requirements, plant constraints, and functional design
Configuration management, change management, documentation management
Articles, blogs and case studies
Supplier evaluation
,
I&C review and consultation
Simulator utilisation in I&C lifecycle (Apros®)
Preparation of invitation to tender documents
Control Room Design services
Controller tuning
Specification of concepts regarding priority, diversification, periodical testing and self-diagnostics and independence
Project initiation and definition
Analyses (CCF, diversity, interface analysis, etc.)
Fortum is independent from the I&C technology suppliers, but we have experience in working with all the key players.
Integration with I&C cabinets
Control of I&C system suppliers
Creating the required plans for quality, V&V, qualification, cyber security, requirements management and configuration management
Site coordination
Invitation to tender and supplier evaluation
Evaluation of licensing strategy
Support for identification of needed documentation
Training and testing I&C with power plant operators
Defining and agreement of processes, requirements management and configuration management
Defining and agreement of the documents to be prepared (e.g. Quality plans, V&V plans, Qualification plans)
Project development support
Testing of commissioning procedures
Proactive planning and addressing potential issues in the project development phase with Fortum’s support will secure smooth execution of the design and implementation phase of the project. Early phase support in conceptual design enables our customer to accomplish clear work packages and efficient implementation without unplanned iterations in the later project phases.
Independent assessment of delivery scope
Verification and validation through I&C lifecycle
We provide services to support our customers throughout the nuclear I&C modernisation or newbuild project from defining the scope and requirements for the project to the testing of the commissioning procedures and training the personnel. See below for more details of our offering for the different phases of the project.
Fortum's support with work planning and conceptual design at an early phase of the project will help ensure smooth execution of the project.
We also provide easy access to and integration with Fortum’s other products and services, e.g.
Support in planning of qualification testing (software and hardware integration)
Document review
Commissioning planning
Proven methods and tools
Validating I&C in implementation phase
Development of I&C architecture specification
Nuclear I&C Projects
Improved execution of nuclear I&C projects
Fortum has a good track record of using proven methods and tools for the technical imple­men­tation, work planning and management.
Project management and coordination
V&V strategy and planning for I&C delivery project
Read more about


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2018/10/modernisation-loviisa-nuclear-power-plant-automation-successfully-completed
The modernisation was implemented in three phases during annual outages in 2016-2018. Around 50 Fortum's specialists have been employed full-time since the beginning of the project in 2014, and momentarily increased above 200 in total during the annual outages.
The scope of work for Rolls-Royce included design, licensing, installation and commissioning activities for new safety systems.
Magnus Forsstrom
, Automation Modernisation Project Owner, from Loviisa power plant.
Modernisation of Loviisa nuclear power plant automation successfully completed | Fortum
FORTUM CORPORATION ONLINE NEWS 25 October 2018
safe and the reliable operation of the Loviisa nuclear power plant also in the future
re based on Fortum´s overall plant safety design concept ADLAS™, where the safety functions were validated with advanced process simulator APROS™.
Loviisa power plant
Watch the video to learn more about Apros® Nuclear!
In 2017, the load factor at Fortum’s fully-owned Loviisa nuclear power plant was 92.9%. On an international scale, the load factor was among the best in the world for pressurised water reactor power plants. The plant produced a total of 8.16 terawatt hours, which is more than 10% of Finland’s total electricity production. The Loviisa power plant employs more than 500 Fortum employees and some 100 permanent contractors. In 2017, Fortum invested about EUR 90 million into the Loviisa nuclear power plant.
"We are extremely delighted that the implementation of the new safety systems was completed on time, within budget and according to high quality and required safety standards. Also the nuclear specific challenge related to the complexity of licensing processes, was turned into a success factor throughout the excellent cooperation between Fortum, Rolls Royce and all other stakeholders. This was achieved through an extensive pre-planning phase, proactive schedule management and continuous improvement during the project," says
Pia Fast, Corporate Communications, tel. +358 40 147 8752
Fortum and Rolls-Royce signed an agreement in May 2014 about the modernisation of the most critical safety automation systems on both production units at Loviisa. Fortum created the safety automation architectu
The modernisation of safety automation systems improves safety and secures
Automation modernisation project, the biggest single project since the construction of Fortum's Loviisa nuclear power plant, has been successfully completed on time and within budget by Fortum and the main supplier Rolls-Royce.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/focus



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/annual-general-meeting#extra­or­dinary-2403075
for a Member of the Nomination and Remuneration Committee EUR 2,000 per year,
The authorisation cancelled the authorisation resolved by the Annual General Meeting of 2021 to decide on the repurchase of the company’s own shares, and it will be effective until the next Annual General Meeting and in any event no longer than for a period of 18 months.
Fortum January-March 2022 Interim Report
The Annual General Meeting resolved, in accordance with the proposal of the Board of Directors, to pay the auditor’s fee pursuant to an invoice approved by the company.
The number of shares to be disposed based on the authorisation shall not exceed 20,000,000 shares, which corresponds to approximately 2.25 per cent of all the shares in the company.
for the Chair of the Audit and Risk Committee: EUR 63,300 per year in case he/she does not simultaneously act as Chair or Deputy Chair of the Board of Directors.
00048 FORTUM
Minutes of the Extraordinary General Meeting 2022 of Fortum Corporation
Own shares can be repurchased at a price formed in public trading on the date of the repurchase or otherwise at a price formed on the market.
Board of Directors, remuneration and auditor
Repurchase and disposal of the company's own shares
Other materials
The Annual General Meeting resolved, in accordance with the proposal of the Board of Directors, to authorise the Board of Directors to decide on the repurchase of the company's own shares, and at the same time cancel the repurchase authorisation resolved by the Annual General Meeting of 2021 as follows:
The annual fee for the Board work of the Board members will be paid in company shares and in cash in such a way that approximately 40 % of the amount of the annual fee will be payable in shares acquired on behalf and in the name of the Board members, and the remainder in cash. The company will pay the costs and the transfer tax related to the purchase of the company shares.
In addition, the Annual General Meeting resolved, in accordance with the proposal of the Board of Directors, to authorise the Board of Directors to decide on the disposal of the company's own shares, and at the same time cancel the disposal authorisation resolved by the Annual General Meeting of 2021 as follows:
The authorisation will be effective until the next Annual General Meeting.
AGM 2023 of Fortum Corporation is planned to be held on 13 April 2023.
The Board of Directors will decide how own shares will be repurchased. Own shares can also be repurchased using derivatives. Own shares can be repurchased otherwise than in proportion to the shareholdings of the shareholders (directed repurchase).
Minutes of the Extraordinary General Meeting 2022
Notice to the Extraordinary General Meeting of Shareholders of Fortum Corporation
for the Chair EUR 88,800 per year,
In addition to the aforementioned annual fee, fixed fees will be paid for the Committee work as follows:
The Annual General Meeting adopted the Financial Statements and the Consolidated Financial Statements for the financial period 1 January-31 December 2021. In accordance with the proposal of the Board of Directors, the Annual General Meeting resolved that a dividend of EUR 1.14 per share will be paid for the financial year that ended on 31 December 2021, which corresponds to EUR 1,012,655,690 in aggregate, and that the remaining part of the distributable funds shall be retained in the shareholders’ equity. The dividend will be paid to shareholders who on the record date of the dividend payment 30 March 2022 are recorded in the company’s shareholders’ register held by Euroclear Finland Oy. The dividend will be paid on 6 April 2022.
for the Chair of the Nomination and Remuneration Committee EUR 5,000 per year,
Annual General Meeting 2023 | Fortum
The maximum number of own shares to be repurchased is 20,000,000 shares, which corresponds to approximately 2.25 per cent of all the shares in the company. Only the unrestricted equity of the company can be used to repurchase own shares on the basis of the authorisation.
or
agm
Go to archive
for a Member of the Audit and Risk Committee EUR 3,000 per year,
In accordance with the Shareholders' Nomination Board’s proposal, the Annual General Meeting resolved to elect the following persons to the Board of Directors for a term ending at the end of the Annual General Meeting 2023: Mr Veli-Matti Reinikkala as Chair, Ms Anja McAlister as Deputy Chair, and Ms Luisa Delgado, Ms Essimari Kairisto, Mr Teppo Paavola, Mr Philipp Rösler, Ms Annette Stube, Mr Ralf Christian and Mr Kimmo Viertola as Members.
for a Member of any additional Committee established by a Board decision EUR 2,000 per year.
Legal Department/AGM
Annual General Meeting
The Extraordinary General Meeting of Fortum was held on Wednesday 23 November 2022, at 12:00 a.m. (EET) at the Helsinki House of Culture, address Sturenkatu 4, Helsinki, Finland.
Charitable contributions
On 6 September 2022, Fortum announced that it had signed a bridge financing agreement of EUR 2.35 billion with the Finnish State to ensure access to sufficient liquidity resources for potential additional collateral requirements on the Nordic commodities exchange Nasdaq in case of further rising power prices. One condition in the financing agreement was a directed share issue without payment to the lender Solidium in case Fortum would draw on the loan. On 26 September 2022, Fortum announced of having drawn the first minimum tranche of EUR 350 million. Further drawdowns are subject to liquidity needs for collaterals.
The Board of Directors will decide on all the other conditions of the disposals, including to whom, at what price and in which manner the company's shares are disposed. The disposals may also be made in deviation from the shareholders’ pre-emptive rights (directed share issue).
The meeting fee payable to a Board member, also for the Committee meetings will be EUR 800 for each meeting, or EUR 1,600 in case the member travels to the meeting outside his/her country of residence. When a member participates in the meeting via remote connection, or for the decisions that are confirmed without convening a meeting, the meeting fee will be EUR 800. The travel expenses of Board members are compensated in accordance with the company’s travel policy.
The shareholder's right to have a matter considered by the General Meeting and its conditions are laid down in Chapter 5, Section 5 of the Finnish Limited Liability Companies Act (624/2006).
Minutes of the Annual General Meeting 2022
(incl. Financial Statements and Operating and Financial Review)
The Annual General Meeting resolved to approve the remuneration report for the company’s governing bodies for 2021. The resolution is advisory.
for the Deputy Chair EUR 63,300 per year,
Fortum Financials 2021
The Annual General Meeting resolved, in accordance with the proposal of the Board of Directors, to re-elect Deloitte Oy as the auditor. Deloitte Oy has notified the company that Jukka Vattulainen, APA, will act as the responsible auditor.
Voting Result upon Resolving on the Directed Share Issue without Payment at Extraordinary General Meeting 2022 of Fortum Corporation
The minutes of the Annual General Meeting
Speech by the representative of the State of Finland
The meeting fees and the fixed fees for the Committee work will be paid fully in cash.
A total of 5,927 shareholders were represented at the EGM at the beginning of the voting, corresponding to 679,526,050 shares and votes (76.50% of the total number of 888,294,465 shares in Fortum). Of the shares and votes represented at the EGM, 91.44%, including the votes of the Finnish State, were in favour of the proposal of the Board of Directors, 7.85% against and 0.71% abstained from voting. The approval of the directed share issue required that two-thirds of the votes cast and shares represented at the EGM were in favour of the proposal.
The Annual General Meeting of Fortum Corporation was held at the company headquarters in Espoo, Finland on 28 March 2022 under special arrangements.
A shareholder may request a matter belonging to the Annual General Meeting to be included on the agenda of the Annual General Meeting. In order for the request to be considered, it must be submitted in written form to the Board of Directors of the Company no later than 2 February 2023 to the address:
Annual General Meeting 2023
Materials of Fortum's General Meetings
Opening by the Chair of the Board of Directors
P.O. Box 100
Meeting materials
Decisions by Fortum Corporation's Annual General Meeting 2022
Extra­or­dinary General Meeting of Fortum 23 Nov 2022
The issuance and admission to trading of the new shares offered to Solidium for subscription will be communicated by means of a separate stock exchange release.
FINLAND
Presentation by the CEO
In accordance with the proposal of the Shareholders’ Nomination Board, the Annual General Meeting resolved that, in line with the earlier decision in principle to increase the remuneration, the annual fee of the Chair, Deputy Chair and other members of the Board of Directors will be changed as follows:
Minutes of the AGM 2022 of Fortum Corporation
for a Member EUR 43,100 per year, and
Fortum January-June 2022 Half-year Financial Report
Recordings of the speeches held in the meeting (English interpretation)
Advance Voting Form
In accordance with the Shareholders’ Nomination Board’s proposal, the Annual General Meeting resolved that the Board of Directors will consist of nine members, the Chair and the Deputy Chair included.
Fortum January-September 2022 Interim Report
Annual General Meeting of Fortum 28 March 2022
Further details of the members of the Board of Directors are available on the company's website at www.fortum.com/governance.
- Release on 6 Sep 2022
The Annual General Meeting resolved to discharge from liability for the year 2021 all the persons who had served as members of the Board of Directors and as President and CEO during the year 2021.
The authorisation cancelled the authorisation resolved by the Annual General Meeting of 2021 to decide on the disposal of the company’s own shares, and it will be effective until the next Annual General Meeting and in any even no longer than for a period of 18 months.
for the Chair of any additional Committee established by a Board decision EUR 5,000 per year, and
The Annual General Meeting resolved, in accordance with the proposal of the Board of Directors, to authorise the Board of Directors to decide on contributions in the total maximum amount of EUR 500,000 for charitable or similar purposes, and to decide on the recipients, purposes and other terms of the contributions.
Decisions by Fortum's Extra­or­dinary General Meeting 2022
The shares will be acquired on behalf and in the name of the Board members within two weeks following the publication of the company’s first quarter 2022 interim report. If share purchases cannot be carried out within the aforementioned schedule due to a reason related to the company or a Board member, the shares will be acquired later, or the annual fee will be paid fully in cash.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/09/fortum-has-signed-bridge-financing-arrangement-finnish-state-cover-collateral-needs-nordic-power-commodity-market
A directed share issue without payment, which entitles Solidium to subscribe up to 8.97 million new ordinary registered shares in Fortum, is a condition subsequent for the drawdown of the liquidity facility. The new shares, amounting to 1% of Fortum’s share capital, will be issued without payment after the execution of the share issue. As a consequence, the shares under control of the Finnish state would increase to 51.26% correspondingly diluting the ownership of other shareholders. The directed share issue requires an approval by Fortum’s Extraordinary General Meeting (EGM) with
The incremental liquidity facility of EUR 2.35 billion is provided by the Finnish state-owned holding company Solidium.
Nordic commodities exchange Nasdaq.
Media:
The arrangement does not include dividend restrictions. Fortum’s Board of Directors will take a view on a possible dividend for 2022 in early 2023.
FORTUM CORPORATION INSIDE INFORMATION 6 SEPTEMBER 2022 AT 9:42 EEST
will not be increased during 2022 or 2023.
a two thirds majority of the shares and votes present. The EGM
Fortum’s Nordic power generating subsidiaries Fortum Power and Heat Oy and Fortum Sverige AB are also parties to the arrangement.
Fortum Corporation has agreed with its majority owner, the Finnish State (ownership 50.76%), on a bridge financing arrangement with which the company aims to ensure access to sufficient liquidity resources if power prices and, with it, collateral requirements continue to rise significantly on the
Fortum commented on the increased collateral requirements in the Nordic power derivative markets in conjunction with the publication of the company's half-year report on 25 August 2022, and in a stock exchange release on 29 August 2022.
short- or long-term incentives (STI and LTI programmes) that are accumulated in 2022 and 2023, and their salaries
(PDF, 798 KB)
Fortum has signed a bridge financing arrangement with the Finnish state to cover collateral needs in the Nordic power commodity market | Fortum
“Regulatory changes are urgently needed to curb the unreasonably high margining and collateral requirements. The EMIR-regulation that governs commodities trading does not make a difference between financial traders and companies hedging their future power production – both have the same cash collateral requirements. Power companies hedging their own production should be allowed to use their future production as collateral. I am pleased that Finland plans to address this issue at the EU energy ministers’ meeting this week," Rauramo continues.
will only be arranged if the liquidity facility is drawn.
06 September 2022, 09:42 EEST
of the liquidity facility is one year, and it matures in full within one year from signing. The first tranche of a minimum of EUR 350 million must to be drawn latest on 30 September 2022 in order for the arrangement to remain effective thereafter. The last required tranche may be drawn by 31 March 2023. The liquidity facility margin for the first six months is 10% and for the following six months 12%. The liquidity facility is linked to the six-month Euribor. The effective annual interest cost including arrangement and commitment fees and excluding the impact of the below mentioned share issue, for the whole amount and duration, would be 14.2%.
The term
The arrangement also contains restrictions regarding management remuneration. In 2022 and 2023, the fees to be paid to the Board of Directors will not be increased. Members of Fortum’s Executive Management team are not paid
Fortum News Desk, tel. +358 40 198 2843
“The ongoing energy crisis in Europe is caused by Russia’s decision to use energy as a weapon and it is now also severely affecting Fortum and other Nordic power producers. The uncertainty in the market remains high as we in recent weeks have seen historically high power prices. Last week, however, spot and futures prices and thus collateral requirements decreased from the highest levels. The arrangement provided by the Finnish state strengthens our liquidity backstop in the midst of the turbulence,” says Fortum’s President and CEO
Currently, Fortum has sufficient liquid funds to meet the collateral needs. The bridge financing is put in place now in accordance with the schedule and terms set by the Finnish state, but the utilisation of the arrangement is a last resort for Fortum. The arrangement cannot be used to cover collateral needs of Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper.
At market close yesterday on 5 September, Fortum’s standalone (excl. Uniper) collaterals tied up on Nasdaq amounted to approximately EUR 3.5 billion. At their highest, the collateral requirements amounted to approximately EUR 5 billion based on closing prices of 26 August 2022.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company
We put our people first; safety and well-being of our personnel is of great importance to us.
We are a European energy company with activities in more than 40 countries and with close to 20,000 professionals.
and our European generation already by
Comparable EBITDA, EUR million
Are you an investor or considering investing in our company? Read more about Fortum as an investment.
Transforming our operations to carbon neutral is a long-standing priority for Fortum. To accelerate development, we have committed to
2035
Fortum in numbers (2021)
This is Fortum | Fortum
2050
Get to know our business structure.
ambitious climate and environmental targets
. We target carbon neutrality in all our operations by
Get to know our energy production
2,536
Business structure
3,817
Modern life requires more energy than ever before. To meet this demand, we use reliable production methods like hydro power and nuclear power.
Fortum as an investment
Comparable operating profit, EUR million
Our people and values
at the latest.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/reporting-structure
Reporting structure | Fortum
Fortum's segment reporting is based on business operations combined with one segment based on geographical area. Fortum's reportable segments under IFRS are Generation, Russia, City Solutions, and Consumer Solutions. Other Operations includes corporate functions, R&D and technology development projects. As announced on 21 September 2022, Fortum has agreed to fully divest Uniper to the German State. As a consequence of the agreement, Fortum deconsolidated Uniper and reported it as discontinued operations in the third quarter 2022 interim report. Fortum’s financials for the continuing operations will not include any impacts from Uniper’s operations.
City Solutions
Reporting structure
Generation is responsible for Nordic power generation. The segment comprises CO2-free nuclear, hydro, and wind power generation, as well as power portfolio optimisation, trading, market intelligence, thermal power, and global nuclear services. Due to the deconsolidation of Uniper, OKG is reported as an associated company instead of the earlier proportionate consolidation.
City Solutions is responsible for sustainable solutions for urban areas. The segment comprises heating, cooling, waste-to-energy, and other circular economy solutions, as well as solar power generation, services, and development of new biomass-based businesses. The business operations are located in the Nordics, Poland, and India.
Consumer Solutions is responsible for the electricity and gas retail businesses in the Nordics, Poland and Spain, including related customer service and invoicing businesses. Fortum is the largest electricity retail business in the Nordics, with approximately 2.2 million customers across different brands in Finland, Sweden, Norway, Poland and Spain. The business provides electricity, as well as related value-added and digital services, mainly to retail customers.
Generation
Why invest in Fortum
The Russia segment comprises power and heat generation and sales in Russia. The segment includes Fortum’s fully owned power plants, its joint ventures for renewable power generation and the joint ventures for power and heat sales, as well as Fortum’s more than 29% holding in TGC‑1. These joint ventures and the associated company are accounted for using the equity method.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum
Major investments and divestments
+200 bps for other investments
Strategy review ongoing
Responsible investment
Fortum's dividend policy ‘is to pay a stable, sustainable, and over time increasing dividend’.
Financial outlook
The long-term financial targets are:
Fortum is a European power company with the purpose to drive the change for a cleaner world. Our role is to ensure the security of supply and a fast and reliable transition to a carbon-neutral economy by providing customers and societies with clean energy and sustainable solutions. Fortum’s core operations are located in the Nordics and consist of CO2-free power generation, electricity sales, district heating as well as recycling and waste solutions.
Fortum's strategy
During 2022, Fortum’s operating environment changed drastically due to the Russian attack to Ukraine. The company is complying with all applicable laws and regulations, including sanctions, and preparing for various scenarios. Fortum has stopped all new investment projects in Russia and is not providing any new financing to its Russian subsidiaries. Fortum is in the process to implement a controlled exit from the Russian market, with potential divestments of its Russian operations as the preferred path.
We are securing a fast and reliable transition to a carbon-neutral economy by providing customers and societies with clean energy and sustainable solutions.
Fortum financial targets and dividend policy were updated in December 2020. Fortum is committed to maintaining a credit rating of at least BBB.
Focus on clean energy
Markets
Credit facilities
Financial targets and aim to grow the dividend
Financial performance
Risks and sensitivities
In the short-term, Fortum’s priorities are, in addition to the finalised divestment of Uniper, to exit from Russia and to ensure the Group’s liquidity in the very turbulent energy market with high prices and extreme price volatility.
More information
Considering the current prevailing uncertainties and the energy crisis in Europe, Fortum will review its stand-alone strategy with the main focus on sustainable power generation, the security of supply and affordable energy. In this context, Fortum’s CO2-free generation assets are now needed more than ever. Following the divestment of Uniper to the German State in December 2022 and the ongoing process to exit Russia, Fortum is repositioning its geographic scope and strategic focus. A strategy review is ongoing and is planned to be announced in connection with the full-year 2022 results on 2 March 2023. At the same time, Fortum is reviewing its business structure and operating model.
Why invest in Fortum | Fortum
Financial net debt/comparable EBITDA below 2x
+100 bps for green investments
Aligned with the goals of the Paris Agreement, Fortum targets carbon neutrality at the latest by 2050 with ambitious mid-term targets.
Operating environment
Hurdle rates for new investments of WACC
Financial targets
CEO's review


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/fortum-responsible-and-sustainable-investment
Corporate Governance
Uniper: women to account for 25% of top executives by June 2022
Fortum’s Board of Directors has approved the company’s Code of Conduct and Supplier Code of Conduct. Uniper’s Code of Conduct and Supplier Code of Conduct have been approved by the Uniper Management Board.
Internal and external reporting channels are offered for reporting suspicions of misconduct. The channels are described in the Codes of Conduct and accessible on the companies’ internal and external webpages. Suspected misconduct and measures related to ethical business practices and compliance with regulations are regularly monitored and assessed by Fortum’s Audit and Risk Committee. Uniper’s Compliance Management System includes quarterly compliance reports to the Uniper Management Board. Uniper’s Audit and Risk Committee monitors compliance issues on a regular basis. Uniper Management Board’s Compliance Commitment is published annually on the company’s webpage in accordance with the German Governance Code. During 2021, two new cases of corruption or bribery were confirmed in Fortum’s operations and one was closed as unfounded.
Secure and affordable energy supply
Continuously improving our performance
Fortum as a responsible and sustainable investment
Fortum had a target for biodiversity to conduct a minimum of 12 major voluntary measures that improve the living conditions of species and strengthen populations, covering all countries where Fortum has hydropower production, for 2021. The projects focus on threatened species or habitats, in particular, and in 2021 included restoring aquatic and terrestrial habitats, improving fish migration and migratory fish populations, and combating invasive species.
Carbon neutral globally (Scope 1, 2, and 3 greenhouse gas, GHG, emissions) in line with the goals of the Paris Agreement, by 2050 at the latest
The Uniper SE Management Board bears the overall responsibility for the adoption and implementation of Uniper’s sustainability measures. Uniper’s Chief Sustainability Officer (CSO) reports periodically to the Supervisory Board on strategic sustainability activities. The Supervisory Board, which is Uniper’s highest governance board, also monitors the fulfilment of Uniper’s sustainability obligations. Four of Fortum’s Executive Managers, including the President and CEO of Fortum, are members of Uniper’s Supervisory Board.
Fortum’s long-term incentive (LTI) programme includes a climate-related metric. In the 2021–2023 LTI plan, the target is linked to the reduction of coal-fired power generation capacity in line with Fortum’s coal-exit path. In the 2022–2024 LTI plan, the target is related to the reduction of absolute CO2 emissions in the European fossil fleet, based on a fossil fleetreview addressing the Group’s European generation portfolio and a pathway developed to reach Fortum Group’s 2030 and 2035 climate targets. Uniper continues to follow its own STI and LTI plans. However, the safety metric (severity rate per TRI) in the STI 2022 programme and the climate-related metric in the 2022–2024 LTI plan are applicable to both companies. Scaling of STI and LTI metrics are company-specific.
Zero tolerance for corruption and bribery is highlighted in both Fortum’s and Uniper’s Codes of Conduct and Supplier Codes of Conduct. In addition, separate instructions and guidelines have been created to address various topics, including but not limited to anti-bribery, compliance management, safeguarding company assets, conflict of interest, anti-money laundering, and competition law.
Fortum as a responsible and sustainable investment | Fortum
Circular economy and waste management
Fortum is an energy company highly committed to sustainability. We strive to respond to the needs of our customers by generating and selling low-carbon electricity and heat and by offering energy-sector expert services.
Fortum’s operations are exposed to risks, which, if materialised, can have adverse effects on the environment and on the safety and security of employees, contractors and neighbouring societies. Key sustainability risks are presented in the Climate section in the Climate and resources review in the Sustainability Report.
Sustainability at Fortum
Governance
Total Recordable Injury Frequency (TRIF) <1.0 by the end of 2025
Sustainability risks
Download Tax footprint 2021
We are exposed to changes in taxation and how local tax authorities interpret tax laws. We aim to identify simple and cost-efficient solutions supporting our business as a whole to manage taxes in a sustainable manner. Artificial or other aggressive solutions are not being used, and legality and honesty are highly valued.
Customer rights and satisfaction
Health, safety and wellbeing
Emissions to air, land and water
Corporate citizenship
Fortum’s sustainability priorities are presented in the table below.
Energy efficiency
Fortum received a score of A- in the CDP Climate Change 2021 rating, and Uniper received a score of B. In the MSCI ESG Ratings 2021 assessment, Fortum received a “BBB” rating and Uniper a “BB” rating. Both companies have also participated in the ISS ESG Corporate Rating, where Fortum received a “Prime B-” rating and Uniper a “Medium C” rating. In addition, Fortum is listed on the Nasdaq Helsinki exchange and is included in the STOXX Global ESG Leaders, OMX Sustainability Finland, ECPI®, Euronext Vigeo Eurozone 120, and Euronext Vigeo Europe 120 indices.
Fortum believes that the growing awareness and concern about climate change will increase the demand for low-carbon and resource- and energy-efficient energy products and services. Fortum's circular economy services also respond to this demand by utilising waste stream materials as efficiently as possible.
Just transition
Gender equality:
Sustainability governance and management
Fortum updated its climate targets aligned with the goals of the Paris Agreement in December 2020 and is committed to carbon neutrality by 2050 at the latest. The target covers direct CO2 emissions (Scope 1) and indirect CO2 emissions (Scope 2 and 3). Fortum’s roadmap to reduce emissions in Europe has also been defined. Fortum is committed to at least a 50% reduction in CO2 emissions (Scope 1 and 2) in its European generation by 2030 (compared to base-year 2019) and to be carbon neutral (Scope 1 and 2) by 2035 at the latest.
Realisation of the safety target (LTIF, own employees and contractors combined) was a part of Fortum’s short-term incentive (STI) programme in 2021. In the 2022 STI programme, the safety target contains the severity rate per Total Recordable Injuries (TRI) of own employees and contractors combined and the execution rate of safety leadership training.
Fortum reassessed its sustainability priorities in 2021. A sustainability materiality analysis was conducted based on internal and external stakeholder surveys, and an extensive desktop review. The materiality analysis applied a two-dimensional approach. It considered the sustainability impacts of Fortum’s business activities on a number of sustainability issues as well as the impacts of these issues on Fortum.
Human rights
Climate change and GHG emissions
As a separate listed company, Uniper applies its own processes aligned with its enterprise risk management to systematically identify, assess, and manage Environmental, Social and Governance (ESG) risks. Uniper’s ESG risk processes includes assessing external and internal ESG risks, including climate-related risks. In 2021, Uniper had no reportable ESG risks pursuant to Section 289c of the German Commercial Code. The impact of its net risks was below the reporting threshold.
Biodiversity
Sustainability management at Fortum is strategy-driven and is based on the company’s values, the Code of Conduct, the Supplier Code of Conduct, the Sustainability Policy and other policies and their specifying instructions defined at the Group level. As sustainability is an integral part of Fortum’s strategy, the highest decision making on sustainability and climate-related matters falls within the duties of the members of the Board of Directors, who share joint responsibility in these matters. Fortum Executive Management decides on the sustainability approach and Group-level sustainability targets that guide annual planning. The Group’s performance targets, including sustainability and climate-related targets, are approved by Fortum’s Board of Directors. Fortum’s line management is responsible for the implementation of Fortum’s policies and instructions and for day-to-day sustainability management and improvement plans.
Business ethics and compliance
Sustainability priorities
Read more on our sustainability site
Fortum strives for balanced management of economic, social and environmental responsibility in the company’s operations.  In our operations, we take into consideration climate and resource issues as well as our impact on personnel and society. The focus areas reflect not only the views of our personnel and stakeholders regarding our fundamental impacts, but also our values – curiosity, responsibility, integrity and respect towards each other and our stakeholder groups.
The Codes of Conduct are regularly reviewed in order to ensure compliance with evolving company and regulatory requirements. Fortum’s updated Code of Conduct and Supplier Code of Conduct were published in early 2021 and training on the updated Codes was organised during the year. The Code of Conduct online training, launched in November 2021, is mandatory for all employees. Uniper’s updated Code of Conduct was published in early 2020, and a new compliance eLearning module was introduced for all Uniper employees in 2021. In addition, relevant individuals are regularly trained in policies and systems that help to prevent corruption.
Scope 3 emissions play a significant role in Fortum’s total emissions. In December 2021, Fortum committed to reduce Scope 3 greenhouse gas emissions by 35% by 2035 at the latest (compared to base-year 2021).
Stakeholder engagement
Climate
Shared value creation
Safety:
Fortum wants to excel in sustainability. The Group-level sustainability targets are linked to the main sustainability focus areas and affect every Fortum employee. Targets are set annually and are based on continuous operational improvement. The achievement of the sustainability targets is monitored in monthly, quarterly and annual reporting.
Sustainability indices and ratings
For Fortum, excellence in safety and caring about both its own employees and contractors is the foundation of the company’s business and an absolute prerequisite for efficient and interruption-free production. Fortum’s safety target is measured as Total Recordable Injury Frequency (TRIF), for own personnel and contractors, and the ambitious goal is <1.0 by the end of 2025. Fortum also had a target for Lost Time Injury Frequency (LTIF), for own personnel and contractors: ≤1.2 in 2021.
Personnel and society
Sustainability management at Fortum is strategy-driven and based on its Values, Code of Conduct, Supplier Code of Conduct, sustainability-related policies, and other Group policies and their specifying instructions. Uniper continues to have its own separate Code of Conduct and Supplier Code of Conduct. Both companies’ Codes of Conduct are based on similar fundaments and they establish the basic principles of conduct that everyone must follow. They define how we treat each other, do business, and engage with the world. The companies’ Supplier Codes of Conduct, both based on the ten principles of the UN Global Compact, outline the requirements for Fortum’s and Uniper’s suppliers and business partners.
Innovation and digitalisation
Reduction of Scope 3 indirect GHG emissions by 35% by 2035 at the latest (compared to base-year 2021)
Number of major voluntary measures enhancing biodiversity ≥12 in 2021
Water use and optimisation
Fortum, excluding Uniper: Board consisting of at least 40% of women and men each in compliance with the principles issued in the Finnish Government Resolution.
Diversity, equity and inclusion
Fortum follows and respects the International Bill of Human Rights, the United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child, and the core conventions of the International Labour Organisation (ILO). Fortum also recognises in its operations the UN Guiding Principles on Business and Human Rights, the OECD Guidelines for Multinational Enterprises, the International Chamber of Commerce’s anti-bribery and anti-corruption guidelines, and the Bettercoal initiative’s Code on responsible coal mining. Fortum is a participant of the UN Global Compact initiative and the UN Caring for Climate initiative. Uniper also follows the ten principles of the UN Global Compact, but is not a formal participant.
Paying taxes responsibly
We have local operations and tax contributions in more than 15 countries. We pay taxes always in the country where our business operations are located and where the added value is generated, in accordance with the local regulations.
Climate and resources targets
Fortum takes into consideration the climate-related transition risks of potential new businesses, investments and technologies. Fortum’s operations are also exposed to physical risks caused by climate change, including changes in weather patterns that could alter energy production volumes and energy demand. Fortum adapts its operations to the changing climate and takes it into consideration, for example, in evaluating growth and investment projects and in operation and maintenance planning.
Fair and attractive employer
Sustainability reporting
Fortum’s sustainability reporting covers all functions under Fortum’s operational control, including subsidiaries in all countries of operation. Fortum’s TCFD (the Task Force on Climate-related Financial Disclosures) report is included in the Sustainability report. The non-financial reporting, in line with the Accounting Act, is included in the Operating and Financial Review in the Financials. Read more about sustainability at Fortum's sustainability pages in and in annual Sustainability Reports.
The country-specific reporting of taxes has become an important topic in international and national public and political discussions. Fortum annually publishes country-by-country taxation its Tax footprint.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/sustainability/approach/assessments-indices
CDP collects information on climate risks and low carbon opportunities from the world’s largest companies.
NASDAQ OMX Sustainability Finland Index
ECPI® Indices.
The index is made of the following three ESG sub-indices: the STOXX Global ESG Environmental, Social and Governance Leaders indices.
The index consists of the 40 shares with the highest Sustainability ranking of the 80 most traded shares on NASDAQ Helsinki.
Rating B in 2022 (A- in 2021) among the Electric utilities sector (scale from D to A, A being the highest score).
We rank in several sustainability indices | Fortum
Fortum has been certified as a Nasdaq's ESG Transparency Partner (reporting year 2021).
CDP Climate Change
ECPI® Indices
Moody’s ESG Solutions
ECPI focuses primarily on the ESG (Environmental, Social, and Governance) performance factors that determine issuers’ sustainability and intangible market value.
Sustainability approach
Moody’s ESG Solutions is a business unit of Moody’s Corporation that serves the growing global demand for ESG and climate insights. The group’s offering includes ESG scores, climate data, Sustainability Ratings and Sustainable Finance certifier services. Moody’s ESG Solutions’ data is used for various ESG indices.
Fortum is a constituent of the ECPI® Indices 2021.
The index offers a representation of the leading global companies in terms of environmental, social and governance criteria.
Fortum is included in the STOXX Global ESG Leaders index 2021/2022.
EcoVadis
Sustainability assessments and indices
MSCI ESG ratings
Rating BBB in 2021 (unchanged).
Read
MSCI ESG Ratings
The Gold level rating indicates that the company is among the top 5% of companies assessed by EcoVadis. The EcoVadis assessment criteria include themes of environment, labour and human rights, ethics and sustainable procurement.
Read more on
STOXX Global ESG Leaders
Expert assessments of our sustainability efforts and good rankings in sustainability indices are important to us as they support the continuous improvement of our performance.
Assessments and indices
Fortum's CDP Climate Change 2022 response
Fortum has received a Gold rating in the EcoVadis sustainability assessment in 2022.
Fortum has received the Moody's ESG Solutions scorecard in 2022.
Rating Prime Status B- in 2022 (unchanged).
Moody's ESG Solutions
ECPI research covers over 4,000 issuers and maintains one of the world‘s largest sustainability databases.
Prime status is awarded to companies that meet specific minimum requirements in Corporate Ratings and achieve the best ESG scores among their sector peers.
NASDAQ OMX Sustainability Finland index
ISS ESG Corporate Rating
MSCI ESG Research provides MSCI ESG Ratings on global public and a few private companies on a scale of AAA (leader) to CCC (laggard), according to exposure to industry-specific ESG risks and the ability to manage those risks relative to peers.
Fortum is included in the NASDAQ OMX Sustainability Finland Index 2022.
Sustainability indices
As the majority owner of Uniper, Fortum has consolidated Uniper as a subsidiary as of 31 March 2020. The consolidation has ended on 30 September 2022 due to Uniper divestment.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/sustainability/approach
We want to excel in sustainability. Our sustainability targets affect every Fortum employee.
Fortum reassessed its sustainability priorities in 2021. A sustainability materiality analysis was conducted based on internal and external stakeholder surveys, and an extensive desktop review. The materiality analysis applied a two-dimensional approach. It considered the sustainability impacts of Fortum’s business activities on a number of sustainability issues as well as the impacts of these issues on Fortum. Fortum’s sustainability priorities are presented in the materiality matrix below.
How we act responsibly
Sustainability is at the heart of Fortum’s strategy. We drive the energy transition towards a carbon-neutral economy. A successful transition must balance sustainability, affordability, and security of supply. This requires renewables, but also nuclear power, clean hydrogen, energy storages, and other flexible solutions. As greenhouse gas emissions need to be reduced in other sectors besides energy, we provide clean energy and sustainable solutions for our industrial and infrastructure customers.
Fortum’s Communication on Progress
Caring for Climate reporting
Sustainability lies at the heart of our strategy. With our strategy, we are driving the change for a cleaner world and we wish to engage our customers and society to join this journey.
on the United Nations Global Compact website.
Fortum Sustainability policy
Read our report
Fortum has participated in the United Nations Global Compact initiative since 2010. In our 2021 Sustainability report, we describe the realisation of the Ten Principles of the Global Compact initiative in our operations in the sections Climate and resources, Personnel and society, and Business ethics and compliance. In addition, we use the GRI Sustainability Reporting Standards disclosures to measure compliance with human rights principles, labour standards, the environment, and anti-corruption. Please find
Read our 2022 response
Global Compact reporting
The entire energy sector is undergoing a transformation and Fortum is an integral part of this change. The faster pace of climate change is accelerating the need for structural changes in society.
In addition to climate and resources, we pay close attention to the impacts our operations can have on our personnel and contractors and the society around us. Fortum’s top priorities were to ensure the health and safety of its employees and contractors and to maintain business continuity.
We joined the UN Caring for Climate initiative in 2013. We meet the reporting requirements of the Caring for Climate initiative by annually participating in the assessment in the CDP Climate Change questionnaire and by publishing our response on the CDP website.
Read more about our strategy
Key sustainability topics | Fortum
Read Fortum's Sustainability policy
CDP Climate change


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/share-information
0.95
– 1999 management share option scheme
Fortum Corporation’s shares have been listed on Nasdaq Helsinki since 18 December 1998. The trading code is FORTUM. Fortum Corporation’s shares are in the Finnish book-entry system maintained by Euroclear Finland Ltd which also maintains the official share register of Fortum Corporation. Fortum has one class of shares.
Subscriptions with options in 2008
1.12
1.98
60,825,940
2,000,000
Employee issue in 1998
5.7
14.61
5.8
13.66
7,154,000
11.30
5.0
# of shares
886,683,058
Rights issue in 2000
Subscriptions with options in 2002
542,368
Registered shares at 31 December 2009
3,247,075
Here you will find share key figures of Fortum and changes in share capital.
2.05
14.58
Option schemes
7.2
888,294,465
12,210,760
14.69
2,478,481
115.8
Share key figures
Share capital on 31 December 2000
Investors: Share information | Fortum
Fortum has currently no option schemes. Last option scheme 2002B ended in 2009.
2,913,000
Subscriptions with options in 2003
2,639,819,282
897,264,465
Share capital on 31 December 2004
EUR
3,046,185,953
72,580
516,800
1.55
10,289,080
4,856,488
Total shares and share capital on 31 December 2006
54.6
0.70
137.3
Registered shares at 31 December 2010 - 31 December 2017
848,832,475
955,022
1,636,350
- 1,660,000
Registered shares at 31 December 2018 - 24 Nov 2022
Share capital on 31 December 2002
36.6
Changes in share capital
784,782,635
112.2
4.66
– 2002 B share option scheme
Total shares and share capital on 31 December 2008
Subscriptions with options in 2005
– 1999 bond loan with warrants
7.5
1,698,000
4,366,858
11.28
3,043,707,472
15.53
2,631,409,886
2.07
24,323,600
867,083,905
1.10 + 0.20
728,965
7.1
6.6
5,773,200
6,727,517
16,512,059
5.60
Payout ratio, %
-5,910,000
5,563,590
Earnings per share
80.9
– cancellation of treasury shares on 21 Dec 2018
1.14
845,759,955
13.33
Registered shares at 25 November 2022 (no changes after this date during 2022)
875,294,025
500,000
2.27
3,040,460,397
2,875,069,155
12.23
415,140
782,782,635
3,591,400
2,886,030,415
22,224,780
0.56
– 2001 A share options scheme for key employees
887,638,080
504,492
On 23 November 2022, Fortum announced that the company’s Extraordinary General Meeting resolved on a directed share issue without payment to the Finnish state-owned holding company Solidium Oy. The 8,970,000 new shares issued by the company have been registered with the Finnish trade register on 25 November 2022. The total amount of shares outstanding in the company after the registration of the new shares is 897,264,465. (at the end of 2021, 888,294,465). Fortum Corporation’s share capital, paid in its entirety and entered in the trade register, is EUR 3,046,185,953.00.
1.36
Subscriptions with options in 2007
1,284,370
887,393,646
- registered shares in directed share issue without payment to Solidium Oy
6,536,700
Subscriptions with options in 2004
11,772,585
– 2002 A share options scheme for key employees
62.9
share capital, EUR
3,000
Share capital on 31 December 2001
4,560,730
Script issue in 2000
1,681,879
1.10
6.7
148,380
7.9
4,555,548
– 2001 B share options scheme for key employees
122,100
1.56
– 2002 B share options scheme for key employees
1.67
Share capital on 31 December 2003
3.55
Fortum established on 7 February 1998
Equity per share
206,808,196
2,875,583,847
Cash flow per share
9,904,200
1,339,867
3,022,782,396
Share capital on 31 December 1998
Subscriptions with options in 2006
194.4
10,200
8,970,000
934,728
1,757,120
28,441,677
Share capital on 31 December 1999
274,920
1.59
2.88
Share capital on 31 December 2005
159,520
5,360,133
Cancellation of own shares
3,026,200
23.6
2,975,999,685
4.2
845,608,575
15,506,482
Dividend per share
Rights issue in 1998
Registrations in 2022
0.91
0.83
888,367,045
Dividend yield, %
0.98
Event
18,224,452
Share capital
2,948,085,277
65.9
784,282,635
Total shares and share capital on 31 December 2007
1.00
3,462,525
15.15


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/all-contacts/sales-contacts
Contact Nuclear Services
0200 19000
21 49 69 10
kundeservice
Fortum eNext Contacts
Contact Fortum eNext
Customer service Finland
Nuclear Services Contacts
020460000
On this page you can find our sales contacts. Don't hesitate to contact us – we are here to help you.
Customer service Sweden
kundservice
Electricity supply
Customer service Norway
Sales contact information | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/contact-information
Fortum eNext supports you throughout the whole life cycle of a power plant with our highly specialized expert services. Here you can find contact information of your local contacts. You can also use the general contact form to request more information and send inquiries, and we will get back to you.
General Manager, Business Development, Continental Europe
juha
+358 400 500 216
Subject
Fortum_noimage_avatar
Sales Manager, Sweden, Norway, Denmark and Iceland
General Manager, Business Development, Asia
Sales Manager, Finland & Baltics
+358 504 532 703
suhonen
+49 160 571 7720
Head of Sales, Fortum eNext
holappa
Mathias Nordstrand
General Manager, Business Development, Finland, Estonia, Latvia and Lithuania
Kristian Rehnström
mathias
Steve Hawes
Juha Suomi
Director, Business Development, United Kingdom, Ireland, Turkey, Africa
Sales Manager, Germany and Middle Europe
Global sales contacts
+358 50 453 4271
Kari Ylönen
Do you have a question or need more information? Fill in the form below to contact us.
+46 70 385 7073
steve
olov
Fortum eNext
Verena Quiskamp
Jyrki Holappa
Fortum eNext - Contact information
Olov Svensson
ylonen
suomi
Contact Information
svensson
+358 50 453 5018
jyrki
hawes
General Manager, Germany and Middle Europe
rehnstrom
Kari Suhonen
+49 173 601 5436
kari
+358 10 45 11
nordstrand
General Manager, Business Development, Sweden, Norway, Denmark and Iceland
+44 779 554 5658
Daniel Brückner
Fortum eNext - Contact information | Fortum
Heating and Cooling Finland
+358 50 453 2705
kristian
+46 70 699 3193


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/we-care-about-your-privacy



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal/privacy/privacy-notice-employees
9. Your rights and how to exercise them
10. Changes to this privacy notice
Personal details
Employment contract management and general administration
You may always express your opinion or contest a decision based solely on automated processing, as well as request a manual decision-making process instead by contacting the People function.
, or in writing to the address below:
Fortum is a global company that has affiliates, business processes, management structures and technical systems that cross national borders. This means that your data is transferred to countries other than the one where you are employed by Fortum, including also outside of the European Economic Area. We use appropriate safeguards, such as the standard contractual clauses provided by the European Commission, for these transfers to protect your data. You can obtain more information about the transfers by contacting the People function.
may use your personal data for the purposes defined in this notice, based on our legitimate interest, to the extent permitted by applicable law. This includes sharing of personal data with the Uniper Group, that processes personal data in accordance with its own privacy notice, in connection with Fortum-Uniper cooperation, common projects and business activities.
Our subcontractors
Fortum reserves the right to amend this Privacy Notice. Possible amendments to the Privacy Notice will be notified on this site, or by communicating directly to you.
– If we decide to sell, merge or otherwise reorganize our businesses, this may involve us disclosing personal data to prospective or actual purchasers and their advisers.
If we do not take action in accordance with your request, we will inform you of the reasons. If you are not satisfied with our response or with the way we handle personal data, please let us know. You can also always contact your national data protection authority.
You
Privacy notice – Employees | Fortum
– You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data on Fortum’s legitimate interests, such as developing our products and services, and other purposes explained above in sections 3 and 6 above. Fortum may reject your request if there is a compelling reason for continuing the processing.
– We receive information directly from you, during the recruitment process and during your employment at Fortum.
11. Controller of your personal data and contact details
We will use your personal data for the following purposes:
We process personal data to manage a professional recruitment process and onboarding with our employees. We review the personal data which you share with us, such as CV and references; we also assess and select applicants in the process. Furthermore, as allowed by local law, we may conduct health tests, drug tests, and background clearances. Read more about privacy in the recruitment process in our
We process personal data to manage the relationship with our employees, including management of contracts with employees. This includes, for example, providing you with work-related tools, training and services, and management of travel and expense claims, working hours, performance evaluation, international assignments, promotions and other development, working orders, payroll, incentives, pension, insurances, and payments, and complaints and grievances.
Fortum collects and processes various types of personal data, where applicable, such as:
. We will disclose your data to certain competent authorities, such as government agencies responsible for tax collection, statistical information or to the police other law enforcement agencies, to the extent required under mandatory law. We may also disclose your personal data in relation to legal proceedings or at the request of an authority on the basis of applicable law, or court order or in connection with a trial or authority process, or as otherwise required or permitted by law.
Ensuring security, safety and legal rights
Legal obligations
If we use automated decision-making with legal or similarly significant effects on you, we will inform you about it in advance. If such automated decision-making is not authorized by legislation, not necessary for the performance of or entering into a contract with us, we will ask for your consent.
Employment administration information
. Please note that some of the rights may not be applicable, for example, if the data cannot be connected to you.
Privacy notice – Employees
This privacy notice describes how Fortum (Fortum Corporation and its subsidiaries, “Fortum”) processes your personal data. This notice applies to the processing of your personal data in the employment context. We may also provide you with additional privacy information in supplements or other notices regarding a particular system, product or service.
– We may receive information from third parties, such as national authorities (e.g. tax, police, and other enforcement agencies) and pension companies.
We use personal data to ensure the security and safety of our information, facilities, products, services, and personnel. This is done subject to local law, for example by keeping access logs and system backups, preventing attacks, monitoring system use, identifying and authenticating individuals, and monitoring access and facilities (including CCTV) and locating individuals in emergency situations. We also process personal data for defending legal rights, including preventing and investigating fraud, industrial espionage and other crime.
– We may share your personal data with authorized third parties, based on our legitimate interest, to the extent permitted by applicable law. In such cases, Fortum will ensure there is a genuine need to share your personal data. Authorized third parties include, for example, travel agencies, banks, telecom operators, benefit, insurance scheme providers, auditors, professional advisors, external legal counsels, actuaries, medical practitioners, trustees or other third-party suppliers.
Recruitment information
Security data
– such as employment, work and career history, photographs, absence and leave records, accident records, time and attendance management records, skills and competencies records, any disciplinary and grievance records, career development, occupational health-related data allowed by local law; and information about work-related equipment and services that you use in connection with work, including, e.g. recorded and transcribed phone calls, recordings of trainings, messaging, and information you publish about yourself in internal and external channels.
– such as your bank account information, corporate credit card information, details of your compensation, benefits and pension arrangements, tax codes, insurance information, travel expenses, company car arrangements, trade union deductions and equity and share information.
Employee recruitment and onboarding
We process personal data to comply with our legal obligations, for example, to comply with tax, accounting, securities, employment, anti-bribery, anti-money laundering, health and safety rules and other legal obligation placed on Fortum.
Financial data
– You can ask for the information about you to be corrected, if it is not accurate or if it needs to be updated.
you have an employment relationship with and Fortum Corporation. If you want to exercise your rights or have any queries about the processing of your personal data, kindly contact
– You are able to obtain and reuse the personal data you have provided us. We can provide a selected set of the data delivered in a machine-readable format, where the basis of processing has been either contract or consent.
– such as your resumé, previous employments, references from previous employers and other third-party references, information about your competencies, qualifications, skills, work experience, and education, and where applicable, the results of background checks and assessments, as well as credit information.
We will use your personal data for predefined purposes based on contract, consent, legal obligation and legitimate interest. Typically, the legal basis for data processing in the employment context are employment contract, employment-related laws or our legitimate interest as an employer to administer employee information in order to enable employment-related processes and practicalities. In addition, we have certain other legal obligations that require us to process employee data. Consent may be used in certain specific situations.
people
cookie policy
services
8. Cookies
- including your contact details (e.g. your name, address, phone number, and email address), demographic data (e.g. your gender, age, language, nationality, professional details, and your identification related information where needed (e.g. national ID number, passport number) but also contact information of others that you provide (e.g. emergency contact, details of your dependents and other similar information).
– data that is collected with cookies or similar technologies about your use of our internal services, your IP address, cookie ID, mobile device ID, details about browser and device, and location.
The controller of your personal data is the local
Authorized third parties
– We use subcontractors to provide us services. Such subcontractors may have access to your personal information and process it on our behalf, but they are not allowed to use the personal data for any other purpose than to provide the service agreed with us. We ensure that the processing of personal data by our subcontractors is done in accordance with this notice through appropriate contractual arrangements. Typical service providers that process personal data include for example payroll and IT software and service providers.
– data that is used for securing the use of our services and our premises, such as your password and login details, employee ID, security logs, facility entry logs, and CCTV camera recordings.
3. What are the purposes and legal bases for processing personal data?
Online data & identifiers
5. How long does Fortum store the personal data?
Below you can see the list of your rights regarding personal data that we process about you. If you have any questions about your rights or want to exercise them, please contact the People function at
This varies country by country depending on the local laws. We delete or de-identify personal data when it is no longer necessary for the purposes it was collected for. For information on how long we hold your personal data, please contact People Services for more information on the specific retention times.
The provisions here are supplemented by applicable mandatory law that prevails to the extent there is a conflict with this Notice.
We process personal data to improve and develop HR and other internal services. Service development is done, for example, by collecting feedback directly from you in surveys and questionnaires; by utilizing the data generated from the use of our services in analytics; and by using recorded or transcribed sales and customer care phone calls for training and service quality improvement. We also have internal reporting processes that utilize employee data.
When you use our services or visit our websites, Fortum can collect data about your devices using cookies and other similar technologies. Our website may also include cookies and other similar technologies used by third parties. You can get more information about how to manage cookies and online data use by reading our
section 6
Service development & reporting
, which share information for purposes mentioned below in


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal/fortums-subsidiaries-and-legal-entities
Kolbäckens Kraft AB
Katajamäen Tuulivoima Oy
Fortum Markets Oy
Fortum Power and Heat Polska Sp. z o.o.
Fortum Waste Solutions A/S
Domicile
Fortum Network Wrocław Sp. z o.o.
Uniper Technologies Limited
Uniper Solar 1 WHV GmbH
Fortum Growth Oy
Fortum Sweden AB
Fortum-New G 3 Limited Liability Company
Uniper Benelux Holding B.V.
Sydkraft Försäkring AB
OOO Unipro Engineering
Molpe Vindkraft Ab/Oy
Uniper Beteiligungs GmbH
Fortum 3 B.V.
Hydropower Evolutions GmbH
Uniper IT GmbH
Energikundservice Sverige AB
Sydkraft Nuclear Services AB
Luxemburg
Fortum SAR B.V.
Göta Energi AB
Uniper Energy Southern Africa (Pty) Ltd.
Fortum Charge & Drive India Private Limited
C, O
Uniper BioMethan GmbH
Sydkraft Nuclear Power AB
Kristinestad-Tjöck Vindpark Ab
G, U
Fortum Asiakaspalvelu Oy
E.ON Benelux Geothermie B.V. (in liquidation)
BauMineral GmbH
Fortum Global Finance Designated Activity Company
Untere Iller GmbH
Subsidiaries by segment on 31 December 2021.
Ergon Insurance Ltd
Penkkisuon Tuulivoima Oy
Fortum Network Częstochowa Sp. z o.o.
Uniper Renewables Italy S.r.l.
Fortum Waste Solutions AB
Uniper UK Limited
Segments:
Ekopartnerit Turku Oy
CS
Uniper Kraftwerke GmbH
Stensjön Kraft AB
Singapore
Fortum Strøm AS
Fortum-New G 5 Limited Liability Company
Oreälvens Kraftaktiebolag
Fortum Waste Solutions Holding AB
METHA-Methanhandel GmbH
Uniper International Holding GmbH
UPT Global Alternatives S.C.S. SICAV-SIF
Fortum Assets Oy
Uniper Energy Sales GmbH
C, CS, G, O
E.ON Ruhrgas Nigeria Limited
Uniper Exploration & Production GmbH
Koillis-Pohjan Energiantuotanto Oy
SolarXL Beta Energy Private Limited
Hallingkraft AS
Indonesia
Värmlandskraft-OKG-delägarna Aktiebolag
Sydkraft AB
Fortum Forvaltning AS
Uniper SE
Uddeholm Kraft Aktiebolag
Uniper Energy DMCC
Uniper Global Commodities SE
Uniper India Private Ltd.
Ural Heat Networks Company Joint Stock Company
Rhein-Main-Donau GmbH
South Africa
Kokereigasnetz Ruhr GmbH
PolarSolar B.V.
Uniper Global Commodities North America LLC
Pjelax Vindkraft Ab/Oy
Fortum Finance Ireland Designated Activity Company
Kotimaan Energia Oy
Gemeinschaftskraftwerk Irsching GmbH
Uniper Energy Fujairah FZE
Fortum Silesia SA
Fortum eNext Ireland Ltd
Uniper Global Commodities London Ltd.
Fortum Finance B.V.
Utilities Center Maasvlakte Leftbank b.v.
Brändskogen Vindkraft Ab/Oy
Fortum Energy AB
Fortum Energy Ltd.
Valo Ventures I LP Fund
OKG Aktiebolag
G, C
Oy Pauken Ab
C, G, O
Uniper Energy Storage GmbH
Nigeria
Fortum P&H Ireland Limited
Holford Gas Storage Limited
Uniper Energy Trading UK Staff Company Limited
Fortum Produktionsnät AB
C = City Solutions, CS = Consumer Solutions, G = Generation, R = Russia, O = Other, U = Uniper
Fortum Kundesenter AS
Barsebäck Kraft AB
Canada
Fortum RES Oy
Uniper UK Corby Limited
Fortum Fiber AS
Blåsjön Kraft AB
Nordgroup Waste Management AB
Sydkraft Hydropower AB
Rwanda
Uniper Energy Asia Pacific Pte. Ltd.
SolarXL Gamma Energy Private Limited
Fortum Power Holding B.V.
United Arab Emirates
O
Uniper Financial Services GmbH
Uniper Benelux N.V.
Fortum Vindkraft Sverige 1 AB
Fortum Russia B.V.
Fortum Heat and Gas Oy
Fortum Glasgow Limited
Segment
Fortum Marketing and Sales Polska S.A.
Plugsurfing GmbH
Uniper NefteGaz LLC
Malta
Uniper Hydrogen Netherlands B.V.
Uniper Risk Consulting GmbH
Plugsurfing B.V
Blåsjön Nät AB
Oy Tertrade Ab
Donau-Wasserkraft Aktiengesellschaft
PT Fortum Energy Solution
Liqvis GmbH
Uniper Global Commodities Canada Inc.
Uniper Hydrogen GmbH
Uniper Ruhrgas BBL B.V.
beschränkter Haftung
Uniper UK Trustees Limited
Fortum´s subsidiaries and legal entities | Fortum
G
Fortum India Private Limited
Fortum Ren AB
Uniper UK Ironbridge Limited
Fortum Tellier AS
Uniper Global Commodities UK Limited
Fortum Clean Oy
Sävar Vindkraft AB
CrisolteQ Oy
Lubmin-Brandov Gastransport GmbH
Uniper Hydrogen UK Limited
Uniper Systemstabilität GmbH
Fortum´s subsidiaries and legal entities
U
Freya Bunde-Etzel GmbH & Co. KG
USA
Fortum Service Poland Sp. z o.o.
Uniper Energy Trading NL Staff Company B.V.
Escandinava de Electricidad S.L.U
Fortum Vindkraft Sverige 3 AB
Mainkraftwerk Schweinfurt Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung
Mittlere Donau Kraftwerke Aktiengesellschaft
O, C, G
tum Sprzedaż Sp. z o.o.
DFTG-Deutsche Flüssigerdgas Terminal Gesellschaft mit
C
Italy
Oy Tersil Ab
Fortum Holding B.V.
Närpes Vindkraft Ab/Oy
Deutche Flüssigerdgas Terminal beschränkt haftende oHG
U, O
Fortum Hydro B.V.
Uniper Anlagenservice GmbH
Fortum Oslo Varme AS
PAO Unipro
Uniper Technologies B.V.
Mellansvensk Kraftgrupp Aktiebolag
South Clyde Energy Recovery Holdings Ltd.
Uniper Holdings Limited
Fortum Waste Solutions AS
UniperTrading Canada Ltd.
IVO Energy Limited
Sydkraft Thermal Power AB
Uniper Holding GmbH
Uniper Renewables GmbH
Fortum France S.A.S
Fortum Power and Heat Holding Oy
Liqvis France SASU
C,O
OOO Agro-industrial Park «Siberia»
Poikel Vindkraft Ab/Oy
Induboden GmbH & Co. Industriewerte OHG
Fortum H&C B.V.
Fortum O&M (UK) Limited
RMD-Consult GmbH Wasserbau und Energie
RuhrEnergie GmbH, EVR
traconn GmbH
SolarXL Alpha Energy Private Limited
Uniper Energy Limited
Blybergs Kraftaktiebolag
Uniper Energy Services MENA DMCC
Fortum Plastics Recycling Norway AS
Fortum Network Płock Sp. z o.o.
Uniper Hungary Energetikai Kft.
Fortum Fastigheter AB
Uniper Gas Transportation and Finance B.V.
Fortum Alku Oy
Fortum Vindkraft Sverige 2 AB
Guernsey
Rheinsee 875. V V GmbH
Uniper Technologies GmbH
Fortum 1 AB
Fortum Norm Oy
Uniper Wärme GmbH
R
Uniper Ruhrgas International GmbH
Uniper UK Cottam Limited
Fortum CFS Eesti OU
Obere Donau Kraftwerke Aktiengesellschaft
Company name
Uniper Infrastructure Asset Management B.V.
Fortum Participation Ltd
Uniper Market Solutions GmbH
CS,C,G,O,R
RGE Holding GmbH
Fortum Markets AS
Spain
Barry France S.A.S
Fortum Insurance Ltd
Joint Stock Company Chelyabenergoremont
Fincumet Oy
Solar One Energy Private Limited
Brännälven Kraft AB
Uniper HR Services Hannover GmbH
Fortum Star B.V.
Hungary
Fortum 2 B.V.
Fortum Real Estate Oy
Böle Vindkraft Ab/Oy
Fortum CS Oy
O, C
Freya Bunde-Etzel Verwaltungsgesellschaft mbH
Uniper Renewables Poland sp. z o.o.
NorgesEnergi AS
HQ Services Limited
Bullerforsens Kraft Aktiebolag
Barry Danmark ApS
Fortum Oyj
Fortum Carlisle Limited
Ergon Holdings Ltd
LLC Bugulchanskaya Solar power station


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal
Learn how we take care of it
Find legal information and resources for Fortum products and services.
Privacy policies
Read our legal notice
Fortum Legal | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal/privacy/privacy-notice-customers
We use personal data to defend and secure our own rights and our customers’ rights. The basis for processing data for the defence of legal claims, debt collection, credit checking, information security, and prevention of fraud and misconduct is typically legitimate interest. Personal data is used for ensuring the security of our products and services, for example, by keeping access logs and system backups, authenticating users, and preventing attacks.
may use your personal data for the purposes defined in this notice, based on legitimate interest to the extent permitted by applicable law, including for marketing their products and services to you.
Privacy notice – Customers
3.2 Sales, marketing and stakeholder communications
3.2.6 Stakeholder relations
In analytics, we do not process identifying data, but we aggregate large volumes of service use data in order to create statistical models, reports, predictions and trend analyses for the support of business decision making, create analyses about service/feature performance, and calculate customer segments that are used to improve our sales and marketing as described in
Chapter 3.2.5
– We may share your personal data if we have your consent to do so. Some of our products and services allow you to share your personal data with others. We may also share your personal data with a third party when this is required to fulfil our obligations under a contract with you or to fulfil a request by you. As an example, we will disclose your address to the postal, courier or installation service to be able to deliver a product or service which you have ordered.
, with whom you have contracted.
how to control your marketing preferences
3.2.1 Customer marketing
We may use traditional marketing channels (post, telephone, door-to-door) to contact you about our products or services and our partners’ products or services, unless you have blocked the use of your contact details.
– We disclose personal data to our commercial partners based on a legitimate interest to the extent permitted by applicable law. Examples of such situations include:
Payment & credit data
We process personal data to improve and develop better services for our customers, to support our business decision making, and to consider our customers’ feedback and needs. The basis for processing data for product and service development is a legitimate interest. This is done, for example, by collecting feedback directly from users using surveys, test panels, interviews, questionnaires and other forms of market research; by utilizing the data generated from the use of our services in analytics; by using recorded or transcribed phone calls for training and service quality improvement; and by testing system functionality with temporary sample data that is collected during normal service use.
Content
Fortum employs appropriate organizational and technical security measures to protect your data from loss or misuse. We have a cybersecurity governance model which describes roles and responsibilities on the group level, and our instructions give detailed information on how personal data must be handled within Fortum. By conducting awareness programs, we engage Fortum employees in privacy and security considerations. Where we contract with third-party suppliers to provide services that may enable them to access your personal data, we require them by contract to have similar security controls in place.
– such as your payment card information and bank account information that are needed for verifying purchases or returning funds, creditworthiness.
For marketing and advertising, we use data that is collected during the customer relationship and from customer surveys; online behavioural data; and derived data that for example predicts the users’ interests. Based on these data, we are able to make marketing more relevant and effective, and send you more personalized offers. An example of derived data is a segment that tells us that the user is likely to live in a suburban area or a row house. You may also receive a targeted offer, for example, because you have moved recently.
This privacy notice describes how Fortum (Fortum Corporation and its subsidiaries, "Fortum”) processes your personal data. The notice applies when you use our products and services or otherwise interact with us. This notice also applies if you are a business customer.
To our business customers (employees of our current and prospective client companies and business partners, other stakeholders) we send offers and information about products, services, promotional events and services that are relevant for their professional role. We send these communications to the work contact address which we have received from the customer, their company, or a public source.
The data needed for delivering services vary depending on the product or service in question. For example, online services may require the user to authenticate, whereas electricity contracts require us to measure consumption. Our customer service handles your requests and messages to serve you. Customer service may also offer you the optimal contract type that we calculate for you. We may communicate with you in contract-related matters via phone, mail, email, SMS, chat, automated calls, and other digital channels including social media.
Please note
: If you no longer want to receive marketing calls or postal marketing from Fortum, you can contact your local market’s customer service] or inform the customer service representatives during the marketing call.
Data processing for our product and service development generally happens with de-identified data to the extent possible. In the case that the customer’s real contact details are collected in connection to the survey, or if we conduct interviews personally with the customer, we may inform you specifically about the use of the contact details in connection to the survey or interview. We may occasionally use samples of real data, for example, to test the functioning of our systems.
The above includes sharing of personal data with the Uniper Group, that processes personal data in accordance with its own
Where you buy our commercial partner’s product or service through us, you make a contract for it with the commercial partner selling that product or service. Fortum is only charging the amount directly to your bill as part of the arrangement with the seller. Fortum may pass your personal data to such a commercial partner to complete your purchase and for us to be able to pay them.
Consent, contract or request
privacy notice
To manage cookies and to opt-out from targeted online advertising
: If you want to manage cookies on our websites or to opt-out from targeted online advertising, use the controls set out in the cookie policy.
contact our customer service
Fortum deletes or de-identifies personal data when it is no longer necessary for the purposes it was collected for. For information on how long we hold your personal data for, please see our retention schedule or
In addition to our own marketing and sales, we use sales and marketing partners who may contact you about our products and services based on their own customer lists, or sell our products and services at their own premises.
To opt-out from telephone and postal marketing
– data that is collected with cookies or similar technologies about your use of our services, such as your browsing activities and segments, your IP address, cookie ID, mobile device ID, details about browser and device, and location.
Authorities, legal proceedings and law.
We will disclose your data to competent authorities, such as the police, to the extent required by law. We may also disclose your personal data in relation to legal proceedings or at the request of an authority on the basis of applicable law, or court order or in connection with a trial or authority process, or as otherwise required or permitted by law.
or in writing to the address below.
The basis for processing your data for service delivery and customer service is typically the contract. When required by law, we may ask for your consent to deliver certain services, for example, location-based services.
that you may still receive marketing messages for a short period after opting out while we update our systems. Also, we sometimes use marketing partners, who may display our products and services to you, but who have not received any personal data about you from us. To opt-out from such marketing or to exercise your other rights, you will need to contact the specific marketing partner directly.
We process personal data to comply with our legal requirements, for example, accounting and tax laws, and anti-money laundering laws.
3.2.3 Traditional marketing channels
To opt-out from electronic marketing communications and customer surveys
For marketing and advertising, we use data that is collected during the customer relationship and from customer surveys; online behavioural data; and derived data that for example predicts the users’ interests. Based on these data, we are able to make marketing more relevant and effective, and send you more personalized offers. An example of derived data is a segment that tells us that the user is likely to live in a suburban area or a row house. You may also receive a targeted offer, for example because you have moved recently.
contact your local company
: If you no longer want to receive marketing messages from Fortum, you can choose to opt-out at any time. The easiest way is to click the link at the end of the marketing message.
Privacy notice – Customers | Fortum
We may contact you through marketing even if you are not our customer. We will ask for your consent to contact you when required by law, otherwise, our contacting is based on legitimate interest. Without consent, we can send automated electronic marketing messages that relate to your customer or business relationship with us, and use traditional marketing channels (e.g. post, telephone, door-to-door), when allowed by law. We also conduct lotteries and contests.
3.1 Service delivery & customer service
Below you can read more about the different types of marketing. In chapter 10, you can read
– such as information about your agreements, orders, purchases, payment status, and invoices; recorded and transcribed phone calls; subscriptions and opt-outs; and your other transactions with us such as service requests and messaging with our customer service.
The data controller who is responsible for your data is typically the
3.4 Legal obligations
– including your contact details (such as your name, address, phone number, and email address), demographic data (such as your gender, age, language, nationality, professional details, and additional details such as your interests or a segment group), and your national identity number when required for verifying your identity.
Where you have purchased our products and services from a commercial partner, we may need to exchange data about you as part of managing that relationship and your purchase – for example, to identify your order and for us to be able to pay them.
We advertise our products and services online to users who visit our website or our partner’s website, by placing retargeting cookies or pixels on the sites that enable us (or a third party acting on our behalf) to show Fortum’s ad to the same user in another network. In order to target you in social media, we may use your phone number or email address unless you have made a marketing block on them. For targeting in mobile applications, we may use data collected about your use of the application, and your CRM data. We also buy advertising services from external companies that target audiences relevant for Fortum, with advertisements of Fortum products and services, in which case Fortum itself does not process the data. Read more about advertising practices in our [cookie policy].
, in connection with Fortum-Uniper cooperation, common projects and business activities. In certain business activities, Fortum and Uniper may also act as joint controllers for common business customers' information, for the purposes of product and service delivery, customer service, sales and marketing. Information about the joint controllership will be provided in connection with the specific business activity.
To contact the local company and exercise your rights with them, please use the links below:
: If we do not take action in accordance with your requests, we will inform you of the reasons. If you are not satisfied with our response, or with the way we handle personal data, please contact your local market’s customer service. If you are still not pleased with the handling, you can contact your national data protection authority.
Agreement & transaction data
Address:
, such as public address registers, credit reference agencies, debt collection agencies, installation partners, marketing partners, electricity and insurance companies, and other data providers.
We collect and use personal data about you to process orders, deliver products and services, to provide customer service and to manage payments, contracts and transactions.
3.2.4 Online advertising
Customer marketing is electronic automated marketing that is sent without consent to existing customers and business customers in those countries where such practice is allowed.
How to lodge a complaint
If we use automated decision-making with legal or similarly significant effects on you, we will inform you in advance. If such automated decision-making is not authorized by legislation, necessary for the performance of or entering into a contract with us, we will ask for your consent.
. Some rights may not be applicable for example if the data cannot be connected to you.
02150 Espoo
We manage stakeholder relationships by communicating about relevant topics and promoting events which we arrange. Communications are sent directly by email to the contact addresses received from the stakeholders or their company.
– We use subcontractors to provide services. Such subcontractors may have access to your personal information and are processing it on our behalf but they are not allowed to use the personal data for any other purpose than to provide the service agreed with us. We ensure through appropriate contractual arrangements that the processing of personal data is in accordance with this notice. Typical service providers that process personal data include for example telemarketing and sales partners, payment and invoicing partners, and IT software & service providers.
3.2.2 Consent based marketing
Further questions and comments regarding your privacy,  including contact with the Data Protection Officer, can be addressed using the
We send you automated electronic marketing and newsletters, if you have agreed to subscribe to them. This marketing can contain information about any Fortum group company products and services or about partner products and services. We may also collect marketing consents on behalf of our partners.
Technical and consumption data
Keilalahdentie 2-4
You can always express your opinion or contest a decision based solely on automated processing, as well as to request a manual decision-making process instead of by contacting our
We will use your personal data for predefined purposes based on contract, consent, legal obligation and legitimate interest. We will use your personal data for the following purposes:
3.5 Defense of legal rights & ensuring the security of our services and customers
Commercial partners
3.3 Product and service development
– data that is used for securing the use of our services and our premises, such as your password and login details, security logs, and camera surveillance recordings.
3.2.5 What data is used to optimize sales & marketing (“Profiling”)
We may give you additional product or service-specific privacy information in the service or product-specific terms, privacy supplements or other notices you may see while using our product or service.
To our consumer customers, who are currently ordering our products and services, we send regular offers and information about products and services that are relevant for the customer relationship. We send these communications to the contact address (phone or email) that you have given in connection with your relationship.
when you order or use our services, when you fill in a form of interest, participate in a survey or competition, create an account, browse our website, or otherwise interact with us.
Our commercial partners include, for example, electricity grid companies, debt recovery agencies, insurance companies, consumer electronics retailers, electric charging station operators, car manufacturers and online advertising partners as explained in the
– such as data related to the operation of a device or application, including the measurement of consumption and production of electricity and other utilities, and data from charging stations and smart devices, including data from any sensors (e.g. temperature).
Below, you can see your rights regarding personal data that Fortum processes about you. If you have any question about your rights or want to exercise them, please


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal/privacy/our-cookie-policy
Cookie Settings
Cookie settings in Safari
The data controller for the data collected by Fortum’s cookies and similar technologies is the company whose website you are visiting.
Our websites are regularly scanned automatically to maintain a list of cookies as well as their purpose and lifecycle. This list is available for you in the Privacy Preference Centre where you can also manage and disable cookies for our sites (except strictly necessary cookies). To visit the Privacy Preference Centre, click on the “cookie settings” button below:
read more about Google’s privacy
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will then not work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Functional cookies
How we use cookies and other technologies
fortum.fi
Cookie settings in Firefox
how we care about your privacy
Fortum and its service providers can access the data in accordance with Fortum privacy notice. Third-party services and social plugins might collect data about the user’s visit in accordance with their valid privacy policies. You can find a list of these parties from the cookie settings panel.
We use cookies to personalize content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyze site usage.
Cookies on our websites can be placed by us and our service providers or by third parties, such as advertising networks, providers of analytics and monitoring services, and social media services.
Cookie settings in Edge
fortum.com
Performance cookies
We use cookies and similar technologies which collect and store information as you browse. Cookies are small text files stored on the user’s device. Other similar technologies include, for example, JavaScript, mobile identifiers, and web beacons, etc.
Our services may also include social plugins, such as the Facebook Like button or the Twitter Like and Share buttons. Although such social plugin buttons may be visible on our services, the related content comes directly from the service provider in question. Social plugins on our service recognize if the user has logged into the service in question and can then display customized content for the user in the social plugin on the website. Social media services using social plugins can collect data about the user’s visit in accordance with their valid privacy policies.
Our cookie policy
Our cookie policy | Fortum
Please read more about
Cookies’ expiration time
We use session cookies, which expire once the user closes the browser. In addition, we use persistent cookies, which remain on the user’s device for a specified period of time or until the user removes them. You can check the cookie expiration times from the cookie manager.
If the user is registered as a user of our digital service such as our mobile application, we can combine observed data of the user’s use of service to the personal data provided to us by the user for targeted advertising and marketing. We use tools such as Google Analytics and Google Firebase to monitor the use of our services. You can
Your internet browser allows you to manage and disable cookies. Consult the below links or your browser´s “help” menu for more details on how to manage and disable cookies in your browser:
We respect your preferences concerning cookies, and you can easily manage and disable cookies for our websites. If you do reject the use of cookies, this may impact your user experience and the functionalities of our services.
Contact details and further information
Social media cookies
Cookies and similar technologies enable us to count the unique visitors on our websites, read certain data on the user’s device, and in some cases determine when the user has viewed certain contents or opened a certain email, combine activity data to user’s profile and determine the IP address.
29/5/2020
In addition to using cookies on our websites, we also use cookies on third-party websites to provide targeted advertising to users. These third-party websites will inform you about cookies in their privacy notices, and you can control the cookie use there.
Strictly necessary cookies
Also, you can control third party cookie use at
Types of cookies
These may be set by us or by third party providers. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Social media services use social media cookies to recognize the user so that you can, for example, share articles in the service by pressing a button. They are capable of tracking your browser across other sites and building up a profile of your interests. This may impact the content and messages you see on other websites you visit. If you do not allow these cookies you may not be able to use or see these sharing tools.
Who accesses the data collected with cookies?
Cookie settings in Chrome
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. They may be set by us or by third party providers. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when a user has visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Managing the cookies on our websites
Your Online Choices
This cookie policy covers the sites under
We use cookies to personalize content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyze site usage. In general, the following types of cookies are used:
Targeting cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide
Products and services for nuclear and thermal power plants
See our offices
Recycling and waste solutions for improvement of material efficiency to B2B customers
Electricity retail sales, district heating & cooling and services for smart living
Fortum is an energy company driving the change for a cleaner world. Our role is to ensure the security of supply and a fast and reliable transition to a carbon-neutral economy by providing customers and societies with clean energy and sustainable solutions.
Fortum worldwide | Fortum
Electrcity generation and heat production
Our headquarters is located in Espoo, Finland.
Our services and solutions
Power trading services for energy-intensive industry
Our core operations are located in the Nordics and consist of CO2-free power generation, electricity sales, district heating as well as recycling and waste solutions. Fortum's share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki.
To country fact sheets


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets
Read the Finland fact sheet
Read the UK fact sheet
Read the Denmark fact sheet
Read the France fact sheet
Read our fact sheet
Read the Russia fact sheet
Read the Norway fact sheet
Read the Poland fact sheet
Read the India fact sheet
Operations in other countries
Read the Sweden fact sheet
Read the Germany fact sheet
Country fact sheets | Fortum
Read the Estonia fact sheet


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-netherlands
Equity investment to Assam Biorefinery Pvt Ltd
The Dutch companies aim to maintain or improve the value of shares in Fortum Oyj books.
Our investments
Sale of 80% stake in Nordic wind portfolio
Equity investment to IVO Energy Ltd
Dutch entities are also involved in new operations by investing in start-ups looking for future solutions for the power industry, such as Valo Ventures.​
Approx. 420M Euro of new investments in the last three years
Fortum companies in the Netherlands create shareholder value by owning Fortum operations worldwide, supporting their profitability, carrying the risk, and enjoying the profits related to these shareholdings and their operations.
Direct and indirect participation in more than 80 companies in the following countries: the Netherlands. Germany, Poland, Norway, Lithuania, Finland, India, France, Sweden, Rwanda, the UK, and the USA
Fortum in the Netherlands
Significant projects executed:
​Our office in the Netherlands is located in Breda and employs ten professionals in economics and finance, treasury, taxation, and accounting.
Divestment of Indian Solar projects to Actis
Key Figures
Divestment of Plugsurfing BV
Equity investments to Valo Fund
Fortum in the Netherlands | Fortum
Fortum companies in the Netherlands create shareholder value by owning Fortum operations worldwide, supporting their profitability, carrying the risk, and enjoying the profits related to these shareholdings and their operations.​​ Next to holding companies, the Dutch branch of Fortum Finance Ireland DAC provided financing activities, including the effective management of intra-group financing dedicated to operational group companies. Fortum Finance Ireland DAC, Dutch branch financing is organized in independent, stable loan portfolios ensuring predictable and safe financing for Fortum Group companies.​​
New equity shares to Finnfund in Fortum Charge & Drive India
Our business
Fortum companies in the Netherlands invest in solar and wind operations, heating, and cooling, waste-to-energy, as well as solutions to improve resource efficiency, more specifically, the production, distribution, B2B, and B2C sale of energy from a different source but also power plant services.​
Sales of Recharge AS group


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-sweden
Fortum in Sweden | Fortum
Read more about our hydropower
Read more about Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power
Electricity sales
Fortum is co-owner of the Swedish nuclear power plants Oskarshamn and Forsmark.
Fortum in Sweden
Read more about our environmental approach within hydropower
Fortum has a minority ownership in its Nordic wind power portfolio serving as long-term asset manager. In Sweden the portfolio consists of the wind power park Solberg.
Circular Economy services
Fortum is the largest electricity retail business in the Nordics with more than 2 million customers. We provide electricity, Charge & Drive e-mobility solution as well as related and digital services for consumers and businesses.
Fortum entered the Swedish market in 1996 in conjunction with the energy market reforms. Today Fortum is one of the major energy companies on the Swedish market with strong presence in fossil-free power generation, electricity sales and waste & recycling.
Read more about our Consumer Solutions business
In 2016 Fortum acquired Ekokem, now Fortum Recycling & Waste Solutions. The facility situated in Sweden specializes in handling toxic waste. We also collaborates with several municipalities in waste treatment and circular economy solutions.
With some 130 hydropower plants in Sweden, Fortum is not only one of the largest operators, but it also gives us the opportunity to make our hydro contribute to a cleaner world. Even with some power plants a hundred years old, hydro power's contribution to a fossil-free energy system[HP1] is crucial. In order to balance its energy contribution to the system, the local environmental effects and the global environmental benefits, Fortum takes perspective based on the whole river system rather than individual plants.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/environmental-approach-within-hydropower
In addition, hydropower gives the opportunity to store energy in the water reservoirs, which is crucial to meet the demands of the renewable power sources that cannot be regulated, such as wind and solar. When the wind doesn’t blow and the sun doesn’t shine we can use hydropower, and when we get energy from wind we can store hydropower. This means that the more hydropower we have the more wind power we can build.
We participate in many ways in environmental management and recreational use of rivers in cooperation with local residents, riverside municipalities, research institutes and environmental authorities. In cooperation we have for many years rehabilitated waterways and improved the riverside landscaping. We are also constantly pursuing the development of water management so that it can better combine other water usage needs with the needs of hydropower production. We have enhanced the recreational use of watercourses by building boat sluices and recreational areas.
Construction of hydropower changed the nature of the watercourse
Hydropower is a clean and renewable energy source
but on the other hand storage of water to the reservoirs diversifies the recreational use of the water system.
We are actively involved in research and development projects aimed at reducing local environmental impacts. The expertise of municipalities, environmental authorities and other local stakeholders in these projects is an essential part of cooperation. As a hydropower company, we have a duty to reduce the environmental impacts of our hydropower production.
Regulation of the water system also has local positive effects. Regulation can effectively prevent flooding of the river. When designing new hydropower plants and renovating old ones, mitigating environmental impacts is always taken into account.
Hydropower plant dams are barriers for the migration of fish and other fauna,
Hydropower has a special position in the Nordic energy system due to its regulation characteristics. Therefore, existing hydropower plants should be used to produce CO
Environmental approach within hydropower | Fortum
Important to do the right measure for the desired effect
Improving recreational use of water systems with hydropower
The installed power of an old hydropower plant can be increased by improving the overall efficiency of the plant. The efficiency of the engine improves when the impeller design is modified, the generator losses are reduced and the turbine control systems are renewed.
At Fortum we actively implement environmental projects within hydropower.
Environmental approach within hydropower
-free electricity increased by an average of 250 gigawatt hours. If the same amount of electricity had been produced by coal ratios, the average carbon dioxide emissions from production would be 220,000 tons.
Hydropower is renewable and produces very little emissions of greenhouse gases from a life cycle perspective. When hydropower was built it affected the local ecosystems in and around the rivers. At Fortum we actively implement projects aimed at mitigating this effect, whilst recognizing the importance of hydropower when combating climate change. Implementing the right action in the right place is crucial to achieve the desired outcome.
Upgrade of hydropower plants bring new renewable energy to the energy market
With the upgrade and increase of the installed power, the hydropower plant produces more CO
The environmental impacts caused by hydropower production are always local and are well known. Hydropower production and regulation change the range and rhythm of the water level and the flow rate in water systems compared to their natural state. Some rivers have been affected for centuries, long before hydroelectric dams.
During the last ten years, we have upgraded our hydropower production capacity by over 116 megawatts through power upgrades. At the same time, the amount of CO
Fish management requires water system specific solutions, and we strive to reduce the impact on fish stocks by fish stocking, restoring fish habitats, implementing transports of fish to their spawning areas and building fishways. In addition to the power plant specific obligations, we participate in voluntary environmental projects to reduce the environmental impact of hydropower production together with municipalities, local authorities and research institutes. We also fund a number of projects to explore the possibilities for enhancing biodiversity.
-free electricity. Upgrades do not usually increase the existing environmental impacts of the hydropower plant. The renewal of equipment improves safety at work and reliability of the plant, the oil amount at the plant is reduced as well as the risk of oil and grease spills, and also the risk of a fire at the plant. We invest 50 to 80 million euros annually for the renovation and power upgrading projects of our hydroelectric power plants in Finland and Sweden.
Environmental projects
Environmental approach
Read more about environmental projects
Show More
-free electricity as efficiently as possible.
Producing energy from hydroelectric power plants is a renewable and efficient way of producing energy. It produces very little emissions of greenhouse gases from a life cycle perspective and as such it is one of the most important energy forms that we have in the battle against climate change. Since there are no fuels in hydropower there is no waste and no emissions of harmful substances either.
The main goal of our environmental work is to determine the specific goal in every case and find the best measure to achieve this goal.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/environmental-approach-within-hydropower/environmental-projects-hydropower
Read more about Hydro power at Fortum
Biodiversity around the Avesta power plant
Environmental project
Downstream migration in Klarälven, Sweden
More about Hydropower
Avesta Power Plant
Cases
Environmental projects in hydropower
Removal of the Acksjö dam, Sweden
Habitat restoration in river Vuoksi, Finland
Here you can find a selection of our environmental projects to date in Finland and Sweden.
Trap and transport systems
Environmental projects in hydropower | Fortum
The bio channel Eldbäcken, Sweden
Measures in Lower Dalälven, Sweden
Avesta power plant
Supporting biodiversity around Avesta Power Station
Improved habitat for graylings downstream from the Munkfors power plant on the Klarälven river


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/environmental-approach-within-hydropower/environmental-projects-hydropower/biodiversity-around-avesta-power-plant
Several threatened species such as broad-leaved thyme and blue bugle were found in the test areas. Interesting plants typical in dry environments such as sand or lime-rich soils were also found. Examples include maiden pink, bloody crane's-bill, Nottingham catchfly, spear thistle, and garden burnet.
Read about our environmental approach within hydropower
Biodiversity around the Avesta power plant | Fortum
The project was initiated in May of 2021 with a controlled burn. This was done in collaboration with Avesta municipality and the emergency services of Södra Dalarna.
Fortum strives to reduce the environmental impact of our activity while at the same time delivering electricity and heat to private homes, businesses, and the public sector. Hydropower does not emit any greenhouse gasses into the atmosphere and is therefore good from a climate perspective. On the other hand, there is local environmental impact in all electricity production. It is for this reason that we participate in several different environmental projects at our power plants. Such efforts are underway in Avesta.
Read more about environmental approach
The inventory revealed abundant growth of species including field scabious, brown knapweed, common bird's-foot trefoil, creeping thistle, along with sporadic growth of harebell and mouse-ear hawkweed. All these plants have special significance to wild bee and butterfly populations.
Inventory by means of clean-up over both areas showed that there are many interesting butterfly and wild bee species here. Several threatened butterfly species were found, including the six-spot burnet, narrow-bordered five-spot burnet, and small blues.
-Controlled burns are intended to benefit the area’s biodiversity and are one of several important means of maintaining high natural value, explains Fortum Environmental Coordinator Katarina Erelöf. In this case it was also necessary to investigate what species are found in the area. We could now inventory eight areas within the burned surface and the same number within a control area.
-Of course it’s great to see that there are many interesting plant and insect species in the area around the Avesta power plant, says Erelöf. Now we can analyse the results and look forward to continued dialogue with Avesta municipality as to how we can continue to benefit and preserve the biodiversity here - while the power plant continues fossil-free production of electricity for many years to come.
During the summer, Fortum worked with environmental consultants from Calluna to inventory plants   and insects in the area surrounding the Avesta hydropower plant on the Dalälven river. The preliminary results show that there are several interesting butterflies and wild bee species in the area.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy
CO2 free
Hydropower – renewable and clean energy
The operating costs of hydropower are very low. Only water is needed to generate power and because the water flow is renewable and not subject to market-based pricing, hydropower helps keep the price of electricity lower because it is relatively inexpensive to produce.
Hydropower helps fight climate change because it doesn’t produce harmful emissions.
36.3 TWh
Fishheart fishway has carried more than 12,500 fish over Fortum’s Leppikoski hydropower plant
Related news
Renewable
We go above and beyond the environmental standards for owning and operating a hydro plant
Water behind a dam is a renewable energy source that does not need to be purchased.
FAQ - Hydropower
Hydropower plants utilise the difference in height between the dammed water and the outflow area to generate water flow energy which rotates a turbine that drives an electric generator. The same water can then be utilised again in the next plant downstream.
share of Fortum's power generation
What is hydroelectric power?
Get to know our Hydropower plants
Flexible
Changes in demand can be met by increasing water flow to generate more electricity.
of power capacity
Where can hydropower be found?
Is hydropower safe?
Inexpensive to produce
See all hydro power plants
-free power generation method that uses the energy created by water flowing through a dammed waterway to create electricity.
8,406 MW
Case Study
Working together for cleaner rivers
More production capacity is needed during times of peak power demand. While coal-fired electricity could be used to fill the gap, hydropower and water flow management offers enough flexibility to meet changes in demand without increasing CO2 output.
Yes, our hydroelectric power plants are built to withstand a flood that statistically occurs every 700 to 5000 years and we invest millions of Euros in dam safety every year.
A CO
We care about the environment around our power plants
Read about the projects
How does hydroelectric power work?
Fortum owns/operates about 150 hydroelectric power stations in the Nordic region.
Eldforsen Hydroelectric Power Plant
A clean-energy future means generating electricity without producing CO2 emissions. For us, hydropower provides much-needed electricity while also playing an important role in minimising our carbon footprint and helping mitigate climate change.
Extra energy
Hydropower is the most important form of renewable energy in the Nordic countries. It is a steady source of power that produces no CO2 emissions. And with only water as an input, the low operating costs of hydropower stabilise the price of electricity for everyone.
of electricity produced
Hydropower – renewable and clean energy | Fortum
Reducing our footprint


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/sustainability/our-people-society/csr/working-together-cleaner-rivers
Personnel, safety and society
We have already seen that this concept works in Sweden, so now it is time for Finland to join in. Sports club Muhoksen Pallo-Salamat started cooperation with Fortum to clean up the Oulujoki riverbank with a crew of twelve volunteers. The goal has been to keep the Leppiniemi beach, located near Fortum’s Pyhäkoski hydropower plant, neat and clean during the summer season. By making the beach more appealing for recreational use, we are contributing to the more versatile use of the riverside and the waterway. Collecting litter from the beach also prevents it from causing harm to wildlife in and around the river.
Working together for cleaner rivers | Fortum
This year, the Swedish project is focused on five rivers: Ljusnan, Indalsälven, Dalälven, Klarälven and Gullspångsälven. As many as 3,000 people are cleaning up the riversides from litter – local youths from the sports clubs, their coaches, and some Fortum staff. In addition, 130 sports clubs from 34 municipalities are participating. We are proud to be part of this effort and extremely happy that so many people in our communities have come together to make it happen.
Thousands of participants – and Finland joining in
We value the possibility of working with local communities and making a positive impact through projects that create value in the community. The River Clean-Up project, which we started in Sweden already in 2013 and have now expanded to Finland, is an excellent example of shared efforts that benefit everyone.
The River Clean-Up project benefits communities in more than one way. For example, in Sweden, we have found that young people are already quite environmentally conscious, and through this project, we can support this mindset. And, of course, the grant given to each participating sports club is a great way to create social value in communities near the rivers that our electricity production depends on.
The project has also allowed us to share knowledge about the importance of hydropower in the Nordics. Hydropower is an essential part of the energy system in Finland and Sweden. It can be used to balance demand peaks, and as a flexible, CO2-free production form, it enables us to add more renewable wind and solar power to the system. This is why it is also very important for us to collaborate with the communities around the rivers where we operate. We share the rivers, and we share the responsibility for them.
Cooperation benefits the entire community
The River Clean-Up, in its tenth year in Sweden, addresses the need to keep rivers clean and in good condition for the good of hydropower production, recreational use of rivers and river ecosystems alike. The project is built around collaboration with local sports clubs. Their members clean up litter from the riversides, and Fortum provides a grant for the sports clubs in return. Today, we have around 3,000 participants, and about 35 sports clubs have worked with us from the very first year to this day. The amount of litter collected over the years is astounding – in total, 252 tonnes by the end of 2021.
Corporate Social Responsibility


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/sustainability/our-people-society/csr
Fortum collaborated with Miljøagentene to teach children in Norway about renewable energy
Fortum welcomes support applications within our Corporate Social Responsibility (CSR) programme's strategic focus areas Climate (environment and water), People (particular emphasis on children, youth and education) and Material revolution (recycling and waste).
we do not sponsor anything for logo visibility only.
About our Corporate Social Responsibility programme
Supply chain management
religious causes
Corporate social responsibility
Read more in the Sustainability 2021 report
To ensure a smooth handling of your application, fill in all the requested details carefully. Mandatory fields are marked. Incomplete applications will not be evaluated.
Before submitting your application, please ensure that you have completed all the required details. Once you have submitted your application, it is not possible to cancel it anymore.
labour organizations
You cannot save the web application template as a draft.
Corporate Social Responsibility | Fortum
municipalities, local governments-accessory advertisements
Fortum has a long history of cooperating with local communities. We have defined our way of working: we want to work in the areas that we know best and link our actions tightly to our corporate strategy.
CSR application form
Support guidelines
sports allowed only if aligned with the CSR programme themes
We do not contribute to:
Fortum's support for social responsibility initiatives can be requested through an application. You may find the link to the application form at the bottom of this page. To facilitate efficient handling of your application, we have provided a set of detailed questions for you to answer, including, e.g. your plan on how Fortum is to be acknowledged for supporting your cause.
Before filling in the application, please note the following:
public authorities (e.g. officials, police, military)
political purposes of any kind
Handling of your application takes a while. You can expect to receive a reply within 90 days.
radical movements or associations using illegal methods, unethical purposes or activities that endanger environment or safety
Our Supplier Code of Conduct
Fortum and Neste Foundation
Apply for Fortum's support for social responsibility initiatives (sponsoring, donation requests)
Fortum Data Privacy Document
Supporting the post-COVID-19 recovery in Rajasthan, India
Please note that we require applications to fulfil our basic qualification criteria. Only qualified applications are accepted into the further evaluation process. We will send a response to all applicants.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/code-of-conduct
Lithuanian
Supplier Code of Conduct | Fortum
Our Supplier Code of Conduct sets the sustainability requirements for our suppliers. It is used in all our countries, and suppliers are obligated to implement the principles of the Supplier Code of Conduct across their whole business.
Danish
Our key tools in supply chain management are counterparty risk assessment, supplier qualification and supplier audits.
Etiske retningslinjer for leverandører
Estonian
We are actively striving to reduce the environmental impacts caused by our operations and to improve economic and social wellbeing. We require all our suppliers and business partners to comply with a zero tolerance policy towards corruption and bribery. The aim is that open and efficient collaboration creates value for both parties and in whole supply chain.
Norwegian
German
Finnish
Verhaltenskodex für Lieferanten
Tiekėjo veiklos kodeksas
Documents in different languages
Toimintaohje palvelun- ja tavarantoimittajille
Find your own language version from the list below to get to know our requirements.
Piegādātāju Ētikas kodekss
Kodeks Postępowania dla Dostawców
We manage risks related to our supply chain
Polish
Tarnija käitumiskoodeks
Leverandøradfærdskodeks
Latvian
Кодекс поведения поставщиков
Russian
Code of conduct for suppliers
Swedish
Uppförandekod för leverantörer


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/sustainability/our-people-society/csr/fortum-collaborated-miljoagentene-teach-children-norway-about-renewable-energy
Fortum supported Miljøagentene financially, but also contributed to the teaching programme.
Feedback from Miljøagentene: “Through De Grønne Forskerspirene we have been able to give the third-graders a unique understanding of what energy actually is. The classes have reported back that it has been both fun and exciting to be a part of the competition. Hopefully we have inspired them to lifelong environmental engagement.” Miljøagentene’s aim is to stimulate the children’s interest and love for nature and to help them realise that the way we live our lives impacts the environment. Miljøagentene has more than 10,000 members and 59 local groups all over Norway.
Return to the
Read more in the
In 2021, Fortum collaborated with the children’s environmental organisation called Miljøagentene (The Eco-Agents) to develop De Grønne Forskerspirene (The Green Researchers), a teaching programme for all third-graders in Norway. During the programme, around 10,600 children in the participating 475 school classes carried out fun experiments and learned about renewable energy. The children were also provided with practical guidelines for additional voluntary experiments to be done at home. The goal of the programme was to give the children a passion for research and environmental commitment and to show how new technology and renewable energy can contribute to solving climate challenges.
Fortum collaborated with Miljøagentene to teach children in Norway about renewable energy | Fortum
Sustainability 2021 report
According to Fortum’s representatives in the project, “Miljøagentene gives insight into energy on the children’s terms. The 8-year-olds have researched the mysteries of energy and have thus become more energy-smart than many adults. We’re happy to continue and further develop the collaboration in 2022.”
Corporate Social Responsibility page
The impact of the programme was measured through a survey of participating teachers. The result showed that 95% were happy with the project, 96% noted that the project increased knowledge on renewable energy, and 86% thought that the project increased children’s engagement in climate and environmental topics.
Fortum collaborated with Miljøagentene
The third-graders completed different experiments and competed with other school classes. At the end of the competition, three winners were chosen and each received EUR 500 for their classes.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/sustainability/personnel-safety-and-society
Our open leadership mode of operation supports the cooperation between units and targets to establish a work environment that promotes innovations, flexibility and agility.
28%
Our Energise Your Day wellbeing program encourages employees to maintain and develop their wellbeing and take care of themselves.
For Fortum, excellence in safety is the foundation of our business. We believe that all work injuries and EHS non-compliances are preventable when competence and the right attitude prevails, when potential risks are addressed, and when measures are taken to safeguard against them. Good occupational safety is a prerequisite for an efficient operation from the point of our employees and environment. Our safety targets are common and our goal is the continuous improvement of safety.
We aspire to be a responsible employer that offers a diverse and motivating work environment and invests in personnel development and well-being. For us, excellence in safety is the foundation of our business, and safe performance is a sign of professionalism.
0 severe accidents
TRIF in 2021
Safety first
Vacancies
We value diversity and foster fair treatment and equal opportunity in the recruitment, remuneration, development and advancement of employees, regardless of ethnicity, religion, political opinion, gender, age, national origin, language, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, or any other factor. Discrimination or unfair treatment is not tolerated, and we address it immediately.
employees in total at the end of 2021
See our open jobs
Would you like to work for a cleaner world?
We support our employees' wellbeing and development
We have managed to achieve already a good safety level and our target is zero severe incidents. The Group’s new safety target is measured as Total Recordable Injury Frequency (TRIF), for own personnel and contractors, and our ambitious goal is to be below 1.0 by the end of 2025.
Our safety target
female employees
Diversity in focus
report.
We contribute to the UN Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs). Personnel and society related targets are clearly visible in the below chart.
female share in leadership
27%
The importance of occupational healthcare services in a pandemic situation
2.2
19,140
The energy sector is changing, and so is our company. We wish to support our employees in responding to the field's megatrends. Their wellbeing and work-life balance are important to us, as it is the people that enable what Fortum is today and in the future.
Lost Time Injury Frequency (LTIF) ≤1.2
Personel and society
Personnel, safety and society | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/careers/open-jobs
Open jobs at Fortum | Fortum
Open jobs at Fortum
Open jobs


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/sustainability/our-people-society/csr/fortum-and-neste-foundation
Fortum and Neste Foundation | Fortum
To fulfil its purpose, the Foundation can award grants, honorary awards or other such financial means to economically support actions relating to meeting its objective.
The Foundation’s purpose is to support research, education and development in natural, technical and economical sciences within the energy industry. The Foundation’s focus areas within the energy industry are energy production and use, as well as clean energy solutions for traffic.
Read more on Fortum and Neste Foundation


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/sustainability/our-people-society/csr/about-our-corporate-social-responsibility-programme
Miljøagentene
We support for example
organizations in Sweden.
Focus areas
Examples of co-operation partners
We have structured our societal actions within the framework of a Corporate Social Responsibility (CSR) Programme, which covers the initiatives undertaken by Fortum companies in their neighbouring communities worldwide. The programme's focus areas are Climate (environment and water), Material revolution (recycling and waste) and People (particular emphasis on youth, children and education).
During the Covid-19 pandemic, our programme initiatives have concentrated on People as the pandemic has created an increased need for services and help among people globally. We co-operate with carefully selected organisations. Due to the war in Ukraine, Fortum Group has supported charity organisations and launched a voluntary work programme for our employees helping refugees in Ukraine and in the neighbouring countries.
John Nurminen Foundation
Save the Children’s
in Norway and
Covid-19 relief work in India,
Return to the Corporate Social Responsibility page
About our Corporate Social Responsibility programme | Fortum
Activities
Städa Sverige
Regnskogfondet
Maskrosbarn
in Finland,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/06/fortum-support-save-childrens-covid-19-relief-work-india
Save the Children Finland is a politically and religiously independent non-governmental organization founded in 1922, which fights for children’s rights in order to immediately and permanently improve children’s lives in Finland and all over the world. Save the Children Finland is part of the Save the Children organization, which operates in over 100 countries to improve children’s lives. Our vision is a world where every child has the right to live, to be protected, to develop and to participate. Our mission is to improve the way children are treated and to immediately and permanently improve children’s lives.
Fortum's Corporate Social Responsibility:
Fortum donates one hundred thousand euros to support the Save the Children organisation’s efforts to help children and families suffering from the Covid-19 crisis in India.
FORTUM CORPORATION ONLINE NEWS 28.6.2021
, +358 40 570 5005
28 June 2021, 11:00 EEST
www.savethechildren.fi
Anne Haaranen
Fortum started its operations in India about 10 years ago. Fortum’s operations in India are focused on solar power.
“Covid-19 pandemic further weakens the situation of the most marginalised families, and many children in India have lost the adults who take care of them. Through its donation, Fortum is contributing to the Save the Children organisation’s effort to bring help to where it is most needed,” says Fortum’s Vice President of Sustainability
paula
https://www.fortum.com/about-us/sustainability/our-people-society/csr
Fortum to support Save the Children’s Covid-19 relief work in India | Fortum
Save the Children uses donations to help children and families in India survive in the midst of the crisis. The donated funds support the operations of clinics and hospitals by ensuring that children and the families in the worst situation receive vital services, food, monetary aid, and hygiene supplies. In particular, the aid targets those children whose parents or caregivers have become ill or have died by offering them psychosocial support, identifying these children and supporting the arrangements for their alternative care.
, International Programme Director from Save the Children; and adds: “We are extremely thankful for Fortum’s support and that it wants to help children in India through the Covid-19 aftermath.”
The second Covid-19 wave has ravaged India throughout the spring. The health care services are under extreme pressure, and restriction measures have interrupted children’s education. As a result of the situation, the people have no access to basic services, and the consequences impact children in particular. The need for help in India is acute, and the need for support will continue for a long time.
“The Covid-19 pandemic has had – and will have – a huge impact on the lives of children specifically in the most vulnerable regions. Many children have lost one or both of their caregivers. Many are left outside the educational system and end up being exploited in harmful child labour or getting married too young. When more families slip below the poverty line, the plight of the most disadvantaged families worsens,” says
varhe
Paula Varhe, Manager, Corporate Social Responsibility,
Save the Children is the world’s leading independent organization for children.
Save the Children Finland


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/sustainability/our-people-society/csr/csr-application
terms and conditions
People
Complete
Basic information
Terms and conditions
All initiatives are to be related to Fortum's Corporate Social Responsibility programme's strategic focus areas. To which area(s) does your initiative belong to? If none, your application will be disqualified and rejected.
2. Evaluation: Our entity commits to send to Fortum a report on project, including information on how Fortum's financial support was used and what was the impact of the project (KPIs), minimum at the end of project, year end or whenever Fortum asks for the information.
Fortum Supplier Code of Conduct
Corporate Social Responsibility support application form
Current
No (disqualified)
Qualification
recycling and waste
Corporate Social Responsibility support application form | Fortum
Material revolution
Yes (qualified)
Guidelines for Fortum's social responsibility initiative support
I agree to the
Please fill in this application for requesting Fortum's support on social responsibility activities. You may fill in the application in English, Finnish or Swedish. Please note that you cannot save the application as draft. You can get a copy of the application to your email. After you have submitted your application, an information box will open to instruct how to send us application attachments via e-mail. Kindly note that we will only handle applications submitted through our web site application form.
particular emphasis on Children, Youth and Education. Should have element also from either Climate or Material Revolution.
Initiative information
Please confirm, that your initiative does not represent any of the out-of-scope groups defined in the guidelines. Please find link to guidelines at the top of the page .
Proposed co-operation
environment and water
and the entity that I represent commits to comply with it.
1. Terms and conditions: I have read and understood the requirements of


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers-are-important-part-our-successful-business/we-manage-risks-related-our-supply-chain



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/10/supporting-post-covid-19-recovery-rajasthan-india
About the writer
South Rajasthan is a poverty-stricken area where people manage their livelihoods from subsistence farming along with migrating as seasonal labourers to the neighbouring state of Gujarat. When illness strikes, many people still resort to faith healers instead of seeking appropriate medical treatment. Child labour is rampant and trafficking of children to neighbouring cotton fields is a common practice in the area. Harsh living and working conditions have resulted in the early death of many adults, especially migrating men, leaving women behind to care for the household economy and children. With the advent of the COVID-19 pandemic, the situation worsened as income opportunities came to a halt and some children lost one or both parents to the virus.
Written by Disa Sjöblom, Senior Social Protection Adviser, Save the Children Finland
Supporting the post-COVID-19 recovery in Rajasthan, India | Fortum
For the last ten years, Save the Children has been working in this area with a two-pronged strategy which was intensified due to the pandemic. Firstly, we have developed an approach in which local governments take responsibility to ensure that people secure access to the many social protection programmes (cash transfers) provided by the government. These programmes include for example widow allowance, disability allowance, caregiver allowance, allowances for construction workers, and insurance benefits for low-income households. Lack of awareness of these programmes and application processes has resulted in low uptake of the schemes leaving the families in greatest need without support. In response to the economic hardships caused by the pandemic, the government increased the coverage as well as the value of many schemes. With Fortum’s support, we have been able to expand this work to new areas in the region and many people have and are still gaining access to the programmes which provide them with a regular income.
Educating local project staff and parents
As accurate and regular growth monitoring is an important factor to address the high prevalence of malnutrition, we have used some of the Fortum grant to provide early childhood development centres with infantometers (to measure the length of a child) and weighing machines along with training of the government frontline workers on their use.
Measuring the length of a child
Due to the COVID-19 pandemic, many children lost their parents leaving them in a state of fear and uncertainty. The Fortum donation has enabled us to engage a clinical psychologist with substantial experience in grassroot psychosocial counselling. She has trained local staff members to act as first aid counsellors and they are now working with selected children. This is an important piece of work that we hope we can take further and that can help us to advocate with the government on the urgent need for initiatives that target improving the mental health of disadvantaged children.
Children who live in poor regions and in marginalised communities are at risk of being deprived of many of their basic rights and needs, but with the support of companies like Fortum, we are in a good position to transform the lives of children and improve their development prospects. Our support is increasingly being recognised by the state government, and we are actively promoting the government to scale up some of the initiatives.
Fortum in India
India is the first country Fortum decided to enter in solar. The country offers one of the best solar resources and a sound government support for the development of the solar sector. India has set itself stretching targets for solar capacity for a clean energy future and Fortum is helping to support this. Within Rajasthan, Fortum has built 325 MW of solar since 2013 and continues to operate 75MW of this in Amrit and Bhadla in Rajasthan as well as in other parts of India. As well as funding the work with Save the Children, Fortum India carries out many other CSR projects near to where it operates to promote social and economic equity.
Disa Sjöblom works as a Senior Social Protection Adviser at Save the Children. She is based in India, where she supports Save the Children's Child Sensitive Social Protection project. Disa's job involves strategic planning, training, research, documentation, policy analyses and, most importantly, supporting the local project staff to do their work in the best possible way.
A mother bonding with her child
Secondly, we know that addressing monetary poverty is not enough to combat child poverty. Misconceptions, community trends, traditional beliefs, and lack of adult education are also key drivers of children being deprived of a good start in life and subsequent support needed for their development. Parents are key actors in children’s life and their caregiving skills have a profound impact on children’s opportunities. We have therefore introduced a parenting programme to parents and other caregivers who receive the government caregiver scheme with impressive results. Not only has maltreatment of children reduced but children's social and emotional skills have improved as well. Thanks to Fortum we are now able to take this programme to mothers with small children and we are certain that improved parenting practices will lead to improvements in early childhood development. Parents gain skills in how to enhance bonding with their children and to communicate in ways that support children’s cognitive, social and emotional development.
CSR at Fortum
10 October 2022, 16:04 EEST
In June 2021, Save the Children Finland received a significant donation from Fortum to support the COVID-19 response in our ongoing project in southern Rajasthan, India. The project aims to reduce the poverty and vulnerability of children who belong to the tribal communities in the Dungarpur and Udaipur districts.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/08/fishheart-fishway-has-carried-more-12500-fish-over-fortums-leppikoski-hydropower-plant
Fishheart fishway has carried more than 12,500 fish over Fortum’s Leppikoski hydropower plant | Fortum
The Fishheart commissioned at the Leppikoski power plant is part of a set of measures being implemented to strengthen the natural life cycle of endangered Oulujärvi lake trout on the Hyrynsalmi route. The top targets of the Oulujoki river system fish passage strategy are located on the route.
Additional stocking of juvenile fish in rivers upstream from the Leppikoski power plant
Mika Sohlberg
As of mid-August, the Fishheart fishway had carried more than 12,500 fish over the Leppikoski power plant located in Paltamo. The Fishheart was lowered into the water in June, and the plan is for it to be in use until mid-October.
Along with lake trout, the Fishheart has also carried whitefish, perch, bream, vendace and pike perch, among others, this summer. In 2021, the Fishheart was in test use from early August to the end of October. Now, for the first time, the fishway will be in use throughout the entire upstream migration season.
“During the 2021 test use and the short operating period, we gained important information about where the Fishheart’s opening should be positioned for the next season. Based on the results, it seems that the positioning has been ideal for this summer. In fact, one of the advantages of the Fishheart is that it can be moved to a location based on what is best for the fish,” says
, Sales and Marketing Manager from Fishheart Ltd.
30 August 2022, 09:00 EEST
The hydraulic Fishheart fishway is a Finnish innovation enabling fish to migrate past obstacles. The fishway is installed in the power plant’s tailrace channel, where an attraction flow is created to guide fish into the opening of the device. Fishheart uses artificial intelligence to detect fish that swim in and then moves them via pipes over the dam.
Katri Hämäläinen
“The result is excellent even though we are just half way through the operating period. It’s also fantastic to see how many different species have passed through the Fishheart. So far, about 15 of the fish have been endangered lake trout; that’s a promising number,” says Fortum’s Environmental Manager
The project includes e.g. the restoration of potential habitats and breeding grounds essential for the life cycle of the lake trout population in the tributaries upstream from the Leppikoski power plant. Additionally, Fortum has increased the stocking of lake trout fry in the tributaries in an effort to strengthen the fish population that imprints to the river. Stocking and the use of the Fishheart fishway is planned and developed in cooperation with the local fishing right owners’ association and fishing authorities.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/hydropower/hydropower-plants
Gråda
Noreborg
Montta
Tainionkoski
Gullspångsälven river system
Oulujoki is a 107 km long river in Northern Finland. Fortum has eleven hydropower plants in the Oulujoki river system.
Lottefors
Klarälven hydropower plants
Åsen
Väsa (jointly owned)
Järnvägsforsen (jointly owned)
The Pälli hydropower plant, completed in 1954, is located in Muhos. The plant is the fourth hydropower plant upstream in the Oulujoki river. The output is 51 MW, and the head is about 14 meters. Three Kaplan turbines. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of about 12,000 households with electric heat.
Långströmmen - jointly owned.
Munkfors
Ljusnan hydropower plants
Byarforsen - jointly owned.
Hydropower plants
Sveg - jointly owned.
Kroppstadsfors
Kvarnfallet (jointly owned)
Åsteby
Norränge
Tänger
Pälli
Power plant
Norsälven hydropower plants
Avesta Lillfors
Kristinefors
Degerfors
Ljungan hydropower plants
Hydro Finland
Hermandsboda (jointly owned)
Bofors
The Pyhäkoski hydropower plant, completed in 1951, is located in Muhos and is the third power plant upstream in the Oulujoki river. The output is 149 MW, and the head is 32.4 meters. Our Pyhäkoski plant is the biggest hydropower plant in the Oulujoki water system. Three Kaplan turbines. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of nearly 30,000 households with electric heat.
The Ämmä hydropower plant, completed in 1959, is located along the Emäjoki river in Suomussalmi. The output is 16 MW, and the head is 10-13 meters. One Kaplan turbine. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of about 2,000 households with electric heat.
Storgysinge
In Sweden the river Indalsälven, with its source lakes in the mountains of Jämtland, holds a high volume of water – at its mouth the flow is an average of 440 m³ per second. Here Fortum runs 10 hydro power plants.
Laforsen
Alfta (Malvik)
Nuojua
Väls
Gammelänge (jointly owned)
Landafors
The river Gullspångsälven in Sweden is one of Fortum's biggest main drainage basins in terms of number of plants, with 8 power plants distributed amongst three watercourses. Together with the arms Svartälven and Timsälven, the catchment area comprises 5,000 km².
Krångede (jointly owned)
Björkborn
Höljes
Ljusnefors
Värån Övre
River system Byälven
Byälven hydropower plants
Hydropower plants | Fortum
Järpströmmen
Mockfjärd (jointly owned)
River system Indalsälven
River system Dalälven
Gävrunda
Stensjöfall
Skedvi
Ljusneströmmar - jointly owned.
River system Ljusnan
Röjdåfors
Lanforsen
Hydro Sweden
Tvärforsen
Horrmundsvalla (jointly owned)
Kvarnsveden 1 och 2
River system Norsälven
Dönje
In Sweden, Klarälven stretches from Långflon in the far north to Lake Vänern in the south. Klarälven's catchment area has an area of 11,800 km², half of which is on the Norwegian side.
Domnarvarvet
Åtorp
Långå G1 Lossen
Storåsströmmen
Oulujoki hydro power plants
Edeforsen
The Leppikoski hydropower plant, completed in 1963, is located along the Emäjoki river in Paltamo. The output is 21 MW, and the head is 11.1-13.3 meters. Two Kaplan turbines. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of about 4,000 households with electric heat.
Dejefors
Skattungbyn
Gullspång
Noppikoski
Vässinkoski
Tåsan (jointly owned)
Anjan
Kymmen
Laggåsen
The Aittokoski hydropower plant, completed in 1960, is located along the Emäjoki river in Suomussalmi. The output is 45 MW, and the head is 30 meters. One Kaplan turbine. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of 6,000+ households with electric heat.
Spjutmo
Frykfors
Trängslet
Bullerforsen (jointly owned)
Vuoksi power plants
Lima
Unnån (jointly owned)
Torsby
Jössefors (jointly owned)
The river Byälven runs in the region of Värmland in Sweden. Fortum has five hydro power plants in the catchment area of Byälven.
Vuoksi river system
Klarälven river system
The Seitenoikea hydropower plant, completed in 1961, is located along the Emäjoki river in Ristijärvi. The output is 39 MW, and the head is 15.6 meters. One Kaplan turbine. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of about 7,000 households with electric heat.
Blyberg (jointly owned)
Mörsil
Hydro power plants global site
We have a total of 159 hydropower plants in Finland and Sweden. In addition, we are co-owner of several other hydropower plants.
Edsvalla
Nain
Båthusströmmen
Pyhäkoski
Hummelforsen
Skråmforsen
The Jylhämä hydropower plant, completed in 1952, is located in Vaala. Jylhämä is the first hydropower plant downstream from Oulujärvi lake, and it regulates the water level in Oulujärvi lake. The output of the power plant is 55 MW, and the head is 11-14 meters. Three Kaplan turbines. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of 10,000+ households with electric heat.
Read more (in Finnish)
Oulujoki river system
Långå G2 Mittån
Värån Nedre
Fensbol
Skoga
Långhag
Imatra
Letten
Glava
Borgärdets
Indalsälven hydropower plants
Stjern
Viksjöfors
Rottnen
Lindbyn
Untra
Öjeforsen
Ugsi
Krokströmmen - jointly owned.
Svarthålsforsen
Råda
Description
The Utanen hydropower plant, completed in 1957, is located in Utajärvi. The output is 58 MW, and the head is 15.7 meters. Three Kaplan turbines. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of about 13,000 households with electric heat.
Avesta Storfors
Sunnerstaholm
Hansjö
Furudal
Juveln
Seitenoikea
Bergvik
Brattforsen
Krakerud
Read more (in Swedish)
The Ala-Utos hydropower plant, completed in 1957, is located in Utajärvi. Ala-Utos is the smallest power plant in the Oulujoki water system and utilises the elevation difference of two water channels. The output of the power plant is 1 MW, and the head is about 6 meters. One Francis turbine. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of about 70 households with electric heat.
Eldforsen
In Sweden, the river Dalälven forms many rapids on its way down to the Gulf of Bothnia, and it is close to areas with a high energy requirement. Dalälven's catchment area is Fortum's biggest, comprising 33,480 km² and 39 hydropower plants.
Leppikoski
Torrön
Åmotfors
Avestaforsen
Dalstuga
Knon
Eggsjön (jointly owned)
Jylhämä
Edsforsen
Ljungan is a 399 km long river that flows from the Swedish mountains to south of Sundsvall. Fortum has four power plants in the river system Ljungan, of which two are fully-owned.
Röbjörke
Dalälven hydropower plants
Skumnäs
River system Ljungan
Parteboda
Ljunga
The Nuojua hydropower plant, completed in 1955, is located in Vaala. The output is 81 MW, and the head is 22 meters. Three Kaplan turbines. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of about 18,000 households with electric heat.
Hagfors
Ämmä
Lenninge
Forshuvud (jointly owned)
Brattfall
Traneberg
Forshaga
In the river Norsälven's main catchment area in Fryksdalen, Sweden, Fortum wholly owns 11 hydro power plants. The area of the basin is 4,000 km².
Vuoksi river system is located in Finland, Imatra. Fortum has two hydropower plants in the Vuoksi river system.
Ala-Utos
Forshult
Kvien
Karåsen
In Sweden, the Ljusnan river's source flow starts in the mountains northwest of Ramundberget on the Norwegian border. Together with its biggest tributary, Voxnan, Ljusnan is Sweden's sixth biggest producer of hydropower. The total utilised river to sea height drop is 570 m.
Aittokoski
Johannisholm
Utanen
Höljebro
Halvfari
Gullspångsälven hydropower plants
The Montta hydropower plant, completed in 1957, is located in Muhos. Montta hydropower plant is the second plant upstream from the sea, after the Oulun Energia Merikoski power plant. The output of our Montta hydropower plant is 47 MW, and it has a head of 12.2 meters. Three Kaplan turbines. Average annual production covers the annual electricity use of 9,000+ households with electric heat.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/hydropower/hydropower-plants/ljungan
Parteboda is the smaller of the two plants using the Ångesjön Lake as its reservoir. The Ljunga power plant was built in 1971–1973. It is a combination of a cliff station and a land station. The water that passes through the turbines is lead through a 6 km long drain pipe that empties into the Torpsjön Lake.​
Ljungan is a 399 km long river that flows from the Swedish mountains to the south of Sundsvall. Fortum has four power plants in the river system Ljungan, of which two are fully owned.
1976
Get to know our hydro power plants
1973
176
Hydro power plant
Järnvägsforsen
1960
Hermansboda
Hydro power plants
1962
Ljungan
408
Renewable and flexible energy - read more about Hydro power at Fortum
​River system Ljungan
50
268
Stream
Fortum's share (%)
2.58
Installed capacity (MW)
Year of Comm.
Our hydro power plants along Ljusnan | Fortum
59
12
Normal annual production (GWh)


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/environmental-approach-within-hydropower/environmental-projects-hydropower/habitat-restoration-river-vuoksi
To strengthen the stream fish populations in the river Vuoksi in eastern Finland, we have carried out restoration works as co-operation projects to improve spawning and breeding areas for trout and grayling. The trout population is additionally supported with regular fish stockings.
area, where a small islet, formed by dredging of rocks in the river, was re-shaped and gravel added to provide more underwater breeding and living habitat for fish.
River Vuoksi is a transboundary river system, with a total of four hydropower plants located in the upper part of the river. Fortum has two hydropower plants along the river Vuoksi: Imatra and Tainionkoski. Due to the damming of the river, rapid sections and their characteristic habitats have mostly vanished. With modelling and field surveys, we were able to identify several potential areas for spawning and breeding ground restoration.
In 2020 we worked on the environmental restoration of the
The city creek has proven to be a success as a spawning and breeding habitat for local trout. The density of juvenile trout has been high. There are also perch and roaches living in the creek. The city creek is continuously studied by researchers who follow up on the development of the fish population and benthos in the artificially created creek.
The Imatra City Creek
Habitat restoration in river Vuoksi
Habitat restoration in river Vuoksi | Fortum
We have participated in the restoration of several locations along the river Vuoksi main channel, where the bottom of the river bank was reshaped, and gravel and stones were added to make the bottom more natural and more suitable for spawning and shelter for young fish. These stream habitats are important spawning and breeding areas for trout and graylings.
Kokkasaari
The Imatra City Creek, an artificial creek nearby the Imatra hydropower plant, was built in 2014. The creek is about 1km long, with a head difference of about 24 m, and it provides a breeding and spawning area for local trout, as well as a recreational attraction in the middle of Imatra city.
The Vuoksi river habitat restorations are a joint project between Fortum, the municipality of Imatra and environmental authorities. The project started with defining suitable habitats for grayling, trout and salmon by modelling the Finnish part of the Vuoksi river with Fortum's habitat modelling tool.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/kokkasaari-salmonid-habitat-restoration-river-vuoksi
Smooth and tangible collaboration
Kokkasaari, Salmonid habitat restoration on the River Vuoksi
Next, spawning gravel was transferred to the work site and then the dismantling of Kokkasaari islet began. The islet consisting mostly of dredged rocks was lowered to enable water to flow over it. Extra rocks were moved in front of the islet and to the main channel side, and spawning gravel was spread between the rocks. The restoration project was completed in September 2020.
Located in the River Vuoksi, Kokkasaari is a small islet formed as a result of the dredging of rocks. Environmental restoration by shaping and lowering the islet aims at improving the area as an underwater breeding and living habitat for fish.
”The aim of the Kokkasaari restoration work is to increase the habitat area suitable for the different stages of the salmonid life cycle. The cooperation has once again gone really well. The shared goal and working together will produce tangible measures and results on the River Vuoksi,” says Tomi Menna, Fishing Master, City of Imatra.
Kokkasaari, Salmonid habitat restoration on the River Vuoksi | Fortum
Fortum, the City of Imatra, and the ELY Centre for Southeast Finland have been carrying out fish habitat restorations at River Vuoksi since 2013. Previous works have taken place in the stretch between the Tainionkoski power plant and the City of Imatra, and off Mellonlahti bay, about one kilometre from Kokkasaari.
The City of Imatra was responsible for the practical work of the restoration project, and the ELY Centre for Southeast Finland was monitoring the realisation of the project. The project was funded by Fortum and the ELY Centre for Southwest Finland.
The Kokkasaari salmonid habitat restoration work, a joint project of the City of Imatra, the ELY Centre for Southeast Finland, and Fortum, got under way in June 2020. The work started with establishing a temporary service road and removing trees from the small islet, to provide access for the work equipment.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/environmental-approach-within-hydropower/environmental-projects-hydropower/trap-and-transport-salmonids-finland-and-sweden
Fortum believes in strengthening the natural life cycle of migrating fish in constructed and regulated rivers like the Klarälven and the Oulujoki. Strengthening of the salmon populations calls for a combination of several supporting measures and a step-by-step process with the best available knowledge and technology in fish migration. Same solutions cannot be applied everywhere, since each river is unique and requires a tailored approach.
Trap and transport systems enable efficient and safe transporting of the salmonids to the spawning areas behind several dams. The fish born in the upstream areas of the river are likely to return to the same river for spawning and sustain the natural life cycle of migrating fish.
Our approach
A long-term co-operation and a number of measures are needed when strengthening the natural life cycle of salmonids in constructed rivers. Depending on the waterway, measures may e.g. include regulation of fishing, fishways, habitat restoration, supporting fish stockings, transporting of fish, or their various combinations.
Trap and transport in Sweden
Trap and transport of salmonids in Finland and Sweden | Fortum
Trap and transport in Finland
In Finland in river Oulujoki there is a fish trap at Montta hydropower plant, which is the second power plant from the sea. The salmon and trout trapped at Montta are transported over several dams to the restored spawning areas in tributaries as. Montta fish trap also helps us study fish behavior and gain knowledge to be used in future fish migration projects.
Trap and transport of salmonids in Finland and Sweden
In river Klarälven in Sweden, salmon have to pass eight hydropower plants before reaching the spawning areas, and cumulative losses and delays for salmon passing the hydropower plants by fishways would not result in a large enough number of fish reaching the spawning grounds to sustain the wild salmon population. This is why the natural smolt production in the Klarälven river has been sustained via an active trap and transport of spawning fish since the 1930s. Fish are collected in a fish trap at the lowermost dam (Forshaga) and transported by truck to the spawning areas some 100 kilometers upstream past the hydropower plants.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/environmental-approach-within-hydropower/environmental-projects-hydropower/environmental-measures-lower-dalalven
Recreation of forage and pastures on river meadows
The project started in 2009 as a cooperation between Fortum and the Uppland Foundation. The project aimed to conserve and develop the high nature values in the lower Dalälven through the opening up and clearing of vegetation and prevent meadows from being invaded by fir trees. The project also aimed to recreate naturally leafy forests and preserve the threatened plants and animals that occur in the area.
Project scope
The long-term work with focus on biodiversity in Lower Dalälven will continue for the next coming ten years in collaboration with Upplandsstiftelsen.
The unique nature of Lower Dalälven
Contributing to the Nature Conservation Association's project for the reintroduction of the white-backed woodpecker. Woody debris is created to favour woodpeckers.
The nature in the lower Dalälven is unique in Sweden. Large open river meadows and bays are varied with streams, old leaves, and mixed forests which are rare in the rest of the country. The wide variety that the landscape exhibits provide the prerequisites for a particularly rich flora and fauna. Regular floods have benefited from different deciduous trees and the appearance of the flood meadows, which is typical for the lower Dalälven.
Environmental measures in Lower Dalälven | Fortum
Clearing of fir from flood meadows and areas rich in leaf trees
Burning of forests on the island Upper Tylleropsön, and follow-up through insect inventory in the burned area
The efforts during 10 years have possibly improved and developed the biodiversity in the area. Measures have also been done outside the Fortum’s real estate, with the same aim; contribution to biodiversity. 2021 an updated management plan for the area has been finalized so now the successful work with environmental management in Untra will continue for at least ten years.
Environmental measures in Lower Dalälven
Relieving old oaks in need of a lot of light
Implemented actions
In no other place is the biological northern border as clear and obvious as here. At the northern border for many animals and plants, there are e.g. plenty of precious deciduous trees like oaks, ashes and linden. Some areas belong to the most valuable that we have in terms of biodiversity. Here there are hundreds of red-listed and threatened animals and plants. The harrow stock, which is one of the country's southernmost, is of high biological value.
Cooperating partners and stakeholders
Collaboration with Upplandsstiftelsen (Uppland Foundation) first started in late 1990. A more formal project including development of a plan for environmental management of the Fortum real estate at Untra first started 2009. It has continued until 2018. The cooperation with Upplandsstiftelsen has continued after 2018. First with an inventory to follow up the situation to see possible improvements but also updating the management plan during 2019-2020. In the plan, different type of measures are decided due to conditions in the different part of the area. From free development in some areas to restoration of overgrown areas, enrichment with dead wood, free cutting of oak trees etcetera. Also measures in the aquatic environment in the streams Bredforsen and Tammån received more attention. Results from investigations led to proposals on improved biotopes by supplying gravel and debris for support of the grayling. Some extra activities have been agreed with the County Administrative Board in Uppsala during 2021. The reason for this is due to impact on a Natura 2000 area when dam safety actions will be implemented during 2021-2024. Measures to compensate will be carried out Fortum Hydro in order not to impact on nature values in the area, forest burning, clear cutting of old trees, increase amount of dead wood.
The nature of the Lower Dalälven is unique in Sweden, and the vast variety of landscape provides the conditions for a particularly rich flora and fauna. This project aimed at preserving and developing the high natural values found at the lower Dalälven, through various measures. The project was first a collaboration between Fortum Hydro and Upplandsstiftelsen and it started already in late 1990.
Sixty hectares of meadows have been restored so far, and another 30 hectares were opened at the later stage of the project
Clearing of bushes in flood meadows
Biotope enhancements in the Bredforsen stream through the supplying of gravel


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/hydropower/environmental-approach/cases/improved-habitat-graylings-downstream-munkfors-power-plant-klaralven-river
Rocks of various sizes were set out in order to create and optimise a flowing water habitat in this stretch of the river. An estimated 200-250 m2 of rock was added or repositioned to create a more varied biotope. The west side is considered especially important for the grayling’s spawning and growth season during the spring and early summer. In parallel with the project, a number of larger boulders that had been cleared during the log driving era have also been reintroduced into the river.
Downstream of the Munkfors power plant, Fortum has been working with the Munkfors Fishery Conservation Association to implement a biotope preservation project to improve the flowing water environment for salmonids, particularly graylings. A biotope is a designated area with specific properties in which certain organisms thrive.
Working in cooperation with the Munkfors Fishery Conservation Association, Fortum has, throughout 2021, implemented biotope protection measures downstream of the Munkfors power plant to improve the spawning and growth areas for salmonids and to promote sport fishing.
After the implementation of the biotope protection measures downstream from the Munkfors power plant, there is now a more varied biotope with rock and environments advantageous to fish and other organisms that thrive in flowing water. The project was approved by the Swedish Society for Nature Conservation as an environmental fund project under the criteria for electrical power marked Bra Miljöval 2009. The consulting firm Synlab AB has been responsible for project management in the field.
Improved habitat for graylings downstream from the Munkfors power plant on the Klarälven river | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/environmental-approach-within-hydropower/environmental-projects-hydropower/supporting-biodiversity-around-avesta-power-station
To make the area even more attractive for wild bees and other insects, several promising measures were implemented in the area in November. As most wild bee species do not build nests in holes in trees, but instead burrow in sand, a sand bed was created on the sunny, south-facing slope. Creating supportive habitat which gives wild bees a place to lay their eggs close to the kinds of plants they like.
Biologisk mångfald runt Avesta kraftverk
“It’s great to help the wild bees find a home, as there seems to be a housing shortage for bees, too,” says Katarina Erelöf, Environmental Coordinator for Fortum.
Supporting biodiversity around Avesta Power Station | Fortum
The biodiversity project, undertaken by Fortum and Municipality of Avesta, is moving forward. In May 2021, a controlled burn was conducted in the area and an inventory of the site was carried out over the summer. A number of interesting species of plants, butterflies and wild bees were identified.
Pussy willows flower in early spring with their furry catkins. Bumble bees, wild bees and other insects benefit from these flowers at a time when there is not much else for them to eat. The area around the pussy willows growing on the slope was also cleared to give them more space and make it easier for wild bee species to access their nectar.
The trees that were cleared during the course of the project will be left there as dead wood to provide homes for other insects. A habitat pile was also built. It will look like a bit of a mess to start with, but it will soon become a ‘residential area’ and pantry for all kinds of bugs and insects.
Fortum strives to reduce the environmental impact of our enterprise while at the same time delivering power and heating to private homes, businesses, and the public sector. Hydropower does not emit any greenhouse gases into the atmosphere and is therefore good from a climate perspective. On the other hand, there is local environmental impact in all electricity production. It is for this reason that we participate in several different environmental projects at our power plants. Such efforts are underway in Avesta.
Various measures have been implemented to further improve the area surrounding Avesta Hydropower Station, to enhance living conditions for butterflies, wild bee species and insects.
“The Municipality of Avesta is experienced in building habitat piles. It’s great that we can create this kind of thing together on Fortums land as well,” says Peter Klintberg, Municipal Ecologist at the Municipality of Avesta.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/environmental-approach-within-hydropower/environmental-projects-hydropower/bio-channel-eldbacken
The construction of a new dam at Eldforsen was completed in 2011. Legally Fortum was not required to release water in the old river bed, but after discussions with the local residents, sport fishermen and the municipality, Fortum decided to voluntarily create a bypass channel in the form of a bio channel, which would supply the old river bed with water.
A bypass channel for fish, animals, and plants
Voluntary initiative
The characteristics of the Eldbäcken bypass channel in the Västerdalälven in Sweden were transformed from an ordinary fish way into an environment that is suitable for different types of animals and plants. The channel is located next to Fortum's hydropower plant Eldforsen.
The bio channel has a head of 5m and a length of 575m. To make the flow as natural as possible, the intake of the bio channel is constructed to create a variable flow regime. It also has other features, such as pools with low water velocity, islands and flood plains.
An underwater camera and fish-counter was installed in Eldbäcken, which monitors the fish and animals living in the bio channel. In the summer of 2018 the information was made public. The camera uses infrared rays to scan and register every single fish or animal that swims through Eldbäcken. The information is displayed on a website that collects statistics and video clips of the different species. In Eldbäcken grayling is spawning and otters seem to like the possibility to move through the bio channel searching for fish.
Fish counter in Eldbäcken (in Swedish)
The bio channel Eldbäcken | Fortum
Research
The bio channel Eldbäcken
Eldbäcken is unique in Sweden and has employed researchers from mainly Karlstad's university for years. These studies contribute to various fields such as benthos, beach vegetation, large mussels, reptiles, fish, hydrology and flood fields. Stina Gustafsson from Karlstad university wrote her doctoral dissertation Dec 2017 on Eldbäcken with the title ”Habitat compensation in nature-like fishways: effects on benthos and fish”.
Real-time observations
The project started up as voluntary, but is now part of the license for Eldforsen hydropower plant and the bio channel is on a probationary period for ten years.
A bio channel is a more diverse version of a nature-like bypass channel with the idea that various animal and plant species, not only fish, can establish themselves in the channel. In traditional bypass channels, the main purpose is usually to enable fish migration. But the Eldbäcken project includes the construction of the bio channel, the design of suitable habitats, and research studies on the establishment of different animal and plant species in the channel.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/environmental-approach-within-hydropower/environmental-projects-hydropower/improved-downstream-migration-wild-salmon-river-klaralven
After the project
Projecting of measures for improved downstream migration.
Mapping the behavior of spawned fish and their chosen routes when approaching Edsforsen.
Improved downstream migration for wild salmon in river Klarälven | Fortum
The project consisted of four parts:
Project purpose
This project was a continued collaboration between Fortum and Karlstad University, after the previous project “Salmon and trout in River Klarälven” was conducted within the framework for the Fortum Environmental Fund (Bra Miljöval). The aim was to find solutions to help fish migrate downstream to Lake Vänern from spawning and growth areas in the upper part of Klarälven.
Fortum and Karlstad University decided to continue the research collaboration. The hydropower plants are a migration barrier for fish, both upstream and downstream. Within the new collaboration the aim is to investigate how fish migration downstream can be improved, an issue that has been quite neglected, not only in in Klarälven but in many other places in the world.
A historical survey shows a sharp decline of salmon- and trout populations in the river already during the 19th century. After the construction of hydropower in Sweden in 1907, the quantity decreased to critical levels. However, the trend has been the opposite for wild fish, and the fishing quality in lake Vänern has vastly improved in comparison with the 1960s.
Hydraulic measures taken of flow conditions upstream at the hydropower plant Edsforsen, to highlight motion of fish and potential measures.
Study the smolt behavior before different types of hydraulic conditions (e.g.. different forms of acceleration and turbulence in a controlled environment).
The main aim was to find a long term and (cost-) efficient solution to get downstream migrating salmonids from the spawning- and growth areas in the upper part of river Klarälven to lake Vänern.
Description of the project
The continued research mainly aimed at increasing survival rates among smolt and kelt upon their return to lake Vänern from the spawning and growth areas. The total budget to increase the salmon’s chances of survival amounted to approx. 9 million SEK over a period of four years, 2012‒2015. The project was mainly financed by the Fortum Environmental Fund, and the Research and Development. Karlstad University also partly financed the project. The InterReg-project “Free migration of the Väner-salmon” (“Vänerlaxens fria gång”) is also a contribution to the studies at the University, which was concluded in a separate agreement.
Salmon and Trout in Klarälven,
Improved downstream migration for wild salmon in river Klarälven
Downstream migration in Klarälven


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/hydropower-renewable-and-clean-energy/environmental-approach-within-hydropower/environmental-projects-hydropower/removal-acksjo-dam
Removal of the Acksjö Dam
Cooperation partners and stakeholders
Implementation
In addition to tearing out the dam there will also be biotope restorations in the river, which will be carried out by the County of Värmland. They will restore damage caused by the log driving period, e.g. by adding gravel and larger stones to improve spawning areas in the river.
When the project is finalized the area will hopefully reach good ecological status and conditions for several species will have improved. As part of the project, a follow up will be carried out to investigate how the ecosystem has changed due to the measures.
The Acksjö dam was located in the lake mouth of Acksjön lake where the lake outfall in the river Acksjö is situated. The dam was owned by Fortum, and it had been operating as a water storage dam for the hydropower plants in river Klarälven. The Acksjö river is a tributary to river Klarälven and has been affected by many human activities. The greatest impact comes from former logging when the river was cleared from rocks and stones to enable smoother transportation of the logs. In Sweden’s near future the need of flexibility in the energy system will be crucial. In order to  meet the needs of renewable and CO
Removal of the Acksjö Dam | Fortum
In August 2017 the Acksjö dam was torn out in Hagfors Municipality, Sweden. The aim was to increase the possibility for trout migration, as well as to improve conditions of life for several species. The project was financed by the Fortum Environmental Fund (Bra Miljöval). It was a collaboration between different parties, not least the river Klarälven water council.
The project is done in a broad cooperation. In addition to Fortum and the County Administration in Värmland, a number of land owners and non-profit organisations such as Klarälven’s water council, snow scooter club, fishing interest and the village community in Bergsäng, have been involved.
-free energy production, water reservoirs are needed. When reviewing the Acksjö dam, the contribution to flexibility from this dam deemed to be low. Instead, by tearing it out,  we could implement a suitable environmental measure in the area as it has mitigation possibilities.
Objectives
As a first part of the implementation, Fortum removed the gates in the outlet to lower the water level in the lake in early 2017. Later, in August 2017, removal of the dam in full was underway. When the project was finalized no damming parts of the dam remained that will lift the water level and the water will be free flowing.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/consumer-solutions
From energy transition to sustainable smart services
Consumer Solutions | Fortum
Fortum’s Renewable agreement helps companies reduce CO2 emissions
Electricity
News and articles
Electric Vehicle Charging
Read more about our services
Consumer Solutions is responsible for the electricity and gas retail businesses in the Nordics, Poland, and Spain, including the customer service and invoicing businesses. Fortum is the largest electricity retail business in the Nordics, with approximately 2.4 million customers across different brands in Finland, Sweden, Norway, Poland, and Spain. The business provides electricity, as well as related value-added and digital services.
Electricity and value-added services
Smart Charging offers a sustainable way to save up to 20% on electric car charging costs


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/electric-vehicle-charging
Types of Connectors
Home Charging
Types of Electric Vehicles
Electric Vehicle Charging | Fortum
Some useful information about electric vehicles and charging.
Consumer Information


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/electric-vehicle-charging/home-charging
Home charging
Whether for private individuals or housing associations, Fortum helps our customer through the entire process – from site surveys to planning, hardware recommendations, and installation.
Housing Developers
Detached and semi-detached houses
Fortum offers home charging solutions for housing associations, tailoring to terraced housing and apartment buildings. We offer services for retrofitting existing parking lots and have worked closely with housing developers to prepare new housing for future EV charging requirements.
New housing developments
Housing Associations
Fortum also offers home charging solutions for private individuals living in detached and semi-detached houses in Finland, Norway, and Sweden. While there may be benefits for the customer if they have an electricity contract with Fortum as well as home charging, having Fortum as the electricity supplier is not a requirement to purchase our home charging solutions.
Charging services for businesses
Home Charging | Fortum
Terraced housing and apartment buildings
Charging services for housing association
Home Charging Services


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/contact-us
Contact us! | Fortum
Contact us!
Tel: 22 55 54 24
Tel: 0800 1 99055
Our customer service is here to help when you have questions regarding Fortum Charge & Drive app and charging
Tel: 020 46 00 46
Customer support is free of charge, and available weekdays 08-17.
NORWAY
no
chargedrive
fi


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/electric-vehicle-charging/types-connectors
In order to charge your electric vehicle, you will need to know what kind of connector your car has (and what kind of cables you need to have with you). Semi-fast cables are often (but not always) included with the car. Fast chargers always have a cable connected to the charger. At other charging stations, you may be expected to have your own cable with you. Maps of charging stations will typically allow you to filter by the type of connector at the station.
Type 1 is a single-phase plug for normal charging used by some Asian automobile manufacturers.
Charging Speeds
Tesla SuperCharger (fast DC)
Schuko (slow AC)
A regular grounded household contact.
Types of Connectors | Fortum
Type 2 (slow AC)
Type 2 connector is also known as Mennekes and can charge both 1-phase and 3-phase. It origins from Germany and is the standard in Europe for normal / semi-fast charging.
CHaDeMO (fast DC)
More details about types of EV connectors
CCS (slow AC and fast DC)
These are the basic types of connectors. In general, fast chargers (e.g. 50kWh DC) can charge a battery to 80% in under 45 minutes. Semi-fast (7-22kWh AC) can charge a battery in 3-4 hours. Slow AC chargers (3kWh) have a charging time of around 6-8 hours.
Tesla chargers use their own plugs and sockets for SuperChargers. Adaptors are available for Teslas to be able to charge with CHaDeMO connectors.
Combined Charging System (or CCS) follows the European standard with a Type 2 AC outlet charging, but also has a special outlet for fast charging with direct current. A vehicle with this type of contact supports both fast and normal charging into the same socket in the car.
Type 1 (slow AC)
A Japanese standard for quick charging with direct current, and most Asian cars with quick charging capabilities use CHaDeMO.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/electric-vehicle-charging/types-electric-vehicles
Hybrid
Solar charge
PHEV
BEV
Types of Electric Vehicles | Fortum
There are three types of electric vehicles available: BEV (Battery Electric Vehicles) are 100% powered by electricity. PHEVs (Plug-In Hybrid Electric Vehicles) are cars with an internal combustion engine and a battery charged from an external socket; in other words, they have a plug. Hybrid cars are cars with an electric battery that is charged using the internal combustion engine (they don't have a plug).
Plugin Hybrid Electric Vehicles, or PHEVs. These are cars that have both an electric battery and a combustion engine. The electric battery is recharged from a plug.
Charge on the go
Battery Electric Vehicles, or BEVs. These are cars that are powered only from an electric battery.
Hybrid cars have an electric battery and a combustion engine. The electric battery is charged using the combustion engine.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/electric-vehicle-charging/travelling-and-charging
Activate the charging key (Charging keys -> Activate charging key), add a credit card, and you're good to go!
Download from AppStore
How to charge your EV on the Fortum Charge & Drive network when travelling in Norway, Finland, or Sweden.
If you prefer, you can also order an RFID charging key via the app (Profile -> Charging keys).
Download the Fortum Charge & Drive Android app
Get it from Google Play
Smart energy solutions
Google Play.
How to charge with our network
Fortum lampovahti
Add a credit card in the app (Profile -> Payment options) and you can use the app to start and stop charging.
Download the Fortum Charge & Drive iOS app
Plugsurfing enables you to charge everywhere with a single app!
AppStore
Travelling and Charging | Fortum
Travelling and Charging
Download the Fortum Charge & Drive app from
Available on AppStore


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/consumer-solutions/electricity-and-value-added-services
SmartLiving
For more information about electricity sales, visit our local sites below:
With our 2.4 million customers, we are the largest electricity retailer in the Nordics. We offer our customers more convenience, affordable smart products, time efficient services and sustainable and environmentally friendly solutions, that makes their everyday life easier.
Virtual power plant
Virtual power plants
Virtual power plant spring
Electricity retail
We are a leading Nordic consumer business, offering our 2.4 million customers reliable and sustainable energy, making their everyday lives easier with new technology and innovative solutions and services. We invite our customers to take an active part in the transformation towards a cleaner world.
Together with our clients and their water boilers, we take the first step towards a new balanced power grid.
Fortum charge & drive is the most advanced solution for operating a charging network
You have a virtual battery - make money on it!
Fortum SmartLiving makes your home more comfortable, safer and helps you save money
Electricity and value-added services | Fortum
Charge and drive for business
We provide safer, faster, more convenient charging at home, by offering high quality turnkey installation, including reporting. Additionally, we offer services for cost sharing and access options for housing associations.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/business-services
Fortum Digital Mobility Services
We make it easy to use electric vehicles, to operate and grow charging networks, and to move towards cleaner world.
Business Services
Services for Charge Point Operators (CPOs)
Charge & Drive Business Services
Electric vehicle SaaS platform for commercial use worldwide
Services for Original Equipment Manufacturers (OEMs)
Charge & Drive Business Services | Fortum
We offer solutions for EV charging for utilities, CPOs, EMPs, OEMs, as well as workplace charging and fleet management. If your business involves EV charging, Fortum Charge & Drive has the solution.
Electric Vehicle Charging Services by Segment
Services for Emobility Service Providers (EMPs)
Our cloud-based SaaS platform can be licensed for commercial use worldwide.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/business-services/services-cpos
Charge Point Operators (CPOs) use our platform to manage and administer their network. CPOs from around the world can use our best-in-class software to grow their charging business. CPOs in the Nordics can take advantage of our turnkey solution, where we offer everything from site surveys to installation and customer support.  Internationally we offer our SaaS cloud solution for administering a charging network. Our software can be licensed to handle all aspects of CPO operations, from charging stations to user account management and customer service.
Prices
Multiple pricing & payment alternatives for user segments
Remote management
Services for CPOs | Fortum
Certified chargers from multiple OEMs and continual charger certification
Remote charger management & real-time charger status
Cloud service
Charging pole
Flexible pricing
Services for CPOs


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/business-services/services-oems
IT systems
Payment functionality included in the platform software
Certified chargers
OEMs (Original Equipment Manufacturers) can use our platform to provide their customers with a smart charging platform as well as end-user apps.  Our back-end for network administration enables OEMs to offer a turnkey solution to customers seeking to operate their chargers on a robust SaaS platform, and also enables them to offer their hardware to clients that may already have another manufacturer's hardware in use in their network. In addition, we work with automobile manufacturers to offer charging solutions as an integrated part of the product offering.
Services for OEMs | Fortum
Remote control
Certified chargers operated from a single back-end
Payment functionality
Services for OEMs
Remote firmware updates (& hard / soft reset)


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/business-services/saas-platform-ev-charging-network-management
OEM
I accept that my personal data is collected with this form
Remote start / stop
White-labeled for our SaaS clients
Fueling station
Pay for charging with multiple payment alternatives
End-User Account Management
Our electric vehicle charging network is operated on a cloud-based SaaS platform and can be licensed for commercial use worldwide. The Fortum Charge & Drive platform already handles hundreds of thousands of charging sessions per month, from thousands of connected chargers. We offer our software, white-label consumer apps, and a personal commitment to help grow your charging business.
See charging history & receipts
CPO
Locate chargers (map)
Real-time network communication
Transactions per charger
Add & remove payment methods
privacy policy
Deactivate user accounts
Add & remove chargers
Utility
Title
If you would like to learn more about our SaaS platform for operating an EV charging network, request a personal system demo by completing the form below. Please note that by submitting the form, you are providing us with personal data and you should read our
Add prepaid balance to end-user accounts
Remote commands to the station (e.g. update firmware, hard/soft reset)
End User Services
SaaS Platform for EV Charging Network Management
Change configuration settings
Profile management
SaaS Cloud Platform
SaaS Platform for EV Charging Network Management | Fortum
Energy consumption per charger
What business do you represent
Create & edit user profiles
Multiple pricing alternatives
Retail
Please leave us a message
The most advanced EV charging business solution on the market (video from 2017 - we've grown since then)!
Charging history
Comprehensive tools for account and user management
Network Management
Start & stop charging
Mobile apps for EV drivers
End User Apps
The data collected in this form (name, email, title, company) is used to respond to your inquiry. The data will be stored for approximately 1 year and may be used in analysing what kind of contacts we get.
End User Account Management
Request a system demo
Monitor real-time status


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/business-services/digital-mobility-services
We believe the best results can be achieved by close cooperation and co-creation with our partners and customers. Our cloud solutions enable charging network investors to benefit from our expertise with a modular pay-as-you-grow service model. We rely on open standards and a hardware-agnostic approach, allowing any charger to operate on our platform via "Quick Connect."
SaaS Platform
Turnkey Solutions
Fortum Charge & Drive is the most advanced solution for operating an electric vehicle charging network. We are the leading charge point operator (CPO) in the Nordics, and our cloud-based software is used to operate charging networks worldwide. We deliver everything needed to create superior end-user experiences, from sophisticated mobile applications to top-rated customer support.  Our service offering encompasses the entire value chain for electric vehicle charging.
Comprehensive business solutions for EV charging
Digital Mobility Services | Fortum
Digital Mobility Services
Turnkey Solutions for EV Charging
Commercial software for operating an EV charging network
Enabling EV charging everywhere
Fortum’s Digital Mobility Solutions offers customer value-driven, market-leading, and proven digital mobility solutions. The solutions are known in the market under the brands Plugsurfing and Fortum Charge & Drive. Together we are able to offer a unique and complete package for EV charging networks.
Fortum Charge & Drive and Plugsurfing
Business Software for Operating an EV Charging Network
In Finland, Sweden, and Norway, we offer turnkey solutions for electric vehicle charging, including everything from site surveys to hardware selection, installation, operations, and customer support.
We offer our SaaS cloud solution to for commercial use to operate smart networks of electric vehicle chargers. Our platform is hardware agnostic; this means there is no vendor lock-in, the chargers best suited for the location can be used, and network reliability is improved through hardware redundancy.
Charge & Drive and Plugsurfing


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/vehicle-charging/business-services/services-emps
Multiple payment alternatives (app, RFID, ad-hoc)
We offer end-user apps for electric vehicle charging.  Through our native apps (iOS & Android), end-users can find chargers, pay for charging, and manage their own profile information. The apps can be white-labeled for our clients and can enable access to the largest network of charging points in Europe.
Single interface to the over 70 000 charging stations in Europe and around the world
Payment
Services for EMPs
Largest EV charging network in Europe
User profiles & apps
Services for EMPs | Fortum
Register and edit profile information in white-label app


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/smart-energy-solutions/fortum-smartliving
Fortum SmartLiving
Monitor electricity, heat and water consumption of your building
Residents can see their own data and summary information of the building from the mobile app. Representatives  of housing company can see more detailed information from their own user interface.
SmartLiving Heating Optimization
SmartLiving Metering Services
SmartLiving Consumption Monitoring
Prompt response in the fault situation can save significant costs
Fortum SmartLiving | Fortum
Fortum SmartLiving provides a smarter future for real estates in district heating area in Espoo, Kauniainen and Kirkkonummi in Finland.
This service increases the awareness of the housing association's representatives and residents about the consumption of electricity, water and heat in the building. The follow-up is very easy with a monthly e-mail report about the consumption, trends and costs.
With this service you will optimize your heating, improve the energy efficiency and indoor air quality of your property. You will ensure even temperatures between the apartments and reduce heating costs.
SmartLiving services help you to optimize heat consumption and take care of your property. You can choose from: Heating Optimization, Consumption Monitoring and Metering Services. Click for more information in Finnish underneath.
Find a new, smart way to heat your property - always with comfort in mind
The service provides useful information about apartment temperatures and humidity as a basis for housing association´s decision-making.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/smart-energy-solutions/fortum-spring
Business Development Manager
How to join?
Pekka Manner
ojala
Together with thousands of customers, we commercially operate the largest Virtual Battery in the Nordics - No matter the size, we make our customers' assets automatically work for the environment in a profitable way!
Ready to harness your assets for green value? Great! The process is simple. First, we roughly evaluate the technical and economic potential of the asset to see the demand response potential. Then, if we mutually agree that the asset is suitable, we continue with our five steps process. Click the button below to get started.
Earn market revenue (up to 170 k€/MW)
Hannes Ojala
sainio
Project and Operations Manager
Up to speed with very little investments
+358 400 37 7506
pekka
+358 40 412 2328
Green value for your company
“Utilising HDC’s UPS equipment in the electricity market is an important part of a modern data center and the mitigation of environmental impacts. By participating in the reserve market, we can promote more renewable energy by providing support to the power grid”
Battery
Harri Vilonen, Telia
More about Spring virtual battery
Building a Virtual Battery With Our Customers | Fortum
Fortum Spring
Pikku Juttu
hannes
Building a Virtual Battery With Our Customers
+358 40 777 9311
manner
Sales Manager Finland
Juha Sainio


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/01/fortum-and-telia-agree-new-data-center-connection-electricity-market
+358 40 688 5559
Mikael
+358 50 332 1020
The number of data centers in the Nordic countries is expected to increase significantly in the upcoming years, so it is important that the data centers operate as eco-consciously as possible and have the ability to be active participants in the energy system.
Mikael Uschanov, UPS Business Unit Manager,
Harri Vilonen, Development Manager,
, Sales Director, Telia Helsinki Data Center.
18 January 2022, 15:00 EET
alapera
Fortum and Telia agree on new data center connection to the electricity market
abb
In a normal situation, the power from the batteries of the HDC’s UPS equipment is used in the balancing of the power grid. If a power outage or other exceptional situation occurs, the batteries will still be used to cover the data center’s electricity demand before the back-up power generators start operating. The deployment and testing of the system took place in summer; since the end of summer, Telia’s data center has contributed several megawatts of capacity to Fingrid’s Fast Frequency Reserve (FFR) market as part of the Fortum Spring’s virtual battery.
“This is what responsibility is all about. The uses of the technology are expanded and more benefits are gained from a single investment. It’s great that we have green electricity in Finland, and its support is ensured also in this kind of innovative way. Here at Telia Helsinki Data Center, our activities are strongly driven by green values and the modern technology epitomised in these kinds of projects – thus enabling us to be part of an important solution to securing renewable electricity,” notes
Ilari Alaperä, Business Development Manager,
Harri Vilonen
Fortum and Telia agree on new data center connection to the electricity market | Fortum
uchanov
ABB (ABBN: SIX Swiss Ex) is a leading global technology company that energizes the transformation of society and industry to achieve a more productive, sustainable future. By connecting software to its electrification, robotics, automation and motion portfolio, ABB pushes the boundaries of technology to drive performance to new levels. With a history of excellence stretching back more than 130 years, ABB’s success is driven by about 105,000 talented employees in over 100 countries
www.abb.com
+358 40 302 4077
teliacompany
In just a few years, Telia has grown from a traditional telecom operator to a modern media and technology company offering a wide spectrum of telecommunication, IT, and digital services to millions of its consumer and business customers. Telia Finland is part of the Telia Company, operating primarily in the Nordic and Baltic countries. The company’s net sales in 2020 were EUR 8.5 billion. The company is committed to zero emissions and waste across its value chain, from suppliers to customers, by 2030.
Fortum is a European energy company with activities in more than 40 countries. We provide our customers with electricity, gas, heating and cooling as well as smart solutions to improve resource efficiency. Together with our subsidiary Uniper, we are the third largest producer of CO2-free electricity in Europe. Close to 20,000 professionals and a combined balance sheet of approximately EUR 60 billion, we have the scale, competence and resources to grow and to drive the energy transition forward. Fortum’s share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki and Uniper’s share on the Frankfurt Stock Exchange.
“We are pleased that the innovative, truly modular UPS systems developed by ABB support Telia’s goal to operate as a part of the fast reserve market as well as bring added value for Telia while helping to build renewable energy in Finland. ABB Oy has long supported safe, smart, and sustainable electrification; this project is a fine example of that,” notes
Telia Helsinki Data Center is at the heart of digitalisation; it is the largest open data center in the Nordics offering flexible and secure data center and cloud services for companies and organisations.
from Telia.
, Director, ABB Data Center Sales.
ABB
Telia
Electricity production and consumption must be in balance at all times. The increasing production volume of intermittent renewable energy, like wind and solar power, creates challenges for the grid. Traditional production forms can help to accommodate the changes in electricity production and demand, but other means are also needed. UPS systems and their batteries offer very quick regulating power, and they are an ideal fit for the power reserve maintained by Fingrid. Power can be drawn from the batteries in milliseconds without any delays. If a major disruption occurs in the balancing of the grid, Telia’s UPS equipment will respond within a few hundred milliseconds and help in recovery from the disruption.
, Business Development Manager at Fortum.
FORTUM BUSINESS PRESS RELEASE 18 January 2022
Ilari Alaperä
“The Fortum Spring virtual battery solution is cost efficient. The solution utilises the customer’s existing assets to support the power grid without jeopardising the main purpose of the equipment -- securing the supply of power for critical processes. This enables a return on investments that traditionally haven’t generated a positive cash flow. At the same time, we are driving the development of the Nordic electricity system towards a cleaner future,” notes
Leila Podduikin
harri
Fortum and Telia have signed a collaboration agreement to connect the Helsinki Data Center (HDC) to the electricity market. Through the collaboration, HDC’s Uninterrupted Power Supply (UPS) systems manufactured by ABB will take part in balancing production and consumption fluctuations in the electricity market.
“Utilising HDC’s UPS equipment in the electricity market is an important part of a modern data center and the mitigation of environmental impacts. By participating in the reserve market, we can promote more renewable energy by providing support to the power grid,” says Development Manager
ilari
vilonen
Timo Kontturi


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/smart-energy-solutions/fortum-spring/spring-nutshell
+50 MW of flexible electrical loads
How to join Spring?
How to join
Fortum Spring main page
Through our offering, distribution system operators can utilise batteries as a component in the balancing of a smart electricity network and in reducing power outages.
Data centers
Read more about the globally unique model in which the market and regulatory requirements are met, in the case with the DSO Elenia.
Data centres
Distributed assets
+3000 connected units
Hiven
What kind of assets are suitable for Spring?
Read how to join
Spring in a nutshell | Fortum
Our business is based on partnerships. In our business model, we generate new value that we then share with the customer. And since the customer owns the asset, we think that it’s only fair that the customer gets the biggest share of the generated value. We do our best to generate as much value as possible without harming the original purpose of customer's asset. Because we aspire to be a trustworthy partner to our customer, we are 100% transparent about the value that we generate.
+100 MW of flexible heating capacity
Spring in a nutshell
Our strategy
Our core segments
Service by industry
Industrial processes like ovens, pumps and heating/cooling applications typically have in-built flexibility. Contact us to find out if your process can start producing additional value.
Fortum Spring is a demand response aggregator and operator within Fortum. We connect various consumption-side assets and batteries to our platform and provide this harnessed capacity to various energy markets, including ancillary services, via Fortum’s trading system. By utilising the already existing assets for balancing services, we can create additional revenue streams for the asset owner and help the increased renewable production to integrate better to our energy system.
Data centre UPS and back-up systems can provide capacity to various ancillary services without jeopardising their original duty.
Industrial and real estate flexibility
In order to connect the smallest possible assets, like EVs and domestic heating loads, we work in collaboration with our new business unit called
Energy storages
Back to Spring main page


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/spring-nutshell#contact-us-2402490



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/05/fortum-and-elenias-battery-pack-stores-electricity-power-outages-and-maintaining-electricity-network-balance
Fortum and Elenia commissioned in Kuru, Pirkanmaa, a battery pack they have created together. In normal conditions it will function through Fortum as regulating power for Fingrid’s grid and in a power outage as backup power for Elenia’s customers.
28 May 2020, 10:00 EEST
Location of battery pack is critical as back-up in power outages
Optimized planning of the location of the battery pack brings other benefits too. Owned and operated by Fortum, the battery pack has been installed in Elenia’s network area in the Kuru region in Pirkanmaa. The battery pack has been connected to Elenia’s grid, and, in addition to the reserve markets, energy from the battery pack can be used to secure the supply of electricity to Elenia’s customers during a power outage. During a power outage, it can supply electricity to a limited area where the power can be kept on during the repair works. The battery pack can secure the electricity supply to more than one hundred customers for several hours.
“The battery pack allows us to keep the electricity service on for customers, even if a storm has damaged the grid in the region. The battery pack supplies electricity to customers while the damage is being repaired and thus creates a completely new dimension for handling power outages,” says
In the pilot project Fortum and Elenia built a battery pack for storing electricity as part of the smart grid development. The battery pack serves the electricity network’s balancing needs and helps to keep lights on longer for customers during power outages.
“Electricity storages are needed alongside the increases in renewable energy production forms that produce intermittently. Electricity production and consumption must be in balance at all times. With the battery pack we can bring to the markets very fast regulating power that can respond to rapid changes in production and consumption better than many traditional power plants,” says
Fortum and Elenia’s battery pack stores electricity for power outages and for maintaining electricity network balance
, Unit Manager, Asset Management, Elenia Oy. “The battery pack improves our ability to take care of reliable electricity distribution alongside the upgrading work to weather-proof the aging grid,” Lähdeaho continues.
In normal situations the battery pack works with thousands of household hot water heaters as part of Fortum’s virtual battery that offers electricity as regulating power to transmission system operator Fingrid’s reserve markets. Regulating power is electricity production that can respond quickly to fluctuations in electricity production and consumption.
Fortum and Elenia’s battery pack stores electricity for power outages and for maintaining electricity network balance | Fortum
Climate change requires new solutions for flexibility
, Interim CEO, Fortum Spring, +358 40 688 5559
Tommi Lähdeaho
FORTUM CORPORATION ONLINE NEWS 28 May 2020
Because of climate change and the energy transition, the demand for regulating power in Finland is estimated to grow as intermittent wind and solar energy’s share of electricity production increases. The electrification of society also increases the demand for regulating power. Fortum’s virtual battery is part of a smarter, flexible electricity network enabling the growth of renewable energy production in the energy markets.
Electricity storages are planned particularly in areas where the overhead power lines still have a useful life left and installing underground cabling is not an issue in the foreseeable future. “We have identified sites in our grid area where this kind of battery system would improve the reliability of electricity distribution and where the battery pack would provide the most benefit to customers. We will continue our development work to productise electricity distribution battery solutions,” says Lähdeaho from Elenia.
, Unit Manager, Asset Management, Elenia Oy, +358 40 820 2204
, interim CEO from Fortum Spring.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/smart-energy-solutions/fortum-spring/how-join-spring
Other good candidates are assets that have flexibility in their processes. These could be for example heating or cooling applications that need to operate within certain temperature limits and pumps and fans that have bigger tolerances in their operation.
Installations
We are interested in all kinds of assets that have flexibility. Batteries that can be used also as a source of flexible capacity as a secondary purpose (like data center UPSs) are naturally a perfect asset for the Spring's service.
We do the major part of the required work, and we take care of the possible hardware needed for the integration.
Preliminary check
In order to enable demand response with your asset, we need to connect to it in a secure way. Usually, this means that we need to install a device that can control the asset. If it is possible, we prefer using APIs or other digital means to create the connection. We definitely take cyber security seriously, and we use secure ways to control the asset, agreed upon together with the customer. For safety's sake, we always allow the customer to temporarily opt out of the demand response activity if needed.
Suitable assets for Spring
Read more about Spring
Revenue
How to join Spring? | Fortum
Joining our service is easy. Our five step process to enable demand response with your asset ensures a smooth onboarding without any unnecessary work. The process starts with a rough feasibility study and continues to more technical details, including contracting, only if we see the mutual benefit.
With a green light from the feasibility study, we proceed to the contracting phase. The results of the feasibility study will be used as the basis for the contract.
The process starts with a quick check to see if the asset is suitable to be part of Spring’s pool of flexible assets. General information about the power consumption and the actual process is needed to conduct this quick check.
If we mutually concur that the asset could be part of Spring’s demand response programme, a more detailed study will be conducted. It includes an analysis of the consumption pattern of the asset and a more detailed analysis of the impacts on the customer’s process. The economic potential is also analysed more thoroughly.
Once the contract is signed, we proceed to the actual installation, which typically does not take much time.
Five steps to determine your company’s potential to join Fortum Spring
What happens in practice
Once everything has been installed and configured, we can start enjoying the additional value and the contributions to a greener future.
Feasibility check
Contracting point


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/fortums-renewable-agreement-helps-companies-reduce-co2-emissions
Fortum’s Renewable agreement helps companies reduce CO2 emissions | Fortum
07 December 2021, 13:33
This is the reason Norengros went for the greenest power purchase agreement it could find. Norengros owns large warehouses covering 75,000 square metres. Controlling the temperature of these sites requires a great deal of electricity, so this will reduce the CO2 emissions in the end,” he says.
Link to the Swedish site
“With the support from Fortum's customers, we can make more and more powerful efforts against litter,” says Joakim Brodahl at Keep Sweden Clean. “Picking up rubbish is not just about cleaning. Above all, it’s an eye opener to achieve a change in attitude and in behaviour. We know that a person who picks up rubbish is less likely to litter themselves in the future,” Joakim emphasises.
Contributing to the transition to renewable electricity production
Silver has chosen to add Fortum’s renewable energy product ‘Miljötrygg’ that includes energy for renewable sources, to their electricity contract. “We do what we can to influence. It is good that Fortum makes it easy for customers to make sustainable choices. When you get an opportunity to choose 100% renewable electricity, it’s a given that you take it,” says Therése. The companies that choose to buy renewable energy are involved in the phasing out of fossil energy sources. When companies choose to buy electricity from renewable sources, they secure production for their electricity consumption and contribute to the increasing demand for that type of electricity – and that, in turn, makes renewable energy more attractive to investors and electricity companies.
A growing number of companies have realised the value of taking a proactive stance on sustainability, as such an approach puts them in a better position for dealing with customers. Renewable agreement from Fortum is helping companies to reduce their CO2 emissions.
Fortum’s Renewable agreement ensures that the power comes with a guarantee of origin for renewable energy. “It is essential for us to have a guarantee of origin for our power and this agreement is essential for enabling us to reach our sustainability goals,” says Håkon. According to him, their goal was to become climate-neutral as early as 2019, and they did it. “Sustainability is now an integral part of our core strategy. Norengros has been a member of Ethical Trade Norway since 2010, and we monitor all our suppliers to ensure a responsible value chain.”
Another company making extensive use of Fortum’s Renewable agreement is Silver, a strategic brand and design agency in Sweden. They help other companies to build and develop their brands – and to think more sustainably. Therése Eineman of Silver explains: “We can make a difference for our customers by making them think sustainably, but we also make demands on both our own and the customer's suppliers.” Silver has joined Ecovadis, which rates companies on their sustainability.
Link to the Finnish site
He adds that this commitment to sustainability is an advantage when dealing with customers. “We are becoming more attractive precisely because we are helping our customers achieve their sustainability goals. We also play an active role in the value chain, along with our subcontractors, to make things more eco-friendly. In this way, we have become more involved in green shift, both upwards and downwards through the value chain.”
In addition to contributing to the transition to renewable electricity production, the companies in Sweden that have ‘Miljötrygg’ also support the Keep Sweden Clean organisation, which is working to prevent and counter the littering of land and seas. They gather knowledge, drive opinion, collaborate with schools, and develop tools and solutions to stop litter. Their efforts are driven by their vision: A litter-free society is the foundation for a sustainable society.
Links to renewable agreement in various markets:
“We are doing a lot to reduce our direct emissions. Renewable agreement from Fortum has also helped us reduce indirect emissions, which are often more difficult to control,” says Håkon Skjellevik-Heger, Head of Operations and Sustainability at Norengros, which is a major wholesaler and Norway’s largest supplier of consumer goods for the public and private sectors.
Link to the Norwegian site
Silver also helps their customers to make sustainability reports that communicate the values they live by. “Sustainability is very important today as it strengthens the brand and adds to the perception of being a serious company,” Therése concludes.
Customers having Renewable agreement in Norway also help support the work of Rainforest Foundation Norway aimed at reducing emissions, conserving biodiversity and strengthening the rights of indigenous populations. Anders Bolstad, Senior Marketing Advisor at Rainforest Foundation Norway tells us: “What we receive via Renewable agreement and our cooperation with Fortum is vital. All companies have an opportunity to make a difference through their everyday choices. We encourage all companies to monitor their supplier chain and request good environmental documentation.”


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/smart-charging-offers-sustainable-way-save-20-electric-car-charging-costs
“With the Fortum Smart Charging app you can ensure that your car is charging at night – outside of peak pricing – thus
Users in Norway love this simple way of saving money
11 March 2022, 11:34
Sounds easy and practical – but there is one major disadvantage with this “typical” way of charging: the charging starts as soon as we plug in the car, and in most cases it is at a time of day when electricity prices are still at their highest.
Based on the concept developed by Fortum in Norway – the largest electric vehicles market in the world – Fortum is now able to offer a purely digital, automatic smart charging solution to Fortum customers also in Sweden.
One of the best things about Fortum Smart Charging is that the whole process is fully automated. “Smart Charging is completely automatic: all you need to do is connect the app and the car. This means that you can reduce charging costs, even if you do not have a smart charging box,” Anton stresses.
Smart Charging offers a sustainable way to save up to 20% on electric car charging costs | Fortum
Good for the climate and your wallet – all automatically!
Simple, easy, reliable and, most importantly, offering good savings
“Our intelligent app ensures that the car charges when the power price is low, and it works with all types of chargers. When combined with the Fortum Charge & Drive app, you will save even more money: at sign-up, you will get 200 SEK to charge your car,” Anton explains. “Additionally, Fortum Charge & Drive offers access to the largest charging network in the Nordics, making it your perfect charging companion on longer road trips or during vacations.”
Charging an electric car at home is basically very easy. When we return home from work, most of us just plug our car into the charger and leave it there charging until the next morning.
For the average car driver in Sweden with a regular electric car and home charger, the savings on charging costs could be up to 20 percent for the first months.
with lower electricity prices and when the energy generated produces the lowest CO2 emissions
Traffic is being electrified at a rapid pace. More and more people are choosing electric cars, mainly for two reasons: to make a positive impact on the climate and to save money on car operating costs. Smart Charging, the smart new solution from Fortum helps you to achieve these both.
,” says Anton Gustavsson, Offering Manager at Fortum Sweden.
– this is how our satisfied customers describe Fortum Smart Charging. And now we are excited to bring these great benefits also to electric car drivers in Sweden!”
Kristina Hoff Wanderas, Head of New Personal Living Environment Services at Fortum, says that Fortum Smart Charging is one example of successful scaling across the operating countries of Fortum Consumer Solutions. “The feedback from our customers in Norway has been really positive, and people are surprised by how easy it is to use the app.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-transition-new-smart-services-together-customers
“Many of our customers have been involved in the development of Small Steps program from the beginning and have continued to further develop the program with us. Through our daily choices, each and every one of us can have an impact on our environment. But when many people are doing these small things, the positive impact on our environment is even bigger”, stresses Elisa Blomberg, Head of Customer Centricity. Fortum also rewards customers with free electricity hours for every small action they take. “Many of our customers appreciate how these small steps make it easy to reduce their own carbon footprint and environmental load”, Elisa adds.
Small Steps - Big impact
Another example of Fortum’s customer centricity work, is the customer loyalty program called Small Steps. It all started with feedback from a customer and ended up being a new kind of customer program that engages Fortum Consumer Solutions customers to do good for the environment through small actions every day. Examples of actions include saving electricity, reducing daily food waste, recycling, or other little things that help customers to live a more sustainable life every day.
Climate change and the consequent energy transition from fossil to renewable and zero-emission energy sources are accelerating the need to develop new smart services for consumers. Fortum Consumer Solutions is working closely with customers to develop such services.
Fortum digital smart charging service is a good example of the new service development that Fortum Consumer Solutions is doing together with customers. It was developed in response to the need for charging electric cars at home. “Digital smart charging at home was a natural next step to charging on the road, where Fortum Consumer Solutions already had a strong foothold. At the same time, we saw a trend in connectable devices at home and this provided an opportunity to utilize the devices that consumers already had”, notes Kristina Hoff Wanderas, who is heading new personal living environment services.
The two cases above are good practical examples of what customer centricity means to Fortum Consumer Solutions. “It means that the voice of our customers is reflected in everything we do and develop,” says the Head of Customer Centricity. It is at the heart of the business strategy, high on the management agenda and on the metrics that everyone follows. “In addition to having a continuous dialogue with our customers, achieving customer satisfaction also requires cooperation, sharing and agile way of working across our country and function borders, as well as benchmarking the best practices in our own and other industries,” clarifies Elisa.
The work to develop Fortum digital smart charging started in Norway, the largest electric vehicles market in the world. A test group of customers was very much involved along the way, with their opinions and views carefully listened to and taken into account. As a result of this collaboration, Fortum was able to bring to market a purely digital smart charging solution. “The solution, which in practice is an app, ensures that the car at home is charging when the power price is low, and it works with all types of charges. Now that it has been successfully taken into use in Norway, we are ready to take all that learning with us and scale the service to new markets,” says Kristina.
From energy transition to sustainable smart services | Fortum
28 January 2022, 14:18
Customer’s voice is everywhere
“For us, customer satisfaction is not a project; it is something that we strive for every day and it guides our daily work. I am very pleased that our work was recently noticed by the Customer Experience Professionals Association (CXPA Finland), which rewarded us among several top companies and industries for our work”, concludes Elisa Blomberg.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/our-power-plants
Wind power plants
Nuclear power plants
CHP plants
Fortum has over 150 power plants in total: hydro, CHP (combined heat and power), condensing, nuclear, solar and wind. We are the 3rd largest power generator in the Nordic countries and one of the leading heat producers globally.
Solar power plants
Our power plants | Fortum
Our operations worldwide


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/nuclear/nuclear-power-plants
890
We have been safely operating the Loviisa nuclear plant in Finland for over 40 years. We have also jointly owned nuclear power plants in Finland and Sweden.
Commercial operation started
Read more about Nuclear power at Fortum
1,120
OKG
TVO
Jointly owned
1,167
Nuclear power plants | Fortum
Licenses valid until
Loviisa 2: 1980
Country
Majority owner
Vattenfall
1,400
43
Capacity (MW)
Olkiluoto 1
984
507
Oskarshamn 3
Forsmark 2
2030
More about Nuclear power
2027
Olkiluoto 2
Forsmark 3
Loviisa 1: 1977
23
Forsmark 1


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/nuclear



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/nuclear/fortums-nuclear-operations-safety-and-quality-policy
Petra Lundström
an open atmosphere and communicate about our operations to personnel and other stakeholders.
Fortum’s nuclear operations Safety and quality policy
Satu Katajala
We commit to these goals and operating principles and to ensuring the prerequisites for their realisation.
We expect
Nuclear Services at Fortum
nuclear power’s good public image and social acceptance.
More useful information about this subject
Our operations are based on a high-level safety culture and quality and on continuous improvement. Our safety vision is “Beyond Zero”, we don’t give room for complacency, but set ambitious, sustainable goals.
Fortum Group operations are guided by the mission, strategy and values and by the policies and Code of Conduct created on the basis of them. Additionally, nuclear power operations are governed by safety and quality requirements imposed by legislation and decisions by authorities. Fortum’s management recognises the special characteristics of nuclear power, and hereby presents the goals and operating principles we commit to in all our nuclear power-related activities.
Generation division
All personnel in our nuclear organisations have the right and the obligation to develop and maintain safe operations.
We develop
each other to engage in active and continuous learning. We learn from mistakes and draw on experiences from within and outside our own sector. We anticipate future challenges by responding to findings and key indicators and to general changes in the sector. We ensure world-class know-how by actively participating in nuclear research and development.
Loviisa NPP
Instructions in case of radiation hazard, public notice, March 2019
3.3.2022
from ourselves, and from everyone involved in our operations, the values and attitudes that advance nuclear safety and quality. We work responsibly, we commit to the agreed ways of operating and targets, we understand the safety significance of our operations, and we make safety a priority throughout our operations.
Nuclear Oversight and Advisory Group
Safety at Loviisa Nuclear Power Plant
our operations systematically and in an economically sustainable manner towards the best practices in safety, quality management, personnel well-being, environment, IT security, and security. We plan, assess and approve changes prior to implementing them in a controlled manner. We present detailed and function-specific operating principles and procedures in our management system.
Sasu Valkamo
By operating in this way,
Radiation Safety at Loviisa Nuclear Power Plant
We encourage
we advance
Nuclear Engineering Services and Co-owned Assets
Our own world-class expertise is a prerequisite for safety and competitiveness. Nuclear Services business is built upon this strong competence base, and our customers are in the centre of the solutions we provide.
We foster
Fortum’s nuclear operations Safety and quality policy | Fortum
Nuclear plays a core part in Fortum’s strategy. Safety is a prerequisite for all our nuclear operations. Our task is to produce electricity safely, reliably and competitively, in the short term and long term, while complying with the principles of nuclear and radiation safety, waste management control and nuclear security.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/safety-loviisa-nuclear-power-plant
The shift supervisors and operators are required to have a special, nuclear power plant unit-specific licence, a so-called "operating permit", issued by the Radiation and Nuclear Safety Authority of Finland. Professional skills are retained through continuous training and regularly renewable licence exams.
Improving safety means continuous improvement in all processes. Incidents and discrepancies from the Technical Specifications are reported to the National Radiation and Nuclear Safety Authority STUK. The report on regulatory oversight can be found online on STUK's website.
Safety is critical in nuclear power plant operations. Therefore a multiple isolation principle is applied in the planning, building, operation and decommissioning of a nuclear power plant. The high-quality safety systems are designed to be effective in any situation and they integrate multiple isolation and parallel safety measures.
The know-how of the Loviisa power plant personnel is maintained through continuous training. The staff responsible for operating the nuclear power plant must have thorough knowledge of the plant and profound professional skills. This is ensured through 3–4-year-long training where the ordinary technical education is supplemented with training focusing on the Loviisa power plant's special features and safety aspects. Most of the basic and supplementary training is carried out with the Loviisa power plant's training simulator. It is used to simulate the operations of the Loviisa nuclear power plant units, and disruption situations in a surrounding that corresponds to real conditions.
Incidents at the power plant are investigated, evaluated and reported according to Finnish legislation and the international standards (IAEA, WANO). The power plant's technical operations and organization are subject to strict internal quality assurance and inspections by international peer reviews and the authorities.
The reactor is equipped not only with cooling systems that are part of the process, but also with several parallel emergency cooling systems. The supply of electricity to these systems is ensured with several redundant and independent systems. This is to prevent fuel damage in the highly unlikely event of an accident.
The reactor is protected with several barriers
Safety at Loviisa nuclear power plant
At the Loviisa power plant, several successive structural barriers prevent radioactive materials from the fuel from being released into the environment. The innermost barrier consists of the metal cladding that protects the fuel rods. The next barrier is the reactor pressure vessel. The reactor circuit is surrounded by a gas-tight steel containment, which is the third barrier. The entire primary circuit, i.e. the part of the power plant that holds the reactor core, is in a separate concrete containment building.
Loviisa power plant's Technical Specifications set the specific plant parameters on how to run the power plant safely and reliably. Large safety margins are set so that there is enough time to respond to any abnormal levels of radiation in all situations.
Safety at Loviisa nuclear power plant | Fortum
Personnel are in a key role
Safety systems go through periodic testings and inspections in order to ensure that operational limits and conditions and other permits and regulations are met accordingly at all times and possible problems are recognized as early and as reliably as possible. During the annual outages the safety systems go through systematic and thorough maintenance, testing and inspection programs.
The safety of the Loviisa nuclear power plant is based on the very high reliability of equipment and functions. Multiple parallel functions that back up each other and structural barriers are part of the safety systems designed to manage any situation. Additionally, the nuclear power plant's systematic annual outages and modernisation projects ensure that the equipment is always in compliance with current standards.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant
Our environment
Loviisa power plant environmental report 2021 published
History
We publish several nuclear related publications. Here you can find all of them.
Operations
Loviisa NPP production in 2022
Share of Finland's electricity production
The first nuclear power plant in Finland, Fortum's Loviisa Unit 1, was taken into commercial use in 1977. Unit 2 followed in 1980.
TWh
Do you want to visit at the Loviisa power plant? Here you can find contacts for Loviisa power plant.
See contacts
Environmental impacts
Loviisa nuclear power plant | Fortum
When reviewing the entire production lifecycle, the climate impact of operating nuclear power is similar to that of wind, solar or hydropower.
Loviisa NPP in 2022
See publications
The power plant continuously employs
To the report
In 2022, the annual production totalled 7.9 TWh which is more than 10% of Finland's electricity production.
530
A multiple isolation principle is applied in the planning, building, operation and decommissioning of a nuclear power plant.
The Loviisa power plant was the first nuclear power plant in Finland. Get to know Loviisa's history.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/environmental-impacts-loviisa-power-plant
76%
Our environment 2021
Read and download PDF
as material
10%
66%
See the report here
Environmental Impacts
Environmental Impacts - Loviisa power plant
The majority of the waste generated at the Loviisa power plant is conventional waste
Waste management at the Loviisa power plant is comprised of two separate areas: waste management for the non-controlled area and waste management for the controlled area. All waste generated in the controlled area is treated as radioactive. Waste generated outside the controlled area can be treated as waste from a conventional industrial plant.
as energy
Only 10% of waste ends up in landfills and 9%, such as chemicals and solvents, goes to further treatment as a hazardous waste due to its properties.
Read more about the final disposal of nuclear waste
The final disposal of spent nuclear fuel in Finland is handled with care
Environmental Impacts - Loviisa power plant | Fortum
Read our latest Our environment report
Only a fraction of the waste generated by the power plant is nuclear waste
Waste for recovery
The environmental work of the Loviisa power plant is guided by the environmental standard ISO 14001. The system covers all operations by the Loviisa power plant and its contractors who work at the island of Hästholmen. The electricity production of the Loviisa nuclear power plant avoids about 6 million tonnes of carbon dioxide emissions into the atmosphere in Finland each year compared to producing a similar amount with fossil fuels.
Check out the Loviisa power plant environmental report 2021
Waste management at Loviisa
Loviisa nuclear power plant generates approximately 1,188 t of waste each year. However, most, or more precisely 95%, of the waste generated by the nuclear power plant is conventional, ie non-radioactive waste. Up to 74% of this waste is recovered, as material or energy.
2% of the waste generated by the Loviisa nuclear power plant consists of spent fuel, which has an interim storage at the power plant premises. The final disposal of this waste is to Posiva, at Eurajoki. The remaining 3% of the waste generated by the nuclear power plant consists of maintenance waste 1% and liquid waste 2%, and they will be disposed on the power plant site in the final repository. Therefore in total, only 5% of the waste generated by the power plant is so-called nuclear waste.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/nuclear/waste-management
The Ministry of Employment and the Economy holds the highest power of control and supervision over nuclear waste management in Finland. The Ministry prepares the legislation concerning nuclear waste as well as any associated international agreements with regard to Finland. It also supervises adherence to the legislation and agreements.
Further proof of the safety of final disposal for the safety case may be gathered by observing so-called natural analogs—in other words, by making comparisons with nature.​
Waste mgmt and decom services
The Radiation and Nuclear Safety Authority (STUK) supervises the safety of nuclear power generation. STUK prepares instructions and regulations on nuclear safety and inspects the safety of the power plants. The safety aspects of nuclear waste processing and storage also fall within the scope of STUK's supervision activities.
The Finnish Government granted in November 2015 a licence to Posiva for the construction of a final disposal facility for spent nuclear fuel. After extensive and multidisciplinary research and development work, Posiva can now proceed with construction of the final disposal facility in Olkiluoto according to the concept it has developed. The final disposal of the spent fuel generated in the Olkiluoto and Loviisa nuclear power plants into the Finnish bedrock is planned to start in the early 2020s.
Nuclear waste management payments collected in the fund also cover any research and development costs and the costs incurred from official supervision and administrative activities.
Highly selective ion exchange materials: CsTreat, SrTreat and CoTreat
The Finnish State Nuclear Waste Management Fund was established in 1988 in accordance with the Nuclear Energy Act. Separate from the state budget, the fund is controlled by the Ministry of Employment and the Economy. The purpose of the fund is to collect, preserve, and safely invest the funds required for the management of nuclear waste in the future.
Nuclear waste management | Fortum
Posiva, founded and owned by Fortum and another Finnish nuclear operator, TVO, takes care of the final nuclear waste disposal of their nuclear power plants. The plan is to dispose of high-level nuclear waste in the final repository of Posiva in Olkiluoto, in the municipality of Eurajoki. The final repository and related encapsulation unit are expected to be ready for use in 2020.
What happens to spent nuclear fuel?
Who is responsible for nuclear waste?
Companies with a nuclear waste management obligation prepare for the costs by collecting funds in advance in the price of electricity and depositing them in a specific fund. This provides society with a financial guarantee for the handling of nuclear waste management under all circumstances.
The Olkiluoto island was chosen as the site of the repository from among many survey sites on the basis of location surveys and safety assessments carried out between 1987 and 2000. The underground research facility ONKALO, which Posiva started to construct in 2004, has enabled research at the actual disposal depth. The aim has been to preserve the good characteristics of the rock as far as possible in the construction phase of the underground research facility.
Who pays for the costs of disposal?
Fortum Nuclear Services: Waste Management & Decommissioning
What are the responsibilities in final disposal?
The fund's capital consists of annual payments by the companies with a nuclear waste management obligation as well as the fund's revenue. The Ministry makes annual decisions on the amount of cost liability at the current price level on the basis of reports submitted by the companies with a nuclear waste management obligation. The total amount of collected funds must, at any given time, correspond to the costs of nuclear waste management activities not yet implemented.
How was the site for final disposal chosen?
Highly selective ion exchange materials
The Government Decree on the safety of the final disposal of nuclear waste stipulates the following concerning the long-term radiation effects of final disposal: “The annual dose of the persons with the greatest exposure shall remain below 0.1 mSv (millisieverts), and the average annual doses of other persons shall remain insignificant.”
Read the case here
With regard to the management of radioactive substances, Fortum always strives to keep any emissions well below both the emission limits set by the authorities and Fortum's own target limits, which are more stringent than the official limits.
The processing of nuclear waste is governed by the Nuclear Energy Act, the Nuclear Energy Decree, and a Government Decree. Amended in 1994, the Nuclear Energy Act stipulates that all spent nuclear fuel produced in Finland must be disposed of in the Finnish bedrock. The same legislation also prohibits the import, and disposal of, foreign nuclear waste in Finland.
According to Finnish legislation, nuclear waste generated in Finland must be finally disposed of in Finland, and the power plant companies are responsible for their respective nuclear waste management. Swedish legislation is similar in regard to responsibilities. The final disposal solutions for the nuclear waste of the Loviisa nuclear power plant and Fortum's co-owned nuclear power plants in Finland and Sweden are among the leading solutions in the world.
In Finland, the law stipulates that each producer of nuclear power-generated electricity is responsible for its own nuclear waste management.​ Fortum Power and Heat Oy and Teollisuuden Voima Oyj have established Posiva Oy to manage the research and development work required for the disposal of the spent nuclear fuel produced at their power plants as well as the implementation of the selected disposal solution.
Case: Responsible final disposal of nuclear waste – final disposal begins in Finland, the first in the world
An extensive body of assessment documentation, known as the safety case, is prepared to prove the safety of final disposal. The most central part of the safety case is scenario analysis whereby the behavior of the final disposal system installed deep in bedrock is assessed on the basis of postulated event sequences. The temporal scopes of the analyses stretch far into the future, and they consider factors such as climate change and the formation of a thick glacier as well as associated rock movement.
The research carried out during the construction has confirmed earlier assumptions about the rock properties. Based on the research, it is now known that there are few cracks in the bedrock at the disposal depth the bedrock is stable at a depth of hundreds of meters, the  roundwater is oxygen-free the groundwater flow is minimal.
NURES® Technology for Radionuclide Removal
Furthermore, natural copper formations found around the world have persisted for up to millions of years, which can be considered as proof of the long-term strength of copper canisters placed deep in the bedrock. In Hyrkkölä in southern Finland, for example, copper occurs in its original form in granite rocks despite having been exposed to groundwater containing sulfide under oxidizing conditions.
SKB (Svensk Kärnbränslehantering AB) is responsible for managing the waste created by Fortum's co-owned nuclear power production in Sweden. A final repository for spent nuclear fuel is being built in Forsmark, in the municipality of Östhammar. The plan is to complete the construction by the end of this decade. After construction and the pilot period, final disposal can begin at the end of the next decade.
Waste created in nuclear power plant operations is governed by either regular (non-radioactive) or radioactive waste management rules. Regular waste is the waste created in a typical work environment, in goods transport, office tasks and cafeteria operations, for example. Radioactive waste is classified as either low-level, intermediate-level or high-level waste, based on how it was created, its original purpose and radioactivity level. At Fortum's Loviisa nuclear power plant, low-level and intermediate-level waste are finally disposed of in a 110-metre-deep cave that has been excavated in the Hästholmen bedrock in Loviisa.
Natural analogs are examples, observed around the world, of how naturally occurring materials have behaved under different conditions over long periods of time. By studying nature, it is possible to establish how copper, clay, and radioactive substances behave under different conditions over long periods of time. This has led to a better understanding of the representativeness of the models used to describe the functionality of the disposal system.
Waste management at the Loviisa power plant has been divided into two sectors. Conventional waste management covers waste which does not contain activity, while waste formed in the controlled area is handled as radioactive waste. Waste in controlled area is divided into three groups by mode of generation and original use: low-level waste (conventional maintenance waste), medium-level waste (liquid waste) and high-level waste (spent fuel).
Nuclear power plants produce electricity using uranium as fuel. The energy in uranium is in a tightly compressed format, so the amount of spent fuel is small. Spent nuclear fuel is radioactive. Therefore, it must be kept isolated until its radioactivity has decreased to a harmless level. This isolation is called final disposal.
The disposal solution is the result of decades of research and development work aimed at developing a safe solution for the permanent isolation of nuclear waste.
The safety of final disposal is supported with information obtained through research. The bedrock, the materials used in the disposal process, and the functionality of the technical solutions are subjected to safety studies.
It is now known, for example, that clay has effectively stopped the migration of uranium as well as other radioactive substances from a radioactive uranium deposit deep in the bedrock in Cigar Lake, northern Canada. No radiation levels differing from the normal natural background radiation levels can be observed above ground in the area.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/nuclear/nuclear-waste-management/case-responsible-final-disposal-nuclear-waste
In Finland, the management of the entire power plant life cycle is a precondition for sustainable nuclear electricity production. Posiva, founded by its owners Fortum and TVO (Teollisuuden Voima), will conduct the final disposal of spent nuclear fuel from both currently operational nuclear power plants, Loviisa and Olkiluoto, in a responsible manner.
Case – Responsible final disposal of nuclear waste | Fortum
Olkiluoto bedrock is crystalline bedrock, which constitutes the majority of Finnish bedrock. Finnish bedrock is among the oldest in the world.
The final disposal facility will be at a depth of approximately 430 meters.
The final disposal facility for spent nuclear fuel will be constructed within the solid Olkiluoto bedrock with no major fractures at a depth of 400–450 meters. The potential effects of changes above ground and in the atmosphere, and the effects of human activities on the immediate surroundings of the repository, have been taken into account in the design of the final disposal concept.
Final disposal begins in Finland, the first in the world
Case – Responsible final disposal
The deployment of the final disposal of spent nuclear fuel is planned to begin in Finland around the mid-2020s. Final disposal of Fortum's Loviisa power plant's spent nuclear fuel is scheduled to begin in the 2040s.
Final disposal is based on the use of multiple release barriers, which guarantee that nuclear waste cannot come into contact with organic nature or people. These barriers include the state of the fuel, the final disposal canister, the bentonite buffer, the backfilling of the repository tunnels and the surrounding Olkiluoto bedrock.
Total length of the ONKALO® tunnels is 42 km.
Sustainability 2020 – the faster pace of climate change is accelerating the need for structural changes in society
Facts
Olkiluoto has been selected as the final disposal site on the basis of site surveys and a safety analysis.
The final disposal solution for spent nuclear fuel has also been examined through environmental impact assessments. Environmental responsibility for final disposal is also on a financially sustainable foundation because, in Finland, nuclear power companies must cover the costs of nuclear waste management, and the requisite funds are set aside in the State Nuclear Waste Management Fund.
Case – Responsible final disposal of nuclear waste
Read and download Fortum's sustainability report
Finland is one of the most successful countries in the use of nuclear energy; the country’s four nuclear power plant units have achieved the world’s highest load factors every year of the 21st century. Nuclear power produces almost a third of the country's electricity.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/decommissioning-and-waste-treatment/highly-selective-ion-exchange-materials-cstreat-srtreat-and-cotreat
NURES® is based on use of 100% inorganic, highly selective ion exchange materials CsTreat®, SrTreat® and CoTreat®.
Highly selective ion exchange materials: CsTreat, SrTreat and CoTreat | Fortum
NURES® Product team
See NURES® Publications
See the publications here


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/nuresr-publications
Available NURES® publications:
NURES® Publications | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/nures-publications



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-decommissioning
Services for Nuclear Decommissioning
Fortum's turn-key solutions for nuclear decommissioning and waste management
Fortum offers comprehensive decommissioning services which cover decommissioning planning and dismantling services as well as waste management activities. Our experience ranges from decommissioning of research reactors and laboratories to full scale nuclear power plants.
Waste Management in Decommissioning
• Dismantling in controlled area
Our nuclear decommissioning capability areas:
Dismantling
• Facility shutdown activities
• Waste processing, treatment, storage, and disposal
V
Project Management, Engineering and Support
The preparation for decommissioning is a key issue for a successful decommissioning project. Fortum’s approach to preparation is to make strategy development as early as possible because it creates the boundaries for whole decommissioning project.
Comprehensive decommissioning services
• Pre-decommissioning activities
Antti
Successful project management is required in complex decommissioning projects. Fortum Uniper Nuclear Services has experience ranging from large decommissioning programs in Sweden to individual dismantling projects and small cost optimisation studies.
• Digital services for smooth decommissioning
For more than 30 years, Fortum has been a forerunner in nuclear decommissioning and waste management. We are in an active role in the Nordic decommissioning projects. Together with our partners, we cover the full value chain of a nuclear decommissioning project, including waste management and disposal related services.
• Project management, engineering, and support
Nuclear Decommissioning and Waste
+358 40 751 8956
Services for Nuclear Decommissioning | Fortum
Nuclear decommissioning project cost vary from hundreds of millions to a billion euros. Decommissioning planning plays a key role in establishing the cost level. Our approach to decommissioning planning considers nuclear waste disposal and treatment solutions as early during operation as possible.
• Conventional dismantling, demolition, and site restoration
Pre-decommissioning Activities & Facility Shutdown Activities
In nuclear power plant decommissioning large components form the critical path of the decommissioning schedule. Fortum Uniper Nuclear Services has more than ten years of large component dismantling experience with excellent track record from projects in Germany and Sweden.
Decommissioning waste management is the key to a successful decommissioning project. Fortum has unique knowledge of treatment and handling of activated and contaminated nuclear waste.
Ketolainen
Decommissioning Planning


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-decommissioning/dismantling
Conventional demolition
We are experienced in the most challenging dismantling tasks using tailormade remote controlled tools under challenging radiation environments.
REMAINT nuclear maintenance concept
Segmentation of high dose rate components
Fortum together with its partners has the capability to support and perform even the most demanding dismantling activities:
We have a solid track record of taking care of volume driven (bulk) dismantling in a cost efficient way.
Volume driven dismantling
Services for Dismantling
Packing optimisation
Another important factor in dismantling is the bulk dismantling that makes up the majority of the total dismantling volume. Based on the experience from the large Swedish decommissioning projects, we can take care of the volume driven dismantling in a cost efficient way.
Heavy lifting
Services for Dismantling | Fortum
As we work on all areas of decommissioning, we have a big picture view of the projects and we are able optimise the dismantling also from radiation safety and waste management perspectives.
Dismantling of systems, structures and components inside the containment
Cost efficient volume driven dismantling
Dismantling of primary circuit and biological shield
Dismantling activities usually define the structure and schedule of a decommissioning project. Draw on our experience to ensure even the challenging dismantling  tasks are carried out in time and budget.
Holistic view on decommissioning
In nuclear power plant decommissioning large components, such as reactor pressure vessel (RPV), RPV internals, steam generators and the biological shield, form the critical path of the decommissioning schedule.
Challenging dismantling projects
Dismantling of RPV and RPV internals


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-decommissioning/nuclear-decommissioning-planning
We have been making decommissioning plans for more than 30 years covering different types of facilities and decommissioning phases. Additionally, we have also reviewed and benchmarked decommissioning plans made by others.
Long experience with different types of facilities
Resource and cost estimation and optimisation
Waste stream and waste management planning
In addition to the dismantling related activities, we are also experts on waste management. Based on our experience on handling all different kinds of waste categories, materials and activity levels, we can optimise your waste management from a holistic point of view.
Detailed dismantling planning
Nuclear Decommissioning Planning
Nuclear Decommissioning Planning | Fortum
Our decommissioning planning competences include e.g.:
Plans are reviewed and optimized based on the results of cost analysis. Our customers have been satisfied with our works. The cost estimates vary significantly between countries and sites and the cost savings achieved in the reviews have ranged from dozens to hundreds of millions of euros.
Workflow optimization, including the utilisation of digital solutions
Resource and cost estimation and optimization
Dismantling concept
Download Brochure
Nuclear decommissioning project cost vary from hundreds of millions to a billion euros. Decommissioning planning comprises of three major streams: safety, dismantling and waste management. Experience in all three areas combined enables the most efficient optimisation of total project cost. Utilising modern design tools supports the planning by visualising complex and challenging environments, thus reducing the uncertainties. Fortum can provide support in all questions related to decommissioning planning.
Decommissioning strategy
Learn more about Decommissioning Planning
Waste characterisation, packing and logistics planning
Radiation analyses and dose calculation
Our expertise covers the whole plant lifecycle, including decommissioning plans from the preliminary to final versions as well as decommissioning strategies. Drawing from our experience, we can review your decommissioning plan to identify areas of improvement and potential for cost savings, update the existing plan, or provide your facility with a new decommissioning plan.
Olkiluoto (BWR) and Loviisa (PWR) NPP decommissioning planning
Utilisation of modern digital tools, e.g. reality capture


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-decommissioning/project-management-engineering-and-support-nuclear-decommissioning
Project Management, Engineering and Support in Nuclear Decommissioning | Fortum
Thanks to our long history in the nuclear business, we are used to dealing with different stakeholders, from subcontractors to the regulator. As we are also involved in conventional demolition, we have a long experience about the different dismantling projects and material recycling, which helps us optimise the subcontracting.
Project Management, Engineering and Support in Nuclear Decommissioning
Owner operator perspective
Successful project management is required in complex decommissioning projects. Fortum has experience ranging from large decommissioning programmes in Sweden to individual dismantling projects and small cost optimisation studies. In addition to the project management, we can also provide engineering and project support as well as efficient project management tools.
Reality Capture for cost-efficient data capture of the as-situation on site for virtual visits
Program management
We have long experience from different kinds of decommissioning projects and programs in addition to other nuclear projects. Utilising our competence, the cost and schedule overruns of a first-of-a-kind project can be avoided.
Our project management experience in decommissioning ranges from multi-unit decommissioning programs to individual dismantling projects and project engineer support works.
We deeply understand the owner perspective of a decommissioning program or project, basing our experience on the program on our own plants.
Our services contain for instance:
Broad experience of different size projects
Engineering studies and modelling, e.g. radiation modelling
Stakeholder understanding
Scheduling
Project engineer support
Cost estimation and optimisation


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-decommissioning/waste-management-decommissioning
Waste Management in Decommissioning | Fortum
The waste management competences related to decommissioning contain for instance:
Waste packing and logistics
Safety analyses
Sampling and activity inventory calculations
Final disposal
Waste characterisation
Decommissioning waste management is the key to a successful decommissioning project. Fortum has unique knowledge of treatment and handling of activated and contaminated nuclear waste. Based on our experience on operational waste, decommissioning waste, the treatment of liquid waste and nuclear waste disposal, we can help you optimise the waste management of your decommissioning project.
Our NURES® liquid waste treatment solutions enable you to purify the liquids from operational and decommissioning phases and bind all of the radioactivity into solid filters, ready for final disposal.
Waste management is an integrated part of a decommissioning project and one of the main drivers in cost efficient decommissioning. Bottlenecks in waste management can lead to long delays in the project or expensive waste reprocessing. Our streamlined processes can be utilised by our customers to avoid the challenges.
As owner operators of nuclear power plants as well as repositories, we truly understand the challenges of our clients and are able to draw from our experience in a broader way than most other service providers.
Planning and optimisation of waste routes and waste packing
Liquid waste treatment with NURES®
Liquid waste treatment
Utilise our holistic planning and optimisation of the whole lifecycle of waste, from origin to final disposal, to achieve lower total decommissioning cost.
Waste management planning and optimisation


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/09/fortum-and-uniper-start-cooperation-nuclear-decommissioning-and-dismantling-services
“Earlier this year, Fortum and Uniper announced joint service offering  for utility customers and energy-intensive industries. Fortum and Uniper joining forces also in the nuclear business area is a winning combination for scaling up and developing a significant business portfolio in nuclear decommissioning services”, says Petra Lundström.
“Uniper is developing strong decommissioning competences and have a unique reference with their decommissioning program in Sweden. Fortum will bring to the cooperation complementary competences in the waste and decommissioning area, as well as our customer-centric way of working. In our Nuclear Services business we have served customers for many years already with excellent customer satisfaction results, says
“Nuclear power plants around Europe are in different phases of the life cycle. At the same time, as new reactors are being planned and built, there are also plants that will be shut down and dismantled. Here we see attractive opportunities to create joint service offering and our joint target is to become the market leader in nuclear decommissioning and dismantling in Europe”, says
, Vice President, Co-owned assets and Nuclear Services at Fortum.
Torbjörn Larsson, press officer, Uniper Sweden, phone + 46 70 637 32 77
Fortum and Uniper enter close into cooperation to offer nuclear decommissioning and dismantling services for nuclear companies. Through this cooperation, Fortum and Uniper combine decades of nuclear experience and a wide variety of competencies which will create world-class value to the customers. The future vision is to become a market leader in Europe.
In the beginning, the cooperation focuses on the on-going decommissioning and dismantling of four reactors in Uniper's Swedish nuclear power fleet. These are Barsebäck units 1 and 2, and Oskarshamn units 1 and 2 – co-owned by Fortum and Uniper. The four reactors are integrated into a common decommissioning portfolio to create logistical and economic coordination benefits.
“Ending the lifecycle of Barsebäck 1 and 2 and Oskarshamn 1 and 2 in a safe and efficient manner is of outmost importance to us. Looking ahead and out into the European decommissioning market together with Fortum is a natural next step. It will also enable us to retain nuclear competence in each country and offer our nuclear experts long-term career and development opportunities. If we perform cost efficient decommissioning, we also give legitimacy for a new generation of nuclear power that support and is essential for efficient decarbonization and energy transition”, concludes Johan Svenningsson.
Johan Svenningsson
“This cooperation brings together complementary nuclear competencies, products and services from both Fortum and Uniper. As the projects in Sweden progress, the focus of the cooperation will shift to customers and together we will be able to utilize all learnings to support other nuclear power plants in their decommissioning phase”, explains Petra Lundström.
, CEO of Uniper Sweden.
More information:
Fortum and Uniper start cooperation in nuclear decommissioning and dismantling services | Fortum
Pia Fast, communication manager nuclear, Fortum, phone + 358 40 147 8752


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-decommissioning/pre-decommissioning-facility-shutdown
Our services include for instance:
Optimising preparatory activities lowers the total cost
Preparatory activities include many interdependent functions that affect different areas of implementation. Holistic optimisation of functions such as plant modifications, waste logistics and site simulations is crucial for streamlining implementation tasks and therefore reducing total costs.
Cost calculations and optimisation
The preparation for decommissioning is a key issue for a successful decommissioning project. All units have specific features which need to be addressed for preparatory measures. All required safety functions are also established during the preparatory actions. Radiation protection measures are optimised and put into practice to minimize the dose budget. Plant safety functions will be updated to correspond the new facility state during the implementation. Successfully defined safety functions allow more efficient project execution without compromising safety.
Work process optimisation
Waste treatment and logistics optimisation
Preparatory activities are the first part of a decommissioning project and set the guidelines for the entire project. High quality preparation ensures high quality implementation. Partner with us to fully utilise the last years of your plants lifetime  to ensure a smooth transition into decommissioning.
Owner operator experience
Nuclear Pre-decommissioning & Facility Shutdown Activities | Fortum
Site optimisation and modifications
High-quality preparation as a base for safe implementation
Procurement
During the preparatory actions, all required safety functions are established. Based on our experience, we can help you prepare the most efficient safety measures during decommissioning in collaboration with regulatory bodies.
Fortum’s approach to the preparation is to make strategy development as early as possible, as it creates boundaries for the whole decommissioning project. Fortum has a capability to support all pre-decommissioning activities to achieve timely and cost effective project, or a specific area such as training of personnel, procurement, waste management or cost optimisation. Well prepared decommissioning, including site logistics and waste routes, ensures safe and efficient decommissioning of a facility, and minimizes delays and undue costs.
Nuclear Pre-decommissioning & Facility Shutdown Activities
Site simulations
Optimising radiation protection measures
We have experience of four units transitioning from operation to decommissioning. Our experience from the preparatory phase and its effects to the implementation will reduce overall risks of the project and secure a successful transition for your plant.
Pre-decommissioning & Facility Shutdown
Training of personnel


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/our-environment-2021
In accordance with the environmental permit, domestic wastewater must be treated so that the biological oxygen demand (BOD7ATU) of wastewater discharged into the sea does not exceed 15 mg/l, and the total phosphorus concentration does not exceed 0.7 mg/l, calculated as annual averages. The efficiency of the treatment process must be at least 90% for both variables.
532
18,375
The goal of conventional waste management is to prevent the production of waste and to reduce the amount of landfill waste through effective sorting. In 2021 about 695 tonnes of waste was transported from the power plant area. Of this, 22% was landfilled,
The annual collective radiation dose of the Loviisa power plant’s own personnel and external contractors in 2021 was the lowest in the plant’s operating history. This shows that long-term work in radiation safety produces good results.
150
Noble gases, TBq
66
Permanent contractors
In accordance with the environmental permit, the amount of cooling water released into the sea should not exceed 1,800 million m3 per year or 56 m3/s. The cooling water’s thermal load on the sea may not exceed 60,000 terajoules annually. The limits set by the permit were not exceeded in 2021.
Nuclear at Fortum
Biological oxygen demand, kg
Solids, kg
Radiation safety
Emissions into water
170
5.1
As a producer of clean energy, the Loviisa power plant and carbon-free nuclear power play a significant role in mitigating climate change. The greenhouse gas emissions over nuclear power’s lifecycle are equivalent to those of wind, hydro and solar power.
82
In Finnish
19,443
Our operations are based on a high-level safety culture and quality and on continuous improvement.
Read more about wastewater
Annual load caused by process wastewater
Phosphorus, kg
Loviisa power plant environmental report: Our environment 2021
No permit limits were exceeded at the Loviisa power plant in 2021, nor were there any breaches of permit conditions.
57,337
Internationally acclaimed expert
Own personnel
Domestic wastewater volume, m3
Tritium, TBq
Summer workers
According to the monitoring results, the treatment plant reached results compliant with the conditions of the permit: the biological oxygen demand of treated wastewater in 2021 was 1.4 mg/l on average, and the total phosphorus concentration was 0.16 mg/l. The load caused by domestic wastewater in 2021 was 3.1 kg of phosphorus, 654 kg of nitrogen and 179 kg of solids.
The cooling water discharge area remains unfrozen throughout the winter. The size of the open water and thin ice area depends on winter temperatures. In 2021, the power plant used a total of about 1,394 million m3 of sea water for cooling, and the thermal load on the sea totalled 57,337 terajoules.
1,800
74
Read more about cooling water
Cooling water
Based on emissions and meteorological data, the estimated radiation dose to the surrounding population was about 0.2% of the set dose limit. The radiation dose to the surrounding population from radioactive substances originating from the Loviisa power plant accounted for only a minor increase compared to the radioactive dose from other sources (like, e.g., radon and medicine).
Temporary employees
Waste generated in the controlled area is divided into three categories: Low-level waste (maintenance waste), intermediate-level waste (liquid waste), and high-level waste (spent fuel). Maintenance waste is either cleared as non-active and treated as conventional waste or disposed of in the final repository located at a depth of 110 metres in the power plant area. Also the solidified liquid waste was disposed of in the final repository.
Chemical oxygen demand, kg
Cooling water, million m³
54,586
(Kr-87 equivalent)
men
92%
Thermal load into the sea, TJ
Iodine, TBq
Process wastewater volume, m3
According to the service water withdrawal permit, the power plant can withdraw up to 180 m3/h of water from the lake for a short period of time and a maximum of 150 m3/h per quarter.
Other radioactive nuclides, TBq
1,440
5.6
Waste for recovery as material and energy
Read more radiation safety
Occupational incidents
56%
Thanks to efficient sorting and packaging, the amount of maintenance waste for final disposal in 2020 accounted for a small share. Liquid waste is purified and released into the sea or stored and solidified in concrete and then disposed of in the final repository. Spent fuel is stored to await final disposal in Eurajoki.
70
External personnel
Amount of conventional waste
In 2021 we stayed within all permit limits in terms of environmental impacts.
Emissions into air
Total amount of waste
16.1
Emissions of radioactive effluents into the environment in 2021 were, as in previous years, significantly lower than the limits set for nuclear power plant emissions.
180
929
The radiation monitoring programme carried out in the power plant surroundings occasionally detected radionuclides originating from the plant, but the concentrations detected were very small.
654
85%
The principle of continuous improvement
Annual load caused by domestic water
Service water
0.0000005
The most important task of our nuclear power operations is to produce electricity safely, reliably and competitively, in the short and long term, while complying with the principles of safety, waste management safety, and nuclear material control.
695 t
Environmental incidents
81
During annual outages
15%
137,841 m3.
0.0001
Our own world-class expertise is a prerequisite for safety and competitiveness. Our Nuclear Services business is built upon this strong competence base, and our customers are in the centre of the solutions we provide.
The water is purified before use at the water plant, and the water used as process water is additionally treated at the demineralisation plant. The total volume of water withdrawn from Lake Lappominjärvi in 2021 was about
the power plant.
Clean energy production and sustainability are at the core of Fortum’s strategy. In 2021, the Loviisa power plant generated a total of 8.2 TWh (net) of carbon-free power, corresponding to more than ten per cent of the energy generation in Finland.
Reliable production
0.0000006
ca. 800
Occupational safety
Get to know Fortum's Loviisa NPP
Read more about waste management
ca. 650
The load caused by process wastewater in 2021 was 5.6 kg of phosphorus, 1279 kg of nitrogen and 40 kg of solids. The power plant’s share of the total load in the Hästholmen sea area in 2021 was about 1% phosphorus and about 5% nitrogen.
1,328
0.0002
The process and domestic water required by the power plant is sourced from Lake Lappominjärvi, which is located about 5 kilometres north of
3.1
210,580
Read more about service water
14.3
Observation reports (no.)
225,315
655
Key figures 2021
1,394
Fortum’s technical support in Espoo
60,000
0.89
179
56% was reused as materials or energy, and 14 % was treated as hazardous waste.
Nitrogen, kg
women
Emissions
Wastewater
(I-131 equivalent)
The safety condition of the power plant remained good, and both the production and equipment availability was at a very high level. Excellence in plant safety is an absolute prerequisite of safe and efficient operations for employees and the environment, and it is a sign of professionalism.
The environmental permit of the power plant does not set any limits for the process wastewater load. However, the nutrient load caused by the process wastewater is monitored through samples taken in accordance with the monitoring programme.
14,000
195
The domestic wastewater generated is treated at the power plant area’s biological-chemical wastewater treatment plant, to which about 18,375 m3 of wastewater was piped in 2021.
1,380
1,279
932
After the outbreak of the COVID-19 pandemic, our most important task has been to ensure the health and safety of our own employees and contractor employees and to secure the continuity of operations.
Personnel
0.22
Loviisa power plant environmental report: Our environment 2021 | Fortum
As a result of the Loviisa nuclear power plant’s electricity production, Finland emits about 6 million tonnes less carbon dioxide emissions compared to the equivalent amount of fossil fuel-based electricity.
2.3
The power plant’s most significant environmental impact is the thermal load on the sea caused by the cooling water, which heats up by about 10 degrees as it passes through the plant. In practice, two-thirds of the thermal energy produced by the reactor ends up in the sea with the cooling water. According to temperature measurements, the discharged water raises the temperature of the sea water during the growing season by about 1-2.5 degrees within a 1-2 kilometre range from the discharge point.
Permitted annual emissions
5.5
3%


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/history
Loviisa units 1 and 2 produce together about 10% of Finland's electricity consumption.
1970's and 1980's
2015:
The Loviisa power plant was a multicultural project in which the West and East co-operated in the field of nuclear technology for the first time. The degree of domestic origin was approximately 50%. The reactor, turbine, generator and other main components are from the former Soviet Union. Safety systems, control systems and automation systems are of Western origin. The steel containment and its related ice condensers were manufactured using Westinghouse licences.
The Loviisa power plant was built to meet the most developed Western safety standards. Safety and operability are continuously improved by major modification projects.
2017:
2007:
Safety-enhancing cooling towers, independent of seawater cooling, completed.
2010:
2016:
Modernisation of the Polar cranes used for heavy lifting in the containment completed. Final disposal of solidified radioactive liquid waste started.
Loviisa unit 2 has produced electricity for 30 years.
The Finnish Parliament passed the application of decision in principle to establish a disposal site at Olkiluoto.
2000's
The Council of State granted a new operating permit for 20 years; licences are valid until 2027 (LO1) and 2030 (LO2).
Control room automation renewal began at Loviisa unit 2.
The Loviisa power plant was the first nuclear power plant in Finland. The power plant has two units: unit 1 started operating in February 1977, and unit 2 in November 1980. The units are VVER-440 type pressurized water reactors.
The Loviisa power plant was built to meet the most developed Western safety standards. Safety and operability is continuously improved by major modification projects.
1990's
History | Fortum
The Loviisa power plant was a multicultural project, in which West and East co-operated in the field of nuclear technology for the first time. The degree of domestic origin was approximately 50%. The reactor, turbine, generator and other main components are from the former Soviet Union. Safety systems, control systems and automation systems are of Western origin. The steel containment and its related ice condensers were manufactured using Westinghouse licences.
In 1996 transportation of spent fuel to Russia ended. On 2 April 1998, the plant's modernisation project (LOMO) was completed. The plant's capacity was raised by 10%. In addition, improvements in security systems, e.g. SAM, severe accident management system, were implemented.
Solidification plant for liquid radioactive waste commissioned.
Modernisation programme (2014-2018, investments approx. 500 M€), incl. automation modernisation, completed.
30 Nov 2008 Loviisa unit 2 has produced 100 TWh since its operating history, starting in 1980.
2001:
2018:
Loviisa Unit 1 has produced clean power for 40 years. In February, the periodic safety review was approved by STUK. In addition, a new full-scale virtual training simulator was completed and used for testing purposes.
Loviisa nuclear power plant's unit 1 (LO1) was connected to the national grid for the first time on 8 Feb 1977. Unit 2 (LO2) was connected to the national grid for the first time three years later, on 4 Nov 1980. Commercial operation of Loviisa unit 2 started on 5 Jan 1981. Loviisa unit 2 was inaugurated on 14 May 1981. In 1981 Loviisa units 1 and 2 produced approximately 15% of Finland's electricity consumption.
2019:
2008:
2009:
2010's


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/contacts
+358 10 45 55011
Atomitie 700, Loviisa, Finland
Please, contact Mia Söderström, Communications Manager, email: firstname.surname(at)fortum.com.
Visit inquiries
Here you can find the contact information for Loviisa Power Plant.
Loviisa nuclear power plant contacts | Fortum
Fortum Power and Heat, Loviisa power plant
POB 23, 07901 Loviisa, Finland


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/publications
Meidän ympäristömme
Four decades of clean power - Loviisa NPP 40 years
Older issues of Our environment report
(PDF)
Four decades of clean power
Read older issues
Toimintaohje säteilyvaaran varalle 2022
Handlingsinstruktioner i händelse av strålrisk 2022 (pdf)
This public notice is distributed to the residents in the emergency planning zone every three years.
Public notice: Instructions in case of a radiation hazard 2022
Instructions in case of a Radiation Hazard 2022
Publications | Fortum
Here you can find instructions in Finnish, Swedish and English.
(web sites)
Issues are in English and Finnish.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/environmental-impacts-loviisa-power-plant/our-environment-2020
464
In accordance with the environmental permit, the amount of cooling water released into the sea should not exceed 1,800 million m3 per year or 56 m3/s. The cooling water’s thermal load on the sea may not exceed 60,000 terajoules annually. The limits set by the permit were not exceeded in 2020.
The most important task of our nuclear power operations is to produce electricity safely, reliably and competitively, in the short and long term, while complying with the principles of  safety, waste management safety, and nuclear material control.
96%
According to the monitoring results, the treatment plant reached results compliant with the conditions of the permit: the biological oxygen demand of treated wastewater in 2020 was 3.1 mg/l on average and total phosphorus concentration 0.16 mg/l. The load caused by domestic wastewater in 2020 was 3.1 kg of phosphorus, 932 kg of nitrogen and 180 kg of solids.
84%
1,009
16%
Domestic wastewater volumeme, m3
Environmental Impact Assessment procedure for Loviisa nuclear power plant completed
The cooling water discharge area remains unfrozen throughout the winter. The size of the open water and thin ice area depends on winter temperatures. In 2020, the power plant used a total of about 1,328 million m3 of sea water for cooling, and the thermal load on the sea totalled 54,586 terajoules.
308
3.0
71%
ca. 100
Key figures 2020
Our environment 2020 | Fortum
No permit limits were exceeded at the Loviisa power plant in 2020 nor were there any breaches of permit conditions.
Environmental Impact Assessment Programme
Clean energy production and sustainability are at the core of Fortum’s strategy. In 2020, the Loviisa power plant generated a total of 7.8 TWh (net) of carbon-free power, corresponding to more than ten per cent of the energy generation in Finland.
1,350 t
411
14.5
In accordance with the environmental permit, domestic wastewater must be treated so that the biological oxygen demand (BOD7ATU) of wastewater discharged into the sea does not exceed 15 mg/l and the total phosphorus concentration does not exceed 0.7 mg/l, calculated as annual averages. The efficiency of the treatment process must be at least 90% for both variables.
905
Check out the Loviisa power plant Our Environment 2020 report
90
Emissions of radioactive effluents into the environment in 2020 were, as in previous years, significantly lower than the limits set for nuclear power plant emissions.
As a result of the Loviisa nuclear power plant’s electricity production, Finland emits about 6 million tonnes less carbon dioxide emissions compared to the equivalent amount of fossil fuelbased electricity.
One chemical leak was reported at the Loviisa power plant in 2020. In the commissioning phase of the new storage for concentrated chemicals, concentrated lye (48% NaOH) was being transferred from the chemical storage tank into the new storage tank. Because of an incorrectly closed valve, the lye flowed through the overflow line into a water tank instead of into the storage tank; the lye filled the water tank and, via the pressure relief line, leaked onto the top of the tank and to the floor of the room. About 300 litres of 30% lye ended up on the floor of the room and flowed through the floor drain to the power plant’s cooling water channel, and from there through the cooling water discharge outlet into the sea. Based on the criteria in effect, sodium hydroxide is not classified as hazardous. Before the chemical was discharged into the sea, the chemical was diluted considerably in the plant’s cooling water channel.
The goal of conventional waste management is to prevent the production of waste and to reduce the amount of landfill waste through effective sorting. In 2020 about 1 296 tonnes of waste was transported from the power plant area. Of this, 158 tonnes was landfilled, 961 tonnes was reused as materials or energy, and 177 tonnes was treated as hazardous waste.
The water is purified before use at the water plant, and the water used as process water is additionally treated at the demineralisation plant. The total volume of water withdrawn from Lake Lappominjärvi in 2020 was about 155,040 m3.
520
Read and download PDF here
The load caused by process wastewater in 2020 was 2.3 kg of phosphorus, 929 kg of nitrogen and 74 kg of solids. The power plant’s share of the total load in the Hästholmen sea area in 2020 was about 0.7% phosphorus and about 4.7% nitrogen.
Our environment 2020
The domestic wastewater generated is treated at the power plant area’s biological-chemical wastewater treatment plant, to which about 19,443 m3 of wastewater was piped in 2020.
234,537
0.0008
22,642
78
The process and domestic water required by the power plant is sourced from Lake Lappominjärvi, which is located about 5 kilometres north of the power plant.
The annual collective radiation dose of the Loviisa power plant’s own personnel and external contractors in 2020 was the lowest in the plant’s operating history. This shows that long-term work in radiation safety produces good results.
After the outbreak of the COVID-19 pandemic, our most important task has been to ensure the health and safety of our own employees and contractor employees and to secure the continuity of operations. We managed very well through what was in many ways a challenging and exceptional year.
57,005
In 2020 we stayed within all permit limits in terms of environmental impacts.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/loviisaeia
The coordinating authority in the project’s EIA procedure is the Ministry of Economic Affairs and Employment of Finland, and the coordinating authority in the international hearing is the Ministry of the Environment of Finland.
Read more about the EIA procedure
Read the news
Report, programme and summary materials
Loviisa nuclear power plant Environmental Impact Assessment | Fortum
Fortum initiated an Environmental Impact Assessment Procedure (EIA procedure) at Loviisa nuclear power plant in August 2020. The procedure will assess the environmental impacts of the potential lifetime extension of the power plant or, alternatively, the decommissioning of the power plant, as well as the environmental impacts of the final disposal facility for low- and intermediate-level waste.
The EIA Programme, published in August 2020, includes Fortum’s plan on the assessment of environmental impacts as well as on the organisation of communication and participation. An environmental impact assessment will be performed based on the EIA Programme and the opinions and statements submitted about the programme. The results of the assessment are presented in the environmental impact assessment report, published on 6 September 2021.
Loviisa nuclear power plant Environmental Impact Assessment
See materials
Business release 14.1.2022
Loviisa nuclear power plant Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA)
Project schedule
Environmental Impact Assessment
EIA procedure
Read more about the EIA project schedule
Read more about the options assessed in the EIA procedure
Assessment options
Fortum Loviisa nuclear power plant’s EIA procedure receives Ministry’s informed conclusion


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/loviisaeia/information-eia-procedure-loviisa-power-plant
In the first phase, an Environmental Impact Assessment Programme (the EIA Programme) is drawn up. It describes a plan concerning how the environmental impacts caused by the project are assessed.
The procedure
Coordinating authorities and hearing
Parallel to the EIA procedure conducted in Finland, an international hearing in accordance with the Espoo Convention should be organised in projects that may have impacts extending beyond the borders of Finland. The Ministry of the Environment of Finland is responsible for the international hearing involving Finland.
Information on the EIA procedure of the Loviisa power plant
The second phase includes the assessment of the environmental impacts and the results are presented in the environmental impact assessment report (the EIA Report). The EIA procedure is carried out before licence or permit procedures, and its purpose is to influence the planning of the project and decision-making.
The purpose of the EIA procedure is to assess the project’s environmental impacts and foster attention to them in the project’s planning phase. In addition, the procedure aims to improve access to information and the opportunities to participate in the planning of the project.
In this EIA procedure, the coordinating authority is the Ministry of Economic Affairs and Employment of Finland.
Information on the EIA procedure of the Loviisa power plant | Fortum
The stages of the EIA procedure.
Two-phased procedure
The EIA procedure is based on the Act on the Environmental Impact Assessment Procedure (252/2017) and the Government Decree on the Environmental Impact Assessment Procedure (277/2017).


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/01/fortum-loviisa-nuclear-power-plants-eia-procedure-receives-ministrys-informed-conclusion
Media contacts: Pia Fast, Communications Manager,
Fortum Loviisa nuclear power plant’s EIA procedure receives Ministry’s informed conclusion | Fortum
MEAE Release, 14.1.2022:
The Ministry of Economic Affairs and Employment (MEAE) has on 14.1.2022 given its informed conclusion on the Fortum [Power and Heat Oy] Loviisa nuclear power plant’s Environmental Impact Assessment report. The coordinating authority in the EIA procedure is the MEAE, and the Ministry of the Environment is responsible for the international hearing. The project also applied the cross-border environmental impact assessment procedure in line with the so-called Espoo Convention.
Thomas Buddas, Deputy Director, Loviisa power plant, tel. +358 10 455 3710
www.fortum.com/loviisaeia
FORTUM CORPORATION, LOCAL RELEASE 14.1.2022
In 2021, the load factor at Fortum’s fully-owned Loviisa nuclear power plant was 92.9%. The continuous development and modernisation of the power plant enable load factors that are among the best for pressurised water reactors on an international scale. During the past five years, Fortum’s investments in the Loviisa power plant have totalled about EUR 325 million. In 2021, the power plant produced a record-high total of 8.2 terawatt-hours (net) of electricity, which is more than 10% of Finland’s electricity production. Fortum employs about 700 nuclear sector professionals, 530 of them work at the Loviisa power plant. Additionally, nearly 100 permanent employees of other companies work in the power plant area every day. More information: www.fortum.com/loviisa
pia
tel. +358 40 147 8752
This EIA procedure is completed with the MEAE’s informed conclusion on the EIA report. The EIA report and the coordinating authority’s reasoned conclusion will be included as part of possible licence applications. Fortum has not yet made a decision on applying for licences for the Loviisa power plant and estimates that it will have a decision-making readiness in 2022.
Fortum Loviisa power plant’s Environmental Impact Assessment procedure website:
14 January 2022, 14:30 EET
The procedure started in August 2020 assessed the extension of the power plant’s operations by a maximum of 20 years and two different decommissioning alternatives, as well as the environmental impacts of the final disposal facility for low- and intermediate-level radioactive waste.
, Deputy Director, Loviisa nuclear power plant.
Ministry of Economic Affairs and Employment submits informed conclusion on EIA report of Loviisa nuclear power
fast
“This historical EIA procedure, the first ever in Finland related to the lifetime extension and decommissioning of a nuclear power plant, involved a broad group of representatives from various stakeholders. I want to thank everyone who participated in this process,” notes
In its informed conclusion, the Ministry of Economic Affairs and Employment states that the assessment report meets the requirements of EIA legislation. The alternatives examined were not found to have such significant adverse environmental impacts that could not be accepted, prevented or mitigated to an acceptable level.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/loviisaeia/eia-contact-us
Coordinating authority
International hearing
P.O. Box 100, FI-00048 Fortum,
Ramboll Finland Oy
Seija Rantakallio
EIA consultant
Ari-Pekka Kirkinen, Mira Salmi
firstname
Antti Lepola
Contact Us | Fortum
tem
+358 295 048274, +358 295 060125
+358 295 250 246
PL 25 FI-02601 Espoo,
ym
+358 20 755 611
lastname
Contact Us
Jaakko Louvanto, Linda Kumpula
The Ministry of Economic Affairs  and Employment
Ministry of the Environment
P.O. Box 35, FI-00023 Government,
Contact person
Contact persons
Project owner
ramboll
P.O. Box 32, FI-00023 Government,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/loviisaeia/loviisan-power-plant-eia-materials
Loviisa power plant Environmental Impact Assessment Materials
EIA Materials
:
Swedish:
Loviisa power plant Environmental Impact Assessment Materials | Fortum
EIA summary for the international hearing
Norwegian:
EIA Programme summary for the international hearing
Environmental Impact Assessment programme, 13 August, 2020
Lithuanian:
Russian:
German:
Environmental Impact Assessment Report, 6 September 2021
Finnish:
Estonian:
Latvian:
EIA Report Summary for the international hearing
EIA programme summary
EIA Report
EIA Programme
Polish:
Danish:
Loviisa NPP EIA materials - all language versions
English:


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/loviisaeia/options-be-reviewed-loviisa-power-plants-eia-programme
Options to be reviewed
Option 1:
The option also includes the measures to extend the service life of the power plant, decommissioning of the power plant after the licensing period ends, the operation and ultimate dismantling of plant parts to be made independent and the waste management measures related to these phases.
Decommissioning of Loviisa nuclear power plant after the current licensing period (in 2027/2030).
Option 0+:
Option 0:
Options to be reviewed in the Loviisa power plant's EIA Programme
Extending the operation of Loviisa power plant by a maximum of approximately 20 years after the current operating licence period, followed by decommissioning.
Options to be reviewed in the Loviisa power plant's EIA Programme | Fortum
The option also includes the operation and ultimate dismantling of plant parts to be made independent and the waste management measures related to these phases.
In the Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA) procedure of Loviisa nuclear power plant, the environmental impacts of a potential extension of the operation of the power plant or, alternatively, the decommissioning of the power plant, as well as the environmental impacts of the final disposal facility for low- and intermediate-level waste will be assessed.
In addition, the option includes the possibility of receiving, processing, placing in interim storage and depositing for final disposal small amounts of radioactive waste generated elsewhere in Finland.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/loviisaeia/schedule-loviisa-power-plant-eia-programme
Schedule of the Loviisa power plant EIA programme
Schedule of the Loviisa power plant EIA programme | Fortum
Schedule


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/second-nordic-nuclear-trainee-program-started
responsible for the program.
The second Nordic Nuclear Trainee Program started | Fortum
Over the course of 18 months, 16 young nuclear sector heroes selected for the second-ever NNTP will have the opportunity to extensively tour various nuclear power plants, learning from best practices and professionals in the field, creating networks and developing their own expertise. The program also aims to show young people considering the career opportunities that the nuclear sector is a viable option for the future.
21 December 2022, 14:00 EET
Nordic Nuclear Trainees visiting Loviisa Nuclear Power Plant.
“We have included a lot of hands-on learning in the program because we believe that working with other nuclear power professionals is the best way for participants to deepen their knowledge and build networks,” Ronimus says.
More information about the NNTP and its progress is available on the program’s
website
(PDF, 748 KB)
Nordic Nuclear Trainee Program (NNTP) has been continued with the launch of a new batch of ‘nuclear heroes’. The purpose of the NNTP, implemented jointly by Fortum, TVO, Vattenfall and Uniper, is to provide nuclear power talents who are in the early stages of their careers with experiences, knowledge and networking opportunities by getting to know the different nuclear power plants and jobs in the nuclear sector. Five young nuclear sector heroes from Fortum started in the program this past autumn.
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS ONLINE NEWS 21.12.2022
Joel Ronimus
“The first NNTP was a success, even though Covid prevented it from being carried out in the way originally planned. Based on the very positive feedback, it was clear that there was a desire for a continuation of the program. We are confident that this time we’ll be able to carry out the program without any major concerns,” says Fortum’s Senior Training Specialist
Antti-Jussi Vesa, Communications Manager, Fortum, +358 50 593 5142
The program runs until December 2023 and includes various modules, virtual meetings, exercises and two four-week-long job rotations in a Finnish or Swedish nuclear power plant.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2023/01/good-production-year-2022-fortums-loviisa-nuclear-power-plant
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS PRESS RELEASE 3.1.2023
03 January 2023, 12:30 EET
In 2022, Loviisa’s Unit 2 underwent the extensive annual outage done every 4 years and Unit 1 the refuelling outage. The annual outage of Unit 1 lasted 29 days, and the annual outage of Unit 2 was 36 days. The annual outage of Unit 1 was delayed by about a week and Unit 2 by approximately five days from the original plan.
“The annual outages were challenging, but all the modification and repair works were completed. The main reason for the delay with Unit 1 was due to a leak in the main reactor coolant pump’s sealing water line, detected during a leak test. The most significant reason for the delay with Unit 2 was the replacement of a main reactor coolant pump, which had failed during the start-up phase, with a serviced pump,” explains
In March 2022, Fortum applied for a new operating licence for both Loviisa power plant units until the end of 2050. The process is estimated to take about one year.
(PDF, 782 KB)
, Vice President of Loviisa nuclear power plant.
mia
On an international scale, the 89.4 % load factor of the Loviisa nuclear power plant was among the best in the world for pressurised water reactors. Loviisa Unit 1’s load factor was 90.5 % and Loviisa Unit 2’s was 88.2 %.
Fortum has applied for a new operating licence for Loviisa nuclear power plant
In 2022, the load factor at Fortum’s fully-owned Loviisa nuclear power plant was 89.4%. The continuous development and modernisation of the power plant enable load factors that are among the best for pressurised water reactors, on an international scale. During the past five years, Fortum’s investments in the Loviisa power plant have totalled about EUR 325 million. In 2022, the power plant produced total of 7.9 terawatt-hours (net) of electricity, which is more than 10% of Finland’s electricity production. Fortum employs about 700 nuclear sector professionals, 530 of them work at the Loviisa power plant. Additionally, nearly 100 permanent employees of other companies work in the power plant area every day.
willberg
Good production year 2022 at Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant | Fortum
Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant had a good production year in 2022. The power plant generated a total of 7.9 terawatt-hours (net) of carbon-free power. Thanks to the Loviisa nuclear power plant’s electricity production, Finland emits about 6 million tonnes less carbon dioxide emissions annually compared to the equivalent amount of fossil fuel-based electricity.
Mia Willberg, Communications manager, +358 40 777 5989,
The Loviisa nuclear power plant is a major employer in the region, providing work for approximately 530 Fortum employees and nearly 100 permanent employees of other companies working in the power plant area every day. In addition to Loviisa’s own personnel, about 750 external workers participated in the annual outages and investment projects. The power plant also employed some 80 summer trainees. Fortum’s investments in the Loviisa power plant were approximately EUR 30 million (2021: approximately EUR 30 million).
“The Loviisa nuclear power plant produces about 10% of the electricity used in Finland, so it will continue to have a very important role in clean, domestic electricity production in the future,” says Valkamo.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/operations
A nuclear power plant differs from a conventional steam power plant primarily in the way it produces heat. Instead of conventional fuel (e.g. coal, natural gas or peat), a nuclear power plant uses uranium as a source of energy. The use of uranium as fuel is based on the fission reaction of the atomic nuclei. The reaction releases a large amount of energy.
The electricity is routed through the main transformer to the national grid at a voltage of 400 kilovolts.
Over one third (34.5%) of the heat created in the reactor is converted into electricity. The rest is transmitted to the cooling water in the condensers and from there to the sea, just like in other condensing power plants generating electricity.
The principle of electricity generation
In the steam generators, the water of the primary circuit heats the water of the separate secondary circuit. The water starts to boil, because the pressure in the secondary circuit (44 bar) is much lower than in the primary circuit. The generated steam is led to the turbines. The turbine rotates the generator, which converts the kinetic energy into electricity.
Heat capacity
1.8.1972
The nuclear reactor produces heat when the uranium nuclei inside the fuel assemblies split when hit by a neutron. The split produces new free neutrons that can split more uranium nuclei, and this enables a chain reaction. Electricity production in a nuclear power plant is based on the utilisation of the thermal energy generated by a controlled chain reaction.
4.0 TWh
Secondary circuit
8.2.1977
Primary circuit
The third separate circuit is the cooling water system. After the turbine, the low-pressure steam is led to the condensers. There the steam is condensed with cold sea water back into water, which is then pumped through the preheaters into the steam generators.
The goal of Loviisa power plant's waste management is to prevent and reduce the production of waste through effective sorting.
Loviisa 1
90.5%
The Loviisa power plant units' reactor coolant pumps circulate the 300-degree water into the steam generators and back to the reactor. The Loviisa power plant units contain a total of six of these circuits working in parallel. Together they form the primary circuit of the reactor.
In 2022, the annual production totalled 7.9 TWh, i.e. more than 10% of Finland’s electricity production. On an international scale, the 89.4% load factor of the Loviisa nuclear power plant was among the best in the world for pressurised water reactor power plants.
Commissioned
3.9 TWh
Power capacity (net)
During the operation of the power plant, radioactive substances develop. Most of the activity is within the fuel cladding.
Load factor
Power generation
Annual outages
In 2022, Fortum invested about EUR 30 million in the Loviisa nuclear power plant.
Loviisa 2
1.5.1971
4.11.1980
Operations | Fortum
When both power plant units are operational, it takes on average about 40 cubic metres of sea water per second to cool the steam. The water used in the cooling is pumped back into the sea. It is 10 degrees warmer but its consistency is unchanged.
Radiation control
Power plant's annual maintenance outages have been scheduled to coincide with the inspection programme for the big pressure vessels.
Construction began
The Loviisa power plant employs about 530 Fortum employees and nearly 100 permanent employees of other companies working in the plant area every day. Additionally, annual outages and modernisation works employ some 700 - 1300 external employees annually.
The cooling water flowing through the reactor core is heated to approximately 300 degrees Celsius. However, the water does not boil due to the high pressure (123 bar) in the pressurised water reactor. The thermal energy is transferred in separate steam generators from the primary circuit water to the secondary circuit water, which evaporates. The high-pressure steam is led to the turbines. The expansion of the steam rotates the turbine, which rotates the generator converting the kinetic energy into electricity.
507 MW
1,500 MW
Cooling water system
88.2%


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/operations/annual-outages
General information
More about training
More about safety
Annual outage theme: Worksite planning
Corona preparedness and safety
Once a year, the reactors of Loviisa nuclear power plant's reactors will be shut down for annual maintenance outages.
Accommodation services
An extensive inspection outage is performed at Loviisa nuclear power plant every four years; the work phases of the reactor determine the length and critical path of the inspection outage. Every four years, the fuel elements and core structures are removed from the reactor for inspection of the reactor pressure vessel. The reactor's core structures, support basket and housing/pile are inspected in this conjunction. In the reactor assembly phase, one fourth of the fuel is replaced with new.
More about Loviisa's annual outages
Four-year outage cycle
Arriving to the power plant
Annual outages | Fortum
In 2022, both units will undergo so called short outages. The annual outage of Loviisa unit 2 will be carried out during 7.8.-7.9. and Loviisa unit 1 during 17.9.-9.10.
During a short annual outage e.g. the steam generator and condenser pipes and the sea water pipes are inspected.
Short annual outage
More about the theme
Annual outages also include a follow-up inspection assessing the functionality of procedures and the execution of work related to the annual outages. Based on the observations made by the follow-up inspection team, practices are improved and developed in the required areas.
General employee training
In short outages, working close to highly radioactive targets is avoided, and thus little or no radiation protection is needed.
Loviisa Annual Outages
Corona safety at the power plant
More about accommodation
In Finnish here →


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/welcome-loviisa-power-plant/corona-preparedness-and-safety
Arrivals at the power plant have been staggered between different working groups, and breaks are also staggered to avoid large congestions.
This year, too, the power plant is preparing for the prevention of coronavirus outbreaks with different measures. We recommend regular home testing.
Social distancing of 2 meters must be practiced when possible, including in the cafeteria and conference rooms.
Getting sick or exposed
Arrival instructions for contractors
To the main page
Trainings and meetings
Arrival to work
Never, under in any circumstances, come to the plant if you are ill. Moreover, don’t come to the plant if a close contact is diagnosed with coronavirus or there is a strong suspicion of a coronavirus infection. Contact your healthcare provider for further instructions.
Wash hands regularly and use hand sanitizer as needed. The power plant has several hand sanitizer points.
Read more about trainings
Welcome to Loviisa npp
Trainings, contractor orientations and meetings are generally held online. Ensure safety distance in on-site meetings and trainings.
Hands must be sanitized in the turnstile before and after the fingerprint identifier/code reader. In the cafeteria, hands must be sanitized before getting in the food line and after eating.
Our most important task is to ensure the health and safety of our own personnel and the employees of our contractors, as well as the continuity of our operations. We are prepared for possible corona infections and their prevention with many different measures.
At the moment, it seems that the pandemic situation is easing. We are constantly monitoring the situation, and we are ready to implement various contingency measures if needed. We want to ensure safe working for everyone at the power plant.
Corona preparedness during annual outages
Corona preparedness and safety | Fortum
General Covid-19 procedures at the Loviisa power plant
Social distancing
Hand hygiene


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/welcome-loviisa-power-plant/general-employee-training
General part of the training is possible also as classroom-based instruction. Classroom-based training in English must be agreed in advance. Please contact
General part of the training
General Employee Trainings at Loviisa NPP
Week 31 (1.8. - 5.8.)
Week 40 (3.10- 7.10.)
Radiation protection training
• general part
• radiation protection
Week 30 (25.7. - 29.7.)
Radiation protection, theory 8.00 - 11.00 Loft
Week 32 (8.8. - 12.8.)
Classroom-based trainings in English
Week 34 (22.8-26.8.)
Before starting the work at the Loviisa power plant you need to complete general employee training. The training has two parts: general part and radiation protection part. Training is valid for three years. In addition to general employee training, orientation training will be provided for those coming for annual outages.
Radiation protection, practice 14.00 Power plant’s main lobby
Week 35 (29.8-2.9.)
In order to work in the controlled area, new employees are required to have current introductory training in both parts of the radiation training, i.e. theory and practice. Register for the radiation training using the form at
General employee trainings during annual outages
Week 33 (15.8. – 19.8.)
During the annual outages, general employee trainings will be held at the Loviisa power plant’s main gate, at the Fortum clubhouse at the Loft (Brandensteininkatu 11, Loviisa), and in the controlled area in the radiation protection training room in accordance with the schedule below.
Week 37 (12.9-16.9.)
General employee training | Fortum
sateilykoulutus
Radiation protection, practice 12.00 Power plant’s main lobby
Monday
Week 38 (19.9-23.9.)
The radiation part of the training must be done for the first time in the classroom. Classroom-based trainings will be held on Mondays of even weeks at the Main gate at 8 a.m. Training in English must be agreed in advance. Please contact
The general part of the training can be completed online by registering to Fortum’s eLearning portal. If you already have access rights you can login here.
Radiation protection, theory 8.00 - 11.00 Main gate
Week 39 (26.9-30.9.)
Trainings in English must be agreed in advance
Tuesday
koulutus
Wednesday
loviisa
Webropol
, or sign up by email at
Week 36 (5.9-9.9.)
. The radiation refresher training can be done online.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/welcome-loviisa-power-plant
• Access rights for the information system
• Other borrowed items
• ID card
• Guides and information bulletins
• Tools to the tool warehouse
• Necessary equipment (phone, keys)
• Inspection of all chemicals and materials
Checklist
• Keys
https://securemail.fortum.com
Passport or ID card
• Plant telephone (DECT)
Welcome to Loviisa power plant | Fortum
• General employee training
Once the work order approvals are in order, please sent the completed forms scanned to
vastaanotto
Occupational Safety card
• Telephone
Arrival to Loviisa power plant
The reception office of the Loviisa power plant is located in the gate building at the end of Atomitie. Reception office is open on weekdays from 7:00 until 15:00. At the start of annual outages, the reception office is also open at specified times.
At the end of a working period
(not a drivers licence)
The power plant will provide the following when necessary
Welcome to Loviisa power plant
Applying for a pass
High quality and safety of our operations is a priority for us at Loviisa Power Plant. We avoid causing any harm or damage to people, property or the environment. We believe that high quality and safety can be achieved through good cooperation and adherence to instructions and rules.
If you wish, you can also send the forms to the above address using our security email
Company ID card with personal tax number
When starting work
Familiarise yourself also with our
To the reception office:
Prepare to present at the reception office
Loviisa contractor websites
Return the following
At the reception office you receive
• The dosimeter to the radiation protection staff’s office
• Health inspection for those who work in the radiation controlled area (RCA)
Your contact person will send you pre-filled forms, see instructions on the other page of the ID card.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/values/code-conduct
Code of Conduct in Swedish
Code of Conduct in Norwegian
President and CEO, Fortum
, and we require that our suppliers comply with it.
Code of Conduct in Polish
Fortum operates globally, and our employees are citizens of many different countries. Consequently, our operations are subject to various national and international laws and regulations. As an industry leader, we go beyond simply obeying the law: we embrace the spirit of integrity and uphold the highest standards of ethical business conduct. We believe that there is a clear connection between the high ethical business practices set by our Code of Conduct and successful financial results.
It is crucial that we apply the same ethical standards wherever we operate. Our Code of Conduct ensures honest and ethical business practices and is deeply rooted in our company values: curiosity, responsibility, integrity and respect.
Code of Conduct in English
Code of Conduct in Finnish
Code of Conduct in Estonian
Our values – curiosity, responsibility, integrity, and respect – shape our culture as a company and are the foundation of this Code. Fortum employees, members of our Board of Directors, and anyone representing Fortum is expected to conduct themselves according to this Code of Conduct. Additionally, Fortum expects companies affiliated with us to respect these principles. Uniper has its own Code of Conduct and its own Compliance Management System.
(PDF, 4 MB)
Read our Code of Conduct in different languages
Fortum’s Code of Conduct builds on various international agreements and initiatives and defines the principles of how we treat others, do business, and engage with the wider world.
Our Code of Conduct is published in twelve languages and has been approved by the Board of Directors.
Code of Conduct in Russian
Fortum has a separate
Code of Conduct in German
"Our Code of Conduct defines how we do business at Fortum and it is embedded in our values and our Open Leadership principles. Together with our strategy, it unites us across our locations and cultures. The importance of a shared Code of Conduct increases as our scope of operations and influence widens and the world around us grows more and more complex."
How you can report concerns relating to violations against Code of Conduct?
Code of Conduct - honest and ethical | Fortum
Code of Conduct in French
Code of Conduct in Latvian
Code of Conduct in Danish
Code of Conduct in Lithuanian


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/values
Read more about personnel, safety and society
We question the status quo and have the courage to explore. We explore new opportunities in the transforming energy sector and continuously learn and co-create solutions for a cleaner world.
We want to operate in a way our employees can be proud of. Our values serve as a compass in evaluating opportunities and guiding our decision-making.
We take responsibility for our work and our collective impact on society and create sustainable solutions based on stakeholder insight. We never compromise on safety.
Our Values – curiosity, responsibility, integrity and respect – provide a foundation for our company culture. They serve as a compass in evaluating opportunities, guiding our decision-making and helping us see the world the Fortum way.
Values and company culture | Fortum
Fortum with its nearly 19,000 employees worldwide has a diverse and inclusive company culture. We believe in Open Leadership and in creating a safe and inspiring work environment and company culture that help our people thrive.
"We encourage each other and value new ideas and ways of working – it's fun to go to work!"
It is crucial that we apply the same ethical standards wherever we operate. Our Code of Conduct ensures honest and ethical business practices everywhere and all the time.
We offer many exciting career opportunities in various fields. Check out our open positions and apply now.
Respect
Curiosity
Get to know some of your future colleagues
Yana Sufiarova, Market analyst
Responsibility
Apply now
We believe in transparency. We run our business ethically that exposes every challenge, every success and every milestone. We have no hidden agendas and follow our Code of Conduct in our everyday business and work practices.
Diverse company
Read more about Code of Conduct
Open positions
How do we make Fortum a safe and inspiring place to work?
We greatly value each other and our stakeholders, such as our customers and partners. Our success derives from maintaining a diverse and inclusive company culture where everyone feels empowered to thrive and reach their full potential.
Integrity


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/operations/annual-outages/annual-outage-theme-worksite-planning
Safe routing of wires and hoses
Verification of the required lifting points
Anticipation of the shoe boundaries and protections needed in the primary side
sharp edges
Upon completion of the work, take into account, e.g.
Demarcation of the job site
Creation of the needed hoist plans
Anticipation of the needed haulage, scaffolding and insulation work
possible foreign materials
Annual outage theme: Worksite planning | Fortum
haulage
Anticipation of hoisting needs, e.g. polar meeting on weekday mornings
Warning signs related to elevated work
final clean-up
Protection required for hot work and their planning
(Caution, overhead work in progress, etc.)
Work safety inspections take into account, e.g.
Temporary switchgear needed at the job site
Reservation of outdoor areas
Ordering and reserving the known spare parts, and haulage requests
dismantling of scaffoldings
protrusions into access routes that people can bump into
Advance agreement on the component decontamination needed in the primary side
Annual outage theme
Pre-job briefing with stakeholders
structures to protect against falls into openings
The theme of the 2022 annual outage is job site planning. Things to take into consideration in the work planning:
installation of insulation
Post-job briefing, including collection of feedback


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/operations/annual-outages/accommodation-services
Accommodation services | Fortum
There are plenty of accommodation facilities and trailer space in the accommodation village located along the road to the power plant. During annual outages, two people are usually accommodated in each room. Each building has a kitchen, bathroom facilities, plant telephone and a television in a shared living room. The accommodation office can be found in the club building. Sauna facilities and the laundry room are available all day. The maintenance building in the middle of the area mainly serves the workers living in trailers.
14 € / day / room, buildings from 2012
Single room
Accommodation prices:
Double room
Prices without VAT
majoitus
More information about the Loviisa power plant accommodation area:
12 € / day / room, buildings from 1975
The accommodation fee will be charged to your company monthly.
During annual outages the accommodation agency is open on weekdays from 6.30 am to 4.30 pm. There is a possibility to borrow equipment for different types of sports.
Trailer space
3 € / day
From the accommodation area you will find a wide range of different activities. In the accommodation area you can swim, go boating and play different games, enjoy sauna and make food on the barbeque. Activities include table tennis, billiard, gym, tennis, soccer, street basketball, beach volleyball, Frisbee golf and mini golf.
14 € / day / room, buildings from 2009 and 2013-14
Quartermaster, tel. (010 45) 54911,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/loviisa-nuclear-power-plant/operations/radiation-safety-loviisa-npp
0,01 mSv
Radiation dose rate
20 mSv
Natural background radiation in Finland.
The dose which may cause symptoms of a radiation sickness (e.g. tiredness and nausea) if received within 24 hours.
1000 mSv
Some protective measures are needed, e.g. avoiding being outdoors unnecessarily.
Dose rate
The radiation dose received by a patient having his/her lungs X-rayed.
The highest permitted dose for a radiation worker over a period of a year.
Radiation and environment
10 µSv/h
Example
Radiation safety at Loviisa NPP
The average annual radiation dose for Finns caused by indoor radon, X-ray examinations, etc.
Some examples of radiation doses
0,2–0,4 µSv/h
The dose rate in an aeroplane flying at an altitude of 12 kilometres.
Loviisa power plant takes all practically and reasonably possible measures in order to avoid radiation exposure to any employees, other people or the environment. Our three basic principles of radiation protection are based on the recommendations of the International Commission on Radiological Protection (ICRP). The ICRP recommendations have also been taken into account in the Radiation Act of Finland.
5 µSv/h
30 µSv/h
Radiation control at Loviisa NPP
The radiation dose received by a patient having his/her teeth X-rayed.
The annual dose of cosmic radiation received by a person working in an aeroplene.
3,2 mSv
2 mSv
It is necessary to take protective measures, e.g. to shelter indoors.
Source: STUK.fi
Radiation safety at Loviisa NPP | Fortum
0,1 mSv
What the rate causes
Some examples of external dose rates
The dose rate measured at a distance of one metre from a patient that has undergone isotope treatment. When the dose rate is less than 30 µSv/h, the patient can be discharged.
100 µSv/h
The dose rate indicates the amount of radioactive dose received by a person within a certain period of time. The unit of the dose rate is sieverts per hour (Sv/h).
During the operation of the power plant, radioactive substances develop in the splitting of uranium nuclei and as the materials are activated in the neutron radiation of the reactor core. Most of the activity is within the fuel cladding. Systems that contain or may contain radioactive substances are located inside the controlled area and are closely monitored. The controlled area is enclosed, and nothing can be brought out without careful measurements.
The radiological environmental impact of the normal operation of Loviisa nuclear power plant is very small. The annual radiation dose caused by the operation of the nuclear power plant to the residents in the vicinity is so small that it can not be measured by any meter. Therefore doses in the environment are estimated theoretically based on release information and meteorological data to a theoretical representative person who lives in the vicinity of the plant.
0,04–0,30 µSv/h
The highest dose rate measured in Finland during Chernobyl accident.
Radiation dose
A dose that when received within under 24 hours causes radiation sickness and can be fatal.
The dose rate which, if it's exceeded, causes an alarm in an automatic radiation monitoring station in the Finnish automatic external dose rate monitoring network. Each station in Finland has its own station-specific alarm level, which is determined separately for each station. Alarm levels in Finland are between 0.2 and 0.4 µSv/h. The differences are mainly caused bu the level of natural radioactivity in the soil surrounding each sensor.
The radiation dose describes the health hazard caused by radiation. Its unit is sievert (Sv). The dose is often given in thousandths of sieverts, i.e. millisieverts (mSv) or in millionths, i.e. microsieverts (µSv).
6000 mSv


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/09/waste-management
Medium-level waste mainly originates in ion exchange resins from process water purification systems as well as in evaporation waste from drainage water purification. If the waste has to be disposed of, it will be solidified by cementation into concrete cylinder at the solidification plant before transport to the final repository situated at the power plant.
Low-level waste
Waste management at the Loviisa power plant has been divided into two sectors. Conventional waste management covers waste which does not contain activity, while waste formed in the controlled area is handled as radioactive waste. Waste in controlled area is divided into three groups by mode of generation and original use: low-level waste, medium-level waste and high-level waste.
Medium-level waste
High-level waste consists of spent fuel. Spent fuel will be placed in a final repository at Olkiluoto in Eurajoki. The final disposal of spent nuclear fuel is planned to start in 2020's and will continue for almost a hundred years.The practical implementation of the final disposal is handled by Posiva Oy. Posiva Oy is an expert organisation responsible for the final disposal of spent nuclear fuel of the owners, Fortum and Teollisuuden Voima.
Spent fuel
A major part of the waste formed during normal operation is low-level waste. This waste consists mainly of isolation material, paper, used protective gear, rugs, work clothing, machine parts, plastic and oil - in other words, conventional maintenance waste. Some of this waste can be exempted if its activity measurements meet the exemption demands set by authorities.
Clean energy and responsible nuclear waste management spanning 40+ years
Waste management | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2018/07/clean-energy-and-responsible-nuclear-waste-management-spanning-40-years
4%
Conventional waste is generated by all industries; 71% of the waste generated at the Loviisa nuclear power plant in 2020 was utilised as material or energy. The volume of conventional waste (96%) has been addressed through efforts to reduce the generation of waste and by sorting to reduce the amount of waste ending up in a landfill.
Clean energy and responsible nuclear waste management spanning 40+ years | Fortum
conventional waste
Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant has produced clean energy since 1977. We invest in the responsible management of all waste, and, in fact, our nuclear waste management processes are globally advanced.
of the waste used for recovery (60% as material, 11% as energy)
Waste at the Loviisa power plant is sorted into conventional and radioactive waste. Radioactive waste is divided into three categories: low-level waste (maintenance waste), intermediate-level waste (liquid waste), and high-level waste (spent fuel).
of Loviisa nuclear power plant's waste is radioactive
Low-level maintenance waste is either verified as non-radioactive and processed as conventional waste, or, if needed, disposed of later in the final repository located 110 meters underground in the power plant area.
According to the Finnish Nuclear Energy Act, nuclear waste generated in Finland must be disposed of in Finland, and we are absolutely committed to the responsible management of waste. Fortum is one of the world’s leading actors in nuclear waste management, particularly in final disposal methods for low- and intermediate-level radioactive waste.
The spent nuclear fuel is stored in the interim stores at the power plant in Loviisa. Final disposal is planned to start in the 2040s at Olkiluoto in Eurajoki. This will be operated by Posiva that is owned by Fortum and TVO.
Radioactive waste accounts for a small share of all waste, just 4%, and we are committed to processing this waste very carefully and responsibly. Processing radioactive waste is carried out in accordance with the Finnish Nuclear Energy Act, using internationally recognised methods.
Intermediate-level liquid waste is either purified and piped into the sea or it is stored and solidified in concrete. The solidification plant for radioactive liquid waste started its operations in February 2016, marking a significant advancement in the Loviisa power plant’s waste management.
Only a small part of a nuclear power plant’s waste is radioactive
We at Fortum want to build an energy system that doesn’t expend the earth. Finland’s first nuclear power plant, in Loviisa, has produced clean, carbon dioxide-free energy responsibly and safely for more than 40 years. Located on Hästholmen Island, the Loviisa power plant’s operations are certified according to the ISO 14001 environmental standard. The certification extends to all of the power plant’s operations, including the activities of the subcontractors working on the island.
Responsible waste management, whether conventional or radioactive waste, is a vital part of our work towards a cleaner world. The work for a cleaner energy system will continue at the Loviisa power plant.
Advanced level of nuclear waste management


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/nuclear/topical-nuclear
Fortum launches a feasibility study to explore prerequisites for new nuclear
Fortum and Westinghouse Electric Company sign an agreement for the design and supply of a new fuel type for the Loviisa power plant
01.07.2022
Fortum submits the Loviisa nuclear power plant operating licence application to the Government
13.47 EEST
Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant annual outage 2022 completed
19.00 EET
Next page
4
18.03.2022
22.11.2022
15.12.2022
5
Pagination
25.11.2022
09.45 EEST
17.10.2022
14.00 EET
Fortum and Helen to explore potential cooperation in small modular reactors
09.28 EEST
6
- Any -
03.01.2023
Fortum and TEPCO sign an Information Exchange and Cooperation Agreement
12.00 EEST
7
06.10.2022
Filter by year
09.00 EET
Page
Topical on nuclear | Fortum
10.00 EEST
12.10 EEST
Current page
10.05 EEST
15.00 EET
01.11.2022
The annual outage of unit 1 of Fortum's Loviisa nuclear power plant prolonged
03.08.2022
Fortum and MIT launch Nuclear Cost Estimation Tool
Fortum Loviisa power plant’s annual outage 2022 to begin
STUK decision on the Loviisa nuclear power plant’s periodic safety review
Last page
29.04.2022
12.30 EET
Hae hakusanalla
10.00 EET
Fortum Uniper Nuclear Services signs framework agreement with Norwegian Nuclear Decommissioning
Topical on nuclear
08.12.2022
18.10.2022


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/08/fortum-loviisa-power-plants-annual-outage-2022-begin
During the annual outage, one quarter of the fuel will be replaced. In addition to the fuel replacement, both units will undergo various preliminary maintenance work, inspections, repairs and tests.  Additionally, the automation modernisation of Loviisa Unit 1’s emergency generators, which was started in the previous annual outage, will be continued. The modernisation project will replace the original automation systems with digital systems.
, Vice President of Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant.
Mia Willberg, Communications Manager, tel. +358 40 777 5989,
In 2021, the load factor at Fortum’s fully-owned Loviisa nuclear power plant was 92.9%. The continuous development and modernisation of the power plant enable load factors that are among the best for pressurised water reactors on an international scale. During the past five years Fortum’s investments in the Loviisa power plant have totalled about EUR 325 million. In 2021, the power plant produced a total of 8.2 terawatt hours (net) of electricity, which is more than 10% of Finland’s electricity production. Fortum employs about 700 nuclear sector professionals, 530 of them work at the Loviisa power plant. Additionally, nearly 100 permanent employees of other companies work in the power plant area every day. More information:
Fortum Loviisa power plant’s annual outage 2022 to begin | Fortum
In addition to the power plant’s 530 employees, some 750 external workers will participate in the annual outage.
(PDF, 804 KB)
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS PRESS RELEASE 2 August 2022
”The Loviisa plant units have been upgraded and modernised systematically and according to plans throughout the plant’s history. This year, too, in additional to the normal annual outage maintenance work, we will carry out a number of measures that will improve plant and employee safety and operational reliability,” says
03 August 2022, 09:45 EEST
The annual outage of Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant will begin with Unit 2 on Sunday, August 7th, followed by the servicing of Unit 1. This year, Unit 2 will undergo an extensive annual outage done every 4 years and Unit 1 the short annual outage. The annual outages are estimated to last a total of about 53 days.
“We are also preparing for the power plant’s continued operations. Fortum has applied for a new operating licence for both Loviisa power plant units until the end of 2050. During the new operating licence period, the power plant is expected to generate a total of 170 terawatt-hours of emission-free electricity. Continuing production at Loviisa is particularly an investment in securing the supply of clean domestic electricity,” Valkamo says


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/10/fortum-launches-feasibility-study-explore-prerequisites-new-nuclear
17 October 2022, 09:28 EEST
, Executive Vice President, Generation Division at Fortum.
Media enquiries:
-free," says
Laurent Leveugle
-free generation assets are now needed more than ever. This study contributes to that strategy development. Any decisions about future investments will be made in due course.
Pia Fast, Head of Generation Communications, +358 40 147 8752,
(PDF, 776 KB)
With the current uncertainty in the energy market, ventures in the nuclear industry will most likely involve partnership constellations. Partnerships may be formed e.g. between nuclear generating and district heating companies, industrial off-takers of power and heat for whom competitive energy supply is of increasing strategic importance, and nuclear utilities, or start-up companies and established utilities with nuclear competence. Thus, the feasibility study will also explore the potential for service business offerings for new projects in Europe and hydrogen for industrial applications.
Fortum has agreed to fully divest Uniper to the German State, and thus Fortum is in the process of updating its stand-alone strategy with the focus on sustainable power generation, security of supply and affordable energy. In this context, Fortum’s CO
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS PRESS RELEASE 17.10.2022
, who is leading the nuclear feasibility study.
Fortum launches a feasibility study to explore prerequisites for new nuclear | Fortum
Since the feasibility study will also take a deep look at the newbuild process, such as progress of planning, siting, and licensing, the work group’s intention is to engage the essential external stakeholders, such as political decision makers, civil servants, and nuclear safety authorities in Finland and Sweden, in active dialogue.
Fortum is starting a two-year feasibility study to explore prerequisites for new nuclear. As part of the study, Fortum will examine commercial, technological and societal, including political, legal and regulatory, conditions both for small modular reactors (SMRs) and conventional large reactors. The study’s geographic focus is Finland and Sweden.
"The goals of energy independence, security of supply and carbon neutrality are challenges facing our entire society. We want to find out under which conditions we could meet them with nuclear power generation, which is known to be reliable and CO
"The challenges related to new nuclear are well-known. Achieving competitive construction times and costs are must-win battles for our industry. In this feasibility study, we aim to explore novel partnerships, new business models and technologies, such as small modular reactors (SMRs), which are promising in terms of taking nuclear power forward to future generations," says


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/11/fortum-and-helen-explore-potential-cooperation-small-modular-reactors
, Senior Vice President, Energy Procurement and Wholesale.
Any future decisions on cooperation and investments will be made at a later stage.
Read release 17 Oct, 22:
Fortum and Helen are forming a study group to explore possible synergy benefits.
mattila
“Because of the uncertainty in the energy markets, projects carried out in the nuclear sector in the future are most likely to happen through various cooperation arrangements. The study being initiated with Helen regarding the prerequisites for cooperation is a great starting point not only for project mapping, but also for the partner mapping that we are doing with various parties as part of a broader look at nuclear power over the next couple of years,” says
Cooperation between energy sector players will be emphasised in nuclear power in the future.
helen
vilma
Fortum is an energy company driving the change for a cleaner world. Our role is to ensure the security of supply and a fast and reliable transition to a carbon-neutral economy by providing customers and societies with clean energy and sustainable solutions. Fortum’s core operation
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS PRESS RELEASE 25.11.2022
“Helen has been interested in SMRs for some time already and has also expressed this publicly. We regard SMRs as one noteworthy production form of zero-emission energy for heating in Helsinki and also for electricity generation in the future. Helen has world-class expertise in the development of the largest district heating system in Finland, and Fortum has competence in the nuclear power technology. By combining these strengths, we could create a productive cooperation that would increase Finland’s energy self-sufficiency,” comments
“We will start the mapping from a clean slate. Our extensive exploratory work on the prerequisites of new nuclear power is just beginning, and we are not ruling out any form of cooperation at this point,” Hautojärvi says.
Helen Ltd helps to make everyday life a little easier for over 550,000 customers in Finland. In addition to heat, cooling and electricity, we offer solutions for regional and renewable energy, smart buildings and electric transport. We are developing a smarter, carbon-neutral energy system that enables everyone to produce, use and save energy with respect for the environment. We aim to achieve 100% carbon neutrality in our energy production by 2030. Let’s join forces and turn the opportunities of a new energy era into reality. More information:
www.helen.fi/en
antti-jussi
Fortum:
Harri Mattila
Antti-Jussi Vesa, Communications Manager, Generation,
Fortum and Helen are initiating a joint study to explore the prerequisites for collaboration in nuclear power and small modular reactors (SMR), in particular. The study is linked to the Fortum project announced in October to explore the prerequisites for nuclear power in Finland and Sweden, including the mapping of potential partner networks and cooperation arrangements.
vesa
(PDF, 752 KB)
, tel. +358 50 593 5142
Harri Mattila, SVP, Energy Procurement and Wholesale,
, tel. +358 50 308 0879
Helen:
Nuclear power’s role as part of a sustainable energy mix for the future is also still seen as important.
wiitakorpi-bjorkman
Vilma Wiitakorpi-Björkman, Head of Communications,
are located in the Nordics and consist of CO2-free power generation, electricity sales, district heating as well as recycling and waste solutions. Fortum's share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki
25 November 2022, 09:00 EET
, Fortum’s representative in Fortum and Helen’s joint study group.
“Leveraging nuclear power’s potential in climate change mitigation and in solving the energy crisis requires significant investments and strong cooperation from different players. However, it seems that there is a strong will in Finland around the issue, and that creates a favourable environment for the development of nuclear power. The study will eventually show where this will lead,” Jukka Hautojärvi says.
s
Helen Ltd
, tel. +358 50 559 2913
For further information:
Fortum and Helen to explore potential cooperation in small modular reactors | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/10/fortums-loviisa-nuclear-power-plant-annual-outage-2022-completed
(PDF, 780 KB)
Mia Willberg, Communications Manager,
Both units at Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant are back in production after completion of their annual outages. Unit 2 underwent an extensive annual outage, which is done every 4 years; the outage lasted just over 36 days and was completed on 12.9.2022. The short annual outage of Unit 1 lasted 29 days and was completed on 16.10.2022.
The annual outage of Unit 2 was delayed by approximately five days from the original plan. The delay was caused by the replacement of a main reactor coolant pump, which had failed during the start-up phase, with a serviced pump. The annual outage of Unit 1 was delayed by about a week due to a leak in the main reactor coolant pump’s sealing water line, detected during a leak test.
“For example, the automation modernisation of Loviisa Unit 1’s emergency generators, which was started in the previous annual outage, was continued. In the modernisation project, the original automation systems are being replaced with digital systems,” Valkamo notes.
Media contacts:
Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant annual outage 2022 completed | Fortum
In conjunction with the annual outages, about one quarter of the fuel in both units was replaced.
“It was a normal annual outage-related test procedure. The purpose of the test is to verify leak-tightness of the systems that are part of the primary circuit after servicing and before plant start-up,” says
17 October 2022, 12:00 EEST
, +358 40 777 5989
In addition to 530 power plant employees, about 750 external workers also participated in the annual outage.
In addition to the normal periodic maintenance work and refuelling, tasks related to maintenance and continuous improvement were carried out on both units during the annual outage.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/fortum-and-edf-sign-framework-cooperation-agreement-explore-joint-opportunities-new-nuclear
petra
Read release 17 Oct, 2022:
“EDF is delighted to join forces with Fortum, a leading nuclear industry player sharing with us the same ambitions for a sustainable carbon free energy future. With Fortum’s impeccable record as a responsible nuclear operator and EDF’s unmatched experience on the entire nuclear lifecycle, we will create opportunities for a successful cooperation in Finland, Sweden and across Europe,” says
“We are very happy to cooperate with the leading nuclear company in Europe both within the scope of our recently launched Feasibility Study regarding new nuclear in the Nordics, and with the objective to learn about the advanced fleet approach from EDF,” says
Vakis Ramany
Laurent Leveugle,
lundstrom
, EDF’s Senior Vice-President of Nuclear Development.
08 December 2022, 19:00 EET
laurent
, +358 40 542 2001
Petra Lundström,
EDF:
, Fortum’s Vice President for Nuclear Engineering Services and Co-owned assets.
fr
Laurent Leveugle, Head of Fortum's Newbuild Feasibility Study; Petra Lundström, Vice President for Fortum's Nuclear Engineering Services and Co-owned assets; Sandro Baldi, Commercial Director NUWARD, EDF; Vakis Ramany, Senior Vice-President of Nuclear Development, EDF and Bruno Rodrigues, Project Coordinator, NUWARD, EDF.
The French energy company EDF is the largest nuclear operator worldwide with a unique experience across the entire nuclear lifecycle. It is planning to deploy a fleet of EPR units across Europe, while developing its 340 MWe NUWARD™ SMR at the same time.
EDF Group
Head of Newbuild Feasibility Study, Fortum,
Fortum and EDF sign Framework Cooperation Agreement to explore joint opportunities in new nuclear | Fortum
(PDF, 731 KB)
Any future decisions on possible investments will be made at a later stage.
EDF Communications,
Leader of Fortum's NESC organisation Petra Lundström and Vakis Ramany, EDF’s Senior Vice-President of Nuclear Development
Fortum is an energy company driving the change for a cleaner world. Our role is to ensure the security of supply and a fast and reliable transition to a carbon-neutral economy by providing customers and societies with clean energy and sustainable solutions. Fortum’s core operations are located in the Nordics and consist of CO2-free power generation, electricity sales, district heating as well as recycling and waste solutions. Fortum's share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki.
edf
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS PRESS RELEASE 8.12.2022
The agreement is part of Fortum’s two-year feasibility study exploring prerequisites for new nuclear in Finland and Sweden.
leveugle
, +358 50 453 5422
A key player in energy transition, the EDF Group is an integrated electricity company, active in all areas of the business: generation, transmission, distribution, energy supply and trading, energy services. A global leader in low-carbon energies, the Group has developed a diversified generation mix based on nuclear power, hydropower, new renewable energies and thermal energy. The Group is involved in supplying energy and services to approximately 37.9 million customers (1), 28.1 million of which are in France. It generated consolidated sales of €69 billion in 2020. EDF is listed on the Paris Stock Exchange.
Vice President for Nuclear Engineering Services and Co-owned assets, Fortum,
service-de-presse
Fortum and Electricité de France (EDF) have signed a Framework Cooperation Agreement to jointly explore collaboration opportunities for small modular nuclear reactor (SMR) and large power plant deployment in Finland and Sweden.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/11/fortum-and-mit-launch-nuclear-cost-estimation-tool
For Fortum, the collaboration is not just about creating new tools for business, it’s also about creating networks and furthering the understanding and know-how of the people involved.
“The first SMR projects in the West are just around the corner. For these projects to reach the finish line, they need to be sustainable from both a technical and economic point of view. Our MIT collaboration and other similar partnerships are small steps towards realising the potential of new nuclear power to solve the world's energy crisis and combat climate change,” Värri concludes.
Fortum and MIT launch Nuclear Cost Estimation Tool | Fortum
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS ONLINE NEWS 1.11.2022
Nuclear Cost Estimation Tool
Through collaboration, Fortum and MIT have launched Nuclear Cost Estimation Tool (NCET) that enables more precise cost estimation of new nuclear power plants and improved understanding of potential risks of new nuclear projects. The open-source version of the tool is now publicly available, and its customised application has been taken into use at Fortum.
Konsta Värri, Project Manager, Nuclear Services, tel. +358 40 545 9597
, the NCET project lead on Fortum’s side.
“In less than two years, we reached our first major milestone with the launch of the first version of the cost estimation tool. While this is already highly useful for us, the ongoing work will continue to provide more precise cost data and will further our understanding of the general project risks,” notes
Fortum Consultation Services for SMRs
The energy crisis and the fight against climate change require active cooperation within the energy sector. The nuclear industry has long been highly networked and international, but there can never be too much exchange of information. This is particularly important for large and complex issues such as the role of nuclear power in the future energy system.
The NCET is a sophisticated tool that enables organisations to evaluate the costs of new build nuclear power plants and provides valuable information to back up investment decisions, for instance. The code is in open-source format, so it will be provided cost-free also for external users. Thus, the work behind the tool benefits basically everyone working in the nuclear industry.
01 November 2022, 09:00 EET
From the industry point of view, Värri sees positive developments in the horizon.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-power-plants/services-nuclear-newbuild/consultation-services-smrs
See Fortum's
We hope that making the modelling tool open source will drive the nuclear sector forward and a step closer to making SMR's a reality.
, for more posts on how our professionals tackle different aspects of climate change towards a cleaner future for us and the next generations.
Consultation Services for SMRs
Decades of nuclear experience for supporting nuclear newbuild projects and newcomer countries throughout all phases of the project. Fortum offers technical support and consulting services which allow our Customers to have the know-how of an experienced Owner-Operator.
Fortum starts cooperation in Estonian SMR deployment project
Whether you need support with realising your plans for SMR newbuild, a better understanding of what the markets and opportunities for SMRs are or support in the analysis of the new safety systems of these plants, our experts are here to support you.
SMR consulting for Fermi Energia
Fortum has years of expertise from different stages of nuclear newbuilds and has been at the forefront of studying the possibilities of small modular reactors (SMR). We are happy to support you with our expertise in gaining a better understanding of the technology or help you get started with your SMR project.
(27 Apr, 2022):
Fortum is starting a two-year feasibility study to explore prerequisites for new nuclear.
Fortum and Helen to explore potential cooper­ation in small modular reactors
Longstanding knowledge in several technical disciplines for supporting newbuilds
Online news article (1 Nov, 2022):
SMR related news, articles and blog posts
Press release (17 Oct, 2022):
Our expertise can ease your first steps into a SMR newbuild
Fortum launches a feasi­bility study to explore prereq­ui­sites for new nuclear
Feasibility studies
Consultation services for SMRs
Consultation Services for SMRs | Fortum
(18 May, 2020):
Market Analysis
Support for Nuclear Newbuild Projects
Small modular reactors are fast becoming a reality and Fortum has been at the forefront of studying them with our R&D programme going back to 2013. In the recent years, we have advanced from research to supporting client projects, using our extensive knowhow and expertise. Beside deep understanding of SMRs, our nuclear experts are also veterans in multiple newbuilds around the world. We have competences in nuclear safety and many other fields, critical to understanding these new reactor types.
(27 Feb, 2020):
Small modular reactors an effective tool for climate change mitigation
Press release (28 Jan, 2020):
Blog, by
More about newbuild and upgrade services
(3 Jun, 2020):
Press release (25 Nov, 2022):
Read more about our views on SMR's
Fortum has been actively supporting the ongoing Estonian SMR project since 2019
Clean district heating with SMRs
Harness our nuclear industry understanding of different actors and factors driving the SMR development
Services for Nuclear Newbuild and Operating Plants
Reference
Nuclear Expertise


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/clean-district-heating-smrs
The use of small modular reactors (SMRs) for district heating (DH) has been a subject in the public discussion for a while now and for a good reason. As decisionmakers and the public started to realise the urgent need for carbon-neutral heating options, many SMR technologies were also starting to mature into something more concrete. From a technology and legislation perspective, the first SMRs could be brought into use in Finland in about 10 to 15 years.
18 May 2020, 17:56
Nuclear DH is by no means a new idea. In Finland and Sweden, a reactor model for district heating was designed back in the late 1970s.  Currently, several plants around the world produce heat for their neighbouring areas.
Nuclear power has a crucial role in achieving climate targets, and small modular reactors currently under development could offer new heat production opportunities. As such, this invention is not new, as nuclear power has been used to produce district heat before.
Nevertheless, for Finland to be a forerunner in SMRs, a lot of work needs to be done. The currently starting nuclear legislation work must take SMRs into account and must ensure that the licensing and newbuild processes do not become too long or too expensive. The legislative work also cannot take too many years if we want the plants to help decarbonise the Helsinki Metropolitan area in the early 2030s, for example. SMR DH is also attracting newcomers to the industry, newcomers who will need support to ensure responsible nuclear operations in the future.
Read Antti Rantakaulio's post
These more traditional designs aimed at power production could potentially still make sense as combined heat and power (CHP) plants, especially if paired with heat storage that could open up the doors for added flexibility in an electricity system with higher amounts of intermittent energy sources.
3. New siting opportunities.
varri
More on topic
We at Fortum believe that nuclear has a crucial role in achieving climate goals. SMRs can be key enablers in the decarbonisation of heat production.
When I started my study of SMR DH in the autumn of 2017, the original research question was "What is the cheapest way to produce heat sustainably?". As any kind of combustion seemed to be more and more problematic, the question quickly changed to "What options for sustainable heat production are there left?". Nuclear power is one alternative.
1. The size
What makes SMRs promising for district heating?
What next?
Preliminary studies by VTT Technical Research Centre of Finland Ltd and by us at Fortum have been promising for SMR DH. This has been the case even with some of the studies that were based on SMR types not necessarily best suited for heat production. The NuScale SMR, which I personally studied, showed that even though the design is far from optimal for use as a heat-only boiler (HOB), it could still be considered a competitive option if the investment costs can be managed.
Working on realizing the decarbonisation potential of small modular reactors
Currently, China is the country furthest along when it comes to designing simple reactors aimed purely at district heating.  We welcome the recent initiatives on developing SMRs for heat production from the Finnish actors VTT and Lappeenranta University of Technology. If decarbonising the smaller heating networks used in Finland is taken seriously, there should be room for these smaller-scale nuclear HOBs.
Of course, SMR DH is not exclusively a Finnish interest, as decarbonising heating is a global challenge. But Finland could be a forerunner for multiple countries in, for example, Eastern Europe, as they look for alternatives to fossil fuel-based heating systems. Surprisingly, it has been noted in the UK as well that CHP could be a sensible option for SMRs.
Meet Konsta Värri, Project Engineer in Nuclear Services
Clean district heating with SMRs | Fortum
. Larger nuclear power plants are currently being built to produce upwards of 3-4 GW of heat. On the other hand, even the largest heating networks in Finland could most likely only fit around 200-400 MW of heat supply from a single plant. SMRs could easily fit into this size range and possibly into smaller grids, as the designs that could potentially be used for district heating vary from CHP plants producing up to around 500 MW of heat to pure heating plants that fit into the 200-400 MW range. A simple pool-type heating reactor in the 50 MW or lower range could also be a viable option.
konsta
The smaller size would also allow for new approaches to safety that would hopefully open up the discussion on siting limits. These plants could potentially be built closer to cities and their heating networks while complying with the existing high safety standards.
. Fast deployment through modularisation coupled with serialised production, should create economic advantages. Preliminary studies regarding heating are very promising on this front.
2. Cost and resource efficiency
Different SMR designs for different uses
Project Engineer, Fortum Nuclear Services


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/small-modular-reactors-effective-tool-climate-change-mitigation
The role of nuclear power has emerged strongly in the discussion around climate change mitigation. Small Modular Reactors (SMRs) and their role in the energy markets are part of this discussion. What are SMRs, and can nuclear power plants really be deployed directly from the factory?
SMRs have a smaller level of output, making them perfect for targets where the energy demand is smaller. Thus SMRs might be used as a solution for heating in urban areas and industry, for producing fresh water, or for energy production in isolated locations, like mining towns.
Project Manager
Small modular reactor research & development project
27 February 2020, 14:11
Small modular reactors enable a carbon-neutral society
Potential and cost-effective tool in climate change mitigation
In terms of technology, SMRs are similar to big plants and require the same level of safety as the current big plants. The big nuclear power plants and SMRs both produce energy efficiently, predictably, stably and without carbon dioxide emissions.
The oversight focus is probably moving increasingly towards the control of manufacturing and to some sort of type- and factory-approval procedure for concepts. There is still a lot of work to be done here and in the national- and international-level collaboration between plant suppliers, energy producers and authorities.
The advantages of SMRs are: better adjustability, standardised solutions, advance prefabrication, faster deployment, the potential for more diverse use, and cost-efficiency. In addition to this, the safety properties of small reactors can be further improved with, e.g., passive safety systems that operate without electricity.
In the future, small modular reactors will not actually be built on-site; they will be installed from prefabricated modules delivered to the site. One of these modules can be prefabricated at the factory to the extent that the plant just needs to be connected to the rest of the infrastructure, like a power grid or a heating network, and the fuel loaded into the plant.
In fact, several Finnish cities have initiatives related to the use of small modular reactors for district heating production. The issue has been studied also in China, where there are several heat reactor concepts under development that would produce heat for a district heating network. With a smaller output, they potentially could be placed closer to cities, for instance in industrial areas. A heating source for industry, in turn, could be the so-called very high-temperature reactors that are under development, as they reach temperatures of over 700 degrees Celsius.
With small modular reactors, new, more efficient licensing practices must be found, especially if the aim is to move to serial production. Prefabrication in a factory requires standardised structures and systems. In order for the same solution to be used in different countries, either the regulatory requirements have to be standardised or the solution approved in one country must be applicable also in another country.
As the production of variable wind and solar energy increases, smaller output and adjustable reactors could be a significant balancing factor in the electricity system.
Here at Fortum, small modular reactors have been part of the nuclear power R&D programme for several years now. We are continuously developing our own expertise and tools for small reactor plant simulations, for example. We see small modular reactors as part of a nuclear power future, and we are actively monitoring what’s going on around the world. We are involved in various national and international projects to help accelerate the development of and the opportunities to utilise small modular reactors.
Small modular reactors an effective tool for climate change mitigation | Fortum
Same technology and safety requirements as the big plants
Strong regulatory control associated with nuclear power
There are currently multiple small modular reactor development projects around the world. Many of the concepts are still on the drawing board, but the first prototype plants are close to deployment or have already been deployed. The most advanced projects right now are in China, Russia, and the United States. A significant state-driven small modular reactor project is underway in Canada.
At the moment, big nuclear power plants are licensed by each country and, despite collaboration, the regulatory requirements differ from one country to another – even though the top-level requirements are quite consistent.
The goal with standardised solutions and serial manufacturing is for clear cost and timetable benefits. They can help to ensure that a small modular reactor project stays on schedule and within budget.
Nuclear power plants with an electricity output of 70 - 300 MW are called small modular reactors. Both of Loviisa’s reactors, for instance, have a power output of over 500 MW each, and the Olkiluoto reactors close to 900 MW. By comparison, the power output of the Imatra power plant, Finland’s biggest hydropower plant, is 192 MW.
Nuclear power plants directly from the factory?
International race is under way
The cost benefits of factory production aren’t achieved with the first plants; it takes several plants to be manufactured before that happens. The cost benefits of serial production have been seen recently in, e.g., wind and solar power. It isn’t necessarily feasible to have module-producing factories and supply chains in each country; instead, there could be, say, continent-specific factories and the related supply chains.
rantakaulio


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/bloggers
He has a wide range of expertise and insights into recycling, waste management and how to build a functioning circular economy.
Anton Steen
Previously he worked at Fortum’s Brussels office, helping the Public Affairs function in EU affairs.
@EsaHyvarinen
@MarkusRauramo23
@_ArunAggarwal
Elba in LinkedIn
Head of Nuclear Engineering.
Fortum's Vice President, Public Affairs, Germany.
Vice President, Trading and Asset Optimisation.
Executive VP of Fortum's City Solutions division.
@AnssiPaalanen
Alessandro Ferraris has been at Fortum since 2017 and has a background in innovative and sustainable energy engineering. Alessandro is the project manager and a key player in initiating the work of modernizing and extending the life of hydropower plant turbines by connecting them to an innovative battery solution.
She is working on bioeconomy, Bio2X and resource efficiency-related issues. Previously she has been responsible for the company's research, development and innovation activities.
Paula in LinkedIn
Viki is heading the development of smart energy systems at Fortum's Heating & Cooling business.
Manager, Corporate Social Responsibility.
Anne Malorie Géron
Jukka leads various nuclear projects and helps nuclear industry to perform effectively and sustainably.
Before that Markus has worked as Fortum's CFO and as the head of our City Solutions Division.
@antonmsteen
Manager, Small Modular Reactor (SMR) Business Development.
Head of CEO Office.
@EAVgooner
You can follow most of our bloggers also in Twitter. Join the discussions: #ForTheDoersBlog.
Executive Vice President, Generation.
@KankaKari
@UllaRehell
Anssi has previously worked at Fortum as Business Development Manager.
Kari is our expert in climate change and carbon market issues.
Before Vesa worked as Commodities Analyst at Fortum's Trading and Asset Optimisation unit.
Head of Public Affairs Finland.
Working on realising the decarbonisation potential of small modular reactors.
@THocksell
Vice President, Biobased Solutions.
Eero represents Fortum and Finland in the Steering Committee of the European Technology and Innovation Platform for Photovoltaics (ETIP PV).
@VAhoniemi
@MonikaKuusela
Mika is a frontrunner in user interface design, user experience, and visual design at Fortum. In the Design Lead role, Mika’s goal is to develop the user experience (UX) and modern design systems in particular.
Vice President, Branch Director in Russia.
Senior Vice President, Business Technology.
Vice President of Fortum's Recycling & Waste business.
Puro.earth
Head of Market Intelligence, Trading and Asset Optimisation.
The authors of ForTheDoers blog include our experts all around the company as well as members of our top management.
Manager, Strategy and Development, Heat Finland.
@AntilaHeli
Elba is Business Development Manager at
Pekka Lundmark is Fortum's former President and CEO in 2015-2020.
Project Engineer, Fortum Nuclear Services.
She helps companies in their journey to carbon net zero.
Design Lead, Innovation & Start-up.
Senior Manager, Digital Transformation.
Head of Communications, Internal Dialogue.
@perssmat
Head of Transformation & Change.
@PeterRoettgen
Arto Räty is Fortum's former EVP, Corporate Affairs and Communications.
Ann Boije af Gennäs
VP of Fortum’s Wind Power Unit.
Vice President, Corporate Public Affairs.
Public Affairs Specialist.
Twitter:
Bloggers
Senior Manager, Nuclear Services.
Vice President, Public Affairs Sweden.
@KonstaVarri
Anne Malorie is our Vice President, EU Affairs.
@hkeskiva
@JacekLawrecki
@CatarinaNaucler
Vice President, Sustainability.
, the world’s first B2B marketplace for carbon removals.
Mika in LinkedIn
ForTheDoers bloggers | Fortum
Vice President for Strategy, Production Portfolio Management and Trading in Fortum Russia.
Solar Technology Senior Manager.
Monika worked at Fortum's Corporate Public Affairs until August 2021.
Merja is responsible for power market and climate change issues and EU affairs.
Previously Esa has been heading Fortum's Public Affairs unit.
Manager, Innovation projects.
Lari in LinkedIn
Lari leads Fortum’s corporate market analysis team with a responsibility to provide clear, well-reasoned analysis and recommendations for operational, tactical and strategic decision making and public discussion. He is passionate about energy market dynamics, forecasting, data visualisation and economics.
Head of Communications in Poland
Head of Hedging and B2B, Trading and Asset Optimisation.
@ArtoRaty
Strategy Manager in Strategy, People and Performance.
Getting rid of coal in Finland to help Espoo district heating with decarbonisation by 2030. Currently Strategic Projects Manager in District Heating and Cooling Finland, previous positions in solar business development, Hafslund integration management office and advisor in CEO Office. Joined Fortum in 2012.
Matti provides expert services both for Fortum internal needs and for external customers, in various disciplines of nuclear engineering.
Sustainability Manager, Social and Economic responsibility.
Fortum's President and CEO as of 1 July 2020.
Before that, she worked in the procurement department as a category manager for indirect procurements and as a Supplier Code of Conduct auditor for our suppliers.
Business Developer, Hydro.
Jukka in LinkedIn
Communications Manager, Sweden.
Ann is responsible for driving the strong leadership commitment to corporate transformation and organisational change need, approach and targets.
General Counsel and Executive Vice President Strategy of Uniper.
@PekkaLundmark
@MerjaPaavola
She is heading Fortum's office in Brussels
@VikiKaasinen
He has worked with Fortum for 14 years and has versatile experience working with our strategy team, and with solar and wind power solutions. In his personal life, Joonas is a talented basketball player.
ForTheDoers bloggers


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/first-small-nuclear-reactor-finland-10-15-years
increasingly produced by small modular reactors in the future
An additional advantage of serial SMR production is the information gained on the use of nuclear reactors, which helps in evaluating their behaviour, ageing and safety.
The Finnish government is preparing an overall reform of the Nuclear Energy Act. Future legislation will hopefully address the factors that would enable cost-effective deployment of SMRs. This requires new ways of thinking on many issues in many stages of the project: for example, the plant type and plant site should be licensed separately, so that the plant type could receive a type certificate, and the plant site licensing would be an entirely separate process.
The time is now right to renew legislation on nuclear energy and consider SMRs as part, but not the only part, of the future of nuclear energy and emission-free energy production. Around the world, the development of SMRs is progressing well, and the first reactors are already in use in Russia. Even if we will have to wait for about 10 to 15 years for the first small modular reactors to be deployed in Finland, it is important to already start thinking about the requirements of their deployment. Actions slowing down climate change are needed now as well as in the future.
. Reactors with lower power level would offer new energy production and cooperation opportunities for the needs of industry and countries where nuclear power has not been part of the energy mix. In Estonia and Poland, for example, the development of SMRs has mainly been advanced by companies.
Small modular reactors (SMRs) could play a part in cleaner energy production and climate change mitigation also in Finland. Now is exactly the right time to speed up the development of the future of nuclear power. Serial production is essential for cost-effective deployment of small modular reactors.
Building a nuclear power plant is typically a unique project, and predicting the budget and schedule has proved challenging, especially in Western countries. SMRs could be manufactured in series in factories, which would increase predictability in project and cost management. Faster projects would also mean faster deployment of reactors. This approach has worked well in wind power construction, as wind power plants are widely produced in series.
The success of SMRs requires international cooperation
SMRs should be manufactured serially
It is essential that authorities in different countries strive to cooperate and harmonise legislation to enable serial production. The licensing process would be smoother if a jointly approved solution was found on EU level, enabling authorities in different countries to make the most of other authorities’ work so that each country would not need to start the plant licensing process from scratch. Cooperation could also extend to monitoring and approval of factories, and the licensing would be carried out in cooperation with the authorities of the country of location. The type of certificate used in the aviation industry is a good example of a procedure ensuring the safety of aeroplanes without heavy, expensive national processes.
First small nuclear reactor in Finland in 10–15 years?  | Fortum
In Finland, SMRs could form a part of power and district heat production in 10 to 15 years. However, this would require the development of global and national legislation to enable cost-effective serial production of SMRs.
Emission-free energy production has a crucial role in the fight against climate change. Alongside renewable but weather-dependent energy production, we also need nuclear power, which could be


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/selected-nuclear-references/smr-consulting-fermi-energia
, CEO and co-founder of Fermi Energia.
"Fortum, Tractebel to assist in Estonian SMR deployment" on World Nuclear News
Currently evaluating multiple potential SMR plant designs.
Kalev Kallemets
Ongoing SMR consulting for Fermi Energia
Selected Nuclear References
Kalev Kallemets, CEO and co-founder of Fermi Energia.
Fermi Energia, Estonia
Fact sheet
Read over at Fermi.ee
Plant type:
Work started:
Customer:
“Fermi Energia is very pleased with the cooperation with Fortum and the result of the study."
The cooperation was expanded in 2021 to address potential additional value of SMRs related to grid ancillary services in the Baltic Synchronous Area, techno-economical modelling of SMRs including the impact of thermal storage and a general level assessment and discussion on various issues that may have an impact on licensing and the licensability of a non-traditional Light Water Reactor (LWR) SMR technology
Summary of the Licensing study
SMR consulting for Fermi Energia | Fortum
Read more at WNN
Fortum has been actively supporting the ongoing Estonian SMR project since 2019 by providing Fermi Energia with both our long standing nuclear expertise as well as the results of our R&D work on SMRs. By 2020 this has resulted in an outline for the licensing process for SMRs, with the focus on a nuclear newcomer country as well as a pre-feasibility study on the development of the necessary resources and competences of the licence applicant/licensee and the national nuclear regulator.
“Fermi Energia is very pleased with the cooperation with Fortum and the result of the study. Having presented the study to US, Canadian and Finnish regulators, it is the basis for practical progress. The study forms the basis for a common Declaration on SMR Licensing by nine companies and organisations, including Vattenfall, Fortum, Synthos of Poland, Nuclearelectrica of Romania, and others enabling the development of industry consensus. In Estonia, we look forward to cooperation with Fortum in supporting the government with proposals on implementation of the study results” notes
Case description of the Licensing Study
Devices
The starting point for the study was that the licensee is always responsible for the safety of the nuclear plant, and that the national regulator must independently ensure its safe operation. However, assuming that the same SMR design has already been licensed in one country, the licensing process in subsequent countries can be made significantly more efficient through maximum utilisation of the existing safety case and Preliminary Safety Assessment Report (PSAR), as well as the corresponding regulatory safety assessment from the earlier licensing case. Therefore, it would be beneficial if the national legislation and regulations would only set safety targets compatible with international practices (such as IAEA), but avoid setting detailed, prescriptive requirements that could lead to design changes. Ideally, deviations from the reference design would be limited only to the local site and environmental conditions. The safety assessments of the license applicant and the regulator should be based on a graded approach, prioritising deviations from the reference design and safety significant items. The study provides also examples on the objectives and methods of the different safety assessments.
Fortum and Fermi Energia carried out in 2020 a licensing study considering SMR deployment in Estonia. The study discusses the possible main elements of a generic licensing process and makes suggestions regarding a possible licensing model for the construction license. While the study considers specifically a newcomer nuclear country, such as Estonia, many of the findings can be considered as applicable in SMR deployment projects worldwide.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/selected-nuclear-references
Dounreay cecium removal, Scotland, UK
Fukushima Daiichi Nuclear Power Plant
NURES® ion exchange media has been in use in the ALPS to purify radioactive liquids at the Fukushima accident site in Japan since 2012.
Read more about Fukushima Daiichi
Cesium and strontium removal from reprocessing liquid
Solidification plant nuclear waste
JAERI (JAEA) cecium removal, Japan
Fukushima Daiichi Nuclear Power Plant, accident site, Japan
Design, licensing, construction and long term safety analysis of the repository for low and intermediate-level waste,1992-2013.
Bradwell Magnox NPP,United Kingdom
Nuclear waste repository Loviisa
Nuclear waste repository, Loviisa, Finland
Read more about Bradwell Magnox
Read more about Nuclear waste repository Loviisa
Read our selected nuclear references from Fukushima Daiichi Nuclear Power plant, Nuclear waste repository, Loviisa and others. Please contact our contact persons for further information.
Download PDF's
Olkiluoto fuel facility
NURES® Loviisa
Olkiluoto Loviisa decommissioning plan
CsTreat and CoTreat are used to remove cesium and corrosion products, since 2013- (on going).
Selected Nuclear References | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild/nuclear-newbuild-projects
Fortum has extensive and wide-ranging experience from all stages of nuclear newbuild projects, ranging from site selection and characterisation to construction oversight and commissioning. We have gained our competence both from our own projects and from technical support and consulting services to customers in Finland and abroad, including nuclear newcomer countries. Based on this experience and our 40+ years of experience as an Owner-Operator of nuclear power plants, we understand the needs and challenges faced by an organisation planning to contract nuclear power plants, and to construct and eventually operate them. Fortum's experience and expertise benefit Customers who are developing nuclear newbuild projects based on large units and Small Modular Reactors (SMRs) alike.
Nuclear Newbuild Projects
Project Development and Feasibility Studies
Our expertise can ease your first steps into a SMR newbuild or help you better understand the markets and technology.
Fortum has longstanding engineering knowledge in many technical disciplines and 40+ years of experience as an NPP Owner Operator.
Site Selection / Characterization
As a major European utility, we work within several international forums to mitigate risks related to newbuild projects. We have participated in EUR Vol 3 assessments and projects related to large NPPs, covering several different types of reactor technologies. We conduct R&D related to emerging SMR technologies and on the feasibility of SMR projects, also together with international partners. We have up-to-date, hands-on experience in supporting Customers in their SMR projects.
Preparation for operation
This is fortum
Based on extensive experience for supporting nuclear newbuild projects and newcomer countries, Fortum offers technical support and consulting services for Customers to utilise the know-how of an experienced Owner-Operator throughout all phases of the project.
Contract negotiation
Design Phase / Apply for Construction License
Independent
Fortum is independent from plant vendors and technology suppliers.
Construction oversight / Commissioning
Click on the links above to address the key challenges and key benefits Fortum can offer for each stage of new build nuclear plant project.
Program planning & Feasibility studies
Fortum's support with program planning and feasibility studies will help obtaining a holistic picture of the nuclear power plant project and mitigate project risks early on.
Support for Nuclear Newbuild Projects | Fortum
Prepare Bid / Contract specifications


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild/nuclear-newbuild-projects/contract-negotiation
Fortum´s Value Proposition
Due to our technical excellence in all disciplines and Owner-Operator experience, the Customer will understand the full effect of technical as well as legal and commercial requirements on the project and over the lifecycle of the plant.
Key challenges
Support for Nuclear Newbuild projects
Asymmetric information and lack of experience in formulating contracts for nuclear power plants
Services for Nuclear Newbuild
Contract negotiation | Fortum
Prepare Bid/ Contract specifications
A contract for a nuclear power plant can consist of thousands and thousands of pages. The party understanding the substance and content better has more leverage in negotiations. As plant vendors have decades of experience from a large number of projects, the Owner-Operator (or Nuclear Energy Programme Implementing Organization, NEPIO) in a newcomer country may be at a disadvantage. To overcome this disadvantage, the Owner-Operator will need to build up its competence in nuclear technology and licensing, as well as its capability to negotiate the legal and commercial terms for a feasible contract.
Site Selection/ Characterization
Back to newbuild projects main page
Back to Support for Nuclear Newbuild projects main page
Fortum has been involved in contract negotiations with several plant vendors in various contexts. We understand the challenges of a newbuild project, including the special characteristics of first-of-a-kind technologies. We can identify the typical pitfalls and make use of our lessons learned in the contract negotiations.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild/nuclear-newbuild-projects/prepare-bid-contract-specifications
Managing the risks
We are familiar with most of the large reactor technology alternatives, but also neutral towards any alternative.
We have useful experience for conducting dialogue with plant vendors to minimise the risks related to Technical Requirements, which form an essential part of contract specifications.
Dialogue with plant vendors and regulators
We, as an Owner-Operator, fully recognise the significance of EPC contract specifications for the lifetime costs of the plant, with emphasis on operation and maintenance.
Loviisa 3
The risks related to a newbuild project are considerable and can materialize in delays and cost overruns. However, these risks can be identified and mitigated. It is important to consider them already in the drafting of the bid/contract specifications. This can be a challenge particularly for newcomers with limited experience from newbuild projects.
Prepare Bid / Contract specifications | Fortum
In the evolving regulatory environment typical in a newcomer country and when introducing nuclear as a new technology, dialogue with plant vendors and regulatory bodies well before releasing the Request for Proposal is essential. The Owner-Operator will need to ensure that the standard design is mature enough and can be licensed. If the design cannot be licensed as such, the extent of the needed modifications will need to be understood, considering also site and environmental conditions and availability of the related data.
The traditional approach for contracting a nuclear power plant is based on a large set of complex, country-specific requirements set by the regulator. This may no longer be the most recommended approach. In order to keep cost and risk levels manageable, SMRs and Gen III/III+ nuclear reactors will need to be based on standard designs as far as possible. Still, operation and maintenance related requirements will need to be taken into account and set by the Owner-Operator, considering that the reactors may operate 60+ years.
Fortum has extensive experience in compiling contract specifications for newbuild projects both in Finland and internationally. Based on this,
More about Loviisa 3


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild/nuclear-newbuild-projects/design-phase-apply-construction-license
Design changes typically create risks for a newbuild project in terms of significant delays and cost overruns. Design changes should be minimised, but cannot be fully avoided. The resulting risks must be manageable before the final investment decision is made and the contract signed. This is especially relevant for a first-of-a-kind design, but also for a first-in-a-country design.
Design Phase / Apply for Construction License | Fortum
Risks related to design changes
Fortum can support the Customer in setting up a separate design project prior to final investment decision which can be beneficial for adequately identifying and solving possible risks for design changes due to local conditions or national licensing requirements.
Fortum’s experience from newbuild projects, various technologies and a challenging licensing environment means that we have the ability to identify the typical risks involved and have the needed experience in planning and implementing relevant mitigating actions. In particular, we can support the Customer in tackling licensing risks, which are a unique characteristic of nuclear projects.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild/nuclear-newbuild-projects/construction-oversight-commissioning
Validation of operation procedures.
Radiation protection on site
Review of design and as-built documentation
Guarantee tests
Review and compilation of commissioning plans and test programs
Support in commissioning activities and test runs
Even if the plant is constructed based on a turnkey contract, there are numerous parallel activities and different contractors at the site at the same time. Quality and compliance of the works with safety, design, and quality requirements will need to be ensured in parallel with the actual construction work. Technical challenges, which inevitably occur even daily, combined with the large scale of the project, complex logistics and contractual interfaces, means that the management of the project can be very challenging.
Management of a complex construction project
Planning and completion of commissioning
Quality assurance and quality control during construction
Fortum has supported its customers in their projects to construct and commission plants. We have also implemented extensive plant modifications at our own plants, and led the design, construction, and commissioning of new auxiliary nuclear facilities. Based on our experience, we are able to provide support e.g. in
Commissioning will need to prove that the plant has been constructed as planned, fulfills the design and safety requirements, and can be operated safely and efficiently. Commissioning usually implies transfer of the operational responsibility of the plant to the license holder, who is typically responsible for operation already during commissioning after the initial fuel loading.
Construction oversight / Commissioning | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild/nuclear-newbuild-projects/preparation-operation
We can help the Customer and other stakeholders e.g. in
Developing maintenance strategy and programs
Outage optimisation
Fuel procurement
Training
Safeguards
Preparation for operation | Fortum
Developing and implementing operating procedures
Fortum's systematic efforts to develop and improve our operation and maintenance capabilities have resulted in top-notch efficiency and best-in-class performance.
Insufficient organisational readiness to operate and maintain the plant
We are able to provide complete engineering and training simulators for all types NPPs using our Apros® dynamic simulation tools.
Decommissioning planning.
Supplier, spare part and storage management
For a newcomer country or for a new design such as SMRs, achieving readiness to operate and maintain the plant needs long-term commitment and support from stakeholders. Failure to build up this capability has, in some cases, led to unnecessary delays in the commissioning of new units. It may also lead to a prolonged dependency on the plant vendor and external service providers, limiting the Owner-Operator’s latitude, and may have an impact on the safety, security, or performance of the plant.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-power-plants/process-simulation-and-safety-analysis/apros
Extensively Verified and Validated
More realistic transient behaviour due to less boundary conditions assumptions; real physical feedback e.g. between turbine and reactor plant models
salminen
Our Virtual Panels complement Apros®
Company
Integration with CFD and FEM tools
Learn more about the history of Apros®
Testing I&C (both emulated and real cabinets)
Easy to use
Phone
Light water reactor types: BWR, PWR, VVER
Quick and easy-to-use fully graphical user interface for model configuration and simulation
Plant electrical systems and power grid model
Connectivity to third-party software
Vendor independent code owned by NPP owner-operator and research organization
See how Apros® has been utilised in different phases of the nuclear power plant life-cycle
The collected data (name, title, company name, email) is used for the distribution of the Apros Dynamic Process Simulation Software newsletter and for the identification of potential clients for the Fortum Nuclear Services products. The data is stored until the subscriber has unsubscribed. Read more about
Features
+358 400 519 650
Toni Salminen
Waste Management & Decommissioning
1D and 3D neutronics solvers, incl. two-group nodal kinetic model
The Story of Apros® – supporting nuclear power plants
Upgrades & Refurbishments
Validated against real data and approved by STUK for use in Finnish NPPs
Complete automation model incl. PID controls, interlockings, sequence controls
Other areas of Interest (optional):
Connectivity to DCS and other tools and systems via OPC UA, OPC DA
APROS®
Apros® Nuclear - Advanced Process Simulation Software | Fortum
Operating procedures development and testing
Visit Apros® website
Applications
New Builds
Operator training
Feasibility studies and verification of plant modifications
Fortum Privacy Statement
Apros® Nuclear – Advanced Process Simulation Software
I agree that my personal data is collected by Fortum
Sign up for Apros® newsletter
toni
Complementary products
Safety transient and accident analysis e.g for licensing
Features and Connectivity
Connectivity to plant design systems
Process, automation and HMI design and testing
Complete process component libraries including containment, cooling towers, passive systems, and severe accident management systems
Integrate with your document management systems
Modelling of Full Nuclear Power Plant
Comprehensive plant model covering reactor island, turbine island, the balance of plant, and electrical and automation systems
Thermal hydraulic solvers including three- and six-equation flow models
Fully graphical user interface for model configuration and simulation
Extensively verified code and validated models against real measurement data
Key Benefits
Quick and easy-to-use fully graphical model configuration, simulation and maintenance
Fortum kesto
Apros® Nuclear simulation and analysis software has shown its excellence as a key contributor in assuring nuclear power projects achieve the highest plant safety and operational performance levels. It has been successfully used in a series of major nuclear power plant projects, including power upgrade, modernization, safety improvement, and new plant projects. Apros® has been approved by STUK as an independent computer code for the nuclear safety analysis of all Finnish NPPs and it has successful references worldwide in approx. 30 countries.
Apros® cases
Widely certificated
Operation & Maintenance
Learn more about Apros and see our Worldwide references
Apros® software, developed by Fortum and VTT, awarded the 2021 Automation Prize
Comprehensive plant models for BWRs, PWRs and VVERs covering reactor island, turbine island, balance of plant and electrical and automation systems


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/12/story-apros
Apros products and services have been delivered to numerous different users globally: EPC vendors, equipment manufacturers, energy utility companies, engineering companies, research institutions and universities. For example, companies such GE Power, Teollisuuden Voima, Forsmarks Kraftgrupp and Fennovoima use Apros in their daily work. Nowadays there is an ever-increasing need to simulate flexible energy production systems and to evaluate their system behaviour under different operation conditions. Apros provides an excellent simulation platform, which enables simulating all these within a single software application."
A new application area for Apros: E2E and DigiTwin
The story of Apros goes back to 1986, when Apros’s development started as a joint project by VTT Technical Research Centre of Finland and Fortum´s predecessor Imatran Voima (IVO). The aim of the project was to support the operations of the Loviisa nuclear power plant. As the development progressed, it soon became clear that Apros could support power plants throughout their whole life cycle: in the design phase, the commissioning phase and in training new operators and engineers.
Compared to other solutions, Apros has many undeniable benefits and features that make it unique. Very extensive needs from design to tracking and online optimisation place high demands on the model or tool, and Apros can meet all these needs now and in the future.
Read more about DigiTwin - E2E H&C Transformation program
in August 1999. The full set of acceptance tests covered the simulation of different steady-state operations, start-up and shut-down, and 40 failure and accident situations.
Apros was never meant to be just an internal tool for Fortum and VTT: from the very beginning, the plan was to sell Apros products and services to external customers. At the same time, both Fortum and VTT have been continuously interested to learn more about power plants’ dynamic behaviour, increase our knowledge on different energy systems and train new engineers and scientists to become new top energy professionals in Finland. We have reached all the goals, as Apros has been a major competence development platform used in numerous Ms. Sc. thesis and Ph.D. works.
Projects LARA and ELSA, which took place during 2005–2018, were related to the automation renewal of the Loviisa power plant. The automation of the power plant had to be modernised to ensure safe and reliable operation of the plants, and thus the automation systems needed to be renewed.
Case TVO, Olkiluoto
Read case TVO, Olkiluoto
From an internal tool to external business
The purpose of project LARA (2005–2014) was to reform the operational and safety automation on a very large scale. Due to the tight project schedule and broad scale of the renewals, utilisation of efficient testing methods was a necessity. Finding the proper parameters for the new automation systems was a challenging task, for which Apros was able to provide an excellent solution as a comprehensive simulation tool. The Apros engineering and testing simulator as well as the Apros development simulator played important roles in supporting the control room design and I&C testing. Apros was also used as a calculating engine in the operator training simulator LOKS2 developed during this project. The demands for the new training simulator were extremely high, requiring extensive Apros software and platform development as well as necessary Apros add-on tools, such as Instructor's Station. As a result, Apros evolved extensively during the project.
Experiences Utilizing Apros® Simulator in a renewal with Digital I&C
Haapavesi peat-fired power plant (with once through boiler configuration) was, together with the Loviisa NPP model, one of two pilot cases to be modelled and simulated with Apros to benchmark Apros code capabilities in the 1990's.
Using several different clean energy sources means shifting from centralised to decentralised heat production, which will increase the complexity of the district heating system operation. Operating the next generation energy system efficiently calls for major digital development.
A global user community that has various practical needs and development ideas for the software is very important to us and much appreciated by the Apros developers – new ideas are always welcome.
A training simulator for Vanaja combined cycle gas turbine power plant was developed in IVO to support operator training, plant modification design and marketing of operation and maintenance services in 1995.
"The software developers and power plant experts from both VTT and Fortum/IVO have done an extremely good job in the source code and application development work, starting from the very beginning, since Apros has been able to calculate complicated power plant processes and challenging thermohydraulic phenomena already in the 1990's. Nowadays large models and applications are easily run on regular laptops and workstations. At the same time, the software is very easy to take into use and the graphical user interface and calculation stability of Apros have been very much praised by our customers.
Apros® is a multipurpose simulation software, which is traditionally used to design and analyse the dynamic behaviour of power plants and their control systems. It enables extensive modelling of various power plant processes, which is particularly valuable for power plant design verification and validation, evaluating new processes and control concepts, testing operational and emergency transients and for operator training.
Experiences and key benefits at GE Power
The Story of Apros®
"With an I&C system renewal project so complex as ELSA, consisting of several safety and safety related systems together with operational systems, the benefits of utilizing such a powerful tool as Apros were crucial in succeeding in such challenging time schedule. The new systems were commissioned for both plant units in three consecutive years within regular outage durations. This gradual and phased approach required effective modelling and simulation of systems in different lifecycle stages to enable smooth integration testing already at test field and minimizing errors found at plant in final commissioning phase."
Loviisa power upgrade and safety analyses
Click here to open the timeline in a new tab
First, a highly accurate simulation model of Fortum's Espoo DH network is created automatically based on the existing DH network data (in GIS format). Based on that, a design tool is used to help make fact-based investment decisions along the Espoo Clean Heat transformation journey. Design Digitwin includes an additional feature, the capex-opex tool. Combined with the simulation model done with Apros District, which calculates the state of the DH network accurately at every calculation step based on first principles of physics, it automatically runs through the entire production history of the year – from the coldest winter day to the warmest summer day – and calculates the original investment cost and the operational cost for one year for each scenario.
Loviisa NPP automation renewal projects
The training simulator passed official acceptance tests
HAMBO simulator project
E2E is an end-to-end transformation project in the Fortum Heating and Cooling business in Finland. To respond to the global need to eliminate CO2 emissions and reach climate goals, Fortum and the city of Espoo are jointly committed to a programme called Espoo Clean Heat. The aim of the programme is to achieve carbon-neutral district heating in the 2020s. It will replace fossil-based heat production by 2025 at the latest, with smart and flexible solutions such as waste heat, renewable electricity, geothermal energy, and bioenergy-based heat production.
Apros® in NPP greenfield projects
Read Case Fennovoima
Apros® utilised in many phases of nuclear power plant life-cycle
Modelling and Dynamic Simulation of Cyclically Operated Pulverized Coal-Fired Power Plant
The Story of Apros® | Fortum
Along with the 21st century came new challenges for Apros. Loviisa's operating licenses were expiring in 2007 and 2010, and Fortum decided to apply for a new license to continue operating both units of the power plant for another 20 years. In order to apply for the license, the safety analyses of Loviisa NPP had to be recalculated to show that it would be safe to extend the operating time. These analyses were calculated with Apros, once again successfully, and the new operating licenses were eventually granted. As part of this project, Apros was used to model and calculate reactor containment building behaviour as part of the analysis calculations, which had never been done before. Today, all deterministic safety analyses of the Loviisa power plant are calculated with Apros.
While design verification and transient analysis are the key uses of Apros, operational optimisation is a very new area, and it opens plenty of new possibilities for us in the future. We have a great team behind Apros and a network of experts to support the continuing development work. With model-based optimisation, ground-breaking things can and will be done – the Digitwin project in Espoo is just the beginning.
Expansion to other nuclear and thermal applications
One of the major milestones in the history of Apros was the power uprate at the Loviisa power plant in 1995–1997, when Apros was for the first time used extensively for deterministic safety analyses calculations. The challenge was to find out exactly how the power uprate would affect the overall process behaviour and how the modified systems would work together. Naturally, the safe operation of the uprated power plant also needed to be proven to the Radiation and Nuclear Safety Authority STUK. The existing Loviisa NPP simulation model needed to be developed further to be suitable for safety analyses – meaning that every detail of the model had to be well documented and the Apros software calculations validated. It was a big effort to make the model ready for STUK´s evaluation, but in the end, it was done successfully, and the Loviisa NPP power uprate was approved.
One of the main advantages of Operational Digitwin is that its tracking simulator, done with Apros District, provides very accurate, valuable information of the state of the district heating network. As a result, it is possible to plan and operate the DH network in the most optimal way and thus minimise the production costs of the DH production and to maximise the flexibility potential provided by the entire heating system to the electrical system.
Read more about Apros® utilisation
I&C upgrade ends in success at Loviisa
, an experimental BWR simulator based on the Forsmark 3 plant in Sweden was developed for OECD Halden. The BWR simulator development project was initiated in January 1998. The simulator model was co-developed by VTT Energy and IVO Power Engineering Ltd using Apros software, while the operator interface was developed by the Halden Project. The simulator was thoroughly tested by experienced Halden Reactor Project personnel and professional Forsmark 3 operators and accepted by the BWR utilities in June 2000. The acceptance tests consisted of 19 well-defined transients, as well as the running of the simulator from full power down to cold shutdown and back up again with the use of plant procedures.
To operate the complex system optimally and maximise the flexibility of the energy system, very precise system modelling and optimisation is required. By combining dynamic simulation, new automation systems and optimisation algorithms, it is possible to reduce the use of primary energy and improve the efficiency of district heating systems.
Besides district heating applications, Apros is a very versatile tool for modelling renewable energy-based production facilities and new energy process concepts. Apros has been used to model different kinds of biomass boilers as well as Solar CSP concepts integrated with Thermal Energy Storages. Apros also provides good tools for modelling and simulating hydrogen production and P2X facilities, as has been done in the NeoCarbon project with Apros. These new system models can be integrated into the existing energy system models done with Apros, allowing evaluation of the whole performance of the energy system. Apros has also been used to model DEMO fusion balance-of-plant behaviour in the EUROfusion WPPMI project and small modular reactors in different R&D projects, showing the flexibility and usefulness of Apros as multipurpose simulation platform.
The Loviisa model was ready for first applications in 1991, and after that, it has been constantly developed. It was an early priority for Apros, but not the only one. From the very beginning, Apros was meant to be a multipurpose software, and it has been used in various ways in many significant projects around the world.
In 1993, Fortum Engineering and the nuclear plant at Kola began to cooperate in developing a simulator. The Kola NPP plant analyser and compact training simulator were developed and delivered in 1993–1998.
Although supporting Loviisa power plant has been the single biggest use case of Apros so far, new application areas have emerged. It is multi-purpose software that can support the entire energy sector, and it can be used for modelling and simulation of other industrial processes as well.
Today, Apros software licenses have been sold to over 30 countries. Feedback from users around the world has been excellent. Apros has been described as an accurate, stable, user-friendly tool – one that even a newly graduated engineer can use without months of training. Also, the ongoing version development is highly appreciated: a new software release with significant improvements is published every year.
As part of the E2E programme, a digital twin is being developed to represent and optimise the entire district heating (=DH) system of Espoo at a very accurate level together with our partners VTT and Semantum. This is where Apros steps into the picture. The Digitwin project will create two main tools for DH engineers and operators: Design Digitwin and Operational Digitwin. Both of these tools require very detailed first principle modelling of the district heating network, so that the DH flows and temperatures are known in different parts of the network at all times. Apros plays a key role in both, since a new product called Apros District is used to model and simulate all DH production units, DH consumers and the DH pipeline network. Apros District calculates the state of the district heating network in all different operation points, and this model takes into account the network transportation delays and heat accumulation, since this information is needed for using both Design Digitwin and Operational Digitwin.
- Viki Kaasinen, Senior Manager, Digital Transformation
"We have high expectations for our new Apros product. The project is part of a larger digitalization transformation programme, where we automate and optimize the entire chain from customers to heat sources. With the help of Digitwin, Fortum is able to reliably optimize heat sourcing and distribution in the Espoo area and maximize system flexibility towards the electricity market. The same models and business logics are also used when designing our next generation heating system. With Digitwin, we can reduce the use of primary energy and thereby enable cost-effective and environmentally friendly heat supply to our customers."
Case Fennovoima
Early history: Supporting Loviisa nuclear power plant
- Toni Salminen, Senior Manager, Apros
Alongside with the Loviisa NPP model development, both Fortum and VTT started to utilise Apros for various other applications. Some of the projects are listed below.
Design Digitwin and Operational Digitwin
Thanks to consistent development, Apros has proven its benefits in one new application after another. The Fortum DigiTwin project, part of the end-to-end (E2E) programme that digitises Fortum’s whole district heating system in the Espoo, Kirkkonummi and Kauniainen area in 2019–2022, is a new application area for Apros and one that we are particularly excited about. It is a great example of Apros’s multipurpose utilisation.
- Petteri Lehtonen, Head of I＆C and Electrical Systems
Operational Digitwin is about bringing the offline model of the network to life with real-time measurements, and optimising the district heating production from various heat sources based on that. It works by living in real time alongside the actual process and using an IT platform to collect data from different parts of the DH network, consumers, and production facilities. This data is then used to define and calculate the state of the DH network model, and the state of this tracking simulator is used every hour to initialise dozens of scenario calculations carried out with Apros District in a cloud environment, where the production plan for the next 48 hours is made every hour as decided by the optimisation algorithm.
Apros-Based Loviisa NPP Full Scope Training Simulator and Engineering Model
When the optimisation of the digital twin is connected to top-level automation, it will be the first time that a machine, not a human, is running such a complex system as we have in Espoo, and the human role is shifting more towards follow-up and exceptional situations. In a nutshell: the artificial intelligence will be driving the DH network operation while people are focusing on developing and improving operations.
New possibilities
More Apros® cases
Project LARA ended in 2014, but the Loviisa automation renewal project continued under the name ELSA (2014–2018), the focus of which was on renewing the safety critical I&C systems. Apros was also widely utilised in project ELSA: it was used to test the quality of Rolls Royce’s new automation system design before the actual commissioning of the automation systems at the Loviisa power plant. The testing phase, carried out in France, was expected to take up to 18 months but was completed in 11 months – a great example of the solid performance of Apros.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/02/case-fennovoima-aprosr-npp-greenfield-projects
The extensive Apros® component library can be used to model different nuclear power plant designs flexibly and accurately, thus making the model and its responses more realistic. As an example, passive safety systems can be modelled realistically.
Calle Korhonen
Fennovoima also uses Apros® plugin OPERUI (Operation User Interface) to develop their own HMI (Human Machine Interface) applications. The customized HMI applications provide a way for Fennovoima personnel to familiarize themselves with the power plant behaviour, where Apros® is used to provide the realistic power plant dynamic response.
Design company: JSC Atomproekt and OKB Gidropress
Designed plant lifetime: 60 years
Supplier: RAOS Project
Apros® used at Fennovoima since 2014
Fennovoima is constructing an AES-2006 nuclear power plant (NPP) in a greenfield project to Pyhäjoki, Finland. Ensuring compliance to current safety requirements in licensing set by the Radiation and Nuclear Safety Authority of Finland (STUK) is an essential part of the newbuild project.
Apros® process simulation software is a powerful and versatile tool that has been successfully used to support nuclear power plant greenfield projects.
design validation
Creation of an Apros® model for the purposes of conducting comparison accident analyses was started based on available design data in early stage of the project.
Government decision in principle: 2010
Simulations add value to personnel and training
Safety Analysis Manager
Dynamic, flexible and accurate tool
Design: AES-2006
operation instructions validation
as basis for creating a testing and training simulator.
However, the use of the model is not limited to safety analysis applications. Apros® process simulation can also be utilised in
Having a comprehensive Apros®-model of the power plant already in the licensing phase is a good starting point for the future commissioning and operation phases support.
In partnership with
“It is a crucial task to verify the plant supplier’s safety analyses with own analyses and support the licensee’s safety assessment. At the same time, we learn about the plant behaviour during different events and during modelling, the design of systems, e.g. I&C architecture, is reviewed.
Hanhikivi-1 NPP
The use cases where Apros® simulation model can benefit Fennovoima during the coming decades of plant operation are countless.
This extends the potential benefit of using Apros® beyond the typical end users of a simulation tool.
Part of the Hanhikivi-1 Apros® model. Image: Fennovoima
Turbine Generator supplier: General Electric
This way Fennovoima assures that high quality safety analyses can be conducted also by their own personnel, thus reducing the dependence on external suppliers.
Case Fennovoima: Apros® in NPP greenfield projects | Fortum
automation testing
engineering analysis
Case Fennovoima: Apros® in NPP greenfield projects
In the design phase, the plant supplier conducts safety analyses for licensing purposes. Throughout the project, Fennovoima has recognised the benefits of extensive utilisation of simulation. In the design phase, Fennovoima has performed comparison safety analyses to verify the original analyses and to increase the knowledge of their own personnel of the new plant type.
Download the case brochure
Versatile tool
Capacity: 1200 MW
Apros® has been developed since the 1980’s with a focus on being a multipurpose dynamic simulation tool and it has been used extensively to support Loviisa NPP operation throughout its lifetime.
Apros® is constantly developed and it has been successfully used to model different kinds of plant types, such as EPR and many VVER plant types, including AES-2006.
As the design has proceeded, the level of model detailness has increased and also the model scope has extended to include automation and electrical systems as well as containment building. By combining information from different plant systems into the Apros® model, Fennovoima can analyse the potential effect of design choices on plant level with simulated responses.
personnel training and
Amount of primary loops: 4
Apros® simulation tool was easy selection because of well-known history of modelling VVER power plants and available consultant and support services.“
With simulations, the proper functionality of the designed safety systems in different accident situations can be verified. Fennovoima has chosen Fortum’s modelling and simulations services utilising Apros® as an independent tool to conduct verification on the plant suppliers analysis.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/01/case-tvo-olkiluoto-aprosr-utilised-many-phases-nuclear-power-plant-life-cycle
• Commissioning of new 2-stage reheating plant
"Dynamic simulation has supported us in decision making and enhanced knowledge of plant behavior and nuclear safety at TVO. At Olkiluoto 3, we use Apros especially for safety analyses. It has been essential to have own analysis model which can be used for independent safety analyses in various stages of the project. Training of new Apros users and development of own modelling and analysis capability has been possible thanks to the good co-operation with Fortum."
Renewal of condenser and ejector systems is example of utilizing Apros simulation model to support and speed-up the problem solving process. Too high condenser pressure were detected in plant start-up after condenser and ejector renewal at OL2. The high pressure was detected only when using the second line of the 2 identical and redundant ejector lines. If only the second ejector line was in use the reactor power were limited to 70% so the risk of major production losses were present. Physical investigation of the problem was limited because systems are part of contaminated primary circuit. The ejector line was modelled in detail based on the measurements data and configuration from the first ejector line.
OL3: Safety Analyses and Commissioning
TVO has used Apros simulation models since 2005. One Apros simulation model is used to simulate both OL1 and OL2 units as they are identical in design. The main application of the model has been process engineering where the biggest advantage is to analyze the effect of the subsystem level changes on the plant level processes.
• Tuning of generator cooling control system
OL1/OL2: Process Engineering Applications
The comprehensive simulation model of OL1 and OL2 contains the boiling water reactor, turbine plant, containment, safety automation, control systems and plant electricity grid. Through-out the projects and investigations the simulation results have been compared with the plant measurement data, including start-up and shut-down states, with very good accuracy. Main goal for the simulation model in the future will be continuing the support for process and automation modernization projects with up to date model. The usage of the model will be broaden also to safety analyses with integration of the multichannel reactor model which enables the loss of coolant analyses.
OL1/2 simulation model have been also utilized for example in following cases:
Dynamic simulation enables safety analysis, strengthens the operating organisation’s understanding of the process behavior in all plant states, provides data for project planning, commissioning and problem solving, and reinforces the validity of the suppliers’ data and decisions.
The possible reasons for faulty behavior (high amount of non-condensable gases after ejector) were investigated by making configuration changes to the model so that the simulation results would correspond the measurements from the second ejector line. Simulations assumed higher bypass flow in ejector which was confirmed in physical inspections. In addition to problem solving the Apros model was used to validate other process changes in ejector systems and to analyze the procedures for creating the condenser’s vacuum. Simulations demonstrated possibilities to shorten the time to vacuum creation in start-up which results higher annual production capacity. All these measures supported the project staff in decisions and fastened the problem solving process significantly.
The simulation model has been used to wide range of internal design based accident analysis, investigation of plant level commissioning tests and model is validated against the plant supplier reference data. Furthermore, the model has had a role in the training of safety engineers and many Master of Science theses have been written about OL3 model development and analysis cases. In the future the simulation model will be developed and updated for safety analysis purposes but still remaining the best estimate configuration. Best estimate configuration ensures also the capabilities of engineering analysis for primary and secondary circuit systems.
Investigation of steam valve periodic test is an example about benefits that simulation brings about understanding the plant level behavior and changing the operating procedures based on accurate simulation results. Steam line control valves are tested annually in specific periodic tests at OL1 and OL2. During the periodic test the operating power of the plant were originally lowered to 60% of the nominal power. With dynamic simulations TVO was able to test and prove new procedures where periodic tests were executed on higher power level. To simulate the dynamics of the periodic tests the model needs to contain integrated model of the whole BWR-typed reactor water-steam process and control circuits for reactor power, turbine power and steam control valves. The simulation results confirmed that steam valve control circuits could be tested in higher reactor power level. The increase in operating power level for periodic test has annually positive impact on electricity production of both units.
Turbine hall, Olkiluoto 1, Finland
With the new EPR unit (OL3) the need for a detailed Apros model was seen in very early phase of the project. The first OL3 safety analysis with Apros was executed in 2008 and proved that the model can successfully simulate a Large Break Loss of Coolant Accident (LBLOCA). The model has been actively updated and it has similar scope as OL1 and OL2 models including all the essential systems for analysis needs. For safety analysis purposes the model contains 3D and multichannel core models. Multichannel core is utilized in loss of coolant analyses and the 3D neutronics core model allows the examination of asymmetric behavior inside the pressure vessel and primary loops for example in reactivity analysis. In 3D core model all the core flow channels are individually modelled which enables higher accuracy for the simulations. 3D core model is used also to simulate the LBLOCA accident and results have agreed to the plant suppliers safety analysis.
• Investigation of reactor pressure vessel level measurement system
Case TVO, Olkiluoto: Apros® utilised in many phases of nuclear power plant life-cycle | Fortum
"Apros has been valuable tool for TVO in many projects and investigations. From our perspective, the strength of Apros is detailed plant scale process and automation modelling. At Olkiluoto 1 and 2 units, we have used Apros as engineering tool. We have chosen Apros because of reliable support and user-friendly modelling environment."
Mikko Leminen, Nuclear Safety Engineer, TVO
• Analyzing the concept and commissioning of new forward pumping system pumps
Case TVO, Olkiluoto: Apros® utilised in many phases of nuclear power plant life-cycle
Use of Apros® at TVO is a great example how dynamic simulation can be utilised during whole lifetime of the plant. Apros® has been used for several modernisation projects on the OL1 and OL2 units which are running BWR power plants delivered by Asea Atom during 1970’s. Apros® is also utilised preparing for the commissioning and operation of the new EPR power plant (OL3) provided by AREVA.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/05/apros-software-developed-fortum-and-vtt-awarded-2021-automation-prize
The Automation Prize is a recognition to a significant research and development effort in the sector, or to an application for industrial or societal use, or for other activities supporting the automation sector. The prize was given at the Automation Day event held in April, and it was received by
Apros® development has been an exceptional outcome of combining together the high-end Finnish scientific research and engineering work. Apros® utilization areas are the detailed and integrated dynamic simulation of processes, automation and energy systems. Development of Apros® started already 35 years ago as a joint project by VTT and at that time named Finnish energy company IVO (currently Fortum) to support the operations of the Loviisa nuclear power plant and thus creating a very closely working development team from both organisations, which worked in joint premises.
, and
The Finnish Society of Automation selected Apros® simulation software, developed by Fortum and VTT Technical Research Centre of Finland, and the key people impacting its development as the recipient of the 2021 Automation Prize.
(retired), and
In Conventional power plants
Eija-Karita Puska
Kari Porkholm
In granting the Prize, the aim was to recognise the main driving forces behind Apros® and the entire life cycle of Apros® so far. After a thorough review, the jury ended up awarding the Prize, exceptionally, to multiple individuals:
Main utilization areas of Apros® have been the simulation of various energy and process industry applications. The most traditional applications are different nuclear and thermal power plants’ engineering simulators and operator training simulators. The single biggest use case of Apros® is the support for Loviisa nuclear power plant operation. To mention few application areas, Apros® is used to calculate the official Loviisa power plant’s safety analyses It is also used as an engineering tool in plant modification projects and as a calculating engine in the operator training simulator LOKS2.
Apros success stories
Markku Hänninen
Karri Honkoila
Over the years Apros® has been used as a leading modelling and simulation software platform for hundreds of students, researchers and industry engineers. Hundreds of academic theses, scientific journals, and conference publications have been written about the Apros® development work and simulation applications. For example, Aalto University’s Aaltodoc (keyword APROS) gives 113 Apros® related academic theses, 83 of them are master’s theses and the rest licentiate theses and doctoral dissertations.
Apros® was also widely utilised in the Loviisa automation renewal project (ELSA), in which dynamic simulation was used to comprehensively ensure the quality of Rolls Royce’s new automation system design and delivery packages prior to the actual commissioning (the so-called virtual commissioning) of the automation systems at the Loviisa power plant. Outside the traditional power sector, Apros® has been used also to simulate various energy systems, such as the cruise ship waste heat recovery and chilled water systems, alternative energy production methods (e.g. Power-to-X), and in the research and development of systems formed by energy production and consumption targets, e.g. the management of district heating networks. Apros ®software licenses have been sold to more than thirty countries.
(VTT/Enbusco),
Apros® software, developed by Fortum and VTT, awarded the 2021 Automation Prize | Fortum
The development of Apros® has been a long-term work, as the numbers show: dozens of people with over 20 years of Apros® experience are working nowadays with the software full-time in Finland alone. The software development has continued actively and today some 20 people are involved in it – about half of them full-time. Besides Fortum and VTT, various other energy utility companies, engineering companies, technical support organizations, nuclear regulatory authorities, research institutes and universities utilize Apros® in their work.
Matti Paljakka
21 May 2021, 09:30 EEST
Jukka Ylijoki
Read more about utilisation of Apros
from VTT. The amount of the prize is 5,000 euros.
Pasi Laakso
Jari Hämäläinen
from VTT, and
Kaj Juslin
from Fortum.
Sami Tuuri


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-power-plants/process-simulation-and-safety-analysis
Full Scope Training Simulator
Nuclear Safety Analysis
Engineering Simulator
800
I&C Testing Simulator
As well as the following simulator types:
Full Scope Simulator in Virtual Reality
Development Simulator
Fortum provides you with experience in safety analysis for nuclear power plants and nuclear facil­ities.
Beside our Apros® simulation software, our comprehensive safety analysis offering includes:
Severe Accident Management
Apros® is used in 32 countries
Our simulation and safety analysis knowledge has been utilized around the world
Deterministic Safety analysis
Apros® Case, TVO Finland
Probabilistic Risk Analysis
Over 800 Apros® licenses have been delivered
Apros® has been successfully utilised in different phases of the nuclear power plant life-cycle at TVO, Finland.
Process Simulation and Safety Analysis | Fortum
32
Our key product for process simulation and safety analysis is Apros® - Advanced Process Simulation Software. Apros® enables the modelling and simulation of complex NPP configurations, from solving engineering issues to the dynamic testing of digital instrumentation and control systems. In a single software tool we successfully combine high accuracy with high simulation speed making APROS® an excellent choice for a variety of use cases from safety analysis to full-scope training simulators.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/how-improve-nuclear-industry-competitiveness-western-countries
Nuclear power is mitigating climate change and raising the global standard of living in a sustainable way. However, recent new build nuclear power plant projects in western countries have shown time schedule slips and budget overruns. Improving the competitiveness of the nuclear industry is essential, as nuclear power should be an integral part of future low-carbon energy portfolios to meet decarbonisation objectives.
. I would like to emphasise that the lessons learned are there, but in the end it is in the responsibility of all of us to make sure that we are learning and doing the right things to ensure the future of nuclear power to mitigate climate change.
In the long-term,
full report can be downloaded from the NEA web site
There are multiple lessons learned regarding design and construction of new nuclear power plants. The report shows that costs and project schedule overruns are not an inherent characteristic of nuclear technology, but more of a reflection of weak supply chains and a lack of recent nuclear construction experience.
How to improve nuclear industry competitiveness in western countries | Fortum
High potential for cost and risk reduction
jukka
small modular reactors (SMRs)
Head of Expert Services, Nuclear Services
Between 2018-2020, the REDCOST group produced a report on reducing the costs of nuclear construction – a practical guide for industry stakeholders. There is certainly a call for improvement. In western countries, investors typically perceive new build nuclear as high-risk projects. This deters the ability to attract financing for future nuclear projects. Schedule and budget control have been much better in China and South Korea, for example, where fleets of new power plants have been built during recent years.
Nuclear power is essential in the energy transition
hautojarvi
Since a significant part of indirect costs are nonrecurring, such as design and licensing, there is a high potential to reduce the cost by replicating previous projects. Delays and cost overruns are often encountered in first-of-a-kind nuclear projects where uncertain political contexts and a lack of design maturity are present. Serial production would help to improve competitiveness through standardisation. Great potential lies in increasing the performance of Generation-III reactor projects after the first-of-a-kind phase.
will become an innovative option supporting optimisation of technology and harmonisation of licensing regimes. Finally, our international group came to the conclusion that cost reduction requires the long-term commitment of governments and an appropriate governance framework.
It is important to note that the recent construction cost increases in western OECD countries are largely due to indirect costs. Cost escalations result mainly from design, planning, support service and installation expenses rather than from components and materials.
More about the topic
Simon-Erik Ollus on blog
06 November 2020, 14:09
I was honoured to support this high-level target of improving the competitiveness of nuclear by acting as the representative of Finland in the Expert Group on Reducing the Costs of Nuclear Power Generation (REDCOST). The nuclear community is truly global, with lots of cooperation among governments, regulators, and utilities. As a representative of Finland, I did not represent Fortum; I used my knowledge for the development of the whole industry. The two-year initiative was established by the Nuclear Energy Agency (NEA), an intergovernmental agency operating within the framework of the OECD.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/nuclear-power-essential-energy-transition
In Sweden, public opinion on nuclear energy has varied over time. As a result of the 1980 referendum, it was decided that nuclear power would be phased out gradually. The first of the Barsebäck reactors was shut down in 1999 and the second in 2005. The reactors were built around the same time as the Loviisa reactors. This has had an impact on the nuclear energy sector. The utilisation rate of the Swedish reactors has long been lower than in Finland, where the efficiency of reactors is world-class.
All Nordic countries have ambitious climate targets – Finland has the quickest schedule
We must make the most of every possible resource in the fight against climate change and in the transition to cleaner energy. This includes nuclear power. The existing Nordic nuclear power plants should produce energy until the end of their service life, and the existing reactors should be maintained as long as is technically and economically viable. Nuclear power plants are resources that have been invested in, and the final disposal of nuclear waste has been organised.
Hydropower helps control spring flooding and climate change
The Nordic countries will be the first region in the world to achieve a carbon-neutral energy production system in the 2040s. However, the countries have different views on the role of nuclear power in the energy transition. Sweden is shutting down its oldest reactors, whereas in Finland nuclear power is considered essential for a cleaner energy production system.
Nordic well-being is based heavily on energy-intensive industry. Around half of the electricity used in the Nordic countries is consumed by industry, while in Central Europe industry consumes only around one third of all electricity. The Nordic countries have used different resources of the energy system efficiently, thanks to the common electricity market and the interconnected power grid. The Nordic electricity market is already very close to being carbon neutral, as there are only a handful of fossil fuel thermal plants left, and electricity is mostly produced with hydropower, nuclear power, wind power and bioenergy – in this order.
Vice President, Trading & Asset Optimisation
More from the author
Nuclear power is essential in the energy transition | Fortum
Nuclear power plays an important role in the energy transition
A successful energy transition requires work on many fronts. Electricity production must be increased by constructing new wind turbines and nuclear power plants. We need an even stronger Nordic power grid, and we must cooperate more closely in the Nordic countries to coordinate different projects related to energy and climate policy. We must also renew the electricity market to give incentives for demand response of electricity users. In the future, the consumer side must be more flexible in relation to the production side than today.
However, Swedish attitudes towards nuclear energy are slightly more positive than before: four out of the eight parliament parties are in favour of nuclear energy. In Finland, there has always been strong acceptance for nuclear power, which has been viewed as a natural energy source for our energy-intensive industry.
Goals are reached through cooperation, investments and reforms
We are constructing new wind power turbines both onshore and offshore, but they will not be enough to cover all energy demand. Wind power has also run into its first challenges as regards public support: in Norway, strong limitations to wind power construction have been addressed in political discussions. The limited capacity of the main grid is already starting to hinder the construction of new wind power turbines in Norway and Northern Sweden. Moreover, we cannot rely on wind power alone, as the turbines only produce electricity during windy periods, about one-third of the time. The system must provide baseload electricity in the future as well.
*Fortum is a minority shareholder of the Oskarshamn nuclear power plant and opposed the shutdown decision taken in 2016
02 April 2020, 15:36
If we take the energy transition seriously, we will need an abundance of new wind power in addition to the Olkiluoto and Hanhikivi reactors in the future. Thanks to the great combination of wind power, nuclear power and hydropower, the Nordic countries will be the first area in the world to achieve a carbon-neutral energy system in the 2040s.
Varying attitudes towards nuclear energy
Like the other Nordic countries, Finland and Sweden are pursuing climate leadership and trying to achieve carbon neutrality in the coming decades, but the countries have different means to achieve their goal. Sweden is closing its oldest nuclear reactors: Oskarshamn reactors 1 and 2 and Ringhals 2 have already been closed, and Ringhals 1 will be closed later this year ahead of schedule, according to the independent decision taken by the companies a few years ago*. In Finland, new reactors are being built in Olkiluoto and on the Hanhikivi peninsula, and the government is preparing an overall reform of the Nuclear Energy Act. The aim is to standardise safety requirements and improve the operating conditions of small modular reactors to generate heat and energy for cities and towns.
ollus
simon-erik
The Nordic countries have ambitious climate and carbon neutrality targets. Finland has set the bar highest by aiming to achieve carbon neutrality by 2035. The target for Denmark is 2040, for Sweden 2045 and for Norway 2050. Reaching these targets requires fast reorganisation of the industrial base, construction and agriculture, and fast electrification of industrial processes. According to Fortum’s calculations, the demand for electricity in the Nordic countries will increase from the current level of 390 TWh to around 600 TWh to reach climate neutrality and all electricity to be produced in a carbon-neutral manner.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/bloggers/hydropower-helps-control-spring-flooding-and-climate-change
Frazil ice
Hydropower helps control spring flooding and climate change | Fortum
Regulated rivers are significantly helpful in preventing floods in water systems and reduce ice jams from forming. Kemijärvi Lake in northern Finland is a good example; in its natural state, it floods every spring. During peak flood periods in spring, the water levels may have been as much as 4 meters higher than water levels during autumn. With the construction of hydropower, regulation has decreased peak flood levels and has shifted their occurrence from spring to early summer.
Climate change means warmer winters but also longer summers. The summer of 2019 was very dry in the Nordic countries, which significantly raised the price of electricity. We were close to a power shortage when the Olkiluoto nuclear power plant was disconnected from the main grid due to a fire caused by a transformer.
In order to secure hydropower generation also in the future, we must find new solutions to reconcile the different perspectives related to the use of water systems. When it comes to regulating water systems, shifting to a more dynamic approach could be considered. As we will have increased water resources in winter, it is possible to produce more electricity during cold periods, as well.
Emission-free energy has a vital role in solving the climate challenge. The share of solar and wind power in our electricity system is increasing significantly: for example, Nordic wind power production is expected to triple in ten years.
In the future, electricity demand will grow in summer
Hydropower is an effective means of controlling increasing spring flooding
*
In the future, electricity demand is likely to grow in summer, as global warming will increase the cooling need for houses and business premises. Data centres, which form the infrastructure of digitalisation, do not go on summer holidays, either. Traditionally, peak demand has mostly been covered by combined heat and power (CHP) production, but in the future, we will need regulating power all year long, which will increase the relative value of hydropower.
Hydropower is needed alongside other renewable energy sources
It is essential to secure the current hydropower operating conditions by not limiting the use of the power plants for regulating production with additional provisions that control water flow rates. Solutions could be developed for the challenge of reconciling the needs of the fishing industry and hydropower production with the help of water biodiversity compensation models.
However, solar and wind power are variable, which is why renewable regulating power production is needed. Hydropower is a reliable regulating power and, as such, a resource that can be used in fighting climate change alongside other renewable energy sources.
The water volumes in winter in the Nordic countries will increase to the point that the central lakes and outlet rivers of water systems will flood. Warmer winters will delay the freezing of rivers, which will increase frazil ice* floods during heavy winter frosts.
is created when the water temperature of a river is zero or sub-zero and the river doesn't have a solid ice cover. When it snows in these conditions, the ice crystals don't melt when as they come into contact with the water, they freeze. The frozen ice crystals then start sticking to each other and frazil ice forms in the water. The frazil ice easily accumulates on river bank rocks and especially on the metal parts of a hydropower plant, blocking water flow and raising the water level.
Traditionally, hydropower has secured the Nordic electricity system. In addition, we have trusted our neighbours to lend a hand in case our own production is not enough. Now, the fight against climate change is forcing us to re-evaluate the role of the traditional, emission-free and renewable hydropower. The importance of hydropower as a domestic resource maintaining the electricity system will grow. That is why we must do our best to make the most of hydropower in the fight against climate change.
In Lapland, precipitation will increase the snow cover, but in the long term, the rising temperatures will melt the snow. The previous year is a very real example of the changing role of water resources: in the spring of 2019, the masses of rapidly melting snow in northern Finland highlighted the importance of flood control. The same development continues, as Lapland is threatened by heavy spring floods this year as well.
The impact of regulation is very visible in Rovaniemi, Finnish Lapland, where regulation has decreased the flood risk since the melt waters of the Kemijoki and Ounasjoki rivers no longer merge simultaneously at the city of Rovaniemi.
Hydropower operating conditions must be secured
Climate change will lead to milder winters and increased rainfall. At the same time, hydropower’s production conditions will change: as the climate warms and the rainfall increases, Nordic water resources will increase.
24 March 2020, 15:46
Our energy system needs hydropower as regulating power alongside the growth in wind and solar power. Hydropower is also an effective means of controlling spring flooding.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/hydropower-helps-control-spring-flooding-and-climate-change



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/operating-nuclear-power-plants/simulator-services
Connection to Process Simulator
Maximized availability - sophisticated architecture ensures minimized maintenance
We offer
Virtual Panels for Simulator Control Rooms
Easily Configured
Virtual Panels can freely be configured to match any control panels at your plant. They are easily connected to Apros® or other process simulation platforms.
User and technical support
Easy to change - no wiring needed, only software
Touch screens
Virtual Panels for Simulator Control Rooms | Fortum
Fast to build - short design & installation time
Virtual Panel Software
We have saved millions of euros by using virtual panels on a full scope simulator at our own Loviisa NPP.
Panel layout configuration
Mounting solution
Tools for making layout changes
Cost-effective - up to 80% savings compared to hard-wired panels
Simple
With Fortum Virtual Panels, you have no need for dozens or hundreds of expensive mechanical components in your simulator HMI. We use carefully chosen stock touch screens and support structures in combination with our unique interface software. We have saved millions by using virtual panels at the new full scope simulator in our own Loviisa NPP.
Economical
Panel platform SW&HW
With Fortum Virtual Panels, you have no need for dozens or hundreds of expensive mechanical components in your simulator HMI, and reconfiguration of a panel section is deployed in seconds, without the need of manual rearrangement of mosaic tiles.
Fortum Virtual Panels are interactive touch screens to simulate your hard-wired Human Machine Interface (HMI). Virtual Panels can be freely configured to match any control panels at your plant. They are easily connected to Apros® or other process simulation platforms.
Simulator Services


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-power-plants/process-simulation-and-safety-analysis/safety-analysis
Radiation and environmental safety
Over our years of support for the Loviisa NPP, we've built significant expertise of diverse radiation related safety analysis cases ranging from detector efficiency analysis to plant scale dose rate analysis for emergency preparedness needs. Our team is also deeply familiar with radiation analysis of spent fuel and its storage as well as final repositories. We have prepared MCNP analyses for, for example, the use of waste management facilities, spent fuel encapsulation plants and final disposal facilities. All of this is critical for the acceptance and safety of any nuclear plant and we would gladly support you with our knowledge. See below for examples of our offering and the skillset of our radiation safety experts:
see here
Environmental and water permit procedures
based on our long experience in the nuclear industry. Please contact us if you are interested in Apros licenses, training or modelling and analysis support regarding deterministic safety analyses.
Examples of our expertise:
We provide deterministic safety analyses support with our
Wide scope of analysis that considers all of the NPP systems
Authorized Radiation Protection Expert (RPE) activities
Nuclear safety analysis - With in-depth experience | Fortum
Meteorology and limnology expertise
Environmental monitoring and reporting
Radiological release and dose assessments
Complimentary products
Fortum provides you with experience in Safety Analysis for Nuclear Power Plants and Nuclear Facilities
SAM guidelines for NPPs of different technologies
Today, the PRA for our Loviisa NPP includes core damage as well as large and early release analyses for all internal and external events in all plant operating states. All fuel locations at the Loviisa site (reactors, refuelling pools and spent fuel pools) are covered. The expertise created in probabilistic analyses has also been used to assess, e.g. hydroelectric dam safety improvement projects and plant availability assessments. Do not hesitate to contact us if you’d believe our expertise could also support your powerplants and projects.
SAM guidelines for nuclear plants of different technologies, final safety analysis reports, Level 2 probabilistic risk assessment, stress tests, etc.
Environmental impact assessment (EIA)
sta
Nuclear safety analysis
Probabilistic Risk Assessment
Human reliability analysis
Initiating event identification
Radiation safety analyses
Availability analysis
Uncertainty analysis
Risk-informed applications, such as piping inspections programme, Technical Specifications, safety classification etc.
, or contact our experts directly at
See how Apros® is used in Safety Analyses
Read more about these services in Finnish
Severe accident phenomena and analyses
Safety Analysis
Deterministic safety analyses
Reliability data analysis
Since the mid-1980s, Fortum has systematically and continuously developed our PRA (Probabilistic Risk Assessment) methodologies, models and applications. Throughout the years, PRA has been widely used in identifying safety improvements and optimizing plant operations in several diverse ways, greatly improving the plant safety while maintaining high load factors.
As you can see, we're also deeply familiar with environmental radiation monitoring, analysis and reporting. For more information about this,
Analysis of radiation safety in nuclear facilities
Emergency preparedness
System reliability modelling
Radiation physics
Probabilistic scenario modelling
Apros® software
Radiation monitoring, protection and safety design


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild/nuclear-newbuild-projects/site-selection-characterization
Selecting the location for a nuclear power plant is a crucial step with far-reaching consequences. Environmental and seismic conditions, plant elevation, soil properties, and cooling water arrangements have a significant impact on the safety and efficiency of the plant and, thus, influence both the direct investment cost and the net output of the plant. The environmental impact of the plant is also important when considering public acceptability.
Regarding site selection / characterization Fortum can provide services and expertise, for example, in the following areas:
Site Selection / Charachterisation
Specification of site-related design basis, including seismic hazard evaluation
Cooling water modeling
Radiation dose calculations
Finding optimal location
The Customer can also benefit from our vast experience in conducting Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA) procedures in Finland.
NPP project in a newcomer country
Site Selection / Charachterisation | Fortum
Analysing the effects of site and environmental conditions on plant design
Emergency planning zone is currently one of the key issues regarding the location of a plant. This is particularly relevant for SMRs, where existing industrial sites as well as urban sites may be attractive alternatives.
We are familiar with all the topics related to selection of optimal site and site characterisation either through our own projects or though consultation of third parties. Based on our first-hand experience, we understand the importance and impact of these topics on plant design, constructability, and operation and maintenance over the entire plant lifecycle.
Emergency planning
Radiation dispersion analyses and modeling
Environmental studies (desktop and field)
More about NPP project in a newcomer country


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild/nuclear-newbuild-projects/program-planning-feasibility-studies
Capability to manage the project
Fortum can perform feasibility studies and program planning independently of plant vendors and technology providers. The planning and studies can be carried out so that the Customer’s personnel are closely involved. This enables transfer of our extensive Owner-Operator knowledge and enables the Customer to build up its capability to manage the project effectively, taking into account the long-term aspects related to the operation of the plant over its entire lifecycle.
Program planning & Feasibility studies | Fortum
A key task in a newbuild project is to find and select a plant technology that is feasible for the project in question, based on the Customer’s needs and priorities. During this stage, several technology options are studied and site information is collected to assess their suitability for the site(s) and their licensability. The assessment provides important input for evaluating the economic feasibility of the project. Contractual and legal models and boundary conditions, among other things, also need to be taken into account preliminarily.
Technology assessment
The Customer will need to build up its capability to manage the project early on. Development of an overall program plan is essential in order to ensure that all the necessary elements are identified, considered, and set up in time. This includes timely development of the Owner-Operator’s organisation and building up its capability and processes to conduct the licensing, construction and commissioning of the plant.
We have first-hand experience and an extensive knowledge base of most current plant technologies, based on feasibility studies and other assessments including both large NPP units and SMRs. Thus, we are fully familiar with the “pain points” of the various technologies and can perform the work effectively and save the Customer’s resources, without having to start from scratch.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/newbuild/loviisa-3
Site studies (2009-2010)
Feasibility Studies covering five plant alternatives representing both BWR and PWR technology (2008-2009)
Preparation of technical requirements for the call for bids (2009-2010)
Application for Decision-in-Principle (2009), including option for 1000 MW heat production for district heating
Conceptual design development (2009-2010), including e.g. major licensing issues, engineering schedule and licensing plan
Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA) procedure (2007-2008)
Development of project organization plan and management system for implementation (2009-2010)
Loviisa 3 | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild
Process modelling and simulation
Services for Nuclear Newbuild | Fortum
As a licensee and operator of nuclear power plants and waste management facilities, we know how challenging nuclear newbuild projects can be. Our newbuild customers have utilised our expertise and proprietary technologies to manage their projects and to reduce risks of project delays.
How Adlas® is used to speed up the licensing process
Our services include for example:
Materials, structures, quality
Process and mechanical engineering
Contact info
In-depth experience as a NPP license holder
New nuclear project can be very challenging especially for the countries with no previous experience about nuclear power production. Establishment of needed management structures for owner/operator can be laborsome and time demanding. During the last decades Fortum has participated in several international new build projects as a technical evaluator supporting the owner with evaluations of different plant technologies. As a license holder of nuclear NPP Fortum possesses valuable insight to the nuclear power production and has a detailed understanding about nuclear technology from the operational point of view. Fortum’s experience serves the best when applied at the early stage of the new build project when big technical selection are made. Our engineering capability areas for nuclear newbuild projects include different disciplines such as safety engineering and analysis, architect & civil engineering, process modelling and simulation and nuclear waste management.
Instrumentation and control, electric systems


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/01/artificial-intelligence-facilitates-fortums-requirements-engineering
Santeri Myllynen
The project to create an artificial intelligence (AI) based requirements classifier for requirements engineering tasks of our Nuclear Engineering Department was initiated in 2019. Based on the results of
We integrated the best-performing classifier with our requirements management system Polarion ALM®, which we use to write engineering documents and allocate and elaborate requirements to suitable disciplines and architecture levels. This also creates requirement links to enable the traceability of requirements.
’s master’s thesis, the development project is aiming to respond to the challenges of requirements engineering in a safety-critical industry. The challenges in this area include, for example, the vast amount of requirements to be manually classified and the ability of an individual to make exact decisions when faced with a multitude of options. This kind of classification activity is extremely ineffective as a baseline and further hindered by the limits of human attention span. Errors in requirements specifications due to erroneous interpretations and allocations of requirements may cause massive extra costs because of the need for redesigns or even the reproduction of components. Using AI in requirements classification is expected to support designers in their decision-making process when classifying a vast amount of requirements because computers can constantly retain the same efficiency with tremendous processing power.
raunio
Myllynen, S., 2019, “Utilization of Artificial Intelligence in the Analysis of Nuclear Power Plant Requirements,” Master’s thesis, Aalto University, Espoo, Finland.
In the first phase of the project, we utilised open-source classifiers and our requirement datasets to train requirements classifiers and compare them with each other. The classifier is utilised at the beginning of the requirements engineering workflow after collecting the initial set of requirements. The AI model takes a requirement as an input and outputs the requirement with the relevant requirement classes representing design disciplines and processes. Fortum’s nuclear engineering knowledge is included in the training datasets in which we have classified requirements based on our know-how acquired both during the 40-year lifetime of Loviisa Nuclear Power Plant as well as our external projects.
ASME Publication 2021
Raunio, T., Suominen, I., Myllynen, S., Karell, R., 2021, “Machine Learning-based Classifier in the Analysis of Nuclear Power-Specific Requirements,” Automaatiopäivät24 Conference Proceedings, Online, April 13-14.
The project group has involved numerous experts with a range of different competencies – from artificial intelligence and systems engineering, particularly machine learning, to natural language processing, requirements engineering, and configuration management. This group was further supported by experts from every design discipline of Fortum’s Nuclear Engineering department, especially when forming the training, test, and validation datasets for the classifiers.
The project was led by Mr. Santeri Myllynen until February 2021 and has since been headed by Mr.
Technical details
Myllynen, S., and Jitta, A., 2020, “Utilization of Artificial Intelligence in the Analysis of Nuclear Power Plant Requirements,” IYNC2020 Conference Proceedings, Sydney, Australia, March 8-13, pp. 154–157.
Read more about ADLAS®
Artificial Intelligence Facilitates Fortum’s Requirements Engineering | Fortum
Automaatiopäivät Publication
The AI model takes a requirement as an input, classifies it according to the domain knowledge gained from a training dataset and outputs the same requirement associated with relevant requirement classes representing design disciplines and processes.
Combining an AI solution with 40 years of Loviisa Nuclear Power Plant operating experience
IYNC 2020 Publication
Read more about our offering
tapani
Senior Engineer, Nuclear Safety
For further reading
Tapani Raunio
Fortum’s R&D project developing artificial intelligence-based models for requirements engineering has developed a tool that allocates requirements into predetermined classes and significantly speeds up these processes. Utilising AI along with our extensive nuclear expertise has allowed us to facilitate more efficient requirements classification and thus will help us better support our nuclear engineering tasks.
e
In the first phase, we utilised open-source classifiers and our requirement datasets to train different requirements classifiers and compared them with each other.
Master’s thesis
+358405664909
So far, the project has already resulted in a classifier integrated with a requirements management system used for writing engineering documents, eliciting, allocating and elaborating requirements, and tracking them through the whole lifecycle of a nuclear power facility. Additionally, the project has resulted in multiple scientific papers. Fortunately, this fruitful and inspiring project continues researching and developing new features, such as atomising long requirements consisting of several actual requirement entries and combining similar requirements into one. We are looking forward to better facilitating our internal and external requirements engineering tasks.
The classifier is utilised in the beginning of the requirements engineering workflow after collecting the initial set of requirements, such as stakeholder needs and requirements, technical requirements, and design process requirements.
Myllynen, S., Suominen, I., Raunio, T., Karell, R., Lahtinen, J., 2021, “Developing and Implementing AI-Based Classifier for Requirements Engineering, ASME. ASME J of Nuclear Rad Sci.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-new-builds/adlasr-advanced-licensing-and-safety-design-method-nuclear-facilities



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/newbuild/npp-project-newcomer-country
Preparation of RfP for site characterization works
Owner’s Engineer services in the development phase of the project
Preparation of management system documents
Preparation of Request for Information concerning NPPs
Preparation of technical requirements and other draft bid invitation documents
NPP project in a newcomer country | Fortum
Workshops between Owner, Regulator and NPP Vendors to enable technical dialogue
Evaluation of NPP vendors and technologies
Newbuild Customer in MENA region
Strategic guidance and compilation of decision making materials
Training services for Owner


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/digital-solutions/apros-thermal/read-and-download-our-apros-cases
Read and download our Apros® cases | Fortum
Digital Solutions
Read and download our Apros® cases
Here you can read more and download our Apros® cases.
Download the cases here
Case Forsmark Kraftgrupp AB: Forsmark Boiling Water Reactor simulation applications with Apros® - from power uprate compatibility analysis to safety analysis
Read Case Forsmark
Simulation increases effectiveness and quality in modernisation project - CASE Emergency diesel automation renewal at Loviisa NPP
Case Forsmark
Read Case DAUT
Apros simulation software for thermal plants
Case Diesel automation renewal


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/11/simulation-increases-effectiveness-and-quality-modernisation-project-case-emergency-diesel-automation-renewal-loviisa-npp
The original emergency diesel automation systems at Fortum's Loviisa NPP have been modernised. The role of emergency diesels is to automatically provide power for safety-critical components during a total loss of off-site power. The emergency diesel automation consists of safety-classified I&C cabinets (analogue) and non-safety-classified I&C cabinets as well as Human-machine Interface (HMI) systems (physical controls, PLCs and touchscreen). The automation system includes many different operation and control modes, testing functions, and conditional and unconditional protection functions. The automation functionalities are too complex to evaluate with pen and paper, especially regarding fault situations, testing degraded states, and simultaneous activity of safety-classified and non-safety logics. The tight schedule of the NPP overhaul limits the available time for on-site testing of the automation. Delays in commissioning will result in large electricity production losses.
The functional testing, together with simulated HMI, created confidence in the functionality and operation of the new automation system. Simulation activities were also demonstrated to the regulatory body (STUK), and positive feedback was received from them. It was beneficial that many faults and issues were found and resolved in the early phase of the project, most of them before the FAT. Solving these issues during the FAT and SAT phase would have been much more costly and time-consuming; this way, the risk of delaying the whole NPP outage schedule was decreased.
The challenge in nuclear power plant modernisation projects is to ensure safe and functional connectivity between existing and new systems. Safety and functionality must be proven in advance so that the wanted changes are licensed and approved by the operator and the regulator. Dynamic simulation enables the technical concept to be verified in all design phases, and the plant's operators can be involved in functional testing and design work at the very early phase of the project.
Simulation increases effectiveness and quality in modernisation project - CASE Emergency diesel automation renewal at Loviisa NPP | Fortum
The simulation model improved the cooperation in the problem-solving and design commenting work between Fortum and the automation supplier. In addition to general problem solving, the simulation model played an important part in the training of the modernised system for the NPP operators. The operators were able to complete this training independently in the control room where the laptop-based simulator was installed. This reduced travelling and training day costs, and valuable feedback was received from the NPP personnel, as using the simulation models allowed them to participate in the very early phase of the project.
Fortum, Loviisa
After the detailed design phase, the Apros simulation model was used to carry out functional tests of the system. The simulation results were reviewed with NPP operators and the automation supplier. The Apros simulation model – with the simulated HMI integrated into the model – was also used to train the NPP operators in the renewed system. Training was executed before finalisation of the HMI components and automation components so that operator feedback about the new system (25 different notes in this project) could to be taken into consideration. This resulted in a more user-friendly HMI system.
Kristian Sjöblom, Senior expert, Automation design, Fortum
The decision to utilise the Apros simulation software was made in the basic design phase; as a first step, the safety-classified part was modelled. Basic design functionality was tested dynamically with the model, which provided design feedback in the early phase. Then the system design proceeded to the detailed design phase. The detailed Apros simulation model was developed based on the function diagrams provided by the automation system supplier. Both safety and non-safety automation systems, together with a simplified emergency diesel model, were integrated to the same simulation model, enabling full system verification. The simulation model was found to be an efficient platform between the supplier and Fortum – not only for noting issues, but also for discussing and solving design issues.
The simulation model creates confidence in design decisions
Use of Apros in the diesel automation renewal project proved the value of dynamic simulation in all parts of the power plant's modernisation project. The initial investment to get value from the simulation model was only two weeks of work. The simulation model was developed throughout the project based on updated design documentation and integration of the local HMI. The utilisation of Apros simulation software enabled the validation in all the design phases, improved the communication from the suppliers to the end users, and had a positive impact on the project schedule and budget by reducing the issues in the commissioning phases.
More efficient cooperation and training
In the factory acceptance tests (FAT), the simulation test results were used as a validation reference. During the site acceptance tests (SAT), the Apros simulation model was used to check changes in the operator instructions beforehand and to confirm the observations of the system behaviour.
Integration of new and existing systems is extremely valuable for testing
”Most beneficial in utilising dynamic simulation was that many findings and improvements were noted and resolved already during the design phase. Simulation is really a cost-efficient way of verifying the design. Especially important is the impact it has on decreasing the risk of delays in the NPP outage schedule.”


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/digital-solutions
Advanced digital solutions for O&M excellence and plant performance
More about our digital O&M services
Advanced digital solutions for power plant perfection
kollanus
Advanced digital solutions for power plant perfection | Fortum
Apros® simulation software is used to design and analyse the dynamic behaviour of thermal power plants and their control systems in a highly realistic way. It enables extensive modelling of power plant processes, which is particularly valuable for simulating operational changes, for operator training and for recruitment.
Fortum Asset and Maintenance Management system
Digitalisation is progressing at a fast pace in the energy sector: power production has become highly volatile, and there is a need for improved security, flexibility and efficiency. AI and machine learning tools, together with broader data storage options, intensify the digital transformation even more.
Over the years, Fortum eNext has consistently developed digital tools to support both our own assets as well as our customers’ O&M sites. Therefore, we understand the relevance of advanced digital technologies for the power plant’s efficient operations.
Digital solutions and operational excellence go hand in hand
Head of Smart Operations
+358 40 540 5511
While digital technologies provide new tools for analysing information, automating processes and optimising production, it is the strong expert knowledge that harnesses and applies this power. At Fortum eNext, our task is to help you run your plant with the industry’s best knowledge and technology. Over the years, we have successfully supported both our own fleet as well as international customers’ O&M sites in achieving outstanding operative and financial results with the help of advanced digital tools.
Our digital solutions for thermal plants
Vesa Kollanus
TOPi® is an efficient energy data management software that keeps track on your site’s performance. Users can monitor and manage the equipment performance to ensure productivity and reliability of operations.
The Fortum Asset and Maintenance Management solution is applied at our O&M sites to enhance plant availability and efficiency. The solution is based on IBM Maximo® and Fortum’s own value-adding components that contain expertise in power plants, power plant asset management and power plant maintenance.
Dynamic simulation with Apros® software
Process information and optimisation with TOPi®


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/smart-operations/advanced-digital-solutions
Smart Operations
Over the years, Fortum has developed tools to support both our own fleet as well as international customers’ O&M sites.
Our O&M customers are served by a technical support team that provides back office support and manages requests from sites as a central point of contact. Thanks to this remote support centre concept, the data from sites is available for analysis and action by our technical experts without delay, supporting the daily life at power plants. Through the remote support centre, on-site O&M teams also have access to a large pool of expert resources at Fortum, including turbine and generator, emissions, water chemistry, asset lifetime and maintenance experts.
As a part of our O&M concept, we provide optimal digital solutions for each customer’s environment for maximum security, efficient plant operations, energy management and optimisation, accurate data collection and analysis as well as smooth mobilisation and onboarding.
TOPi
Advanced digital solutions for O&M excellence and plant performance | Fortum
Fortum's digital tools
Power plants are operated today with dedicated, highly automated DCS.  The complexity of the projects, volatility of energy production and the need to constantly optimise production call for advanced digital solutions to simplify daily power plant operations. Daily, monthly and annual reports are required to evaluate plant performance from both environmental and production perspectives, and digital tools are also needed for proper production planning, storage handling and optimisation of maintenance.
training
More about digital solutions for thermal plants
simulator is used for training and recruiting purposes at O&M sites. The software is designed for dynamic simulation of power plant processes and energy networks automation and control, as well as power systems. The Apros model is created for the specific plant and used for operator training.
Our digital tools for supporting modern operation and maintenance
based on IBM Maximo saves and maintains data on operational locations, equipment, inventory and suppliers. The data reported can be used for tracking faults, planning maintenance work and outages, managing the warehouse, acquisitions and inventories, and analysing maintenance costs.
Get back to eNext Smart Operations main page
Realise your full business potential with digital solutions for power plants
Digital technologies form an integral part of safe and flexible power plant operations. Our digital solutions, together with our extensive in-house know-how of O&M excellence and plant performance, ensure maximised returns throughout the life cycle of the asset. This holistic approach guarantees the best practices and a strong O&M culture for successful operation of your plant far into the future.
is a browser-based tool for efficient power plant data management that helps monitor the performance of the equipment and enhance maintenance of the power plant. It retrieves data from the DCS and is compatible with various automation systems.
Remote support centre provides access to a large pool of experts
Our tools for successful operation and maintenance in a nutshell
Fortum's Computerized Maintenance Management System


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/smart-operations
Our O&M portfolio covers all the activities necessary to operate your plant safely, sustainably and economically: O&M advisory, planning, mobilisation, and daily operation and maintenance services as well as long-term service agreements for turbines and generators. The scope of the contract will be tailored to match your individual requirements.
Download the guide and find out how a well-executed mobilisation of O&M services enables successful power plant operation long into the future.
Rwanda, East Africa
MOBILISATION GUIDE
Read more about our digital tools
Grangemouth O&M project
To show our commitment and confidence in our ability to secure long-term value creation, we are also open to negotiations regarding acquisition of a minor equity stake in your company.
Hamm CCGT power plant, Germany
A trusted O&M partner
When starting power plant operations, there are many factors to consider. Each customer has different needs, from meeting environmental targets to managing the plant’s overall operations, including its technology, services and personnel. Fortum's world-class concept and valuable experience as a power plant owner and operator mean that we can ensure our customers’ technological and financial competitiveness. As an independent O&M service provider, we always propose the most suitable solution for our customers and incorporate both advanced digital solutions as well as a broad in-house expertise network for O&M excellence and plant performance.
“We have chosen Fortum as our O&M operator due to great price-quality ratio and have not regretted our choice. The availability is high, and we are impressed by Fortum’s safety culture and technical competence.“
Grangemouth, United Kingdom
Improved plant efficiency means you can optimise resource use and minimise unavailability. Minimising unavailability means fewer costs – better for your bottom line and better for the environment overall.
New operating model
Full-scope O&M services for thermal power plants | Fortum
Full-scope O&M services for thermal power plants
Our full-scope O&M approach
Lakeside, United Kingdom
As a part of our O&M portfolio, we provide the required digital solutions for each customer’s environment to ensure smooth mobilisation, onboarding and efficient plant operations.
Financial performance on the environment's terms
Affecting a power plant’s efficiency and costs is possible
Dr. Martin Buschmeier, CEO at Trianel 800 MW CCGT power plant in Germany
O&M project, 2007-2012
We provide full-scope Operation and Maintenance (O&M) solutions to ensure that your power plant runs sustainably, safely and economically. We help you maximise your plant’s performance and increase profitability and shareholder value throughout the asset’s lifetime.
Our long and extensive experience has shown that a power plant's efficiency and costs can be affected through careful decisions at the beginning of the asset's lifetime.
At Fortum O&M Services, we operate your plant using industry-leading expertise and technology. Our task is to ensure the availability, efficiency and reliability of your assets, with the highest standards in safety and sustainability. This expertise stems from long experience in serving both our own fleet as well as a wide range of international O&M customers. With excellent performance in operating several third-party power plants, we are also seen as a trusted and bankable service provider in the eyes of financial stakeholders.  Consequently, our low risk profile often enables power plant owners to secure a lower interest rate when financing.
Advanced digital solutions for power plants
Teesside, United Kingdom
O&M project, 2017 - ongoing
O&M project, 2017 - ongoing
Outperform through optimal efficiency and reliability
New O&M model
Teesside O&M project
Read more about our service range
Rwanda O&M project
Lakeside O&M project
O&M project, 1998 - ongoing


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/ineos
Wide utilisation of site services
ISO 9001/9002, ISO 14001, OHSAS 18001 Certificates
Location:
Common control room and office
Good safety performance, e.g. RoSPA Golden Award for Occupational Safety in several consecutive years
High plant availability - operational time availability: (tgdE) 97.5% 2011–2014 (average)
Design review, project development, equity investment, energy trading, power turn-key contractor, operation & maintenance (O&M), ongoing O&M contract since 1998.
Adaptation of BP/Ineos site regulations
Fortum's Grangemouth project is a combination of design, construction and project management experience with expertise on operation and maintenance, asset management and energy trading.
Close cooperation with the customer Ineos
Services:
High plant efficiency: 87.0% 2011–2014 (average)
Day-to-day management and operation
Project duration:
O&M services for Ineos refinery and petrochemical plants, Grangemouth, UK | Fortum
Under the O&M contract Fortum has been responsible for:
See more customer reference stories
Power output:
Commercial operation:
Until 2014 the plant owner was Grangemouth CHP Ltd, where Fortum's ownership was 100%. The most important issues for the plant owner were:
Fortum’s contribution to the project:
Staff mobilisation and training
Gas-fired combined heat and power (CHP)
Grangemouth power plant, commissioned in 2001, has power generation capacity of 145 megawatts (MW) and heat generation capacity of 257 MW. It provides electricity and steam to INEOS’ petrochemical operations. Excess electricity is sold to the National Grid. Fortum has continued to provide operation and maintenance (O&M) services at the power plant after plant's divestment to INEOS.
Grangemouth CHP Ltd, (owner INEOS Industries Holdings Ltd, since autumn 2014 after Fortum divestment).
O&M services for Ineos refinery and petrochemical plants, Grangemouth, UK
Expert support services
Customer benefits:
Power Plant:
145MWe / 257 MWth
Small multi-skilled team: Total number of staff 21 (during Fortum's ownership), plant operation, daily maintenance, outage planning and contracting, energy (fuel and power) contracts management and commercial issues
A detailed design review
April 2001
Project description
1998–2014, O&M contract continues
Flexible operation of the plant according to Ineos site requirements


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references
The operating hour-based annual maintenance took a surprising turn at Keljonlahti power plant when major damage requiring major repairs was discovered in the turbine rotors. The ten-week project extended to nearly seven months, but in the end, the machine was started precisely on the agreed date, and the total expansion efficiency of the turbine increased by more than 4%.
Asset management process development at Narva power plant, Estonia
As a result of thorough investigations and specialized repairs, the availability of one of Helen’s generators was significantly improved and vibrations brought to the level it was when installed in the early 1990's. At the same time the lifetime of the equipment was also prolonged.
Fortum eNext O&M consulting services provided the new İçanadolu power plant with O&M mobilisation know-how, including high level quality systems, safety and maintenance reliability tools.
Fortum eNext created a modern asset and maintenance management process to Narva power plant. In the project the plant’s maintenance strategy was renewed and upgraded by taking environmental, economical and safety aspects into consideration.
Managing the life cycle of high-value and high-risk turbomachinery with one service partner – Case BIR Avfallsenergi AS, Norway
Our energy engineering references
Multiple TOPI® system projects at Suomenoja power plant, Finland
Prolonged generator lifetime after resolving persistent vibration issues – Case Helen, Finland
In 2019, Fortum eNext and Valmet implemented an extensive modernisation of steam turbine automation for Neve (Napapiirin Energia ja Vesi Oy). The control and protection system was renewed completely and integrated into the plant’s DCS system. This brought more flexibility to production, which enables participation in frequency support in the reserve market. The investment will therefore pay off quickly.
O&M consultancy and CMMS project for GSR Energo power plant, St. Petersburg, Russia
O&M services for Tees biomass-fired renewable energy plant, United Kingdom
TOPi® Process Information and Optimization System is comprehensively used at Suomenoja power plant – one of Fortum’s biggest CHP plants in Finland.
Fortum participated in customer’s energy upgrade and efficiency project in St. Petersburg in accordance to Fortum TOPGen® based O&M management and IT systems.
Reliable life cycle management for turbine generators with long-term service agreement – case Veolia, Finland
Negative development in energy prices affected the 2 x 420 MWe combined cycle gas turbine (CCGT) power plant in Hamm, Germany, and led to problems with the profitability of the plant. With the new operating model developed by Fortum eNext, the cost of operation and maintenance services was cut down by roughly 20%.
Fortum eNext provides technical support services for the operator of the coal fired power plant in Indonesia.
TOPi® Process Information and Optimization System is in daily use at Hamm CCGT Power Plant. Among other features, TOPi® enables the plant personnel to receive accurate information and analysis of the plant processes. The system helps to create savings in every aspect of the daily operations and maximises the plant efficiency.
O&M consultancy services for Içanadolu combined-cycle power plant, Turkey
Fortum eNext customer reference stories
Fortum’s international experience in operation and maintenance using waste fuels contributed greatly to customer’s choice. Fortum’s O&M project for staff mobilisation, recruitment and training contributed positively to plant's performance in general.
TOPi® delivery for Trianel Gaskraftwerk Hamm, Germany
Fortum eNext customer reference stories | Fortum
Fortum eNext has an operation and maintenance (O&M) agreement at Tees biomass-fired renewable energy plant in the UK. The agreement is a continuation of a long history of Fortum’s O&M services in the country.
In 2018 the Norwegian BIR Avfallsenergi AS (BIR) signed an eight-year agreement with Fortum eNext for turbine and generator services. The undertaking includes major and minor overhauls and 24-hour support.
Technical support agreement for Tanjung Jati B, Indonesia
We take great pride in striving for high customer satisfaction. Our customers are continuously rating us very high in terms of the ability to provide the best technical expertise and solution, as well as having deep market understanding. Explore our reference cases and see how we support power and heat producers in maximising their asset performance.
O&M Services for Lakeside Energy from Waste Plant, UK
New cost-efficient O&M model to turn around profitability – case Hamm, Germany
Operation and maintenance services in Rwanda, East Africa
One of Suzano’s spare generator rotors was badly damaged during balancing. Thanks to the engineering expertise accumulated working with similar equipment, Fortum eNext was able to manufacture a completely new rotor based on the old design, but enhanced with upgrades and modern material.
With a greenfield operation and maintenance (O&M) agreement with Yumn Ltd, Fortum eNext is supporting Rwanda towards higher energy independence.
Fortum eNext long-term service agreement enables optimal life cycle management of turbine generators.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/narva
Design and determine the Key Performance Indicators (KPIs). This helps the company to assess the execution of selected strategy and determine bottle necks in the maintenance and repair processes.
Narva power plant, Estonia
Enefit Energiatootmine As
1969
Power plant:
The project resulted in a powerful road map to:
tanttari
+358 40 529 6186
The project got started by performing a criticality analysis, which is a systematic and analytical method to identify and classify power plant components, equipment, systems or other production assets, taking the required level of equipment redundancy into consideration. Based on the risks and reliability, this analysis served as a prejudice for further development of maintenance and repair strategy optimisation and spare part philosophy. The project also included the development assessment of Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS), definition of KPIs and other performance indicators, as well as planning preventive maintenance actions for certain critical equipment.
Narva, Estonia
Asset management process development Narva power plants, Estonia
The criticality class provided extensive information about the expectations for equipment reliability as well as its role in the production process, including environmental, economical and safety aspects. The equipment criticality analysis helped also determine priorities for the maintenance and repair planning and execution, as well as to promote risk awareness and management.
Customer benefits
Develop CMMS to support operation and maintenance activities
Create the Preventive Maintenance (PM) actions and programs by forming a reliable maintenance strategy
Product Manager
1615 MWh
Commercial operation date:
2016–2017
Asset management process development at Narva power plant, Estonia | Fortum
Form principles for spare part and stocking strategy and implement associated purchase processes
: Criticality Analyses (CA), Maintenance Strategy Optimization and instructions for the planning of preventive maintenance
Vesa Tanttari


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/veolia
Turbine generator
Eventually 6 operational units with electricity generation capacity of 170M
Siemens steam turbine and generator
Veolia Kilpilahti thermal power plant
To reach the ambitious target of 100% availability for the customer at the new combined heat and power plant in Kilpilahti, Finland, the operator of the plant, Veolia Services Suomi Oy, sought a partner for the lifecycle management of the plant’s gas and steam turbines. Based on previous collaborations, the customer felt Fortum eNext was a natural partner with the resources, the skills and the insight required for managing the lifecycle of the turbine generators.
ville
After the first six months, the customer has a positive view of the partnership. “I expect to be able to trust that Fortum’s maintenance work will address any problems within the time frame to avoid any unexpected faults or other outages. The partnership also creates an ideal platform to work together to draw up a development programme for the future,” says
General Manager, LTSA
holmstrom
Operational facts
, Maintenance Manager at Veolia Services Suomi Oy.
General Electric gas turbines, Alstom generators
Site: Kilpilahti thermal power plant in Porvoo, Finland.  Using mainly side streams from the nearby refinery as a fuel.
+358 50 453 4817
Interested to learn more? Read also the longer case description.
Ville Holmström
Current thermal plant: 5 units with 5 boilers, 2 gas turbines and 2 steam turbine generators.
Reliable life cycle management for turbine generators with long-term service agreement – case Veolia, Finland | Fortum
How to optimise the lifetime performance of turbine generators?
Juha Kujala
Customer: Veolia, the operator and one of the owners of Kilpilahti power plant
eNext Veolia reference
3 new boilers and a steam turbine generator under construction. Once ready, 2 old boilers and the old steam turbine generators will be decommissioned.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/tanjung-jati
On-site reviews of plant operations and systems
Technical support agreement for Tanjung Jati B, Indonesia | Fortum
Coal fired condensing power plant
Plant personnel competence development
Periodical analysis of plant's thermal efficiency
2005–ongoing
Ari Frantsi, Station manager, PT TJB Power Services
Fortum signed the technical support agreement in year 2005 for both mobilisation and operation periods of the plant. Fortum eNext is supporting the operator to keep the plant's operations and maintenance, availability and thermal performance on an economically optimised level. Our O&M experts provide the plant with variety of services in accordance with Fortum's proven TOPGen® operation and maintenance concept.
Plant owner:
Mobilisation support and setting up the plant O&M processes and procedures
Jepara, Central Java, Indonesia
PT. Central Java Power with long term leasing agreement with the state owned PT. PLN (Persero)
Technical support services
since 2006
Design review of plant process and systems from O&M viewpoint
Periodical vibration analyses of plant's rotating machines
Support for trouble shooting purposes
Off-site analysis and support based on customer requests
Services provided by Fortum eNext:
: PT. TJB Power Services
Fortum eNext supports the operator to keep the plant's O&M on an economically optimised level. Services create measurable value to customer in terms of availability, energy efficiency and controlling the O&M costs.
2 x 660 MWe
“The Tanjung Jati B Units 1 &2, 2 x 660 MW coal fired power plant has over the years had a constant focus on high availability and operational reliability. As a result Tanjung Jati B Units 1 & 2, the plant is one of the most competitive power plants in Indonesia”, says Ari Frantsi, Station Manager, PT TJB Power Services.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/gsr-energo
Efficient O&M organisation with optimised number of personnel
Fortum’s long-term international experience in operating and maintaining gas turbine operated power plants
Gas turbine long-term service agreement. With preparation of Fortum TOPGen® based O&M management and IT systems, Fortum has participated in customer’s energy upgrade and efficiency project.
Power plant criticality analysis
Data collection for CMMS
2x110MWe / 2x 89 MWth
TOPGen® Integrated Management System (IMS)
Restructuring of O&M organisation with clear responsibilities
Fortum CMMS solution with licenses based on IBM Maximo®
West European O&M business processes integrated with organisation and Power IT systems
The first unit in 2014
Selected preventive maintenance programs
LTSA contract review and optimisation of spare parts based on similar project experience
Kolpino Combined Cycle Gas Turbine (CCGT) power plant provides electricity to several energy customers. It is situated in the rapidly growing industrial district in the northwest area of St. Petersburg. GE’s Frame 6FA advanced gas turbine technology and Siemens' steam turbines were selected to power plant upgrade. Fortum signed a long-term service agreement (LTSA) in 2011 which included optimisation of LTSA and spares strategy, streamlining of O&M organisation, provision of Fortum TOPGen® based Integrated Management System (IMS) and supply of Fortum CMMS (Customer Management System) solution with licenses.
St. Petersburg, Russia
GSR Energo
2011–2014
Kolpino CCGT gas-fired combined heat and power (CHP)
O&M consultancy and CMMS project for GSR Energo power plant, St. Petersburg, Russia | Fortum
Fortum's contribution to the project:
Fortum CMMS with newest features on top of IBM Maximo® database
Fortum expert service network and remote support
Transfer of know-how and training


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/suzano
Customer case Helen, Finland
Radial steam turbine
Read more about our generator workshop
Type:
Gabor Csaba
2 x 15 MVA, cosphi 0.85, 3600 rpm
Our workshop in Västerås, Sweden is designed for full-scope generator maintenance services
ASEA GTP 1050CZ
Brazilian pulp and paper company Suzano contacted Fortum eNext in early 2017 for support because one of their spare rotors had been damaged in the balancing pit after a rewind performed by another company. As the rotor could not be repaired, the customer wanted to know whether it would be possible for Fortum to manufacture a similar type of ASEA-GTP rotor from scratch. The challenge was that ASEA had delivered the last rotor in the 1970s and nobody had manufactured a rotor like this in almost 40 years. Also, the OEM had told the customer that it could not be done.
from Suzano’s Corporate Engineering Department.
Having maintained the engineering know-how of the technology and how these rotors are designed and how they should be rewound and high-speed balanced, Fortum eNext was able to offer the delivery of a completely new rotor based on the old design of the one that failed, but enhanced with upgrades and modern material.
Full-scope generator services from our workshop
csaba
gabor
Designing and manufacturing a completely new GTP-type generator rotor – Case Suzano S/A, Brazil | Fortum
More on the topic
"One thing that stands out in this project is the excellent co-operation between our Engineering office, our generator workshop in Sweden, and the very skilled sub-supplier in Finland who did the difficult machining of the rotor parts."
Generator and turbine:
Running season:
Power:
Paper mill
Capturing the know-how and the know-why from experienced personnel and transforming that into how a rotor like this should be built today, with modern production equipment, Fortum’s engineering department made the design of the new rotor.
Fact box
+46 76 783 4933
Ph.D., Principal Generator Specialist
Gabor Csaba, Senior Product Manager, Fortum eNext
“I was impressed with how the know-how of designing and high-speed balancing of these rotors has been maintained within Fortum. It’s not easy to find a service provider in Brazil with the equipment, the facilities, and especially a big enough balancing pit like the one in Västerås to overhaul a generator like this,” says
Alessandro Moscardini de Morais
Continuous
1972


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/helen
Helen Oy, producing electricity and district heat in Helsinki, Finland had for many years had a worsening vibration problem of the generator at its Vuosaari A site. The unit could once not even be started, as it would trip on the run-up to speed.
The unit was operated normally for a couple of years. However, in summer 2017 during a planned outage, Fortum eNext was called again to perform inspections of the main and exciter rotor. It was then discovered that the electrical contact between main rotor and exciter rotor was in a bad shape, and a temporary repair was done. In 2018, the main and exciter rotors were taken to Fortum eNext workshop in Västerås Sweden where a design upgrade of the electrical connections was implemented and the rotors were high-speed balanced.”
The customer had tried to solve the problem on their own and together with other partners, but ended up contacting Fortum eNext in 2015. Based on the initial findings, Fortum eNext executed first repairs including re-alignment of the generator during spring 2015.
from Helen.
ABB GTL 1200EP, manufactured in Västerås, Sweden
50 MVA, operates at 3000 rpm
natural gas
Even though it took some time to come to the final solution, the customer was very pleased with the process. Issues with the stationary parts as well as with the main and exciter rotors were identified, analysed and, in the end, corrected. All work was done without causing any additional downtime.
Helen Oy, Helsinki, Finland
eNext Helen reference
fall – spring
“To me the vibration levels seem the same as when the generator was brand new," says Maintenance Manager
Karl-Gustav Pihl
Prolonged generator lifetime after resolving persistent vibration issues – Case Helen, Finland | Fortum
Finally, with the stator re-aligned and the rotors in perfect balancing conditions, the vibration levels were brought down significantly, back to the level they were in 1994−1995.
delivered by ABB in 1991
Vuosaari A in Helsinki, Finland, producing electricity and heat
Helen Vuosaari power plant


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/trianel-gaskraftwerk-hamm
+358 40 503 2531
Combined cycle gas turbine power plant
Antti Malve
Head of Strategic Customer Management
Mikko Päivärinta
With TOPi® the customer gets an easy-to-use tool for their everyday needs. TOPi® enables the plant personnel to receive top-notch information and analysis of the plant processes and effortlessly create trends, reports or even enable automatic reporting. Maintenance operations also benefit from the operating time calculations that can be automatically transferred to the maintenance management system. With the TOPi® system the customer is able to achieve savings in every aspect of their daily operations and thus maximise the efficiency of their plant.
"We have chosen Fortum as our O&M operator as the price-quality ratio is on an excellent level, and we have not regretted our choice. The plant availability is high, and we are impressed by Fortum's safety culture and technical competence."
TOPi® delivery for Trianel Gaskraftwerk Hamm, Germany | Fortum
“The computerized Process Information and Optimisation System, TOPi®, is in the core for optimising power production and following the condition of the plant, both on site and in back office. The system provides high-end tools for analysis and it is based on long-term experience at Fortum’s own plants”, says
2007, upgrade with continuous support agreement in 2013
November 2007
, Power Plant Manager, Trianel Energie, Hamm Combined Cycle Gas Turbine Power Plant.
Dr. Martin Buschmeier, CEO of Trianel, CCGT
TOPi® Process Information and Optimization System
malve
The TOPi® system in Hamm Power Plant consists of an IP.21 database with over 2500 variables, detailed process displays and a reporting tool with automatic reports. In 2013 the system was enlarged with a dispatching tool, which allows operators to quickly follow and react to changes in the production plan. The dispatching tool was developed together with the plant personnel to work well with the German electricity markets specifically.
Hamm Power Plant is a Combined Cycle Gas Turbine (CCGT) CHP plant with two 400 MWe single-shaft trains. TOPi® Process Information and Optimization System has been used at Hamm Power Plant since the start of the plant’s commercial operation in 2007.
: 2 x 400 MWe
Hamm, Germany
Trianel Gaskraftwerk Hamm GmbH & Co
Power output


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/hamm-ccgt-plant
“We chose Fortum as our O&M operator due to great price-quality ratio and have not regretted our choice. The availability is high, and we are impressed by Fortum’s safety culture and technical competence,” says
“In order to stay competitive in the fluctuating and highly competitive local market, we needed a strong, long-term O&M strategy that would provide cost-effective operation and maintenance with an optimal workforce ensuring a high-level of quality and reliability, as well as meeting or even exceeding the demanding environmental and safety standards,” says General Manager Mikko Päivärinta from Fortum eNext, who worked as Plant Manager at the Hamm power plant from 2007 to 2018.
eNext Hamm reference
paivarinta
mikko
General Manager, Fortum eNext
In terms of availability and reliability, the power plant is one of the most modern gas power plants in Germany.
Fortum has been responsible for the operation and maintenance of the power plant since the start of commercial operation in 2007.
In the end, Fortum eNext and the customer succeeded in creating a new operating model enabling the power plant to continue operations profitably and to hold on to its own, experienced and motivated staff, thereby making it possible to run the plant in a flexible and profitable way.
With the new operating model, the cost of operation and maintenance services was cut by roughly 20%.
Fortum eNext has been responsible for the operation and maintenance of the Hamm CCGT power plant in Germany since 2007. In 2014 the power plant faced serious profitability issues due to decreased electricity prices. The customer and Fortum eNext together created a new operating model that made it possible for the power plant to continue operating, but in a way that is cost-efficient and profitable for both parties.
The customer is very satisfied with the situation.
Combined cycle gas turbine (CCGT) power plant in Hamm, Germany, consisting of 2 x 400 MWe single-shaft trains.
+358 40 830 7855
, CEO of Trianel Gaskraftwerk Hamm GmbH & Co.
Trianel Gaskraftwerk Hamm GmbH & Co, owned by 28 German, Austrian and Dutch regional electricity companies.
Hamm combined cycle gas turbine (CCGT) power plant
New cost-efficient O&M model to turn around profitability – case Hamm, Germany | Fortum
Dr. Martin Buschmeier


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/bir-r%C3%A5dalen
BIR’s Rådalen waste-to-energy plant in Bergen takes care of the municipal waste handling and district heating delivery. The facility encompasses two complete production lines with one turbine and generator unit in each. When it was time to renew the turbine and generator service agreement, the main driver was to find a single supplier in order to save time and money.
Managing the life cycle of high-value and high-risk turbomachinery with one service partner – Case BIR Avfallsenergi AS, Norway | Fortum
each of which can incinerate up to 14 tonnes per hour
Contract signed:
Read more about our long-term service agreement
Two boilers,
Waste treatment:
Delivery scope:
Maximum energy:
eNext BIR reference
, Advisor at BIR AS.
“We wanted to find one supplier who could manage the entire chain, by that I mean servicing, maintenance and monitoring of the production lines as well as providing us with 24-hour support. Our assessment was that in the long term, a system-wide solution would be the most economic – and it would enable us to reduce the number of suppliers and contracts we have to manage. It is much simpler with just one service partner,” says
BIR Rådalen power plant
Kenneth Sörsdal
Long-term partnership brings savings in terms of time and money
Fortum eNext, with the most economical solution, broad knowledge and its own experience as an energy producer, fulfilled the customer's demands. The long-term, eight-year service agreement includes major and minor overhauls and year-round 24/7 support.
220,000 tonnes per year
60 MW district heating and 8 MW electricity in the winter
Turbine and generator service agreement including major and minor overhauls, remote monitoring and 24-hour support
Years 2018-2026


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators/long-term-service-agreements
Visibility - Having constant awareness of the state of the equipment means fewer surprises and enables optimised timing for maintenance activities
Watch a video on how a longer term perspective into maintenance planning supports maximisation of availability
Independent service provider with a utility background
To reach the ambitious target of 100% availability at the new combined heat and power plant in Kilpilahti, Finland, the operator of the plant, Veolia Services Suomi Oy, sought a partner for the lifecycle management of the plant’s gas and steam turbines.
Customer reference
In a long-term service agreement with Fortum eNext, the contract scope and terms are defined jointly with the customer based on the level of support needed. In the simplest form, the contract can be a frame agreement that offers support for unexpected situations and easy ordering of small standard services. An inspection agreement consists of selected inspections, condition monitoring measurements, and analysis services performed according to a predefined schedule. The deepest form of collaboration is a full-scope agreement in which Fortum eNext takes full maintenance responsibility for the turbine island, covering all the necessary maintenance actions for the whole shaft line and secondary equipment.
A long-term partnership provides
Regular inspections and condition monitoring with short enough intervals minimises risks and enables optimised timing for maintenance activities.
Long-term service agreements for turbines and generators | Fortum
Having a strong service partner gives plant owners an excellent basis for updating their maintenance plans, an understanding about why specific maintenance activities are needed, and clear guidance for planning future investments. This is a powerful tool in bringing turbine generator-related risks to an acceptable level – even if the plant’s own staff would no longer have the needed special competence on high-value and high-risk turbomachinery.
Learn more about long-term service agreements and their benefits
In today’s operating environment, a long-term approach to equipment lifecycle management and maintenance is often missing. Long-term service agreements by Fortum eNext are specifically designed to handle the maintenance of turbine generators throughout the equipment lifetime.
Read the case story
The Norwegian BIR Avfallsenergi AS (BIR) signed an eight-year agreement with Fortum eNext for turbine and generator services in 2018. The contract includes major and minor overhauls and 24-hour support to maximise availability.
Long-Term Service Agreement with BIR Avfallsenergi AS
A partnership with a competent service provider who knows the plant’s equipment history, performs continuous monitoring of its condition and spare parts management, and takes the corrective action needed before major failures occur brings clear savings to the power plant owner. If issues still do occur, no time is wasted in selecting the service provider – a knowledgeable, specialised technical support and maintenance staff is always available on short notice, so that the time and effort can be focused on fast problem solving.
Spot-on service
Continuity - Knowing the maintenance history enables precise maintenance planning and technical support to fit the actual need
Focus - When in need of support, you can focus on actual measures rather than on selecting the service provider
Agility - Secured local competences in use even 24/7 over the contract period
Maximising availability
Guarantees the best technical and most economical solution for each specific need.
Long-term service agreements for turbines and generators
Long-term service agreement for turbines and generators
Always the right fit for your needs
Continuity and best service level with long-term service agreement
The results of systematic maintenance work can be seen clearly through reduced downtime and the avoidance of unexpected breakdowns.
Fortum eNext’s expertise with a wide range of turbine generators from several different equipment manufacturers gives it the ability to cover the owner’s entire fleet of equipment from various brands. Spot-on support is available on short notice and locally for immediate and unexpected technical issues.
Long-Term Service Agreement with Veolia Kilpilahti


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/suomenoja
2004 (ongoing)
The TOPi® system has been delivered to dozens of locations around the world and thus Fortum has comprehensive experience of various types and sizes of power plants. Thanks to its modular nature, TOPi® can be flexibly configured to suit the customer’s individual needs. With the TOPi® system the customer is able to achieve savings in every aspect of their daily operations and thus maximise the efficiency of their plant.
Combined heat and power (CHP) plant
1800 GWh of electricity and 2200 GWh of heat
Yearly production:
359 MWe and 554 MWth
Espoo, Finland
The cooperation with the Suomenoja power plant has been excellent throughout the years. Prime example of this is the development of TOPi® Operational Economy (OE) tool that started from the plant’s need to enhance their operational economy even further. Together with the plant personnel a tool was developed that allows the operators to easily follow key operating parameters. The results have been excellent and the new tool has allowed Suomenoja power plant to achieve significant savings in their daily operations.
The TOPi® scope at Suomenoja includes an IP.21 database with 10500 variables, numerous process displays and separate tools for reporting, visualising operating points and operational economy. The system also incorporates integrated plant performance calculations and simulations as well as calculations for the number of start-ups and operating times for various components. Together with the plant personnel the KPI indicators and emissions monitoring have been continuously improved.
since 1977
Multiple TOPI® system projects at Suomenoja power plant, Finland | Fortum
Suomenoja power plant has in total five units. The oldest one was built in 1977 and the newest in 2009. The power plan uses coal and natural gas as sources of energy. The plant supplies district heat for the residents of Espoo, Kauniainen and Kirkkonummi and also delivers electricity to the national grid.
TOPi® Process Information and Optimization System has been used at Suomenoja power plant since 2004, when it was still owned by E.ON Finland Oy. The TOPi® system at Suomenoja has gone through multiple enlargements, the last one connecting also the Järvenpää power plant to the system.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/rwanda
Five-year agreement, signed in 2017
Fortum eNext provides operation and maintenance services including technical support and IT tools needed for the plant. In addition, Fortum eNext is responsible for the mobilisation with the O&M team starting at site.
HQ Peat-fired power plant
Fortum is committed to using modern technology to minimise emissions and other impacts of energy production on people and the environment, so the project in Rwanda fits the bill perfectly. The new peat-fired power plant is expected to increase the installed capacity in Rwanda by 40% and will bring more energy independence to the country that uses 100% foreign fuel.
Location
Fortum has significant experience in the field of energy and the implementation of projects in different countries. This together with the company's expertise in utilising challenging fuels, such as peat, contributed greatly for the customer's choice of Fortum eNext as the partner.
2 x 35 MWe installed capacity
Fortum eNext as a partner
: Rwanda, East Africa near the Burundian border
Operation and maintenance services in Rwanda, East Africa | Fortum
Facts:
4,200 hectares of peat land
Yumn Ltd in Rwanda, Africa. Main owners of Yumn Ltd: Hakan A.S (Turkey) and Quantum (Israel)
The contract is a five-year agreement. It covers the operation and maintenance (O&M) services of a new 2 x 35 MWe peat-fired power plant, including the technical services and IT tools needed for the plant. In addition, Fortum is responsible for the mobilisation phase of the new power plant. The construction phase has started in 2017.
O&M Project duration:
Customer, O&M project:
Capacity:


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/neve
Automation is a complicated investment for many operators. It is difficult to justify the modernisation of an old but functioning system, because the payback time is not easy to calculate. Modernisation is often postponed, because its benefits are not fully understood. However, when a plant actively serves as reserve for or sells electricity to the grid manager, a payback time can be calculated for automation, regardless of the scope of the investment.
loivakari
ABB Advant Controller 110
Turbine ABB STAL HP16 and MP10,  generator ABB GBA 1250 LD, nominal power 34 MW
Jukka Partanen
Modernisation of steam turbine automation brought flexibility to production – Case Neve, Finland | Fortum
"In future, each plant operating in the reserve market will have to develop its functionalities more flexibly. With the current set of controls, adjustments down and up, as well as frequency support, work very well. We have also achieved lower vibration levels,” says Production Director
Senior Product Manager, Systems
, who worked as Electrical Automation Manager at Neve during the modernisation.
The modernisation brought flexibility to operation methods and increased opportunities to operate in the electricity market
+358 40 013 9545
The project progressed according to plan and was delivered in just six months, from signing the agreement to approval. The start-up was completed as planned, and the machine went live on the first attempt.
Henri Jokkala
After the feasibility study performed by Fortum eNext and a tendering phase, Neve chose Valmet Automation as the supplier of the new system, as the plant was already using Valmet’s systems. However, auxiliary equipment and the instrumentation of the turbine island often need to be renewed in connection with modernisation, which is why Neve wanted to assign the overall responsibility for the project to a single supplier.
Suosiola combined heat and power plant (CHP), Rovaniemi, Finland
Find out more
“At first, we were planning to carry out the modernisation of automation directly with Valmet, but Fortum’s broader mechanical expertise in turbine plants was crucial. We also knew that Fortum is a reliable partner because they had previously carried out turbine revisions and generator maintenance for us. It was important for us that the project was supported by a major player in case of any unexpected events,” says
The modernisation of steam turbine automation brought flexibility to production – Case Neve, Finland
System to be replaced:
Toni Loivakari
5 reasons to modernise your control and protection systems
The electricity market has changed considerably in recent years, and even CHP plants need to increase production flexibility. They must be able to run turbines more efficiently in varying conditions.
“Modernisation has enabled participation in modern electricity trading in a new way. Participation in the frequency-controlled reserve market is no longer limited by outdated turbine automation,” says Henri Jokkala.
Equipment:
Modernisation pays off
from Neve.
In 2018, it became evident at the Suosiola power plant of Napapiirin Energia ja Vesi Oy (Neve) that the original turbine automation from 1995 was nearing the end of its life cycle. The plant wanted to find a modern solution to replace the outdated turbine automation, because it was practically impossible to implement major changes to the old system.
Local recycled wood, industrial side streams, forest chips and peat (less than 20%). Steam boiler (40 MW) and oil boiler (50 MW) in case of fault situations.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/10/turbine-control-and-protection-systems-should-be-included-maintenance-strategy
Mechanical and electrical condition monitoring, tailored to the machinery’s lifecycle phase, condition, and criticality can ensure the safe use of main rotating equipment and helps to detect any hidden flaws at an early stage. As a result, maintenance decisions can be made at the correct time, minimising the risk of unscheduled outages.
Older control and protection equipment does not usually meet modern availability and safety requirements. When modernising systems, instruments that control the main rotating equipment and the most important measurements should also be upgraded so that they do not present obstacles in the development of operating flexibility and reliability.
Turbine control and protection systems often age without notice, until one day they malfunction and cause disturbances in production. Power plant control systems should be seen as assets that produce added value and improve profitability rather than as support systems operating in the background.
Effective control systems are an important part of a power plant’s reliable and safe main rotating equipment, but they are easily forgotten when everything is running as it should and nothing unusual has occurred in the control and protection systems. Anomalies may be temporary and systems may recover on their own – until the control system breaks down permanently when the next disruption comes along. As a result, communication to other systems will not work correctly and productivity will decrease. Even though the risks of malfunctions are known, the lack of straightforward condition and aging assessments continually push the development and modernisation of control systems to “next year’s budget”.
Control systems are not part of turbine and generator manufacturers’ core business and, from the perspective of profitability monitoring, manufacturers typically recommend that customers deploy a completely new system or simply replace individual damaged components. The maintenance, development, and continuous monitoring of systems often remains with the equipment owner, with minimal support from the system manufacturer.
Often, main rotating equipment manufacturers deliver a control and protection system that is separate from the plant’s other process control systems. Integrating separate systems into the plant’s automation system makes operation and maintenance easier, increases insight into the operating equipment, and supports decision making.
Early warnings of nascent malfunctions and correctly timed maintenance through continuous condition monitoring
AI can significantly optimise processes at waste and biofuel power plants where the quality of fuel varies. AI helps to define what actions are required to optimise the process, or it can be given the power to directly impact the optimisation of controls.
Optimised operation through AI
Modernising original control and protection process equipment
Integrating turbine control and protection systems into plant-level systems
Explore our services
It is often difficult for owners to see their control systems as an important profitability factor – profits come from the main rotating machines, and control systems are not considered to have any impact. Presenting the added value of the systems, a maintenance strategy, and a risk management plan to obtain an appropriate budget is much more difficult than replacing or upgrading outdated mechanical components that repay themselves through concrete profits.
“We do not offer any standard solutions; rather, we identify each customer’s unique needs and the criticality of their equipment, and offer them the ideal customised services to ensure reliability and availability.”
Benefits gained from the modernisation of control systems:
Turbine control and protection systems should be included in the maintenance strategy | Fortum
Industrial automation systems have taken significant leaps forward and provide major benefits in terms of maximising safety, productivity, and operating flexibility. These are often ignored in long-term maintenance agreements, regrettably. However, long-term maintenance agreements can include lifecycle management and performance optimisation of the control systems. This ensures the appropriate maintenance, risk management, and development of assets that are critical for productivity.
Without a customised maintenance strategy for control systems, the risk of decreased plant reliability or availability increases as systems age. Furthermore, the potential of the IoT and AI cannot yet be fully utilised. This in turn reduces competitiveness and limits the power plant’s earning potential, for example, through their participation in the reserve market or an increase of other operating flexibility, where all the benefits of end products – be it the use of electricity, steam, or heat – in other processes can be fully leveraged.
Toni Loivakari, Senior Product Manager, Fortum eNext


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators/control-protection-systems
Control and protection systems
Getting your systems under control
Flexible turnkey solutions
Generator control and protection systems
Inspections
Expert services
Better availability
Improved performance and visibility into data reduces the risk of failures, increases operational flexibility, enables timely maintenance activities, and minimises plant downtime
Turbine and generator control and protection systems | Fortum
Our offering also includes versatile expert services, such as spot-on support for immediate and unexpected technical issues, project pre-studies, installation supervision, start-ups, process optimisation, inspections, and supplying spare parts to prolong the lifetime of your system without full modernisation. The bottom line for every assignment is to help our customers reach a top-level performance and increase availability – this is what we call getting your systems under control.
Extensive engineering capabilities from an independent service provider
Fortum eNext’s comprehensive solutions for control and protection systems offer support and expertise throughout your equipment lifetime. We provide a range of services – from smaller inspections to full modernisations of turbine-generators’ control and protection systems, and we can take overall responsibility for your project. As an OEM-independent service provider, we have the ability to service a wide range of equipment from different manufacturers and to define an optimal scope and solution for each specific need. Typically, a modular project execution is an ideal approach since it allows the work to be divided into smaller stages, thereby reducing the risks and complexity involved and ultimately leading to cost savings. The life cycle phase of the equipment also has to be considered. An example of this is replacing parts only after they have reached the end of their lifespan.
Even when carefully maintained, control and protection systems require upgrades and modernisations from time to time to ensure the continuation of safe and reliable operation. Whether you are looking for a replacement for existing obsolete equipment, maintenance services with a short response time, or improvements in the overall performance of systems, an experienced partner with a local support network and deep knowledge in the field of turbines, generators, and processes is highly valuable.
Condition monitoring systems
Modernisations
Modular executions allow the work to be split into smaller stages, thereby reducing the risks and complexity involved and maximising efficiency
Ability to provide open systems with knowledge of multiple manufacturers’ equipment
Guaranteed performance for your monitoring, control, and protection systems
Turbine control and protection systems


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/blog/enext/5-reasons-to-modernise-turbine-generator-systems
5 reasons to modernise your turbine and generator control and protection systems | Fortum
An efficient way to improve availability and to minimise unscheduled outages is to do the modernisation in a flexible and modular way. This is an ideal approach, since it allows the work to be divided into smaller stages, thereby reducing the risks and complexity involved and ultimately leading to cost savings.
Our maintenance costs are high
Compared with modern systems, the monitoring capabilities in old turbines and generators are very limited. However, it is very important to improve the visibility of your rotating equipment status and to develop the limiters so that you don’t run into unwanted shutdowns of the turbine. Plant operators should have access to precise information for the optimal operation area and, in the event of an unwanted shutdown, a clear picture of the reasons for the shutdown. Good visibility into operational data supports the correct decision making and improves the efficiency of both operation and maintenance.
When planning the modernisation, it is wise to look at the whole chain of control and protection and to consider developing and renewing also the field equipment. New sensors and field equipment make it possible to improve the monitoring, control, and protection capability of the high-risk and high-value turbomachinery.
eNext blog
Obsolete equipment spare parts are costly and maintenance needs are very high. Equipment reaching its end of life can cause numerous unscheduled outages, because of failures. New equipment reduces the costs and the need for spares. At the same time, better support and online testing capabilities during operation also reduce maintenance costs. This provides a better understanding of the equipment condition and supports well-timed maintenance actions.
We need to improve availability and replace existing obsolete equipment
We would like to have better visibility to systems to understand the root causes of failures
5 reasons to modernise your turbine and generator control and protection systems
Even when carefully maintained, control and protection systems require upgrades and modernisations from time to time to ensure the continuation of safe and reliable operation. Below I have written about the five most common reasons for a power plant operator wanting to modernise their control and protection systems and how it can be done cost-effectively to improve the overall performance of systems.
18 August 2021, 13:54
Reliably and precisely working turbine and generator control and protection systems are an important part in securing the performance of your rotating main equipment. These systems also play a key role when looking for more visibility, reliability, and safety.
New systems provide more flexibility in making modifications to existing operational functions. When designing the modernisation, it is key to have in-depth discussions with the plant personnel in order to determine the current status and development needs of the control and protection functions. The target should be to automate most of the routine operations and to fine-tune the control functions and the process to enable efficient operation.
Before making the decision on the scope of the modernisation, it is advisable to conduct a study on the existing system life cycle. This is because, very often, the various parts of the system equipment are in a different life cycle phase. Based on our experience, it is totally possible to replace parts only after they have reached the end of their lifespan; a complete modernisation of the systems is not always necessary.
We need to increase operational flexibility
We want more data, reliability, and safety
Improved performance together with visibility into data reduces the risk of failures, increases operational flexibility, enables timely maintenance activities, and minimises plant downtime. We call it getting your systems under control.
Read more about remote monitoring


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators/remote-monitoring
Basic package - Process data monitoring and analysis
Case example: Generator stator winding damage
Watch a video on Fortum eNext’s approach to servicing rotating equipment involving continuous and real-time condition monitoring of the equipment
Read more about the case
Condition-based maintenance of turbines and generators at its best
20 hours of expert support annually included
Remote Monitoring is a natural part of a Long-Term Service Agreement
Advanced package - Process and vibration data monitoring and analysis
Ideal for small-sized municipal utilities
A failure of a turbine or generator often comes as an unexpected and unwelcome surprise for the operator. What’s more, if the right spare parts are not readily available, the resulting downtime can be significantly prolonged and lead to significant production losses, where the cost of unavailability easily rises very high.
Maximum package - Process, vibration and electrical data monitoring and analysis
By identifying early signs of faults and disturbances, and setting up alerts if values fall outside of the expected range, it is possible to gain time to react and plan proactive measures before equipment failure. Should a sudden issue nevertheless occur, the available data helps our experts find the root cause without delay, and without unnecessary travelling and extensive on-site measurements. This means lower maintenance costs for our customers, as they only need to pay for the concrete work done by the experts.
Remote monitoring of turbine island prevents unplanned downtime
Remote Monitoring use cases
Case example: Blade damage at an industrial plant
Periodic reporting and 60 hours of expert support annually included
Remote monitoring service is a natural extension of a long-term service agreement for turbines and generators. Long-term service agreements are specially designed to handle maintenance activities of turbines and generators throughout the equipment lifetime, ensuring the continuity of your turbine island operations in the most optimal way.
Read more about service agreements
Keep informed on Fortum eNext news and updates
Optimising both maintenance intervals and duration
Case example: Sensor failure at a CHP plant
Periodic reporting and 100 hours of expert support annually included
Ideal for large utilities and industrial power plants
Remote monitoring of turbines and generators
Remote monitoring service offers numerous benefits:
Early detection of failures
Monitoring of process, vibration, and generator electrical data enables comprehensive condition monitoring and O&M optimisation of the turbine island
Monitoring process and vibration data enables fast remote support as well as proactive maintenance planning and performance optimisation
Fortum eNext has developed the remote monitoring service to be able to identify and react instantly to abnormal operational situations and anomalies of turbines and generators. Automated remote monitoring with a real-time data stream captures valuable operational, vibration and electrical data from a local power plant, and transfers it to experts at our remote support centre for monitoring and analysis without delay. The experts' accurate, fast and proactive responses to early fault indications and performance deteriorations decrease unplanned downtime and repair needs, thus decreasing maintenance and overhaul costs.
Long-term operational trends and KPI follow-up
Remote turbine and generator monitoring and diagnostics services | Fortum eNext
Remote connection to data enables fast support from the remote support centre and expert network
Fast response and instant support from expert network
Proactive maintenance and performance optimisation measures
Minimising unavailability, maintenance time and cost
Ideal for small- and medium-sized municipal utilities
Thermal power
The remote turbines and generator condition monitoring can help power producers prevent unplanned downtimes, equipment failures and performance degradation. In addition to minimising risks this way, the results can also be seen in optimised overhaul timings and shorter overhaul duration. All this not only brings savings in costs but also increased peace of mind.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators/remote-monitoring/blade-damage
Turbine blade damage at an industrial plant - Case example | Fortum eNext
Manufacturing new blades, balancing the rotor and reassembly took 10 weeks. In the worst case scenario, even more blades and other expensive parts could have been damaged.
Periodical reporting and 60 hours of expert support annually included
Ideal for small and medium-sized municipal utilities
The turbine had comprehensive shaft vibration measurements, but no bearing vibration measurements. The customer had not detected exceeded vibration or any other problem.
Case description: Blade failure at industrial plant
Remote monitoring would have eliminated the need for the initial on-site inspection, calibrations, and travelling. Furthermore, installed bearing vibration sensors would have enabled identification of the damaging event earlier, making it possible for the operator to plan the overhaul and preparatory works based on the maintenance schedule of the entire facility.
Remote monitoring would have revealed the damaged turbine blade and prevented an unscheduled overhaul.
Back to Fortum eNext Turbine and Generator services main page
Case example: Blade damage at industrial plant
During planned on-site inspections at customer’s industrial plant, Fortum eNext experts discovered heavy absolute vibrations on the turbine. Our experts recommended shutting down the unit and performing a borescope inspection.
Remote Monitoring Advanced package: process and vibration data monitoring and analysis
The inspection revealed a damaged turbine rotor blade, resulting in an unscheduled overhaul.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators/remote-monitoring/generator-stator-winding
After two years of operation the stator winding failed (earth fault) during the condition monitoring test done in the next overhaul. Vibrations of loosened stator end winding had harmed the main winding insulation to an extent where, despite extensive retightening, the winding failed again.
During a standard overhaul at a pulp mill, Fortum eNext experts discovered extensive looseness in the generator stator end winding. There were no noticeable changes in the operational data of the generator that could have indicated problems.
Monitoring of process, vibration, and generator electrical data enables comprehensive condition monitoring and O&M optimisation of turbine island
A “quick” repair was done by replacing the damaged part of the winding with a new one to bring the machine back into operation. This repair extended the planned overhaul by several weeks, causing significant loss of production. At this point, a decision was made to fully rewind the stator in the coming year.
Remote Monitoring Maximum package: process, vibration and electrical data monitoring and analysis
The end winding areas were cleaned, retightened and painted, extending the overhaul by a week and causing loss of production for the owner.
Periodical reporting and 100 hours of expert support annually included
Case example: Generator stator winding damage at a pulp mill
Case description: Generator stator winding damage at a pulp mill
Generator stator winding failure at a pulp mill - Case example | Fortum eNext
Significant loss of production at a pulp mill could have been avoided with remote monitoring.
Remote monitoring would have detected the end winding looseness both in end winding vibration and increasing stator PD values at the stage of development. It would have enabled planned repairs at an early stage instead of emergency repair when the damages were already severe. The lifetime of the stator could have been extended significantly and, moreover, remote monitoring would have saved the customer several weeks of production and extensive repair costs.
Go to Fortum eNext Turbine and Generator Services main page


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators/remote-monitoring/sensor-failure
Case description: Sensor failure at a CHP plant
Fortunately, this time the operational data was available; otherwise, determining the reason for the shut down would have required on-site borescope, bearing inspection and travelling to the site.
6 hours of unavailability could have been avoided with basic process data monitoring.
Our expert recognised that only one signal of many exceeded the alarm limit for a couple of seconds. Further discussions with the customer revealed that the sensor and cabling had been exposed by hot steam.
Remote connection to data enables fast support from the remote support center and expert network
Remote monitoring would have enabled instant data access for Fortum eNext experts through a real-time data stream. An in-depth analysis could have been conducted right away and the unavailability could have been decreased from 6 hours to only 1 hour.
Remote Monitoring Basic package: process data monitoring and analysis
Sensor failure
Exceeding a turbine vibration limit caused the turbine to shut down at our customer’s CHP plant. The customer contacted Fortum eNext for advice and our expert conducted a root-cause analysis on the basis of operational data on bearing vibrations and temperatures. The data was provided by the customer in a separate Excel file.
Turbine sensor failure at a CHP plant- Case example | Fortum eNext


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/lakeside
Operation and maintenance management
Plant performance after commercial operation exceeded expected performance level
The EfW component burns primarily the residues from source segregated domestic waste. Provision has been made to provide the energy to local enterprises. Lakeside is a leading example of the UK’s EfW industries.
37 MWe / 410,000 tonnes of residual waste per year. Two 27 t/h incineration streams utilising advanced and proven moving grate technology
Full scope O&M Mobilisation and Management
Fortum O&M management tools in place ensuring the business is effectively & efficiently managed
Joint Venture Grundon Waste Management and Viridor Waste Management. Project duration: 2007–2012
Integrated management system in place before commercial operation date (COD): All three ISO standards in place within four months of commercial operation.
Take-over of the plant into commercial operation
Implementation of the integrated management system:  ISO 9001, ISO 14001 and OHSAS 18001
High level of EHS and safety processes in place providing continual high standard of EHS at site
Fortum management team at site: Plant Manager, Operations Manager and Technical Manager
Lakeside Energy from Waste (EfW) is a joint venture project between two of the UK’s leading recycling and waste management companies; Grundon Waste Management and Viridor.
O&M Services for Lakeside Energy from Waste Plant, UK | Fortum
O&M staff mobilisation, recruiting and training
Fortum’s Integrated Management System based on TOPGen® consept in use at the plant
Training program at site including competency matrix development, EHS and staff introduction training and safety training
Start-up in April 2010
Lakeside Energy from Waste (EfW) Location: Near Heathrow, Colnbrook, United Kingdom
Job descriptions and recruitment process for the remaining staff, 41 persons, was handled by Fortum
Under the contract Fortum was responsible for:
Fortum’s IT tools tailored to customer’s needs
Technology transfer


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/jyvaskylan-voima
Foster Wheeler
Watch the customer story in video format
Since the overhaul, it has been possible to operate the machine without any power range or running mode restrictions. The total expansion efficiency of the HP turbine has increased by more than 4%.
Turbine revision returned the guaranteed efficiency values – Case Jyväskylän Voima, Finland | Fortum
LMZ
Jyväskylän Voima power plant
In the beginning, Fortum eNext’s assignment consisted of a regular operating hour-based overhaul involving opening the turbine. Based on the known problems, the assignment also included the balancing of the IP rotor and realignment of the bed. Both parties also wished to identify what was causing the turbine’s unusual vibration behaviour.
Alex Schreckenbach
Turbine-generator:
, who is in charge of operations at the Keljonlahti power plant, says that he particularly appreciates the fact that the project was completed on schedule and delivered on the previously agreed dates, even though it consisted of several partial deliveries and included many challenges and surprises.
Overall, the entire project was extensive.
60% wood-based biomass, 40% peat
in 2010
While some damage had been predicted, the overall scope of the damage came as a surprise. The original ten-week project extended to nearly seven months.
Keljonlahti CHP in Jyväskylä, Finland, producing electricity and heat for the surrounding community
The Keljonlahti power plant, commissioned in 2010, is a biofuel power plant in Central Finland producing electricity and district heat for the Jyväskylä area. An overhaul that would involve opening the turbine had already been planned in Keljonlahti since 2015, when certain irregularities were detected in the behaviour of the turbine.
“The fact that Fortum was able to repair such major damage within such a short time really proves its strong expertise and flexibility," he says.
Watch the video
500 MW


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/icanadolu
2015–2017
Start-up in August 2016
High level of EHS and safe system of work processes in place providing continual high standard of EHS at site
İçanadolu Doğalgaz Elektrik Üretim A.Ş. power company, owned by GAMA Energy
İçanadolu combined-cycle power plant
Creating the Environmental, Health and Safety process (EHS)  with the customer
Strong strategy in O&M mobilisation, recruiting and training information demonstrating high level of team competencies
Providing guidance and tools for Operation and Maintenance Management
Mr. Tanju Oral, plant manager of İçanadolu CCGT
Providing guidance and tools for O&M Staff mobilisation, recruiting and training
Fortum’s Integrated Management System based on TOPGen® concept in place ensuring the business is efficiently managed with the end user interface in mind
O&M Consulting Services including Management Consultancy providing mobilisation tools, Integrated Management System (IMS), Training and Recruitment Tools, IT tools as Plant’s Asset and Maintenance Solution (Maximo®)
Technology transfer selecting and deploying needed IT tools: e.g. plant’s asset and maintenance management solution (Maximo®) and its training and development
O&M consultancy services for Içanadolu combined-cycle power plant, Turkey | Fortum
840 MWe natural gas fired CCGT
Implementation of Fortum’s Integrated Management System (IMS)
The İçanadolu Power Plant supplies the needed generation capacity to the national power supply system and provides a flexible and reliable backup power source to accommodate fluctuations of renewable energy sources.
Providing Fortum’s expertise with criticality analysis for the plant maintenance and spare parts strategy
Kirikkale, about 80 km east of Ankara, Turkey
"We will greatly benefit from Fortum's extensive O&M experience in their fleet and global presence as a service provider. Up to date, we have recorded significant progress with satisfactory results, which is promising for the future of the project."


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/tees
2017 - ongoing
Digital solutions provided by Fortum eNext
CMMS is Fortum's maintenance management solution based on IBM Maximo, offering all necessary information about process locations, equipment and storage. It helps e.g. planning the maintenance and outage processes and improves plant availability and efficiency. TOP
Modern O&M digital  tools are provided for training and effective management of daily operation and maintenance activities
i
Our operations are certified in accordance with the ISO 9001:2015, ISO 14001:2015 and ISO 45001:2018 quality management systems.
Implementation of Fortum’s Safety Management System
due to start in 2020
Long-term operation & maintenance (O&M) agreement (signed in 2016). Full-scope O&M.
O&M staff recruitment
Under long-term operation and maintenance contract, Fortum is responsible for the full-scope operation and maintenance activities at the plant, including mobilisation, staffing, operation and maintenance, management of a steam turbine with a long-term service agreement as well as the implementation of Fortum's O&M digital tools CMMS and TOP
Overall management of power plant operation and maintenance activities
Management of EPC training and provision of Fortum’s O&M training to ensure motivated and multi-skilled staff
Fortum Safety Management System ensures a high level of EHS and safe system of work processes at the site
New 299 MWe biomass-fired CHP plant in Teesside, UK. Fueled by wood pellets and chips from the
Fortum’s world-class operation and maintenance concept and extensive experience as an owner and operator of biomass-fired power plants was one of the most important reasons for why Fortum eNext was chosen as operation and maintenance partner at the new power plant. When starting its commercial operation, the 299 MW Tees renewable energy plant in the UK will be the largest and most efficient dedicated biomass-fired power plant in the world. The plant will be using wood pellets and chips from the United States and Europe as the fuel.
O&M services for Tees biomass-fired renewable energy plant, United Kingdom | Fortum
Cost-effective management of operation and maintenance activities and optimised power plant lifetime costs
MGT Teesside Limited, in the UK
Fortum’s Integrated Management System (IMS) based on TOPGen® concept in use at the plant. TOPGen® concept is a combination of organisational excellence, open leadership, multiskilled persons and technical expertise and fulfils the ISO quality certificate requirements.
Middlesborough, North-East England
Fortum’s Operation and Maintenance IT systems including TOPi® and CMMS Fortum’s Maintenance Management Solution
The Tees renewable energy power station will burn wood chips and pellets to generate electricity for the equivalent of 600,000 homes, 24 hours a day. Meet the UK renewable energy target of 15% of all energy by 2020.
® is an energy management system for real-time monitoring and optimisation of power plant processes.
The United States and Europe.
Process risk assessment (HAZOP)
Certified Quality of thermal plants
Owner:
Management of EPC training
Power output and customers:
Integrated Management System (IMS) in place before Commercial Operating Date (COD)
®. The full-scope operation and maintenance mean that Fortum eNext takes the overall responsibility for power plant operation and maintenance activities including operational and service management as well as for the personnel.
Provision of Fortum O&M training
High plant availability and reliability
Optimised power plant performance


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/smart-operations/holistic-om-approach
Working hard every day to achieve our target of zero accidents
Blog post
Our O&M portfolio covers all activities necessary to operate your plant safely, sustainably and economically: O&M advisory, planning, mobilisation, and daily operation and maintenance services as well as long-term service agreements for turbines and generators. The scope of the contract will be tailored to match your individual requirements.
Impact on net present value (NPV) compared to average plant operator
Impact on plant availability compared to average plant operator
In recognition of our high standards, in 2019 the Royal Society for the Prevention of Accidents (RoSPA) honoured us with a fifth consecutive President's Award for the Grangemouth CHP plant in Scotland. Fortum O&M (UK) Ltd provides operation and maintenance services for the plant.
Our full-scope O&M starts with O&M advisory services regarding technical and commercial issues, design reviews and advice concerning long-term service agreements with main equipment vendors.
0 injuries
Fortum strives to minimise the environmental impact of energy production. Safety is always a top priority at our company.
Create long-term value with a holistic O&M approach
Create long-term value with a holistic O&M approach | Fortum
Back to Fortum eNext Smart Operations main page
Ensure a successful O&M implementation with a reliable partner
+5%
High standards in EHSQ enable operational excellence
In the planning and mobilisation phases, we are responsible for mobilising plant operations, including establishing the O&M organisation and integrated management system as well as the required digital solutions and safety systems. Facilitating smooth onboarding and getting the plant up and running on schedule are our highest priorities.
After the start of commercial operations, we take full responsibility for the O&M of the customer's power plant, including planning , performing daily operations, plant maintenance, material and resource management and implementing continual improvements. As supplementary services, we can assume responsibility for such functions as ash handling, overhauls and upgrades. The precise scope and deliverables can be negotiated based on customer needs and priorities.
+100 m€


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/09/securing-long-term-benefits-your-energy-waste-plant
EfW plants also have to avoid negative publicity. Owners and investors view EfW plants as fitting their “clean world” environmental principles. Non-compliance damages their reputation and can make their next planning application troublesome. So the plant has to be a good, invisible neighbour and operate strictly within all the environmental requirements.
So an EfW plant will have an operating regime of long-term base load and requires maintenance to be carried out with the absolute minimum downtime that keeps the plant in good condition for its resale value.
What is particularly important for owners of EfW plants from the point of view of operation and maintenance?
An EfW plant is different from other thermal power plants in that it is paid to take it’s fuel. With about 70% of the revenue coming from the Gate Fee, as much waste as possible has to be processed, the power export price doesn’t have much influence on the EfW plants operating regime. Predictions show the UK has a residual waste capacity gap for probably the next 15+ years and maybe longer as exported waste becomes unacceptable for the receiving country.
Consider also that the minimum expected Gate Fees, driven by Landfill Tax, and the sector becomes very attractive for investors. These investors are not necessarily involved for the long haul, we see news of UK EfW assets changing hands almost every month as owners make decisions on when to maximise their returns.
What is needed in ensuring the technical and economic performance of the power plant?
Team efficacy, back-up support, training and development. These will produce a confident O&M team who will repay that investment with high availability and reliability of the EfW plant whilst maintaining its condition to fulfil its life expectancy.
About the expert
To top all the requirements in terms of safety, efficiency and desired return on investment in running a modern EfW power plant, a competent O&M partner is a valuable asset.
We are excited to announce that Fortum eNext will be exhibiting jointly with Uniper at RWM on 22-23 September at the NEC Birmingham. To find out more about how we can help you to operate your EfW plant, visit our stand 5-V210 where we have put together a comprehensive programme for plant owners, operators, engineers and asset managers.
We need to ensure the O&M team are trained and developed to fulfil their potential as individuals. Training and development programmes are an essential management function. As well as allowing individual to perform their existing duties competently, it means succession planning is a constantly taking place in the background.
Steve Hawes, Business Development Director
This O&M team cannot know and do everything. They need expert back-up for trouble shooting, outage planning and outage execution. Fortum, and now also Uniper Engineering, provide this support.
Fortum is one of the very few energy utility companies and asset owners offering O&M services to third parties. Our know-how has as well been developed and tested during our 25-year-long presence in the UK and Ireland, where we have delivered power plants and long-term operation and maintenance services for different kinds of power plants and customers. We asked
Predictable planned outages allow the waste procurement team to be confident that the predicted deliveries will be met. Not only does this mean predictable income from the Gate fees, power export and the Capacity Market, it also avoids disruption in the waste supply chain with associated contractual implications such as minimum tonnages and Gate Fees for diverted waste.
Full scope O&M means that all the costs of maintaining the plant are included in the O&M Fee. The Operator takes the risk of the scheduled and unscheduled maintenance costs all within the O&M Fee, and also has performance guarantees that compensate the owner for periods of plant downtime.
What are the key elements of successfully performing full-scope O&M services?
These experts have broader experience of many different power plants and their problems than the site O&M team have and provide key advise and recommendations. Back-up support also means making the most of digital solutions in terms of Fortum and Uniper bespoke software for remote plant performance monitoring. Experts, working remotely, are able to advise on pro-active measures before a deviation in the process becomes an event.
, expert for O&M business at Fortum eNext, about the essential elements of successfully operating an Energy-from-Waste plant long into the future.
What are the long-term benefits of carefully planned and executed operation and maintenance?
Steve Hawes has worked in the UK power sector for over 40 years. He joined Fortum in 1992 and has held management positions in implementing Fortum’s 3rd party O&M Contracts in CGCT and EfW plants. Since then his role is Business Development which includes identifying and securing 3rd party O&M business for Fortum in EFW, biomass and CCGT projects in the UK and other selected regions. More recently this has expended to include Design - Build - Operate opportunities in District Heating, with one such project ongoing in Dublin since May 2021.
Carefully planned operation and maintenance of the EfW plant will ensure high availability and reliability with predictable downtime. Scheduled outages, both minor and major, that are carefully planned well in advance, allow the maintenance to be executed with the minimum downtime and optimum cost.
Securing the long-term benefits of your Energy-from-Waste Plant | Fortum
The size of the O&M team is “just enough” and so to take on this responsibility they need to be able to perform the O&M in an efficient manner. This is where Fortum’s Integrated Management System is so important. The IMS has been under continuous development since its inception in our first UK O&M Contracts over 25 years ago. The IMS contains concise procedures on how the O&M is to be planned and executed, and how the stakeholders expectations are fulfilled. It has defined responsibilities so that every member knows their role. Every activity or event the O&M team face is “business as usual” for them.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/digital-solutions/topi
Whole power plant personnel from operators to management can use the tool
TOPi® also offers other added-value applications that can be used to support several plant operations in a smart way. With the production optimisation application, clients can produce accurate production estimates both for short and longer periods of time. Production optimisation models are managed using a versatile graphical planning environment that supports any kind of production fleet.
(PDF, 350 KB)
Process information and optimisation with TOPi® | Fortum
User-friendliness
(PDF, 521 KB)
Process (Process Information Management)
Modular structure ensures a perfect fit for your needs
TOPi® has three main modules
Improved performance
TOPi real-time monitoring tool
(PDF, 446 KB)
Compatible with various automation systems
TOPi® is easy to use and presents information in a highly visual, user-friendly way
OE (Operational Economy)
TOPi®’s modular structure ensures that the focus is always on bringing you the most benefits
TOPi® is a versatile and user-friendly tool
The main function of the TOPi® process information system is to monitor equipment performance and enhance power plant maintenance. At Fortum’s O&M sites, the tool is used to collect data from the defined DCS interface, store long history into the process database, and produce new information, such as calculations and reports, based on the data gathered. As an example, the system enables detailed process performance calculations with online and offline data, as well as emission and fuel consumption forecasts. The information is presented in a user-friendly way on process displays, as trend charts or reports, enabling an in-depth analysis and informed operational decision-making to improve the performance of the plant.
TOPi® is compatible with various automation systems, and the whole power plant personnel – from operators to management – can use the tool.
Modular structure
EMS (Energy Management System)
TOPi® general info card
TOPi® Browser module info card
TOPi® Titan Release Notes 2022-10
TOPi® enables informed operational decisions
(PDF, 433 KB)
Creating KPIs based on combined data from various sources enables a holistic approach to improving plant performance
TOPi® Operational Economy module info card
Back to Digital Solutions main page
The operational economy module is designed for easy and simple follow-up of the plant’s operational situation through chosen key performance indicators. With the environmental performance module, plant emission data can be reported with the required mode and frequency, depending on the plant needs (WID, LCP, etc.) The system is scalable and the modular structure always ensures a perfect fit for your needs.
TOPi® Energy Management System module info card
(PDF, 389 KB)
TOPi® Process module info card


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/digital-solutions/topi/titan
ProView:
General:
TOPi Release news 2019-09
Data can be exported in CSV file format used by TOPi DM / Filecom through the "Save to file" functionality or through automatic reports (LA004660-4041)
An information message is shown to the user when they enable or disable a user (LA004660-4455)
Improve stability of the API Gateway component (LA004660-4313)
Editor: Saving and deleting ProView displays is now faster (LA004660-4095)
Production Plan: Fixed a bug where status info couldn't be loaded if the values have never been edited (LA004660-4466)
Calculations:
Editor: Fixed a bug where a display could not be saved after resizing elements (LA004660-4260)
Constant Parameter Entry:
Editor: Fixed a bug where the checkbox in the properties dialog jumped to next row when using some languages (LA004660-4439)
ProTrend:
Mozilla Firefox ESR 91
In monitor view, resize graph to window size and move controls to bottom (LA004660-4303)
Added possibility to filter users by their information (like first or last name, username, email, default category etc.) (LA004660-4323)
Fix a bug where not all records are visible when adding a link to a record and folders with same name exist in different categories (LA004660-4418)
Mozilla Firefox ESR 102
Microsoft Edge (Chromium-based) (latest version at the time of release)
Formula Editor dialog: Provide the user an easier way to input a conditional clause (LA004660-3837)
Disallow creating multiple users with a username that only differs in case (e.g. "user" and "USER") (LA004660-3600)
Admin application:
Data sources:
Fixed a bug where the default dashboard opened would change from time to time (LA004660-4477)
Google Chrome (latest version at the time of release)
Supported browsers:
Aspen: Improve stability by switching to another JDBC-ODBC bridge component (LA004660-4415)
Fixed a bug where the dashboard returned to would be different from the one that was just edited (LA004660-4476)
TOPi® Titan 2022.10.0 covers a wide set of enhanced features to define more flexible displays and reports for daily process monitoring and production planning purposes.
The calculation type (average, sum etc.) can be changed for all variables in a report at once through a drop-down menu in the column header (LA004660-4434)
In monitor view, move controls to bottom (LA004660-4303)
Production Plan: Possibility to have 5 values above the graph so that they fit in one line (previously if there were over 4 values, the rest of them went into the next line) (LA004660-4426)
Added possibility to customize the text in the first row (header) and third row (additional description) in table column header. The second (description) row was already customizable. (LA004660-4435)
Production Plan, Guideline: Values above the graph use larger font for better visibility (LA004660-4426)
Logbook:
Fix a bug where the user can't log in if the database and application server clocks have a time difference of over 5 minutes (LA004660-4427)
Formula Editor dialog: The "Allow other users to edit" setting is now on by default. This should prevent cases where other users can't edit a formula that has been created by a user that has e.g. left the company.
Make the user language selection a dropdown that lists only the available languages instead of being a free-text field (LA004660-4320)
(PDF, 249 KB)
Dashboard:
Fix a rarely occurring bug where a TOPi application is not properly loaded and the browser window remains blank (LA004660-4448)
When adding new variables to a display, by default a range effect is added that gives the value a red background if the status of the value is not good. The effect can be removed if it is not wanted. Existing displays and variables are not affected. (LA004660-4279)
Moved the "Mass delete" link from Variables tab to Loader tab (LA004660-4411)
(PDF, 147 KB)
Fix a problem where a PDF report couldn't be generated if entries had fonts that didn't exist on the server (LA004660-4110)
TOPi® Selene release notes 2020-9
Configurator:
Production Plan, Guideline: Hour labels in graph use larger font for better visibility (LA004660-4426)
Balancer:
Production Plan: "Edit" and "Send plan" buttons, the corresponding "Last edited" and "Last sent" information, the "Time left to send plan" and "Recalculation log" elements can be hidden per Balancer display if those features are not needed (LA004660-4426)
TOPi® Titan 2022.10.0 covers better usability, clarity of Views and the possibility of editing Views. In addition, new features have been added to several applications. More versatile features to define Templates and Folders for different categories in systems covering a wider production fleet. For example, enhanced features to customize header texts, edit Formulas, show common y-axis in trends and export data as CSV format for external data integration purposes. Also stability of API Gateway and Aspentech database connection have been improved, and many known application bugs have been fixed.
Production Plan: Support for 15 minute imbalance settlement period (LA004660-4399)
Disabled users are now not shown in the user list by default (LA004660-4357)
Possibility to search and filter parameter overrides in the Manage scenarios dialog (LA003727-4745)
Ordering of applications in the application list on the left changed (LA004660-3938)
Added possibility to have common y axis for all variables (LA004660-1909)
Allow templates with the same name and folder to exist in different categories (LA004660-4412)
Report:
TOPi® Hyperion release notes 2021-10
Give a better error message if a variable with same name and data source already exists (LA004660-4404)
Possibility to configure graph background color (LA004660-4326)
Ordering of applications in the Switch Application dropdown changed (LA004660-3938)
TOPi® Titan Release Notes 2022-10 | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/digital-solutions/apros-thermal
Mitigating risks through simulation
The Apros model is always plant-specific. The software also enables highly realistic simulation of operational changes, such as cold start-ups, power change responses and equipment failures.
Apros® software enables full-scale modelling and dynamic simulation of power plant processes. Also energy networks, automation and electrical systems can be modelled easily and in detail. When starting power plant operations, the Apros simulator has a fundamental role in operator training and recruiting, as it provides a safe and accurate training environment for learning how to respond to diverse situations and problems that can arise at the plant. In the commissioning phase, the time needed for training operators is remarkably shorter, and onboarding new employees later on is also easy.
Practicing skills for responding to challenging situations mitigates risks effectively
Accurate power plant simulation
Customer’s comment in the Fortum customer satisfaction survey.
"Apros® is our cost saver, risk reducer, business enabler and business optimiser."
See the video and get to know more about Apros®
Quick and efficient onboarding of operators
Dynamic simulation with Apros® software | Fortum
Apros® enables dynamic and realistic simulation of power plant processes
Full-scale modelling and dynamic simulation of power plant processes made easy
Operator training made easy


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/digital-solutions/ibm-maximo
Fortum Asset and Maintenance Management system | Fortum
through an effective maintenance strategy based on accurate condition monitoring
Reduced maintenance costs and optimised spares holding (=capex)
through predictive maintenance and a systematic way of working
Market driven
Highly developed production automation and profit demands put requirements on maintenance management at power plants. Equipment must operate reliably without unexpected failures or production breaks. The Fortum Asset and Maintenance Management solution is utilised at Fortum’s O&M sites for managing assets and procurement.
Reduced downtime
through better work planning and scheduling
Improved asset lifetime and productivity
Professional maintenance management with a customised Maximo solution
IBM Maximo Solution
The maintenance regime is based on a suitable maintenance strategy updated through continuous asset condition reporting. The acquired maintenance data is used for planning and scheduling maintenance work and outages, optimising spare parts holding, and managing inventories and procurement. This structured way of working ensures work safety and quality. Maximo provides good reporting capabilities for planning and analysing maintenance effectiveness and costs.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/12/case-forsmark-kraftgrupp-ab-forsmark-boiling-water-reactor-simulation-applications-apros-power-uprate-compatibility-analysis-safety-analysis
After the Fukushima accident in Japan in 2011, the European Council stated that the safety of all EU nuclear power plants should be reviewed. On May 25th, 2011, the Swedish Radiation Safety Authority SSM required all Swedish Nuclear Power Plants (NPP) to perform reassessments in accordance with the joint specifications for the stress tests as agreed between European Nuclear Safety Regulatory authorities and the European Commission, within the framework of ENSREG. In 2014, SSM presented its Independent Core Cooling (ICC) requirements to FKA. The requirement for an ICC function is to maintain the ability to ensure reactor core cooling for at least 72 hours in the case of a long-term loss of external power supply. This capability has to be sustained even in combination with extreme conditions such as exceptional weather conditions, earthquakes, etc.
Calculation of steam flow through remaining valve
Calculation of real Forsmark plant transients and comparison to plant data
Analysis of steam reheater
- Magnus Adolfsson, Nuclear Safety Engineer, FKA, Vattenfall
One of the strengths with our Apros model is that we relatively fast can answer complex questions from projects or in regards to the daily operation and give preliminary but still accurate results in an early phase. This supports the organization in decision making. The Apros model has also been valuable in different projects to compare and verify different simulations or calculations performed by suppliers."
LBLOCA
Load rejection with transition to house load operation
Post-Fukushima requirements and Independent Core Cooling system analysis
In the pressure protection analysis of the moisture separator reheater (MSR) for Forsmark 3, FKA had ordered the analysis work from external supplier to calculate transient scenario where all Low Pressure Turbine Control Valves (LPTCV) would close simultaneously. FKA also compared the supplier analysis to the Apros analysis results done by FKA, and differences in the expected pressure behavior were found between these two analysis results. Thus, it was important to identify and explain these differences between the analysis results before proceeding further in the project. After making detailed analysis and sorting out different possible causes, it was found out that the difference was due to omission of relevant pipeline between High Pressure Turbine (HPT) exhaust to LPTCV in the supplier model. This pipeline was included in the extensive Apros analysis model. The detailed piping model included in the Apros model brought up the fact that there was a certain delay caused by this piping, which then caused LPTCV to open later in Apros analysis, and thus the pressure in the piping would increase to the acceptance criteria level.
In order to support the ICC project, FKA decided to use Apros to calculate the needed analysis for Safety Assessment Report (SAR) update, since over the years FKA had developed their own in-house competence in using Apros. This analysis work consisted of creating the model of the new ICC system and including that as part of their existing plant analysis models, but also to document the developed models in very detailed way. Also, the Apros code capability to calculate official safety analysis needed to be proven to SSM, since FKA had not used Apros to calculate their official safety analysis in Sweden before. So extensive validation and verification work needed to be done. Fortum and VTT had earlier prepared a comprehensive certification package of Apros, which included the general code description and validation procedures of Apros code. In addition to this certification package, FKA calculated other validation cases specific for their own BWR plant and ICC design to SSM.
Adaption of trip levels to avoid overpressure
Forsmark 2 model development and use in power uprate project
Calculation of pressure in steam reheater in case of accidental closure of low pressure shut-off valves
Comparison calculations to GOBLIN and COPTA codes, which have been used for FKA SAR analysis earlier
Forsmark Kraftgrupp AB (FKA) operates three boiling water reactors in Sweden. Forsmark 1 and 2 are similar in design, whereas Forsmark 3 operates on higher power level. The total capacity of the three units is 3271 MWe. All plants are BWR reactors designed by the former Swedish company ASEA-ATOM (F1 and F2 are of type BWR69 and F3 is of type BWR75). The three units have been commissioned in 1980, 1981 and 1985. The Forsmark power plant is situated on the Swedish east coast about 150 km north of Stockholm in Östhammar Municipality.
Etc.
Experiment 3061: 100% (area) split break in the external recirculation loop with activation of ADS around 1 s after the initiating event
The power uprate project for Forsmark unit 2 was implemented during 2009–2011 and this unit has been operating on the uprated power level ever since.
Experiment 4011: Double ended guillotine break in one of the four external recirculation loops
FKA assessed the options for performing the complex plant compatibility analyses and chose Apros as the simulation tool since it provided the possibility to simultaneously simulate the dynamics of the complete water/steam cycle including reactor, turbines, condenser, feed water system and control and automation systems using detailed physical models with high accuracy.
Risk for self closure of parallel valve due to large flow
Main steam valve isolation
As a first step towards the power uprate compatibility analyses, an "as-built" Apros model of Forsmark 2 (base model) was developed by Fortum for FKA in 2008. The model was validated against plant transient measurements. During 2009, the model was updated into an uprated model and compatibility analysis were carried out to ensure that the new design performed as planned. Apros was used to investigate and analyze margins and different acceptance criteria to different plant transients. These analyses gave FKA preliminary insight to the future plant behavior and also some insight to how the commission test with the real uprated plant should be carried out.
Fault in feed water controller
In the containment safety analysis in Forsmark 2, FKA wanted to investigate if Apros containment modelling tools would be suitable for their needs, as it was in FKA interest to find a modern software for containment system analysis purposes. A master thesis work was carried out to evaluate Apros in containment analysis area and a similar containment model was developed by FKA personnel with Apros as was used in COPTA simulation code, which was in use at FKA for containment analysis purposes. FKA calculated two containment incidents with both codes: a valve-failure in the reactor pressure relief system and large steam pipe break (LOCA) case. Overall, a good agreement between Apros and COPTA code was found out as the result of this master thesis work.
In 2004, Forsmark Kraftgrupp AB (FKA) decided to start a project to upgrade F2 power level from 900 MWe to 1118 MWe. The power uprate project included replacing components in the reactor vessels as well as exchange and redesign of parts in other process systems and modifications of control and automation system. Due to the planned extensive changes and modifications in the plant process and control systems, there was a need to perform plant compatibility analyses to make sure that the whole power plant system would function as planned.
Analysis of adapted plant for power uprate without and with increased thermal power
Experiment 5052: Double ended guillotine break in one of the four external recirculation loops
Accidental closure of main steam valve
In outage planning, it is important to ensure there is adequate residual heat cooling available at all times. In some FKA outages, there is a big demand for cooling power to transfer the residual heat away from the nuclear fuel, and planning and handling of the complex system configurations needed for this residual heat removal is a challenging task. To analyze different residual heat transfer rates and system configurations, FKA used Apros to find the balance between the generated residual heat and cooling power, studied the dynamic behavior in case of system failures and also examined the possibilities of new system configurations to handle the residual heat transfer during the outages.
Beginning of Apros® use in Forsmark Kraftgrupp AB
Following analysis cases were calculated with both the base model and uprated model:
FKA submitted their SAR including the Apros calculated deterministic safety analysis results to SSM in spring 2020 and in December 2020 FKA received the response from SSM stating that the FKA planned ICC system was accepted to be taken into use, as well as acceptance of the SAR report and the included Apros analysis results.
BWR integral test program FIX-II (Studsvik, SSM and Asea Atom):
Loss of feedwater pumps with delayed scram
Case Forsmark Kraftgrupp AB: Forsmark Boiling Water Reactor simulation applications with Apros® - from power uprate compatibility analysis to safety analysis | Fortum
"Apros® has been a great tool to perform detailed process analysis at Forsmark. The detailed models of both the process and automation systems and their interaction have helped us analyze and understand different complex plant events as well as performing safety analysis. Apros is a user-friendly simulation tool and the graphical interface helps to better understand plant behavior as well as showcasing the plant model and its capabilities in the organization.
Investigate the risk of overpressure in reactor tank
Peter Höök, Nuclear Safety Engineer, FKA, Vattenfall
Increase of reactor water level
Other use cases besides F2 power uprate project
Maximum feed water flow
Experiment 3051: 10% (area) split break in the external recirculation loop with ADS activated 40 s after the initiating event
As part of this work, FKA calculated following analysis cases:
partial scram, turbine shutdown, accidental closing of high pressure control valve etc.
"In the future the use of simulations with Apros at FKA will most notably be focused towards general process optimization, interoperability analysis as a part of new regulatory requirements and as a simulation tool in different modernization projects."
Forsmark Kraftgrupp AB
Loss of feedwater pumps
Besides the power uprate project, FKA has utilized Apros for outage planning and modeling the spent fuel pool at Forsmark 3, for pressure protection analysis of the MSR for Forsmark 3 and containment safety analysis in Forsmark 2.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/01/fortum-starts-cooperation-estonian-smr-deployment-project
"Fortum has carried out R&D activities on SMRs for several years. SMRs are a potential future option to support the decarbonization of electricity and heat production. We are happy to cooperate with Fermi on this highly interesting topic" said
Fortum, Estonian Fermi Energia and Belgian engineering company Tractebel have today signed MOUs to start enhanced cooperation on studying Small Modular Reactor (SMR) deployment project in Estonia, developed by Fermi Energia. Parties focus on researching a licensing model suitable for SMRs and preliminary siting study for light-water SMR deployment.
Fermi Energia annual conference
Fermi Energia is in discussion on similar MOUs with two other European utilities on in-depth analysis of spent fuel management and on SMR construction timing and planning. All studies will be completed by end of 2020 and made public in early 2021.
On 28 January 2020 Fortum and Tractebel will present at
With these agreements, Fermi Energia is becoming the leading EU SMR deployment project. "These MOUs establish cooperation to support Estonia with developed know-how and capacity on SMR deployment project so that nuclear energy can have strong contribution into achieving EU carbon neutrality in 2050”, said
in Tallinn results of their studies on “Milestones of SMR deployment program” and “Comparative analysis of licensed SMRs”.
Tractebel is one of the world’s leading engineering and advisory companies delivering integrated services with a laser focus on unlocking opportunities for greater sustainability and a zero-carbon future.
, Tractebel General Manager Business Line Nuclear.
Press release 28 Jan 2020, Fermi energia (in estonian)
Fermi Energia
, Vice President, Nuclear Services at Fortum.
"Highest value of the MOU is in starting mutual learning through practical working with current nuclear energy producers. There is a high need to innovate many elements of nuclear energy deployment to be market competitive with other investments and by finding the best solutions together, we can be sure that there is mutual understanding for later stages of the deployment. With Baltic countries desynchronisation from Russian grid system and loss of imports from Russia by end of 2025 approaching fast, nuclear energy in form of SMRs becomes an important element in achieving reliable noncarbon power supplies for Baltic countries, “ said CEO and co-founder of Fermi Energia
Fortum starts cooperation in Estonian SMR deployment project | Fortum
Fermi Energia is a privately owned Small Modular Reactor deployment company seeking to achieve the first deployment of SMR in the European Union to achieve carbon neutrality and security of power supply in Estonia and the Baltics.
Denis Dumont
Tractabel


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/stronger-role-small-nuclear-reactors-future-energy-system
Nuclear power has always functioned as a production- and price-stabilising component in a clean energy system. In the changed global situation, potential challenges in terms of availability and price of fossil- and bio-based imported energy, as well as the desire to boost energy self-sufficiency and to ensure security of supply further strengthen the role of nuclear power.
For us at Fortum, nuclear power is a central pillar of carbon-free electricity generation together with hydro and wind power. We just submitted an operating licence application to continue production at Loviisa until 2050. Nuclear power’s stabilising effect also makes it possible to increase weather-dependent, renewable energy production.
Nuclear power at Fortum
At the same time, the development of cost and schedule certainty for large reactor units should be kept in mind. New reactor concepts are increasingly focusing on tackling these challenges and new solutions have been found to better manage them. One example of this is the French EPR2 concept. Developments should also take place in country-specific legislation and regulations so that large nuclear power units can remain an option alongside SMRs.
matti
Significance of production stability and security of supply have increased
In February 2022, the world changed overnight and became very different looking. At the same time, the urgency to curb climate change and the need to produce stable, predictable electricity for society’s needs remain unchanged. Nuclear power’s role as an important part of clean energy has been further accentuated. In the energy system transition, small nuclear reactors and their innovative technical solutions may have an increasingly more important role in producing self-sufficient, reliable and safe energy.
kattainen
Small nuclear power, particularly small modular reactors (SMR), is now looking increasingly interesting. Depending on the plant type, SMRs can produce energy (electricity, heat, hydrogen) for several years without having to be refuelled. This can be done, for example, by increasing the plant’s fresh fuel stocks and reducing the reactor fuel change cycle. The independence from weather conditions means that energy is reliably available whenever it is needed – at a stable and predictable price. In addition to baseload production, SMRs can also be used for regulating purposes, which allows consumption and other production to be followed.
A stronger role for small nuclear reactors in the future energy system | Fortum
Large units also in focus
Head of Nuclear Future Agenda
Because of their output capacity, the small plant units can be dispersed to consumption sites around the country, which has its own advantages. In addition to electricity production, SMRs can offer a heating solution for population centres or a solution for the needs of energy-intensive industry.
One of Fortum’s key strategic targets is to strengthen and grow in CO2-free generation. In terms of nuclear power, the share of production of Olkiluoto unit three and the lifetime extension of the Loviisa nuclear power plant are part of our strategy implementation. Fortum is exploring opportunities to also grow in small nuclear power. Our subsidiary Uniper is very much involved in SMR development through its participation in the development of SMR test equipment in Oskarshamn, Sweden.
There is active development of SMR around the world, and the first projects have already been announced in Western countries. France recently made a strong move to increase the role of nuclear power, and there are noteworthy projects underway in Sweden. Very promising SMR concepts can already be seen, and plants are expected to be operating already during this decade. Now legislation and regulation must evolve at least at the same pace as the technology to enable the rapid deployment of SMRs as part of the totality of carbon-free, self-sufficient energy production.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/03/fortum-submits-loviisa-nuclear-power-plant-operating-licence-application-government
Fortum submits the Loviisa nuclear power plant operating licence application to the Government | Fortum
, Executive Vice President, Generation Division.
“Loviisa power plant’s lifetime extension is significant for all of Finland because it contributes to securing the supply of clean domestic electricity also in the future,” Ollus adds.
Fortum is seeking a new operating licence for both nuclear power plant units until the end of 2050. Fortum also applies for a licence to use the low- and intermediate-level radioactive waste final disposal facility located in Loviisa’s current power plant area until 2090.
“We want to support the achievement of Finland’s and Europe’s carbon neutrality targets and enable the building of a reliable, competitive and sustainable energy system,” says
“Our employees have done a really great job in security the reliability of electricity production throughout the history of the power plant. Thanks to their know-how and expertise, the Loviisa power plant is in good condition and we can safely continue its operations,” says
will review Fortum’s operating licence application and request statements from a range of various parties, including the Radiation and Nuclear Safety Authority. Finnish Government will make its decision based on expert statements. The process is estimated to take about one year.
The Ministry of Economic Affairs and Employment
Fortum [Power and Heat Oy] has submitted the Loviisa nuclear power plant operating licence application to the Finnish Government on 18.3.2022.
18 March 2022, 10:00 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/04/stuk-decision-loviisa-nuclear-power-plants-periodic-safety-review
, the power plant produced a total of 8.2 terawatt hours (net) of electricity, which is more than 10% of Finland’s electricity production. Fortum employs about 700 nuclear sector professionals, 530 of them work at the Loviisa power plant. Additionally, nearly 100 permanent employees of other companies work in the power plant area every day.
More information: www.fortum.com/loviisa
The Finnish Radiation and Nuclear Safety Authority (STUK) has issued its decision on Fortum Power and Heat Oy’s periodic safety review of the Loviisa power plant submitted in 2020.
21
Thomas Buddas, Director of Nuclear Safety, Loviisa nuclear power plant, tel. +358 10 455 3710
In 2021, the load factor at Fortum’s fully-owned Loviisa nuclear power plant was 92.9%. The continuous development and modernisation of the power plant enable load factors that are among the best for pressurised water reactors on an international scale. During the past five years Fortum’s investments in the Loviisa power plant have totalled about EUR 325 million. In 20
In December 2021 STUK issued its decision on the periodic safety review of the final disposal facility for Loviisa power plant’s low- and intermediate-level radioactive waste.
Loviisa power plant’s goal over the course of its operating history has been to ensure the continuous improvement of plant safety. Fortum has updated and renovated the plant significantly and implemented extensive modifications of its components, systems and structures in order to replace aging plant components and to improve safety. Fortum also has the necessary action plans to continue development of the plant to ensure safe operation of the Loviisa nuclear power plant until the expiry of the operating licence.
Regarding the new operating license application, STUK will assess the prerequisites separately.
In its decision STUK states that Fortum has ensured the safety of the Loviisa 1 and 2 nuclear power plant units in accordance with the effective provisions, for the parts that are applicable to operating facilities, and the licensee has the required capabilities, procedures, competence and resources to continue safe operations through the end of the current operating license.
29 April 2022, 13:47 EEST
STUK decision on the Loviisa nuclear power plant’s periodic safety review | Fortum
www.fortum.fi/loviisa


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/10/fortum-and-tepco-sign-information-exchange-and-cooperation-agreement
moilanen
, Head of Nuclear Services, Fortum.
18 October 2022, 12:10 EEST
Fortum continues to work for a cleaner world by utilising its vast nuclear experience and competences in close cooperation with its partners to further improve the safety and reliability of nuclear power plants around the globe.
(PDF, 770 KB)
Fortum and TEPCO sign an Information Exchange and Cooperation Agreement | Fortum
The scope of the agreement covers the whole nuclear power plant lifecycle from design phase to safe operations including waste management, final disposal and decommissioning. Both parties recognise, that exchanging information with other operators is vital for improving nuclear safety. With this agreement, the companies continue their good cooperation and further promote sharing of experience and practices that will improve nuclear safety.
Anni Jaarinen
"The open discussions and pragmatic approach to the topic at hand in the workshops have truly proven the value of TEPCO-Fortum co-operation. With the signed Memorandum of Understanding (MoU), we expect this co-operation to continue and the relationship of the two companies to develop further,” says
Fortum and TEPCO have already carried out workshops, where Fortum has provided risk-informed approach for maintenance management and methods for assessing aging and degradation and TEPCO has shared their knowledge on seismic resistance assessments.
Fortum signed an information exchange agreement on nuclear safety with Tokyo Electric Power Company Holdings, Inc. (TEPCO), the largest electricity company in Japan, on 6 October 2022.
atte
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS ONLINE NEWS 18.10.2022
Atte Moilanen, Project Manager, Fortum,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/10/annual-outage-unit-1-fortums-loviisa-nuclear-power-plant-prolonged
The duration of the annual outage will be extended to conduct needed cleaning and repair measures. Earlier we have communicated to the market that the outage ends on 9 October, 2022. New estimated time is 16 October 2022.
Thomas Buddas, Deputy director, Loviisan voimalaitos, puh. 010 455 3710
In connection with the preparation for the leak test of the primary circuit of Loviisa power plant’s unit 1, a leak was detected in the sealing water line of one of the main circulation pumps. The purpose of the tightness test is to ensure the tightness of the systems belonging to the primary circuit before starting the plant after the annual outage.
The incident did not endanger people, the environment or the power plant.
06 October 2022, 10:05 EEST
The annual outage of unit 1 of Fortum's Loviisa nuclear power plant prolonged | Fortum
Loviisa unit 2 is in normal production.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/11/fortum-and-westinghouse-electric-company-sign-agreement-design-and-supply-new-fuel-type-loviisa-power-plant
Fortum and Westinghouse Electric Company sign an agreement for the design and supply of a new fuel type for the Loviisa power plant | Fortum
and supply of a new fuel type for the Loviisa power plant. The new fuel type is based on British Nuclear Fuel Limited’s fuel that was supplied to the Loviisa power plant from 2001-2007 and used in parallel with the fuel supplied by the Russian TVEL in the early 2000s. Taking the new fuel into use is a multi-year project requiring regulatory approvals.
The fuel agreement with the Russian TVEL is valid until the end of the current
, Westinghouse President of Nuclear Fuel.
operating
Fortum has signed an agreement with Westinghouse Electric Company for the design, licensing,
says
is shaping the future of carbon-free energy by providing safe, innovative nuclear technologies to utilities globally. Westinghouse supplied the world’s first commercial pressurized water reactor in 1957 and the company’s technology is the basis for nearly one-half of the world's operating nuclear plants. Over 135 years of innovation makes Westinghouse the preferred partner for advanced technologies covering the complete nuclear energy life cycle. For more information, visit
Westinghouse Electric Company
signed with
licences, i.e. 2027 and 2030. In spring 2022, Fortum applied for a new operating licence for both Loviisa power plant units until 2050, and announced that a tendering process will be arranged for fuel supply for the new operating licence period. The agreement
22 November 2022, 09:00 EET
In 2021, the load factor at Fortum’s fully-owned Loviisa nuclear power plant was 92.9%. The continuous development and modernisation of the power plant enable load factors that are among the best for pressurised water reactors on an international scale. During the past five years Fortum’s investments in the Loviisa power plant have totaled about EUR 325 million. In 2021
, Vice President, Loviisa nuclear power plant.
the future,”
Pia Fast, Head of Generation Communication, +358 40 147 8752,
2007," says
prerequisites for successful fuel tendering.
“We are proud to support Fortum’s operating fleet with fuel reload quantities, building on our successful collaboration delivering VVER-440 fuel for Loviisa from 2001 to
create
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 22.11.2022
www.westinghousenuclear.com
Tarik Choho
and follow us on
Westinghouse Electric Company supports Fortum’s aim to strengthen the security of energy supply; the experiences gained from the use of the new fuel will
“The new and parallel fuel supplier will diversify our fuel strategy, improve security of supply and ensure reliable electricity production at the Loviisa power plant also in


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/07/fortum-uniper-nuclear-services-signs-framework-agreement-norwegian-nuclear-decommissioning
-free electricity, and our growth businesses focus on clean power, low-carbon energy, and the infrastructure for tomorrow’s hydrogen economy. In addition, we design solutions that help companies and cities reduce their environmental footprint. Our 20,000 professionals and operations in 40 countries give us the skills, resources, and reach to empower the energy evolution toward a cleaner world.
baechler
Head of Co-Operation FUNS, Uniper,
Michael Bächler,
Fortum Uniper Nuclear Services signs framework agreement with Norwegian Nuclear Decommissioning | Fortum
Michael Bächler
Head of Co-Operation FUNS, Uniper
anni
The scope of the framework agreement is technical support within design, engineering, and safety case
, +49 171 5828 949
Fortum Uniper Nuclear Services (FUNS) has signed a framework agreement with Norwegian Nuclear Decommissioning (NND) on 1 July, 2022, the national agency for decommissioning and waste management related to the country’s nuclear research programme.
01 July 2022, 10:00 EEST
, +358 40 825 7217
GNS Gesellschaft für Nuklear-Service mbH
“Together Fortum and Uniper have unique owner and operator experience and nuclear competences spanning over many decades, which differentiates us from many of the other actors in the nuclear industry“, says
Anni Jaarinen, Head of Co-Operation FUNS, Fortum,
Together Fortum and Uniper combine more than 60+ years’ experience of reliable, safe, and sustainable nuclear power in the Nordics and Central Europe. Our services cover the whole nuclear power plant lifecycle from licensing to decommissioning and waste management. Our team of 1500 experts provide a combination of unrivalled experience and the most versatile competencies in the market covering all phases of nuclear power plant decommissioning.
(PDF, 754 KB)
jaarinen
energy
For more than 40 years, GNS has been providing reliable and efficient solutions for nuclear waste management of nuclear power plants and facilities. The GNS Group is a specialist in the disposal of high-level radioactive waste and spent fuel elements as well as in the safe processing, packaging and storage of low- and intermediate-level radioactive waste and residues. In addition, GNS offers comprehensive solutions for all phases of decommissioning and dismantling, from complete defueling to the dismantling and packaging of large components such as the reactor pressure vessels and their internals. With its more than 800 employees, the companies of the GNS Group achieve an annual turnover of around 250 million euros.
, concludes.
Fortum and Uniper form a European energy group committed to enabling a successful transition to carbon neutrality for everyone. Our 50 gigawatts of power generating capacity, substantial gas import and storage operations, and our global energy trading business enable us to provide Europe and other regions with a reliable supply of low-carbon energy. We are already Europe’s third largest producer of CO
Michael
uniper.energy
For this contract, FUNS has established a consortium with GNS Gesellschaft für Nuklear-Service mbH. The consortium is one of three vendors awarded the framework agreement, altogether worth up to approximately NOK (Norwegian Krone) 1 000 000 000. The three-year framework agreement includes three one-year extension options.
swe
“Our comprehensive approach and understanding of total cost of ownership enable us to offer world-class services. This agreement marks a strong step forward for Fortum Uniper Nuclear Services in the market”,
Fortum Uniper Nuclear Services (FUNS)
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS RELEASE 01.07.2022
, Head of Co-Operation FUNS at Fortum.
uniper
;


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/fortum-and-karnfull-next-jointly-explore-opportunities-sweden-small-modular-reactors
, Head of Fortum’s Newbuild Feasibility Study.
“SMRs can provide both industry and municipalities with predictable and fossil-free electricity, heat and hydrogen. Together with new wind power, new nuclear will be a crucial piece of the climate transition puzzle. Kärnfull Next already has a noteworthy project portfolio and we see that our different competences in the value chain complement each other in an excellent way," says
“Fortum has a unique and broad nuclear expertise and it operates its reactors with world-leading availability. For Kärnfull Next, the cooperation with Fortum will mean that we can offer our customers an even better comprehensive solution at a competitive price,” says
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS PRESS RELEASE 15.12.2022
, +46 79 017 5165
(PDF, 756 KB)
Christian Sjölander, CEO, Kärnfull Next,
, +358 40 542 2001
Fortum and Kärnfull Next to jointly explore opportunities in Sweden for Small Modular Reactors | Fortum
Read more from our press relese 17 Oct 2022:
, CEO of Kärnfull Next.
, +46 70 244 6942
www.knxt.se
Laurent Leveugle, Head of Newbuild Feasibility Study, Fortum,
Christian Sjölander
sjolander
The collaboration will allow the companies to jointly address Swedish SMR projects which could lead to concrete feasibility studies. The schedule of the first operative SMR in Sweden is largely dependent on progress in permitting, licensing and legislation regarding the location and number of reactors in operation and any decisions about future investments will be made in due course.
Fortum and Swedish Kärnfull Next Ab have signed a Memorandum of Understanding to jointly explore opportunities in new nuclear for developing Small Modular Reactors (SMRs) in Sweden. The joint agreement is part of Fortum’s two-year feasibility study to explore business opportunities in new nuclear both in Finland and Sweden.
christian
Kärnfull Next AB
Kärnfull Next:
anton
Kärnfull Next AB (KNXT) is a subsidiary of Kärnfull Future AB (Kärnfull), a cleantech startup based in Goteborg, Sweden. KNXT is the Nordics' first project development company focused on flexible, small-scale nuclear energy (SMRs) delivering everything from first draft to delivery – inspired by similar companies within the renewable energy space. KNXT manages the various sub-contractors and development phases together with key partners. Kärnfull also owns the brand Kärnfull Energi, a digital 100% nuclear electricity supplier with operations in Sweden and Denmark.
In order to fight climate change, the use of electricity will have to increase significantly in the coming decades and strong actions are needed to achieve the climate targets set by the Swedish Government. To meet the new demand, a major expansion of fossil-free power sources is needed. The potential for SMRs is great and there is clear interest from industry.
15 December 2022, 15:00 EET
se
Anton Steen, Vice President, Public Affairs Sweden, Fortum,
knxt
steen


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/nuclear/environmental-impacts-nuclear-power
The main environmental impact of nuclear power is related to building the plant, fuel procurement and the thermal load of cooling water discharged into the sea during operation. Of these three things, the most significant environmental concern is the thermal load on the sea caused by the cooling water.
Web article
The EU and the climate need nuclear power
Efficient way to generate electricity with low environmental impact.
Environmental impacts of Loviisa nuclear power plant
The greenhouse gas emissions are equivalent to those of wind, hydro and solar power.
Environmental impacts of nuclear power
Stable and reliable electricity generation
Overall, nuclear power is an effective way to produce electricity with minimal effect on the environment, and one of the advantages of nuclear power plants is that they can produce a lot of electricity and steadily around the clock. When reviewing the entire production lifecycle, the climate impact of nuclear power is similar to that of wind, solar or hydropower.
Low environmental impact
Environmental impacts – Loviisa nuclear power plant
Most significant environmental impact is the thermal load caused by the cooling water.
Environmental impacts of nuclear power | Fortum
Clean electricity for a growing need


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/09/eu-and-climate-need-nuclear-power
Peter Tuominen
He points out that nuclear power is also an economically competitive form of energy production.
“If we intend to stick to the climate target, we will also need CO2-free nuclear power in the future,” notes
The EU is targeting carbon neutrality by 2050. This requires a significant increase in the use of renewable energy, which, on its own, isn’t enough to meet the energy demand.
Half of Europe’s CO2-free electricity currently comes from nuclear power. It will be needed to reduce climate emissions also in the future.
In terms of technology and legislation, Fortum estimates that production use of the first SMRs in Finland would be possible in about 10-15 years.
The majority of Europe’s nuclear power plants have been around for more than 30 years. The operating lifetime of many plants must be extended during the upcoming decade.
One of the advantages of nuclear power plants is that they can produce a lot of electricity and steadily around the clock. The production volumes of wind and solar power plants vary depending on the weather.
“In the public discourse, nuclear power and renewable energy forms are often seen as alternatives to each other. However, this kind of rivalry is gratuitous because both are needed to achieve the emissions targets,” Tuominen notes.
Fortum is currently reviewing the future of two nuclear reactors commissioned in Loviisa in 1977 and 1980. Their operating licenses will expire in 2027 and 2030, respectively.
There are currently 126 nuclear power reactors operating in 14 countries in the EU area. And four new plants are under construction.
“However, this requires a constant effort to develop standardised equipment and licensing processes in collaboration with the industry, authorities and governments.”
Building a new nuclear power plant is a long and expensive project. According to the International Energy Agency (IEA), extending the operating lifetime of nuclear power plants is the most cost-effective way to produce emissions-free electricity in the years to come.
The EU and the climate need nuclear power | Fortum
The processing of spent fuel is an integral part of long-term responsible operations. The construction of a final repository for this is being completed deep in the bedrock in Olkiluoto, Eurajoki.
“The technology is continuously modernised, which further improves the safety and availability,” Tuominen says.
Attitudes towards nuclear power are partially inconsistent in the EU. In the European Commission’s sustainable finance package, nuclear power is not defined as an environmentally sustainable investment target.
“A key sector challenge is how to keep the plants operating cost efficiently and reliably while improving safety and extending their useful lifetime,” Hyvärinen says.
“Small modular reactors are especially well suited for district heat production in Finland because it is more difficult to find CO2-free forms of production for heating. SMRs would also make it possible to produce emissions-free hydrogen for industrial processes, which is otherwise difficult to make emissions-free,” says Fortum’s Esa Hyvärinen.
, Head of CEO Office at Fortum.
Fortum has invested nearly 500 million euros in the Loviisa power plant during the past five years.
“We have initiated the Environmental Impact Assessment procedure to review the environmental impacts related to extending the operation, or, alternatively, the decommissioning of the power plant,” Hyvärinen says.
, Vice President, Nuclear Safety Assurance, Fortum.
Small modular reactors are coming
The possibility to build small modular reactors (SMRs) to produce CO2-free electricity and heat is currently being studied around the world. In Finland, the VTT Technical Research Centre and LUT University in Lappeenranta are developing an SMR that could meet the district heating needs of an entire city.
“To be competitive, the plants must be highly standardised and serially produced.”
The Commission’s criteria steer the decisions of private investors. They also impact the use of public funds, and, among others, the EU’s big stimulus package to finance sustainability projects to recover from the coronavirus crisis.
“26 per cent of the electricity generated in the EU comes from nuclear power plants. Nuclear power accounts for about half of the CO2-free electricity production,” says
“The policy not only impacts the construction of new nuclear plants, but also existing ones. Today’s plants seek financing from the markets to refinance maturing loans or to invest in safety and availability. And extending the operating lifetime also requires investments,” Hyvärinen says.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/environmental-impacts-loviisa-power-plant



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/nuclear/small-modular-reactors
Technology and safety requirements similar to those of big plants
Serial production and short construction and deployment times
(Source: Energiforsk)
When will small modular reactors be deployed?
We offer consultancy services for SMR's
Small modular reactors – nuclear power’s new flexible generation
Small modular reactors
As an emission-free and reliable energy form, nuclear power has an important role in our vision to build a cleaner world. We at Fortum see small modular reactors as a part of the future of nuclear power, and we are actively working on their research and development. Even though the discussion and research around the topic is lively, the full-scale deployment of small modular reactors requires international development and collaboration between the different actors.
How is Fortum investing in small modular reactors?
Nuclear power plants with a power output of less than 300 MW are called small modular reactors. They differ from big plants not only by their lower power output but also because they can be serially produced. Small modular reactors can generate carbon-free energy more efficiently, more flexibly, and at a lower cost.
Moreover, small modular reactors can be serially produced, i.e. they are installed from prefabricated modules rather than building them on-site.
The current country-specific differences in the regulatory requirements for plant licensing impact the deployment of small modular reactors. Prefabrication in a factory requires standardised structures and systems. In order for the same solution to be used in different countries, either the regulatory requirements have to be standardised or the solution approved in one country must be applicable also in another country.
Small modular reactors – nuclear power’s new flexible generation | Fortum
However, there are currently multiple small modular reactor development projects well under way around the world, and the first prototype plants are close to deployment or have already been deployed. The most advanced projects right now are in China, Russia, and the United States. A significant state-driven small modular reactor project is under way in Canada.
300 MW nuclear power plant
Clean district heating with SMR's
Frequently asked questions about small modular reactors
Read more about our consultation services for SMRs
Small modular reactors can bring new solutions also for district heating production. Because of their smaller output, they potentially could be located closer to urban areas – while complying with the sector’s high safety standards. Small modular reactors can also help the sector to achieve carbon-neutrality and to advance the realisation of the hydrogen economy.
Power output of big reactors in Finland is ~500-900 MW
Small modular reactors and where to use them
High safety standards
Are small modular reactors safe?
We at Fortum are continuously developing our own expertise and tools for small reactor plant simulations, for instance. We see small modular reactors as part of a nuclear power future, and we are actively monitoring related international developments. We are involved in various international projects to help accelerate the development of and the opportunities to utilise small modular reactors.
We launched a feasibility study on new nuclear in late 2022 to explore the prerequisites both conventional nuclear reactors and small modular reactors in Finland and Sweden. The two-year study will investigate commercial, economical and societal questions related to new nuclear projects.
Standardised solutions and serial production enable significant cost- and time-savings. These savings are realised when multiple power plants are made.
Leveraging the opportunities of small modular reactors still requires close collaboration at a national and international level between plant suppliers, energy producers and authorities.
What is a small modular reactor?
Small modular reactors are a new kind of nuclear power plant under development. Nuclear power plants with a power output of under 300 MW are often called small modular reactors. Both Loviisa reactors, for instance, have a power output of over 500 MW each, and the Olkiluoto reactors close to 900 MW. The smaller capacity, however, doesn’t affect the quality of the plant: in terms of technology and safety requirements, small modular reactors are comparable to big nuclear power plants – and both produce electricity stably and with no carbon dioxide emissions.
What are the advantages of small modular reactors?
The advantages of small modular reactors are better adjustability, standardised solutions, advanced prefabrication, faster deployment, the potential for more diverse use, and cost-efficiency.
From the technology and legislative perspective, the first small modular reactors could potentially be in production use in Finland in about 10-15 years. In order for Finland to be a frontrunner in small modular reactors, a lot of work needs to be done.
The same level of safety required of the existing big plants is also required of small modular reactors.
Nuclear power is a future energy form that is constantly developing, and small modular reactors are an example of the latest innovations in the sector. In the long-term, small modular reactors can be an efficient tool in combating climate change and in bringing the needed flexibility to electricity production for the increasingly electrifying society.
Cost and resource efficiency


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/01/10-things-know-about-nuclear-power-2020s
Nuclear power is reliable and stable base-load power that produces electricity 24/7, regardless of the weather. Wind is one of the most important renewable energy sources in electricity production in the future, and the wind conditions in our home markets are excellent.
1. Why is nuclear power used?
until the end of 2050. Fortum also applies for a licence to use the low- and intermediate-level radioactive waste final disposal facility located in Loviisa’s current power plant area until 2090.
final disposal of nuclear waste in Finland>>
Nuclear power has an important role also in the clean energy focus of our future strategy. Nuclear power plays a significant role as we pursue growth in carbon-free electricity production, and we are continuously developing our nuclear power solutions. We see Small Modular Reactors, for example, as part of nuclear power’s future, and we are actively engaged in the research and development of them. We are also interested in the possibilities of nuclear in heat and hydrogen production.
Nuclear power is a future energy form that is continuously developing. At the same time, it sparks a lot of questions and lively discussions. We at Fortum have more than 40 years of experience in planning and operating nuclear power plants. We have compiled 10 relevant questions and answers – read how nuclear power supports energy security of supply and our journey towards a carbon-neutral society.
Electricity is the foundation of our wellbeing, and society is electrifying at a rapid pace. More and more electricity is needed because electricity is the power behind many of the actions to reduce climate emissions in industry, households and transportation. Growing electricity consumption doesn’t mean growing emissions; what matters is how the electricity is produced. Nuclear power production is a carbon dioxide-free and reliable energy source.
10 things to know about nuclear power in the 2020s | Fortum
Nuclear power is profitable in Finland without public subsidies. As a domestic energy form, nuclear power increases self-sufficiency, which in turn creates jobs and bolsters the Finnish economy. The nuclear power sector is a significant employer in Finland: for example, the Loviisa power plant continuously employs about 530 Fortum employees and 100 external employees.
3. Should energy use be decreased for climate reasons?
7. How is it ensured that the nuclear waste generated by the use of nuclear power doesn’t pose a threat to nature or people?
Radioactive waste accounts for a small share of all waste at Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant, just 5%. We are committed to processing this waste very carefully and responsibly. Finland is a globally leading expert in nuclear waste management and in the final disposal of nuclear waste. Before final disposal, nuclear waste is placed in interim storage under controlled conditions in the power plant area.
4. Won’t wind power soon be able to provide most of the base-load supply?
Fortum’s nuclear power plants have operated safely throughout their history, which spans more than 40 years. Nuclear power safety is ensured with multiple isolation layers, back-up systems and comprehensive training.
8. How has the nuclear sector developed in recent years?
Over the decades, we at Fortum have implemented a number of innovations that have advanced nuclear power technology. Examples include various computational software to more accurately model plant operations. These models are used to achieve the best possible efficiency when renewing components, for example.
Posiva, founded by its owners Fortum and TVO (Teollisuuden Voima), will conduct the final disposal of spent nuclear fuel from both currently operational nuclear power plants, Loviisa and Olkiluoto, in a responsible manner. Read more about
2. What is nuclear power’s climate impact?
In March 2022, the company submitted the Loviisa nuclear power plant operating licence application for both units
Small Modular Reactors (SMRs) and their role in the energy markets have been an active topic of discussion in recent times because they are a versatile tool in mitigating climate change. SMRs are nuclear reactors with a power output of less than 300 MW. In addition to the lower power output, they also differ from big plants because they can be serially produced. SMRs could be used to produce carbon dioxide-free energy in the form of, e.g. electricity, heat or hydrogen, more efficiently, more flexibly and at a lower cost.
10. What are Fortum’s future plans for nuclear power?
To mitigate climate change, more electricity is needed – and it must be carbon-free electricity. For this purpose, nuclear power offers the best combination of reliability, safety and profitability. In fact, nuclear power’s most important task is to ensure year-round base-load production. Nuclear power is used to produce electricity reliably, 24/7, regardless of the time of the day or the weather conditions. For example, our Loviisa nuclear power plant alone produces more than 10% of Finland’s electricity.
5. How profitable is nuclear power from society’s perspective?
In Finland, the management of the entire power plant life cycle is a precondition for sustainable nuclear electricity production.
Nuclear power production is carbon dioxide-free. The lifecycle climate impact of electricity produced with nuclear power is comparable to wind, solar or hydropower. In Finland, as a result of the Loviisa nuclear power plant’s electricity production, the country emits about 6 million tonnes less carbon dioxide emissions compared to the equivalent amount of fossil fuel-based electricity.
9. How will the nuclear power sector develop in the future?
Fortum Loviisa power plant’s existing operating licenses are valid until the end of 2027 and 2030.
6. How is the safety of nuclear power ensured?
We at Fortum are constantly developing our own expertise and tools for simulating SMR plants, for example, and we are exploring and advancing business opportunities in the sector.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/combined-heat-and-power-chp
Waste
68 (electricity),
580 (electricity),
1994
We have power plants in Finland and other Nordic countries, Poland and Russia.
350 (electricity),
Riihimäki
1,307 (heat)
18 (electricity),
Naantali
320 (electricity),
138 (electricity),
Coal, biomass
Chelyabinsk GRES
1,112 (heat)
Capacity (MW)
1996, 2006, 2011
Tyumen CHP-1
1942, 2014 (upgrade)
Chelyabinsk CHP-2
1962, 2015 (upgrade)
Kumla
Tyumen CHP-2
35 (heat)
Coal
600 (heat)
Meri-Pori
75 (electricity),
755 (electricity),
9 (electricity),
Nyagan GRES
Other owners
53.5
1,056 (heat)
Zabrze
Fuel
565 (electricity)
Suomenoja
16 (electricity),
660 (electricity),
1,820 (heat)
Thermal
534 (electricity),
Coal, RDF, biomass
40 (heat)
791 (heat)
2013, 2015
1960, 2011
1930, 2015, 2016
Combined heat and power (CHP) and condensing power plants | Fortum
129 (heat)
Chelyabinsk CHP-1
1,302 (electricity)
Gas
90 (heat)
145 (heat)
Nyborg
Turku Energia, City of Naantali
Chelyabinsk CHP-3
Combined heat and power (CHP) and condensing power plants
1986
Częstochowa
Coal, gas
1,640 (heat)
1977


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/suomenoja-chp-plant
Electricity capacity
Head of Production
600 MW
panu
The latest unit investment was a 40 MW heat pump which reduced CO
Panu Ahrnberg
Although the Suomenoja power plant has been in production since 1977, several investments have been made over the years. At the moment the plant consists of five different units.
Hylkeenpyytäjäntie 4
The plant also has a new heat accumulator that can store about 800 MWh of heat energy. The plant is fueled by coal and natural gas.
350 MW
Suomenoja - power plant in Finland | Fortum
Suomenoja CHP plant
Area Manager: Hannu Vinnamo
FI-02270 Espoo, Finland
ahrnberg
Several investments over the years
Caverion, Suomenoja power plant
+358405542462
emissions in the area by 15 %. Furthermore, an additional 40 MW heat pump is currently under construction and will be commissioned in 2021, bringing the total number of heat pumps to three.
Suomenoja CHP is located in Espoo, Southern Finland. The power plant produces heat for the inhabitants of the nearby cities and electricity. The length of the district heating network is over 800 km.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/czestochowa-chp-plant
Czestochowa’s CHP is one of the most modern and effective in Poland, and it meets Fortum’s high standards for safety, efficiency, and low emissions. The production capacity is 129.1 MW of heat and 68.4 MW of electricity, and the plant utilizes up to 35 % biomass in its production. This is a big step towards cleaner energy in the region and the country. The plant also uses coal as a source of an energy.
In 2010, one of Europe's most modern combined heat and power plants was opened in Czestochowa, Poland. The new facility stands on the site of an old heat plant that used to be one of several plants heating Czestochowa.
Częstochowa - CHP plant in Poland | Fortum
Modern and effective power plant
129,1 MW
, but also provides new opportunities for the region in the production of biofuel.
Częstochowa CHP plant
CHP is the main source of heat in the city of Czestochowa, which means that the city benefits from a more efficient way of producing district heating than it previously had. For the inhabitants this means cleaner air with less emission and a more reliable supply of heat. The use of biomass is not only reducing the emissions of fossil CO
68,4 MW


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/riihimaki-production-plant
Waste to energy
55
nykanen
11120 Riihimäki, Finland
megawatt (MW) plant output / Plant 2
Operation manager
+358 50 331 1168
The Riihimäki production plant provides district heating and electricity for residents and properties in Riihimäki and Hyvinkää. The power plant fuels the production process with industrial, commercial and community waste.
megawatt (MW) plant output / Plant 1
Our production plants use the waste to generate high-pressure steam, which we then lead into the joint steam network in the plant area for processing into electricity and district heating. The district heating that Fortum produces for the Riihimäki and Hyvinkää area is certified CO2-neutral Ekolämpö heating, which means that it does not release CO2 emissions into the atmosphere.
Riihimäki production plant | Fortum
Juha Nykänen
+358107551000
Riihimäki production plant


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/chelyabinsk-chp-4
PAO Fortum, Chelyabinsk CHP-4
Commercial operation of the unit started on November 23, 2017. Unit 3 was needed in order to shut down the plant's 8 obsolete generators. After reconstruction, Chelyabinsk GRES became the largest CCGT combined heat and power plant in the Urals area. In 2018 the plant was renamed Chelyabinsk CHP-4. The plant uses natural gas as fuel.
Chelyabinsk GRES - first power plant in Chelyabinsk| Fortum
Chelyabinsk CHP-4
The new units are fully CSA-backed. Prices for capacity under CSA are defined in order to ensure a sufficient return on investments.
Built in 1930, this is the first power plant of the Chelyabinsk Region in Russia, and the first energy system of the country.
988,6 MW
During Fortum’s investment programme in Russia, two new combined-cycle gas turbine power units were built on the power plant area.
Power Plant Manager: Vladislav Bannikov
742 MW
Unit 1 of Chelyabinsk GRES started commercial operation on 1 December 2015, and unit 2 on 1 March 2016. Both new units’ installed electricity capacity is 247.5 MW and heat capacity approximately 174 MW.
454006 Chelyabinsk, Russia
ul. Rossiiskaya 1
+7 351 247 03 59


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/tyumen-chp-1
659,7 MW
1820,1 MW
PAO Fortum, Tyumen CHP-1
ul. Odesskaya 1
+7 345 270 83 59
Tyumen CHP-1 Power Unit No. 2 with an electric capacity of 190 MW and heat capacity of 220 Gcal/h was put in commercial operation in February 2011. It was the first facility to be completed under Fortum's investment programme in Russia. The plant uses gas as a fuel.
625023 Tyumenskaya Oblast, Tyumen
Acting Power Plant Manager: Alexey Gozhev
The Tyumen CHP-1 plant is 100 % gas-fired and comprises two combined-cycle power units.
Tyumen CHP-1 - power plant in Russia| Fortum
The CHP plant Tyumen CHP-1 was commissioned in Russia in 1960. It is one of the two major sources of district heating for the city of Tyumen.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/chelyabinsk-chp-2
Chelyabinsk CHP-2 - power plant in Russia| Fortum
Power Plant Manager: Irina Bozhukova
In 2015, a continuous emissions monitoring system was implemented for coal-fired operation. The flue-gas parameters are published on Fortum Russia's
1111,8 MW
320 MW
ul. Lineinaya 69
In Russia, the CHP plant Chelyabinsk CHP-2 was commissioned in 1962 with the first power unit’s 60 MW capacity. Since then, the plant capacity has increased fivefold.
PAO Fortum, Chelyabinsk CHP-2
454079 Chelyabinsk, Russia
+7 351 239 33 59
The power plant supplies the city with heat generated in a combined cycle. Engineering solutions implemented here enable flexible distribution of the heat load between Chelyabinsk CHP-2 and Chelyabinsk CHP-1 and ensure the reliable supply of heat to the residents. This power plant uses gas and coal as fuel.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/chelyabinsk-chp-3
Chelyabinsk CHP-3 - a modern power plant in Russia | Fortum
593 MW
The first 180 MW power unit of Chelyabinsk CHP-3 was commissioned in 1996. In December 2006, a second power unit with a similar design was commissioned. The third power unit, commissioned under the Fortum investment programme, was built in 2011 and is the first 216.3 MW combined cycle power unit in the Urals region. The plant uses natural gas as fuel.
Brodokalmaksky Trakt 6
1,307 MW
Chelyabinsk CHP-3 is a modern power plant with efficient combined-cycle heat and power production.
+7 351 779 03 59
454077 Chelyabinsk, Russia
Power Plant Manager: Robert Khazeev
PAO Fortum, Chelyabinsk CHP-3


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/our-power-plants/naantali-chp-plant
Naantali - power plant in Finland | Fortum
Naantali CHP plant
The new multifuel plant was inaugurated in 2017. The new CHP plant partly replaced the 50-year-old coal-fired plant. This multifuel plant produces 1400 GWh of district heat, 200 GWh of process steam and 800 GWh of electricity annually. Due to the deployment of the new fuel conveyor, biomass is the plant's main fuel, with a share of 60-70% of all fuels.
Read more here
256 MW
The Naantali CHP plant relies on biomass
The CHP plant Naantali, in Finland, was completed in 1960. It is owned by Turun Seudun Energiantuotanto Oy (TSE). Fortum's shareholding in TSE is 53.5%. The power plant is operated and maintained by Turun Seudun Energia.
The plant produces electricity, steam for industrial customers and district heating for the Turku region. The heat is transferred to the nearby cities by a long district heating tunnel, one of the longest in Europe. The power plant's heat capacity is 350 MW, and the steam capacity is 80 MW. The plant uses biomass and coal as fuel.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/nyagan-gres
On 1 April 2013, the first 420.9 MW power unit started commercial operation, and the second power unit with a capacity of 424.24 MW was commissioned on 1 December 2013. Since 2015, NGRES Power Unit No. 3 has supplied capacity to the wholesale market under the capacity supply agreement (CSA) mechanism.
+7 346 723 93 59
Nyagan GRES is the largest project implemented under Fortum's investment programme in Russia. NGRES, built in Khanty-Mansiysk Autonomous Okrug – Ugrais, is the largest greenfield thermal power plant in Russia.
Nyagan GRES - largest thermal power plant in Russia | Fortum
69,4 MW
mkrn. Energetikov, 73
628181 Tyumenskaya Oblast, HMAO-Jurga, Nyagan
Power Plant Manager: Mikhail Mikhailov
Thus construction of the most advanced thermal power plant in Russia was accomplished a year ahead of schedule. NGRES supplies power for the region's major industries in the oil and gas sector. The plant uses gas as a fuel.
PAO Fortum, Nyagan GRES
1302,4 MW


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/meri-pori-power-plant
Efforts to reduce the use of coal have been underway for years, and its use in Finland will end in 2029. An accelerated phase-out of coal-fired generation is also a strategic target for Fortum. This has naturally influenced the company’s decisions to make the modernisations needed for commercial use of the Meri-Pori plant.
In Finland, the Meri-Pori coal power plant is located at Tahkoluoto in Pori. It was commissioned in 1994.
(Tahkoluoto) POB 90
Production manager Vesa Maso
Meri-Pori - power plant in Finland | Fortum
The Meri-Pori power plant was commissioned in 1994 and is currently Finland’s only coal-fired condensing plant. From 2017-2022, the plant was part of the peak-load reserve system in Finland. The plant currently operates on the electricity market on a commercial basis. The deployment of actual electricity production depends on the electricity market situation at that time. The Meri-Pori plant will not be used to generate electricity at a loss. In practice, the price of electricity must remain high enough for a long enough period of time to make it commercially feasible to start up and run the plant.
28901 Pori, Finland
565 MW
Meri-Pori power plant
Fortum Power and Heat Oy, Meri-Pori power plant


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/chelyabinsk-chp-1
The CHP plant Chelyabinsk CHP-1, in Russia, was commissioned in 1942 and has a total capacity of 83.8 MW.
Chelyabinsk CHP-1 - power plant in Russia| Fortum
454119 Chelyabinsk, Russia
Kopeiskoe Shosse 40
133,8 MW
+7 351 255 2359
In 2014, an upgrade of Chelyabinsk CHP-1 was completed with the commissioning of two CCGT units with a total capacity of 83.8 MW. The implementation of advanced solutions increased the plant's efficiency to 50 %. Chelyabinsk CHP-1 provides for one fifth of the demand for the co-generation heat in Chelyabinsk. The plant uses natural gas and coal as fuel.
PAO Fortum, Chelyabinsk CHP-1
827,1 MW
Power Plant Manager: Yuriy Fanin


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/zabrze-chp-plant
Its production capacity amounts to 225 MW in fuel.
75 MW
It replaced outdated, purely coal-fired units in Zabrze and Bytom, enhancing the two cities’ energy production efficiency and contributing to emission reductions.
Zabrze CHP plant
145 MW
The plant produces electricity for the national grid and heat for some 70 000 households in the cities of Zabrze and Bytom.
Zabrze CHP, commissioned in 2018, is Fortum’s newest plant in Poland. It is a multi-fuel plant using refuse-derived fuel (RDF) and coal. It can also be fueled by biomass.
Zabrze - CHP plant in Poland | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/tyumen-chp-2
Tyumen CHP-2 is one of the highest capacity power plants operating in the Tyumen Region, Russia. It was commissioned in 1986.
Tyumen CHP-2 plant is 100 % gas-fired. The power plant's efficiency is growing, thanks to the reconstruction of the existing facilities to enable the lower consumption of resources and the production of energy at competitive market prices.
PAO Fortum, Tyumen CHP-2
755 MW
625053 Tyumenskaya Oblast, Tyumen
ul. Shirotnaya 200
Power Plant Manager: Alexey Nepushkin
+7 345 259 68 59
Tyumen CHP-2 - high capacity power plant in Russia | Fortum
1639,8 MW


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/wind-power/wind-power-parks
On 3 March 2022, due to Russia's attack on Ukraine, our CEO announced that Fortum Group has stopped all new investment projects in Russia until further notice.
Sørfjord is the second wind farm in Norway where Fortum handled all the steps from development to construction. This remote wind farm is a logistical miracle, accessed via serpentine roads.
Kalax
Kalmykia
Capacity (MW): 90
340
Solberg
Wind power – Our wind farms | Fortum
Read more about Nygårdsfjellet here.
Finland has excellent conditions for onshore wind power. The production is profitable without any state subsidies. Therefore, Fortum has multiple development projects in the works for new wind power throughout Finland, but in particular on the west coast.
Fortum is producing and constructing wind power in Norway, Sweden and Finland. We are also expanding our wind power capacity: when looking towards the future, we currently have more than 1,100 MWs of wind farms at various stages of development.
Commercial operation: 2018
Ulyanovsk
Astrakhan
Wind power parks
Read more about Solberg here
Fortum was in charge of the development and construction of the Ånstadblåheia wind power park. We operate the wind farm and work in close cooperation with our neighbours in the area.
Rostov
Nygårdsfjellet is currently the oldest wind farm in our portfolio.
Capacity (MW): 50
Ulyanovsk 2
We operate three wind farms in northern Norway.
Read more about wind power at Fortum
Commercial operation: 2006
Capacity (MW): 97
Kalax is Fortum’s first large-scale wind farm in Finland.
Wind power – Our wind farms
Read more about Kalax here.
Commercial operation started
Read CEO Markus Rauramo's statement.
Read more about Sørfjord here.
Read more about Ånstadblåheia here.
Solberg, an arctic wind farm, is an example of wind power production in wintery conditions.
Commercial operation: 2017
Wind farm
Capacity (MW): 32
Sørfjord
Commercial operation: 2020
Capacity (MW): 75
In Sweden, we have a history of owning multiple wind farms. Currently, we operate the Solberg wind farm, and we are planning to develop more wind power.
Nygårdsfjellet
350
Ånstadblåheia
Wind farms jointly owned in Russia


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/wind-power/wind-power-our-wind-farms/kalax-wind-power-park
Närpes, Finland
90 MW
How are things going with wind power at Fortum?
The local villages around the wind farm will receive a wind bonus based on the annual production. The village associations will use this annual contribution to develop social and cultural activities locally. The first full contribution will be shared based on the yearly production of 2021, as this will also be Kalax’s first full year of energy production.
Read the blog here
News about wind power
Learn more about our wind power plants
Clean and domestic wind power strengthens Finland's energy self-sufficiency
Kalax wind power park | Fortum
See all our power plants here
Fortum has finished the construction of two new wind parks in the Nordics
Energy Infrastructure Partners (EIP)
The wind farm is jointly owned by
and Fortum, and Fortum took over responsibility for asset management of the wind farm after commissioning. 70% of the renewable wind power it produces is sold directly to the Finnish energy company Neste through a long-term agreement.
Wind park Kalax
Kalax wind farm has been in operation since 2020. The wind farm consists of 21 turbines. Kalax is Fortum’s first large-scale wind farm in Finland.
Kalax, in Närpes, on the west coast of Finland, is Fortum’s first large-scale wind farm in Finland. Kalax wind farm’s total capacity is 90 MW and, with its annual production exceeding 0.3 TWh, it has the highest annual production of all wind farm commissioned in Finland in 2020. This lights up a town of 83,000 households.
Capacity
More about the two new wind parks
Number of turbines
Kalax wind power park


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/how-are-things-going-wind-power-fortum
How are things going with wind power at Fortum? | Fortum
Growth in renewables has played a crucial role in Fortum’s strategy and it will be important for Fortum in the future, as was communicated in our updated strategy published last December. There’s also a strong demand in our home markets of northern Europe to get more renewable sources of energy into the system. This clean power will help to reach our governments’ and customers’ ambitious climate targets: decarbonisation of societies and industry through electrification.
In the Nordics, government subsidies are not needed for onshore wind power (which is located on land rather than in large bodies of water). It is an important form of energy in climate change mitigation, as half a year of wind power production can offset the CO2 emissions that were generated during construction.
updated strategy
What’s going on with wind power at Fortum?
Kalax (90 MW) in Närpes, on the western coast of Finland, and Sørfjord (99 MW), in northern Norway, are the newest additions to our family of wind power parks we have constructed and now co-own with our partners. Fortum is also responsible for operation of the parks: we make sure that the wind parks work efficiently throughout their lifecycle.
In Norway, we are in charge of operating three wind parks: Sørfjord (99 MW), Ånstadblåheia (50 MW) and Nygårdsfjellet (32 MW). In Sweden, we currently operate one wind park, Solberg (76 MW). In Finland, we also multiple projects in the development phase, which means that we are actively cooperating with the landowners and other local stakeholders to identify the best solutions for building more wind power. In addition, Fortum – together with our partners – is the largest producer of wind power in Russia.
In late January we announced the commissioning of two new wind parks in the Nordics, Kalax in Finland and Sørfjord in Norway. Both are now producing clean energy for the Nordic market.
rauramo
In late January we announced the commissioning of two new wind parks in the Nordics. I could not be happier with the work our teams and contractors did to bring more renewable electricity production capacity to the world. An interesting fact I would like to highlight is that the Kalax project in Närpes, with production of more than 0.3 TWh per year, has the highest annual production of all wind parks commissioned in Finland in 2020.
Vice President, Wind
08 February 2021, 11:27
Wind as a renewable, CO2-free power source is a solution to enable electrification in transportation, industries and heating. Energy production in the Nordics is almost 100% fossil-free, but major steps are still needed in these areas of consumption in order to meet the required targets and the potential additional demand from hydrogen production. Our wind power team has no doubt that we are on an important mission: to create more sustainable ways of producing energy.
joonas
The future looks bright for our wind team: together with my colleagues here in the Nordics, and now also in Germany and rest of the Europe, we are excited for the expansion of renewables in Europe. Strengthening and growing in CO2-free power generation is one of the priorities of our


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/01/fortum-has-finished-construction-two-new-wind-parks-nordics
Fortum is growing its wind power portfolio in the Nordics with two newly commissioned wind power parks, Kalax in Finland and Sørfjord in Norway. Both are now producing clean energy for the Nordic market. According to the company’s new joint strategy with Uniper, wind power will be one of the key growth areas in the future.
“We are very pleased that this milestone has been achieved, especially considering the unusual working environment due to Covid-19. We look forward to continuing our close partnership with Fortum and could not be prouder of what the team has achieved”, commented
Sørfjord located in a remote area in north-western Norway, in
Energy Infrastructure Partners AG
Joonas Rauramo, VP, Fortum Wind Power, +358403543732
Fortum has finished the construction of two new wind parks in the Nordics | Fortum
“I am extremely proud of the Kalax wind farm and the excellent work our teams and our contractors did to finish this wind park safely, on schedule, and in active cooperation with our neighbours and other stakeholders in the area. Kalax is a significant milestone for us as we are targeting to build more wind parks not only in Finland but also more widely in Europe”, says
27 January 2021, 10:00 EET
Hamarøy region
Thorsten Helms
, is a large, 99-MW wind park. The construction on top of a mountain was an extraordinary project requiring extensive planning. As agreed in December 2019, EIP, on behalf of its clients, invested in an 80% share of the wind park after commissioning, and the wind park joined Fortum and EIP’s joint portfolio on 20 January 2021 with Fortum taking a role in asset management of the wind park.
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 27.1.2021
, Asset Owner at EIP.
www.energy-infrastructure-partners.com
-free sources of energy play a significant role. Fortum is currently developing new opportunities for wind power in Finland, Sweden, and Norway. In Russia, Fortum is the largest producer of wind power. In cooperation with its subsidiary Uniper, Fortum will be looking for opportunities to develop wind power also in other European countries.
In Fortum’s updated strategy, published in December, wind power and other CO
, VP of Fortum’s Wind Power Business.
Kalax in Närpes, on the west coast of Finland, is Fortum’s first large-scale wind park in Finland. The Kalax wind park’s total capacity is 90 MW and, with its annual production exceeding 0.3 TWh, it has the highest annual production of all wind parks commissioned in Finland in 2020. The construction was finished on schedule and according to the plans. The wind park is jointly owned by Energy Infrastructure Partners (EIP) and Fortum, and Fortum took over responsibility for asset management of the wind park after commissioning. 70% of the renewable wind power it produces is sold directly to the Finnish energy company Neste through a long-term agreement.
Energy Infrastructure Partners AG (EIP) is a Swiss manager of collective assets focused on high quality, large-scale renewables and system-critical energy infrastructure assets. With over CHF 3 billion under management, EIP leverages an extensive industry network, broad transaction experience and close partnerships with energy suppliers and the public sector in order to develop and manage solutions for institutional investors globally. Its clients primarily focus on pension funds, insurances and large family offices seeking investments in long-term, stable cash flow-generating assets that also contribute to security of energy supply, positive economic and social development, and the retirement provision of the population.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/wind-power
Advancement in wind turbine technology has improved efficiency.
Wind will be one of the main renewable energy sources to generate electricity in the future. With excellent wind conditions in our home markets, and with increased efficiency through larger rotors and economies of scale, wind power will be a key part of our move to zero-emissions electricity production.
What is wind power?
-free, clean energy future.
Wind is a one of the most important renewable energy sources.
How does wind power work?
When there is no wind, another source of energy is needed to balance the energy demand. Fortum balances the wind power production with our large hydropower assets. The ability to use hydro facilities as a regulator for intermittent wind production is important for the power system today. And it provides us with 100% renewable energy.
Growth in wind power production
What is the carbon impact of wind power?
How is wind power used?
Under construction we have the 380 MW
Solutions for sustainable cities
Wind power has endless potential
Wind power – a renewable and clean source of energy
with the the energy company Helen Ltd in Ostrobothnia, Finland.
380
Carbon emissions are kept as low as possible during construction of a wind farm. After construction, it takes less than half a year for all those emissions to be offset by the renewable energy the wind farm produces. During its production lifetime, typically 20-30 years, wind power is emissions free.
Wind power and the environment
₂
under construction
windfarms in operation
A renewable source of power generation in which wind is used to turn large propeller-like blades to produce kinetic energy, which is turned into electricity through an electric generator. Wind turbine technology has advanced significantly over the last few years; for example, today’s blades capture the potential of wind even better than before.
And more is on the way! We are currently working on building more wind power: we have more than 1 100+ MW at various stages in the process of getting the permits and planning ready. No investment decisions have yet been taken on these development projects.
Advancements in wind turbine technology with all larger rotor and taller turbines have increased power capacity. Today’s wind turbines are more powerful and more efficient. As part of our commitment to a clean energy future, we will continue to invest in wind power.
What happens when there is no wind?
Renewable energy
345
Pjelax wind farm
FAQ - Wind power
Electricity generated by wind farms is used by homes and businesses. But unlike some other sources of energy, it is important to note that wind energy is renewable. This means that one important use of wind power is to offset the emissions created by carbon-based electricity generation. Wind power will play an important role in the move to a CO
Where is wind energy used?
Improved efficiency
Many regions in the world have strong winds on a regular basis. And, in most cases, it makes sense to set up a wind turbine to capture this natural source of energy. However, for regions closer to the equator – where the sun shines regularly, solar can often be a better option for clean power generation.
Wind power – a renewable and clean source of energy | Fortum
Fortum Wind Power key figures
See more of our latest news about wind power.
Using wind power, a renewable energy source, is one of the ways to slow down global warming. The environmental impact of wind power is mainly connected to the infrastructure requirements of wind turbines and the electricity grid. Strict requirements defined by the regulatory authorities must be fulfilled in order to minimise the environmental impacts during the construction and operation of a wind farm.
megawatts (MW) of capacity together with our partner in the Nordic
Wind power plays a key role in Fortum’s strategy. Over the last few years we have taken many steps to growth. We are currently operating 345 megawatts wind power (MW) with our partners in Finland, Sweden and Norway.
Wind power is an increasingly important source of renewable energy, as its potential is unlimited. No fuel is used when producing electricity from wind, so no emissions are released into the air. Also, the carbon emissions during the construction phase are offset by the renewable energy the wind farm produces within six months of a wind farm’s operation.
Wind turbines are installed in areas where the wind blows regularly. When wind passes through a turbine, the unique shape of the blades causes them to rotate. As the blades spin, they produce kinetic energy, which turns a shaft that is connected to an electric generator.
No CO₂ is released into the atmosphere when electricity is generated with wind turbines.
Zero emissions


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/09/clean-and-domestic-wind-power-strengthens-finlands-energy-self-sufficiency
Clean and domestic wind power strengthens Finland's energy self-sufficiency | Fortum
Fortum aims to increase wind power production in Finland. The conditions in Ostrobothnia make it an excellent place to develop wind power projects. Local cooperation is key to the success and acceptability of projects.
Mikko Iso-Tryykäri
"We are very pleased that the people of Närpes have such a positive attitude towards Kalax. Good cooperation with local landowners and other stakeholders has been really important to us and has carried through the whole project from the planning and construction stages," says
12 September 2022, 16:51 EEST
Mikko Iso-Tryykäri, Head of Wind Power Development, +358 50 453 2650
, Head of Wind Development at Fortum.
The study was carried out by Taloustutkimus Oy on behalf of Fortum. The survey investigated the opinions of 18-79 year olds living in Närpes about wind power in Närpes. The survey was answered by 202 respondents from the target group. The interviews were conducted between 29.8.-30.8.2022.
(PDF, 822 KB)
"According to our survey, 75% of the people of Närpes believe that wind energy is necessary to mitigate climate change. It is important that the climate benefits of wind power are recognised. Renewable and domestic wind power generation has a really important role to play in achieving a carbon neutral energy system. Fortum's goal is to increase clean electricity production in Finland through wind power," says
"We hope to continue our good cooperation with the Närpes region and the residents and stakeholders of Ostrobothnia in future wind farms. We believe that Kalax's strong support will also enable us to implement new projects in this region", Vadbäck continues.
Hans Vadbäck
The Kalax wind park, in operation since the end of 2020, is the largest wind farm in the Närpes region. According to the opinion poll commissioned by Fortum, 83% of Närpes’ residents are in favour of the Kalax project. The inauguration of Kalax, postponed due to the covid situation, was celebrated with an open public event on Friday 9 September.
Kalax produces 300 00 MW of renewable electricity per year. Its production directly benefits local businesses, helping to reduce their emissions. 70% of the electricity produced by the wind park is sold directly to the Finnish energy company Neste under a long-term contract. The local distillery in Koskenkorva also replaces about half of the electricity used with Kalax wind power.
, Project Development Manager.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/wind-power/wind-power-our-wind-farms/anstadblaheia-wind-power-park
Ånstadblåheia wind power park
WinWind funds
Ånstadblåheia wind farm is located in Sortland municipality, in Nordland, and consists of 14 wind turbines. The wind farm has a total installed capacity of up to 50 MW. This corresponds to the electricity lighting up a town about 46,000 households.
Sortland, Norway
and Fortum, and Fortum operates the wind farm with Nordkraft. The local utility company Nordkraft is responsible for the daily operation of the wind farm on behalf of Fortum and is responsible for all local operational tasks that are not related to the actual wind turbines, for example maintenance of roads and grid connections The turbine supplier Vestas is taking care of the maintenance of the wind turbines.
Ånstadblåheia wind power park hero
Fortum and EIP's VinnVind (WinWind) funds can be applied for to support sports, cultural, environmental and youth activities in Sortland. The contributions from the VinnVind funds promote local development and activities and increase the appeal of living, working or visiting the areas around Ånstadblåheia wind farm. The first VinnVind contribution was used on renovations of local community houses and buildings, on musical instruments for the local school, and on a new trail machine for the local ski club. The Kulturfabrikken Sortland KF processes the applications for the VinnVind funds.
14
50 MW
Ånstadblåheia wind farm was put into operation in 2018. The plant consists of 14 wind turbines. In June 2019, the Minister of Petroleum and Energy officially inaugurated the facility.
Ånstadblåheia wind power park | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/wind-power/wind-power-our-wind-farms/sorfjord-wind-power-park
99 MW
Sørfjord wind power park
Fortum and EIP's VinnVind (WinWind) funds can be applied for to support sports, cultural, environmental and youth activities in Hamarøy. The contributions from the VinnVind funds promote local development and activities and increase the appeal of living, working or visiting the areas around Sørfjord wind farm. The Hamarøy and Narvik municipalities process the applications for the VinnVind funds. The first contribution will be shared later this year.
Sørfjord wind farm was fully commissioned in 2020. The plant consists of 23 wind turbines. Located in a remote area on top of a mountain, the wind farm is a logistical miracle with its serpentine roads.
Sørfjord wind power park | Fortum
and Fortum, and Fortum operates the wind farm. The local utility company Nordkraft is responsible for the daily operation of the wind farm on behalf of Fortum and is responsible for all local operational tasks that are not related to the actual wind turbines, for example maintenance of roads and grid connections. The turbine supplier Siemens Gamesa is taking care of the maintenance of the wind power turbines.
Sørfjord wind farm is located in Hamarøy. The wind farm’s 23 turbines have a total installed capacity of up to 99 MW. This corresponds to lighting up a town of about 91,000 households.
Sorfjord wind power park hero
Hamarøy, Norway


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/03/fortum-ceo-markus-rauramos-statement-groups-russian-businesses
(PDF, 751 KB)
Most importantly, we have around 7,000 colleagues in Russia. Many of our employees across Europe work with these colleagues and the developments of the past days have been distressing and challenging for all of us. In this unprecedented situation, our primary focus and concern is for our employees wellbeing and the security of supply of customers in all our countries.
Over the past week we have already witnessed what great suffering the war has caused to people. There is no justification for this. It has also shaken the relationship between Russia and Europe, damaging ties that have been built up over decades. The consequences will be far-reaching.
In addition, Uniper’s long-term gas contracts total approximately 370 TWh/a and approximately half of this amount is sourced from Russia.
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 3 MARCH 2022 AT 9.00 EET
At the same time, business as usual cannot continue.
As the CEO of a company with long business ties and broad operations in Russia, I am devastated and sad by Russia’s attack on Ukraine and follow the situation with the highest attention.
1)
For now, we have stopped all new investment projects in Russia until further notice and we will continue to reduce our thermal exposure in Russia.
03 March 2022, 09:00 EET
The Russian rouble (RUB) has depreciated significantly from the closing rate as of 31 December 2021. If this prevails, it has a negative translation impact on Fortum Group’s earnings, assets and liabilities denominated in RUB.
Together with our subsidiary Uniper, we have 12 power plants in Russia with a combined power generation capacity 15.5 gigawatts (GW) and heat production capacity 10.2 GW. In 2021, we generated 71.9 terawatt-hours (TWh) of electricity and produced 19.1 TWh of heat in Russia. Our Russian generating assets and the exposure in the Nord Stream 2 pipeline project carry a book value of approximately EUR 5.5 billion. In 2021, our Russian operations contributed approximately EUR 500 million in comparable operating profit, which corresponds to approximately 20% of the Group’s comparable operating profit.
All our operations are currently running as normal, so we can fulfil our duties to our customers.
Amongst all the uncertainty, one thing is absolutely clear: Europe’s urgent need for an energy transition. The current developments have also added a new variable to the equation of sustainability, affordability and security of supply, which is independence. We are actively supporting this through our investments into clean power, increasingly clean gas and flexibility. This morning’s announcement on our decision to apply for an extension to the lifetime of our Loviisa nuclear power plant in Finland, Uniper’s recently increased LNG imports and decision to resume planning of a hydrogen-ready LNG-terminal in Wilhelmshaven, Germany, are examples of our commitment. We are in continuous discussions with the Finnish and German governments on how Fortum Group can support security of supply in a decarbonising Europe.
Fortum CEO Markus Rauramo’s statement on the Group’s Russian businesses | Fortum
President and CEO
The situation is very dynamic and keeps evolving on a daily – if not hourly – basis, and it is very difficult to predict the extent of impacts on our operations in the future. It is obviously clear that we are complying with all applicable laws and regulations, including sanctions, and preparing for various scenarios. In case the escalation of events would hinder us from fulfilling our energy delivery commitments to our European customers, we would work with our respective regulators and governments to find a joint solution.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/solberg-wind-farm
Örnsköldsvik and Åsele, Sweden
76 MW
Solberg wind farm hero
Solberg wind farm is located northwest of Örnsköldsvik, in Västerbotten County, and approximately 30 km south of Åsele, in Västernorrland County.
22
and Fortum, and Fortum is responsible for operating the wind farm.
Solberg wind farm | Fortum
The local villages around the wind farm receive a wind bonus based on the annual production. The village associations use this annual contribution to develop social and cultural activities locally.
Solberg wind farm is located in the middle of Sweden. Solberg wind farm has been in operation since 2017. The wind farm consists of 22 turbines. Solberg is one of the arctic wind farms and an example of wind power production in wintery conditions.
Solberg is currently the only wind farm that Fortum operates in Sweden. With 22 wind turbines, its 76-MW capacity produces renewable electricity to light up a town of about 70,000 households on a yearly basis.
Solberg wind farm


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/nygardsfjellet-wind-power-park
Nygårdsfjellet wind farm is located in Narvik municipality, in northern Norway. The 14 wind turbines are spread around one of the reservoirs of Nygård power plant, Skitdalsvatn.
Nygårdsfjellet wind power park
Nygårdsfjellet - wind farm in Norway | Fortum
Narvik, Norway
Local suppliers of snow removal, road maintenance and other services related to the operation of service buildings have an ongoing dialogue with Nordkraft.
Nygårdsfjellet wind power park hero
Nygårdsfjellet wind farm in northern Norway was completed in two instalments: in 2006 and 2011. With a capacity of 32 MW, Nygårdsfjellet produces renewable energy corresponding to the electricity lighting up a town of around 30,000 households a year.
32 MW
and Fortum, and Fortum operates the wind farm. The local utility company Nordkraft is responsible for the daily operation of the wind farm on behalf of Fortum and is responsible for all local operational tasks that are not related to the actual wind turbines, for example maintenance of roads and grid connections.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/solar-power/solar-power-plants
46
Capacity (MW)*
Solar power plants | Fortum
Bugulchanskaya SPP
Kapeli
Bhadla
Biggest owner
*All figures in MWac rounded to nearest Megawatt, Russia Solar in MWp (dc).
Amrit
Pavagada
Solar power play a crucial role in enabling the green transition. We have jointly owned solar power plants in India and we are developing solar plants in the Nordics.
As announced in early March 2022, Fortum stopped all new investment projects in Russia and is not providing any new financing to its Russian subsidiaries. In May 2022, Fortum also announced that it is preparing a controlled exit from the Russian market, with potential divestments of its Russian operations as the preferred path. These processes might take some time and are subject to regulatory approvals. The company is complying with all applicable laws and regulations, including sanctions, and preparing for various scenarios.
15
Pleshanovskaya SPP
Grachevskaya SPP


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/kapeli-solar-plant
Kapeli is Fortum's first greenfield solar project, done in the State of Madhya Pradesh, India.
Kapeli - solar plant in India | Fortum
Kapeli solar plant
10 MW solar plant offsets more than 18,000 tonnes of
Commissioned December 2014
emissions annually
In India, Kapeli is one of Fortum's first greenfield solar projects, done in 2014-2015. It has an annual yield of 20 GWh/a.
The plant size is approximately 70 acres
CO


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/bhadla-solar-plant
Bhadla - a modern solar park in India | Fortum
One of Fortum's solar power plants in India, Bhadla, was commissioned in 2017.
Commissioned March 2017
Bhadla Solar park in Rajasthan, India, commissioned in 2017.
Annual yield of 158 GWh/a
Capacity of 70 MWac
Bhadla solar plant


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/solar-power
Photovoltaic cells in a solar panel turn sunlight into direct current electricity (DC). Then, an inverter converts the DC electricity into alternating current electricity (AC), and once this process has taken place, the electricity is used, fed into the grid or stored in a battery.
No greenhouse gas emissions are released into the atmosphere when you use solar panels to create electricity. And because the sun provides more energy than we’ll ever need, electricity from solar power is a very important energy source in the move to clean energy production.
116
How do solar panels work?
After solar panels have been installed, operational costs are quite low compared to other forms of power generation. Fuel isn’t required, and this means that solar power can create large amounts of electricity without the uncertainty and expense of securing a fuel supply.
MWp under construction
Solar panels produce electricity by transforming the continuous flow of energy from the sun to electricity.
Are solar panels expensive?
No fuel to burn
Solar power - unlimited source of energy
What is solar power?
CO₂-free
948
Key numbers for 2021
The sun provides more than enough energy to meet the whole world’s energy needs, and unlike fossil fuels, it won’t run out anytime soon. As a renewable energy source, the only limitation of solar power is our ability to turn it into electricity in an efficient and cost-effective way.
The cost depends on the number of panels and how/where they are installed, but generally, solar power is becoming more affordable every year. Solar power is the crucial future production method in the move to clean energy, and as economies of scale drive prices down, its importance will only increase.
No harmful emissions are released into the air when electricity is produced by solar panels.
The main advantage is that it is a renewable, clean source of electricity. Solar power is also scalable. This means that it can be deployed on an industrial scale, or it can be used to power a single household. When it’s used on a small scale, extra electricity can be stored in a battery or fed back into the electricity grid. Overall, the sun gives off far more energy than we’ll ever need. The only limitation is our ability to convert it to electricity in a cost-effective way.
Solar energy - a clean source
9
FAQ – Solar power
Solar energy - facts and advantages about solar power | Fortum
Operational solar power plants
Solar power is the key to a clean energy future and play crucial role in decarbonization of our societies. Every day, the sun gives off far more energy than we need to power everything on earth. Fortum has great experience from producing solar power and co-owns several solar plants in India. Also in the Nordics, the conditions for solar power are promising. That is why we are developing solar plants also in our home market.
Solar power and the environment
Limitless solar energy
What are the advantages of solar power?
As a renewable CO2-free power source, the environmental impact of solar power is significantly smaller than other power generation methods. The impact is mainly related to the production and supply of the special materials and metals that are required to produce solar panels. The location and the water used to clean the solar panels also affect the environment. We are working hard to find alternative ways to clean our solar panels.
The photovoltaic process that transforms sunlight into electricity doesn’t require any fuel and has no variable costs.
MWp operating capacity
(including associates)
A power generation method that converts energy from the sun into electricity. It uses solar panels that are often arranged on a building or concentrated in solar farms to facilitate a reaction that converts sun’s light radiation into electricity.
Low operating costs


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/our-energy-production/our-power-plants/amrit-solar-plant
Amrit - Fortum's first solar plant in India| Fortum
Amrit is Fortum's very first solar power plant in India. It has an annual yield of 9 GWh/a.
Amrit 5 MW Solar power plant in India
Amrit solar plant
Fortum acquired a solar plant in Beed ka Kheda village in Gulabpura Tehsil of Bhilwara in June 2013. It was the company's first investment project in the country. With a nominal peak capacity of 5 megawatt (MWac) and annual production at the level of approx. 9 gigawatt-hours (GWh/a), this plant was constructed as part of the Jawaharlal Nehru National Solar Mission.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/pavagada-solar-plant
Fortum’s 100 MW is the first part of the Pavagada solar park that has reached its full capacity and is connected to the grid.
Pavagada solar plant
Fortum connected a 100-MW solar plant to grid at Pavagada solar park in the Tumkur District, Karnataka, India. This solar plant is Fortum's fourth, and so far biggest solar energy project built.
In December 2017,
Pavagada - Fortum's newest solar plant in India | Fortum
Fortum's newest 100 MW Solar park in Tumkur District in Karnataka, India.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-france
Building on its Nordic experience in electric vehicle charging solutions and smart e-mobility solutions, Fortum also wishes to contribute to the development of e-mobility in France through its subsidiary Charge & Drive.
Fortum in France
Fortum in France | Fortum
Fortum has been operating in France since 2011.
We want to engage our customers and society to join the change for a cleaner world
Visit our French website
As a candidate for the upcoming renewal of French hydroelectric concessions, Fortum aims to make a significant contribution to hydroelectric production in France. We are convinced that a positive emulation will come from a plurality of players in the hydroelectric sector in France.
Fortum is a member of the French Independent Association of Electricity and Gas (AFIEG, Association Française Indépendante de l'Electricité et du Gaz), which brings together the main alternative players in the energy sector in France.
Fortum wants to participate in the development of renewable energies in France, in particular in the fields of hydroelectricity and e-mobility


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-germany
Fortum and Uniper
Visit our German website
Fortum in Germany
Our investment in Uniper
Our presence in Germany focuses on operations and maintenance services for industry and energy companies. As announced on 21 September 2022, Fortum has agreed to fully divest Uniper to the German State.
Our services include maintenance, inspection, condition management and consultation for gas and steam turbines, generators, electrical and automation systems. We also deliver a wide range of IT systems specifically designed for the energy industry.
We offer our customers consistent and environmentally friendly performance. We provide care and services of the highest standards with an excellent track record in power plant technology, operations and maintenance.
Fortum in Germany | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-india
In this partnership, Fortum will retain a significant minority ownership in the solar power company and continue to provide operation and maintenance services based on a long-term agreement.
Investor news 22.6.2021:
Fortum launched its operations in India in September 2012 establishing an office in Delhi. It has been focusing on building its solar portfolio ever since, making significant steps in the business. Fortum focuses in all its operations on sustainability, environment and society.
is one of Fortum's first greenfield solar projects, done in 2014-2015. It has an annual yield of 20 GWh/a. The 10 MW solar plant offsets more than 18,000 tonnes of CO2 emissions annually.
Fortum in India | Fortum
Online news 4 February 2022
In June 2018 Fortum signed an agreement to sell a 54% share of its solar power company operating four solar power plants in India to UK Climate Investments (40%) and Elite Alfred Berg (14%). Elite Alfred Berg has the option to buy up to an additional 16% from Fortum. The total capacity of this portfolio is 185 MW.
Social responsibility is important part of Fortum’s operations. In 2014, the company equipped three schools from Bhilwara providing schooling for over 1,200 students with solarpowered infrastructure to meet the schools’ power needs in an efficient and sustainable way. The initiative has bought relief to the students during summers when the temperature rises above 45 degrees Celsius and the region witnesses regular electricity failures. This has significantly increased students’ attendance level reaching 96% from a mere 50%.
. The capital expenditure was approximately EUR 160 million. The plant was fully commissioned by 5 August 2019.
Fortum has won the right to build 200 MW solar capacity in India
In March 2022, Fortum won the right to build a solar project with a total capacity of 200 MW in Gujarat, India. The solar power project in Gujarat, India is planned to be developed together with a partner and the project is expected to be commissioned by 2024.
In June 2018, Fortum won the right to build a
Social responsibility
solar power plant was commissioned in 2017. Its capacity is 70 MWac and annual yield 158 GHh/a.
Sale of Pavagada and Rajashtan solar parks
is Fortum's first power plant in India. It was acquired in 2013. With a nominal peak capacity of 5 megawatt (MWac) and annual production at the level of approx. 9 gigawatt-hours, this plant was constructed as part of the Jawaharlal Nehru National Solar Mission.
Right to build 800 MW of new solar power in India
In June 2021, Fortum has signed an agreement to divest the 250-MW Pavagada II and the 250-MW Rajasthan solar power plants in India to Actis, a global infrastructure investment firm.
is our newest 100 MW Solar park in Tumkur District in Karnataka, India. It was connected to grid in December 2017. This solar plant is Fortum's fourth, and so far biggest solar energy project built.
250-MW solar power plant in the Pavagada solar park in Karnataka, India


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/media/press-kits/our-solutions-india



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/02/fortum-has-won-right-build-600-mw-solar-capacity-india
For the development of solar-based power generation, Fortum utilises partnerships and other forms of co-operation to maintain an asset-light structure. The solar power parks in Karnataka, India are planned to be developed together with a partner.
Fortum has won the right from Solar Energy Corporation of India (SECI) to build two solar power parks with a total capacity of 600 MW in Karnataka, India. Fortum participated in two solar auctions held under SECI’s ISTS-X Scheme for the total tendered capacity of 1,200 MW. The two solar projects shall be entitled to fixed tariffs for 25 years under SECI’s PPAs (power purchase agreements) of 2.37 INR/kWh for 300 MW and 2.36 INR/kWh for 300 MW. The projects are expected to be commissioned by 2024.
target="_blank"
04 February 2022, 15:11 EET
Fortum has won the right to build 600 MW solar capacity in India | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2018/06/fortum-sell-share-185-mw-indian-solar-portfolio-aiming-further-solar-investments
As communicated previously Fortum seeks to allocate EUR 200–400 million of its growth capital to solar projects in India.
Key media
"This project demonstrates the growing maturity of India’s secondary market for renewables – creating an environment in which private investors have confidence to invest in new greenfield projects that will accelerate the decarbonisation of India’s economy," says Richard Abel, Managing Director of UK Climate Investments. "We are delighted and honoured to start co-operation with Fortum and UK Climate Investments regarding investments into renewable energy assets on behalf of our investor clients," says Daniel Pasternack, CEO of Elite Alfred Berg.
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 8 JUNE 2018 AT 9.00 EEST
Fortum has signed an agreement to sell a 54% share of its solar power company operating four solar power plants in India to UK Climate Investments (40%) and Elite Alfred Berg (14%). Elite Alfred Berg has the option to buy up to an additional 16% from Fortum. The total capacity of this portfolio is 185 MW. In this partnership, Fortum will retain a significant minority ownership in the solar power company and continue to provide operation and maintenance services based on a long-term agreement.
www.eabgroup.fi
UK Climate Investments
Elite Alfred Berg
Fortum to sell share of 185-MW Indian solar portfolio – aiming at further solar investments
www.greeninvestmentgroup.com
The total consideration from the divestment of the 54% stake on a debt and cash free basis, including the effect of deconsolidating Fortum's minority part of the net debt, is expected to be approximately EUR 150 million. The positive impact on Fortum's results from selling part of the solar portfolio will be approximately EUR 20 million and will be booked in the M&A and Solar & Wind Development unit. The transaction is subject to regulatory approvals in the EU and is expected to close in the beginning of the third quarter 2018.
Fortum is a leading clean-energy company that provides its customers with electricity, heating and cooling as well as smart solutions to improve resource efficiency. We want to engage our customers and society to join the change for a cleaner world. We employ some 9,000 professionals in the Nordic and Baltic countries, Russia, Poland and India. In 2017, our sales were EUR 4.5 billion and 61% of our electricity generation was CO2 free. Fortum's share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki.
Fortum to sell share of 185-MW Indian solar portfolio – aiming at further solar investments | Fortum
08 June 2018, 09:00 EEST
UKCI is a £200 million pilot investment programme mandated to invest in India and across sub-Saharan Africa. It is targeting transformational green projects where UKCI capital can mobilise additional private sector investment on a sustainable basis to help the world’s developing economies adapt to climate change and promote cleaner, greener growth. UK Climate Investments LLP (UKCI) is a joint venture between the Green Investment Group and the UK Government’s Department for Business, Energy and Industrial Strategy.
Måns Holmberg, Manager, IR and Financial Communications, tel. +358 44 518 1518
(PDF, 29 KB)
EAB Group Plc is a profitable and growing investment service company offering versatile and high-quality asset management services for both consumer clients and professional investors. EAB Group Plc is listed on the First North Finland market maintained by NASDAQ Helsinki Oy (Helsinki Stock Exchange). EAB Group Plc is the parent company of EAB Group. The Groups’ customer base consists of individuals and corporations that are served nationwide in 17 different offices. The Group employs more than 100 investment professionals, and over 25 tied agents provide its services. On behalf of its clients, the Group manages assets of approximately EUR 3 billion in total. Check out EAB Group’s services at
Joonas Rauramo, VP, Solar & Wind Development, tel. +358 40 354 3732
"The agreement with Elite Alfred Berg and UK Climate Investments is an important step in our solar strategy. Our ambition is to continue the partnership also for future solar power projects. The arrangement frees up capital for further investments and enables Fortum to continue to utilise its key competencies to develop, construct and operate solar power plants in India," says Kari Kautinen, SVP, M&A and Solar & Wind Development at Fortum.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/02/responsible-solar-energy-india
Juwi India Renewable Energies Pvt. Ltd., the supplier and operator of the Kapeli power plant, went through a careful audit process that focused on issues related to business principles, human rights, labour standards and environment. Our audit team visited Juwi’s headquarters in Bengaluru and the operations at the Kapeli power plant. During the process, we interviewed management representatives and employees. Additionally, we checked documents, like payroll receipts and work hour tracking reports. An occupational safety inspection was also conducted at the Kapeli power plant in conjunction with the audit.
Responsible solar energy in India | Fortum
Fortum currently has two solar power plants in India, where the sun shines 300 days a year. The newest of the plants is located in Kapeli, a village in Madhya Pradesh State in central India. The plant was built in 2014 and inaugurated in January 2015.
We want to reduce environmental impacts in all our operations and improve economic and social wellbeing. The same goals are also applicable to our business partners, goods and service providers and their supply chains. Fortum’s Supplier Code of Conduct defines the basic requirements that suppliers must comply with. Audits are carried out to verify compliance with, e.g., laws, anti-corruption principles, labour standards and conditions, the ban on the use of child labour, and non-discrimination.
Kapeli power plant is the first new solar power plant that has been constructed under Jawaharlal Nehru National Solar Mission (JNNSM) Phase II, the Indian government’s renewable energy investment programme. The power plant consists of 125,000 fixed, CdTe thin film panels and 15 inverters. The solution reduces the carbon footprint, water consumption and the payback time of the investment. The 10-MW (AC) power plant reduces carbon dioxide emissions by about 18,000 tonnes a year. It was awarded the prestigious “Solar Project of the Year” by Asian Power Awards in 2015.
Corporate responsibility was an important factor in selecting the supplier of Fortum’s Kapeli solar power plant. We require our partners to apply the same ethical business practices that we comply with in our own operations.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2018/03/ngo-cooperation-india
Fortum's social responsibility
NGO cooperation in India | Fortum
Parivartan, a grassroots-level NGO was brought in to help Fortum to draw synergy from this diversity and to ensure functionality between the workers. The Parivartan team members became a part of the community. They shared the same living conditions at the workers’ housing accommodations throughout the construction period. They started with small steps by first encouraging the workers to use good hygiene practices and gradually stepped up their efforts by sharing their knowledge about worker’s rights, the value of safety, respect for women workers, and how to use and share all the wellbeing facilities provided by the company.
Fortum’s activities have also been appreciated by the governmental health officials. Our well maintained housing accommodations and the high standards achieved in preventing diseases common in the area have been showcased as a benchmark for other solar developers.
In December 2017 the 100-MW Pavagada solar plant was connected to the grid in India. Thousands of migrant workers from diverse backgrounds around the country, with different religions, cultures, ethnicities, language, food habits and social rituals were involved in the construction phase.
The results were impressive: the rate of absenteeism dropped, safety compliance increased, and the use of alcohol or other misconduct became nonexistent.
Parivartan employed many ingenious ways of communicating. They organized Saturday movies, and when the house was full they would take a break and talk about one of the topics. Separate events were also organised for female workers to discuss topics important to them. Parivartan trained workers to volunteer as, for example, hygiene inspectors, safety stewards and day care attendants for children. All aligned behaviours were rewarded. Parivartan also brought fun and games to their pitch and communicated through street dramas. This approach ensured better recall and implementation of good practices at the workplace and better personal and group wellbeing.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/sustainability/society-our-people



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/03/fortum-has-won-right-build-200-mw-solar-capacity-india
16 March 2022, 13:45 EET
Fortum has won the right to build 200 MW solar capacity in India | Fortum
Fortum has won the right from Gujarat Urja Vikas Nigam Limited (GUVNL) to build a solar project with a total capacity of 200 MW in Gujarat, India. Fortum participated in the solar auction conducted by GUVNL for the total tendered capacity of 500 MW. The solar project shall be entitled to a fixed tariff for 25 years under GUVNL PPA (power purchase agreement) of 2.29 INR/kWh. The project is expected to be commissioned by 2024.
For the development of solar-based power generation, Fortum utilises partnerships and other forms of co-operation to maintain an asset-light structure. The solar power project in Gujarat, India is planned to be developed together with a partner.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-poland
Fortum in Poland
Fortum entered the Polish market in 2003. In the heating and cooling businesses, there are two CHP plants and over 940 km of district heating networks, which serve around 360,000 households in the cities of Plock, Wroclaw, Czestochowa, Zabrze, and Bytom. The overall electricity generation capacity reaches 145 MW, and the heat generation capacity is over 568 MW. In 2022 Fortum had approximately 630 employees in Poland.
Visit our Polish website
Fortum in Poland | Fortum
Fortum's CHP plant in Czestochowa, which was built from the ground up, was opened in 2010. The CHP plant uses coal and biomass as sources of energy.
In September 2018, Fortum inaugurated a new multi-fuel CHP plant in Zabrze. The new power plant complies with high environmental and BAT (Best Available Technology) standards. The plant provides district heating to some 70,000 households in Zabrze and Bytom, in the Silesia region in southeastern Poland. The new investment replaced the outdated, purely coal-fired units in Zabrze and enhanced the two cities' energy production efficiency. The new plant has a production capacity of 225 MW, and the annual production is estimated to amount to approximately 464 GWh of electricity and 986 GWh of heat.
The core business of Fortum in Poland is high-efficiency combined heat and power production, heat distribution, gas, and electricity retail. The company aims to develop sustainable solutions for cleaner cities, meeting the needs of local communities.
Fortum also sells gas and electricity to both: business clients and individual customers. The total number of clients Fortum provides with gas and electricity amounts to above 100,000. Fortum draws on experience from Nordic markets to ensure sustainably and the highest quality solutions to its customers.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/media/press-kits/country-fact-sheets/fortum-denmark
Fortum Recycling & Waste Denmark complies with all relevant standards and has a processing capacity of approx. 200180.000 tonnes of hazardous waste. The company recovers oil, iron, and metals and delivers full traceability throughout the process. Furthermore, we develop solutions for recycling soil, ash, slags, plastics, and EV batteries. Fortum Waste Solutions A/S has created value for e.g., Manufacturing Industries, the Maritime Industry (ports and offshore), Universities, hospitals, Collection companies, and workshops.
With the point of origin in the high-temperature incineration facility in Nyborg, Fortum Recycling & Waste Denmark has removed hazards from the environment for almost 50 years. We offer comprehensive services and solutions for the final treatment, reutilisation, and recovery of complicated and hazardous waste. This makes us a prerequisite for the circular economy in the Danish and Nordic communities and industries. We increase environmental efficiency for the Danish industry through comprehensive services and solutions for the final treatment, reutilisation and recovery of complicated and hazardous waste.
Solving problems is in our DNA and our mission is to transform waste streams back to essential raw materials. We find solutions for our customers’ environmental and waste challenges to enable circularity of materials.
Fortum in Denmark
We are rethinking recycling and leading the way towards revolution of materials.
Our Recycling & Waste Denmark operation makes us a prereq­uisite for circular economy in the Danish and Nordic communities.
Fortum Recycling & Waste Denmark manages to detoxify hazardous waste through Best Available Techniques and convert the organic waste in thermal incineration processes to heat and electricity. Our energy supply covers 85% of the district heating needed in the city of Nyborg and the neighboring town of Ullerslev, and we deliver a significant amount of electricity to the public electricity grid.
Fortum in Denmark | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-denmark



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-norway
Fortum in Norway
Fortum is the largest electricity retail business in the Nordics with more than 2 million customers. We provide electricity, Charge & Drive e-mobility solutions as well as related and digital services for consumers and businesses.
Fortum in Norway | Fortum
Read more about our Recycling and Waste solutions
Read more about our wind power
Fortum's operations in Norway consist of electricity sales, advanced waste treatment services, and wind power production.
In Northern Norway, Fortum owns three wind farms: Nygårdsfjellet wind power plant which has an installed capacity of 32 MW, Ånstadblåheia wind power plant which has an installed capacity of 50 MW and Sørfjord wind power plant which has an installed capacity of 97 MW.
Fortum Waste Solutions provides advanced waste management services and recycling for industries, cities and communities.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/fortum-recycling-waste
Environmental construction
Environmental construction services
Metal recycling
Our experts are here to help you find the recycled metal products for your needs.
Our waste management specialists in the Nordics are here to help you find solutions for efficient waste management.
Over 80% of lithium-ion battery materials can now be recycled
Our experts in the Nordics are here to help you to find the best solution for your ash recycling.
We offer fly and bottom ash recycling solutions for Waste-to-Energy and other industrial residues and recover valuable materials for reuse.
Battery recycling
We recycle post-consumer plastic waste and produce Fortum Circo® recycled plastic, which is a sustainable raw material choice for plastics industry.
Fortum Recycling & Waste
Our experts are here to discuss more about our services and battery recycling solutions.
Plastic recycling
Carbon2x – Rethinking CO2
Ash recycling
We offer end of life services and recycling solutions for lithium-ion batteries and recover the valuable battery materials for reuse.
Fortum Recycling & Waste | Fortum
We offer turnkey waste management services in the Nordics and specialize in hazardous waste management.
News and current issues
READ MORE
We collect and sort different kinds of metal waste and we offer high-quality recycled metal granulates for industrial needs.
Fortum’s Carbon2x concept captures CO2 emissions from waste incineration and turns them into materials. This offers a solution for the decarbonisation of waste treatment at hundreds of plants in Europe alone. It also secures a valuable feedstock for new products.
Fortum Smart Operations provide full-scope Operation and Maintenance (O&M) solutions to ensure that your power plant runs sustainably, safely and economically. We help you maximise your plant’s performance and increase profitability and shareholder value throughout the asset’s lifetime.
We offer solutions for sustainable environmental construction by reusing recycled materials and utilizing industrial side streams.
Waste management services
Our experts are here to help you to find the right Fortum Circo recycled plastic product to meet your requirements.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/ash-recycling-contact-information
jessica
Ash recycling contact information | Fortum
saarinen
hjermitslev
Other countries
Interested in bottom ash recycling solutions?
Baltics & Norway
+358504349306
+358504668839
Jessica Rydén
+358503866100
Jeppe Hjermitslev
Our ash recycling experts are here to help you to find the best solution for your ashes!
Ash Recycling
Interested in Fortum Gravo® recycled bottom ash?
ryden
piepponen
+46 76 544 46 24
jan
Tuomas Piepponen
vaajamo
osterbacka
Product manager
Interested in fly ash recycling solutions?
eeva
Ash recycling contact information
+358504068001
Matti Vaajamo
Jan Österbacka
jeppe
tuomas
+4525291312
Contact our Fortum Gravo® specialist
Eeva Saarinen


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/ash-recycling
Fly ash recycling
Refining of ash accelerates climate goal achievement
We help you to reduce the CO2 emissions and to be part of the transition from the linear economy towards the circular economy.
Innovative R&D
emissions and boost material efficiency, while enabling a circular economy for non-recyclable waste through safe and sustainable material recovery.
Fly ash is a hazardous by-product of the incineration in waste-to-energy power plants. We provide versatile solutions to process and recover raw materials from industrial fly ash.
Contact our team of experts!
A waste-to-energy plant is no longer the end point for materials. With our innovative technology, we process fly and bottom ash to recover raw materials from waste-to-energy residues as well as other industrial residues and return the recovered materials, metals and minerals, back into circulation.
Our ash recycling solutions
Fortum Gravo®
Transforming waste streams back into raw materials with a low CO
Customer case
Fortum and circular economy company Westenergy are developing waste-to-energy solutions to be even better for the environment. Fortum's new ash refining method significantly reduces the carbon dioxide emissions from Westenergy’s operations.
footprint
Bottom ash recycling
Our mission is to transform waste streams back to raw materials and we aim to close the loop in the waste-to-energy process. Our ash recycling solutions reduce CO
We use novel technologies and develop our recycling processes to make products that meet environmental and technical requirements.
Fortum Gravo products are CE-marked aggregate-like products for filtration and sub-base layers. Produced from waste-to-energy plants’ bottom ash, Fortum Gravo is a circular economy solution for civil engineering structures.
Ash Recycling | Fortum
Built-in sustainability
A waste-to-energy plant is not the end point for materials. We process the bottom ash from incineration to recover materials, such as critical metals and minerals so they can be put back into circulation and into end-products.
As an energy and circular economy company, we offer advanced expertise for all waste streams related to energy production.
Expertise for all ash types


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/bottom-ash-recycling
Bottom ash recycling | Fortum
Bottom ash is a by-product of the waste-to-energy process. With our state-of-the-art recycling service, we recover the valuable minerals and metals, which the bottom ash contains, that would otherwise be lost.
Our recycling process maximises metal extraction from bottom ash. The novel technique liberates even the minute quantities of valuable metals that traditional methods have not been able to recover. We are also constantly developing and innovating new solutions for metals as well as mineral utilisation. The recycled mineral fraction is available for customers as Fortum Gravo® products, designed for roads and other civil engineering structures, for example, in filtration and sub-base layers.
Contributing to the circular economy
Fortum Gravo
Our recycling service for bottom ash is reliable and fast and can also be tailored to meet the specific needs of our customers. We have seven sorting units that currently operate in Sweden, Finland, Norway, and the Baltics. The processing capacity of these units is 700 000 tons (kg) annually. Our flexible sorting units can be transferred from one processing site to another and be operational even within a day.
State-of-the-art process
Flexible, customer-oriented service
Aggregate-like products for civil engineering structures – produced from waste-to-energy plants’ bottom ash
Recycling bottom ash and utilising the recovered minerals helps to save natural resources and contributes to the circular economy. Recycling metal reduces CO2 emissions by as much as 90% compared to primary metal production. Therefore maximising the recovery of valuable metals is essential.
Interested in collaborating with us?
We offer bottom ash recycling services for waste-to-energy plants. Our service concept is cost-effective and versatile and can be tailored to meet the specific needs of our customers. We are also constantly developing and innovating new recycling solutions and productisation of metals and minerals.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/ash-recycling/fortum-gravo-recycled-bottom-ash
Recycled materials
Environmental benefits
products has been piloted in two civil engineering structures in
Technical benefits
Benefits in using Fortum Gravo®
Fortum Gravo products are CE-marked and can be used with notification in paved structures in Finland.
Contact our specialists to learn more about the results of the pilot projects!
Fortum Gravo® - Recycled Bottom Ash
0/2 and 0/16 qualities were tested in the filtration layer and 0/32 in the sub-base layer.
Contact our expert
Fortum Gravo® recycled bottom ash
Recycled bottom ash is a sustainable solution to replace the use of natural rocks and to reduce CO2 emissions.
Interested in Fortum Gravo® products?
Pilot projects
Fortum Gravo® - Recycled Bottom Ash | Fortum
Riihimäki, Finland. The pilot projects tested and monitored the technical functionality of the material in real working conditions. Fortum Gravo
The high thermal resistance of Fortum Gravo products can reduce the amount of materials required in lower stressed structures.
Fortum Gravo products are CE-marked aggregate-like products for filtration and sub-base layers. Produced from waste-to-energy plants’ bottom ash, Fortum Gravo offers a circular economy solution for civil engineering structures.
The use of Fortum Gravo
Fortum Gravo is a recycled aggregate-like product from the bottom ash recycling process, available in qualities of 0/2 and 0/16 for filtration layers and 0/32 for sub-base layers. Fortum Gravo is a suitable material for traditional earth construction methods and can be utilised with a notification (MARA Decree) in paved structures in Finland, without an environmental permit. Our flexible sorting units and in-house processes enable us to tailor Fortum Gravo to meet customers’ specific needs and requirements. Currently Fortum Gravo is produced and available in Finland.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/refining-ash-accelerates-climate-goal-achievement
“Westenergy further processes waste into usable electricity, heat and recycled materials. When energy is recovered from waste, the waste does not completely disappear, but ash and other non-combustible materials remain. These residues must be dealt with responsibly,” says Westenergy’s Head of Business Intelligence
“Fortum has set partnerships as one of its strategic priorities, and it has been great to form one with Westenergy,” says
“We greatly appreciate our long-term collaboration with Fortum,” says Ripatti. “We have all learned something new, and together we have set our visions further into the future. It is truly a partnership.”
, Commercial Director, Ash and Slag Business Line at Fortum. “Emissions are significantly reduced with this method, and not least through the omission of cement. The carbon footprint calculations we have made with Westenergy show that the carbon dioxide emissions from ash refining are up to 84 % lower compared to the emissions from cement stabilisation.”
, Product Manager at Fortum Waste Solutions. “As a result of our long-term partnership, we know each other's strengths and needs, and we can have an open and constructive dialogue about any areas of development. It is important for us to provide solutions that genuinely help our customers achieve their climate and environmental goals.”
Material recycling is essential, but globally there will always be materials that cannot be recycled effectively. Non-recyclable materials are also waste that needs to be treated, and converting waste into energy is in fact a key part of the current waste management system in Finland and around the world. Waste incineration is getting better for the environment through continuous development. The partnership between Westenergy and Fortum in the treatment of ashes is a fine example of this.
operates within the circular economy. The company owns a modern Waste-to-Energy plant where combustible waste is refined into electricity, heat and recovered materials. The energy produced in the plant has a significant impact on reducing the need for fossil fuels in energy production, and Westenergy produces about 50 % of the district heating needed in the Vaasa region. By producing material for earthwork and recycled metals and by participating actively in developing a circular economy in the operation area, Westenergy is creating a cleaner and more sustainable future.
Westenergy
Previously, ash that could not be recovered was used as binder in cement mixtures and taken to the landfill to prevent the impurities it contains from leaching into the environment. Known as cement stabilisation, this has been an effective final disposal method for a challenging product, however, relatively substantial amounts of carbon dioxide emissions and landfill waste are generated in the process. Also, by using this method, the salt contained in the ash and the materials it binds end up in the landfill and cannot be recovered for further use.
The new ash refining method significantly reduces the carbon footprint
“In the future, we will also consider and explore other possible ways of dealing with the remaining ash after the refining process rather than taking it to the landfill,” says Ripatti. “The results will help us achieve the goals we have set for logistics. We would like to use carbon-neutral fuels and power in our logistics.”
The collaboration between Fortum and Westenergy is a fine example of how strong partnerships promote climate and circular economy work.
Refining of ash accelerates climate goal achievement | Fortum
. “Fortum has been an excellent partner for us in this. Westenergy has a waste-to-energy plant in the Mustasaari area of Vaasa, and Fortum has handled ash treatment for the plant since 2012.”
“The treatment of Westenergy’s ashes in our ash refinery in Pori includes the removal of salt from the ash and the binding of heavy metals to the ash. Once this has been done, the ashes are ready for final disposal without cement. The salt is disposed of to the sea in purified and analysed discharge water; however, our objective is to also recycle the salt in the future, and we are continuously working on finding ways to reuse the salt from the ashes,” says
Recycling solutions for fly and bottom ashes
Long-term collaboration benefits all
Juha Ripatti
“Westenergy aims for carbon-neutral energy production by the end of the 2020s, and to make the transition to carbon-negative production at the beginning of the next decade. We want to offer a service in which greenhouse gas emission reduction and carbon capture are thrown into the bargain,” says Ripatti. “Among other things, this means that we evaluate climate and environmental aspects also when we select our partners. Fortum’s new ash refining method meets all our criteria related to the climate and environment, so it can help us achieve our climate goals.”
03 May 2022, 10:23


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fly-ash-recycling
Fortum’s novel technology in ash refining process provides a step towards a circular economy for household waste. Our ash refining process significantly reduces CO2 emissions as well as the amount of material ending up in landfills compared to traditional cement stabilisation methods.
Currently, our novel ash refining process reduces CO2 emissions remarkably compared to traditional treatment methods. In the near future, we are embarking on the next steps to recover salts, metals and minerals from fly ash. Our ultimate target is to utilise all the materials which are fed into recycling process.
Our extensive service portfolio covers both a new innovative recycling and conventional ash treatment services. We provide services for ash recycling currently in Nordics and Baltics. Having our roots and expertise in hazardous waste management, there is no fly ash too hazardous for us. Together we’ll find the best way to recycle your ashes and boost your efforts to get towards CO2 neutrality or to achieve even carbon negativity.
Pioneering fly ash recycling process
Using the best technology for fly ash recycling
We provide a recycling solution for all types of fly ash using the most suitable method. Depending on the type of fly ash and its hazardousness, we have, in addition to conventional recycling methods, our own innovative, state-of-the-art technology available. Regardless of the selected method, we are working to reduce the CO2 emissions of ash recycling for our customers.
Fly ash is a hazardous by-product and the very last remaining waste type originating from the incineration of waste in waste-to-energy plants.  At Fortum, we strive to be among the first companies in the world to recover and recycle all valuable raw materials from waste-to-energy fly ashes.
Fortum’s ash refining process is a pioneering solution in the field of hazardous waste recycling in the Nordics, and it enables the development of raw material recovery and refining the recovered materials for reuse in the near future.
Be part of the circular economy
Fly ash recycling | Fortum
High-end services for our customers


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/metal-recycling
Metal Recycling
Recycled products
Recycled metal saves natural resources, as metal produced in the recycling process consumes two times less energy than ore mining. Our own recycling processes provide us with exact information on the recycling rate and emissions. We offer CO2 reporting on recycled materials.
Processed 100% in Finland
Get in touch with our experts!
Metal recycling minimises carbon footprint
Our high-quality end products are based on efficient sorting at the place of origin.
Our metal recycling plant in Ikaalinen, Finland recycles copper, aluminium, iron and sheet metal scrap, among others, as well as cables and transformers, which are used to manufacture recycled raw materials for industry.
Diversity
Our efficient recycling process meets the requirements of responsible recycling and minimises environmental impact.
Key topics and targets
Our recycled metal products are suitable for the different needs of industry. An increasing number of metal products are already produced from recycled metals, and our refining processes ensure that we are able to save nearly 100% of precious metals.
Metal Recycling | Fortum
We collect, sort and recycle non-ferrous and ferrous metals including cables – such as copper, aluminium, iron and steel – generated by industry and demolition sites. In our state of art metal recycling plant, we manufacture valuable recycled raw materials from scrap metal.
Why Fortum’s recycled metal products?
A wide range of copper, aluminium, steel and iron in different grades.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/metal-recycling/recycled-metals
Recycled metals | Fortum
Bonus
Windings of small electric motors originating from incineration plants or from crushing.
Electrolytically pure copper granulate made from electrical conductors and cables.
Recycled copper
Cast iron in its various forms.
Tense
Granules
E1, E2 & E3
Aluminum cores removed from distribution network transformers.
Copper cores removed from distribution network transformers.
Incineration plant scrap is an iron-containing recyclable metal fraction separated from the slag and ash of the incineration plant by a magnet.
HMS or "Heavy-melting steel" is a common recycled metal grade. It contains ferrous pieces with a size of 150x50x50 cm.
Copper cable with a lead jacket between the insulation layer.
The manganese alloy makes this iron alloy tough and it is often used, for example, in the mining industry. The manganese content of this iron alloy is typically more than 10%.
Aluminium rims either with accessories (valves, tire weights) or without them.
+358 40 820 1396
Martti Pohjonen
HMS
sutela
Brass in its various forms: sheets, tubes, slabs, etc. May not contain sockets, oxidized or iron-containing pieces.
Recycled metals
Our recycled metal product selection
Production at the Ovako steel mill in Imatra is based entirely on recycled scrap metal
Fe-Turnings are turning chips from iron processing. Suitable for recycling.
Honey
Taint Tabor Hammel, i.e. pure mixed alloyed aluminium processed into pieces about the size of a fist.
Incinerator scrap
Ferrous
Hard zinc
Rims
Recycled zinc
+358 40 183 6809
Zinc dust
Hard Zinc is a by-product of the zinc industry, which is created when the excess zinc used in coating is cast into a large ingot.
Aluminium core
Mn-Scrap
Light scrap is mixed, light and thin iron scrap.
Recycled aluminium
martti
Bushelings
Interested in recycled metal products?
Cast iron
TT Hammel
Meatballs
An aluminium stick cut from electric wires and magnetized, with iron wires removed from the aluminium.
Millberry
B-copper
Our raw material selection is broad. If you could not find what you were looking for, please contact us.
Copper core
Pure bare copper wire that is electrolytically clean without oxidation and coatings.
jukkis
Light Scrap
Fe-turnings
Sticks
Cast aluminium pieces that contain silicon and other alloys to guarantee good castability and machinability.
Bonus is heavy-melting steel, but thinner than HMS. The Bonus is more than 6 mm thick iron.
Oxidized copper scrap containing impurities, such as a used water pipe or oxidized copper wires. The verse may contain small amounts of other metals, for example in fasteners.
Marine aluminium or 5000 series aluminium. Magnesium makes this aluminium alloy corrosion-resistant.
pohjonen
Zinc dust and other by-products of the zinc industry still contain a lot of zinc metal, which can be recovered and returned to circulation if properly treated.
Recycled steel
Lead cables
Recycled transformers
Recycled new clean sheet metal, i.e. uncoated surplus sheet metal from industry.
The most typical domestic selling grades of iron. Iron is classified into different E fractions according to the origin and thickness of the material.
Electrolytically pure aluminium granulate made from electrical wires and cables.
Al/mg
Jukkapekka Sutela
Non-ferrous


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/metal-recycling/reference-ovako
Ovako develops and manufactures steel for the demanding automotive and engineering industries, for example. Fortum supplies Ovako with scrap metal that meets quality standards. This cooperation has provided Ovako with more options for the availability of recycled steel.
Ovako Imatra is one of the largest users of scrap metal in Finland. The steel mill’s production is based on 97% recycled scrap metal, of which Fortum supplies a significant part. Thanks to scrap metal and fossil-free electricity production, the carbon footprint of Ovako’s steel products is 80% lower than the global average.
Ovako is a subsidiary of Sanyo Special Steel and part of the Japanese Nippon Steel Group. Nippon Steel is one of the world’s largest steel companies. Leading manufacturers in the ball bearing, vehicle and engineering industries use high-quality steel based on Ovako’s recycled scrap metal for transmission and transformer equipment, axles, gears, springs, bearings, bolts and mining tools, for example.
Steel for the most demanding applications
“The raw material must be of a high quality for Ovako’s demanding steel production. For this reason, our cooperation aims at continuous development and reliable deliveries,” says
Fortum is not only a supplier of raw material, but also a customer-focused partner seeking growth with its customers. The reuse of metal begins when discarded metal is converted into scrap. In practice, metal can circulate endlessly and is a valuable raw material for changing the world.
“A supplier that can provide us with high-quality material consistently is valuable for us. Scrap metal is available, but there are challenges with high-quality sorted material,” says
explains.
Ovako customer case
“Part of the carbon footprint of a steel product comes from its raw material. Fortum’s efficient recycling process meets the requirements of responsible recycling and minimises environmental impacts,”
Steel with a carbon footprint 80% lower than the average
The steel produced by Ovako has the world’s lowest carbon dioxide emissions per tonne of steel produced. Since the beginning of 2022, Ovako’s steel production has been completely carbon-neutral.
The Imatra steel mill has melted scrap metal for more than 80 years, and the company manufactures more than 250 steel grades, each of which has its own recipe. Most of the special steels produced by the mill are for machine manufacturing. Around 20% of all the steel produced by Ovako is used as a raw material for bearings.
, Commercial Director at Fortum.
Ovako’s production process is based on recycled scrap metal and fossil-free electricity production. Consequently, the carbon footprint of Ovako’s steel products is 80% lower than the global average. Its steel products are also slag-free and durable, because impurities are minimised during the production process.
, Purchasing Manager at Ovako.
Pekka Karvonen
Two billion tonnes of steel are produced globally each year, a third of which is made from recycled scrap metal. In Finland, metal is sorted and recycled efficiently. However, not all scrap iron can be used to produce high-quality recycled steel. In 2021, Ovako Imatra delivered a total of 190,000 tonnes of various steel end-products to its customers around the world.
Production at the Ovako steel mill in Imatra is based entirely on recycled scrap metal | Fortum
“The more thoroughly sorted and analysed materials Fortum delivers, the more durable and higher-quality steel Ovako is able to manufacture,” says
Cooperation based on reliable deliveries and sorting
A reliable and steady supply of raw materials is important for Ovako. The quality and suitability of the recycled metal supplied by Fortum are based on established quality standards in Finland. Fortum mainly supplies Ovako with what are known as “general classes” and periodically also with other steel grades.
Sutela


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/metal-recycling/contact-information
Jussi-Pekka Partio
jussi-pekka
+358 40 962 0962
partio
Metal recycling contact information | Fortum
Our experts are here to help you find the best products for your needs!
Metal recycling contact information


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/recycling-waste/waste-management-services/contact-information
+4525148404
pasi
Simon Nunn
strom
Netherlands & Belgium
Recycling & Waste Denmark
jonny
roed
per
Waste management contact information
Recycling & Waste Sweden
jansson
simon
Interested in international waste treatment services ?
Germany, Austria, Switzerland, Luxembourg, France & Spain
Please visit the local web pages to read more and get in touch with our experts.
geir
Waste Management Services
Waste management contact information | Fortum
Get in touch with our experts, they are here to help you find the best solution for your waste.
+46703757898
Jonny Engelbrecht
Per Jansson
ove
+358504431759
Recycling & Waste Finland
engelbrecht
Geir Ove Roed
Interested in waste management services in Finland, Sweden, Denmark or Norway?
Pasi Ström
Please find the country contacts below and get in touch with our experts.
Recycling & Waste Norway
nielsen
nunn


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/recycling-waste/waste-management-services
Our experts work closely with our customers. Together we optimize customers' material handling processes and waste flows.
We offer reliable, high-quality treatment for demanding waste streams internationally.
Contact our experts!
Waste Management Services | Fortum
Collaboration
Environment
We are a reliable and safe partner in demanding waste management and hazardous waste treatment. Our turnkey waste management services are available locally in the Nordics. In addition, we offer waste treatment capacity internationally for waste management operators. We offer availability and traceability with our services through full range of assets, best available techniques and strong partnerships.
International Services
Hazardous Waste Treatment
We are a reliable partner towards decarbonized waste management and enable circular economy by offering innovative solutions for material efficiency.
Safety is our number one priority. We know the life cycle of waste and the risks associated with demanding waste management.
Read more about our Nordic services
We offer reliable and sustainable waste management and hazardous waste treatment services. We have more than 50 years of experience in detoxifying and removing hazardous substances from the circulation.
We know hazardous waste


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/recycling-waste/waste-management-services/international-services
International Services | Fortum
Reliable waste treatment in the Nordics
We offer reliable and high-quality treatment for demanding waste streams internationally.
We offer reliable, high-quality hazardous waste treatment internationally for waste management operators with our three high-temperature incineration plants in Riihimäki Finland, Kumla Sweden and Nyborg Denmark.
Reliable Nordic treatment facilities
Fortum Recycling & Waste and the Australian manufacturing company Orica developed a solution for safe, permanent and environmentally sound destruction for the hexachlorobenzene (HCB) stockpile originating from Orica’s previous operations.
We have more than 50 years of experience in detoxifying and removing hazardous substances from the circulation.
Expertise in difficult waste streams
Interested in international waste treatment services?
We operate under high environmental and safety standards in accordance with international and national legal requirements.
We guarantee reliable and safe treatment for demanding waste streams with our full range of treatment capacity in the Nordics.
Project Australia


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/waste-management-services/destruction-hexachlorobenzene-hcb-stockpile
The project has showcased Fortum's ability to serve customers’ most demanding waste management needs, even on a global scale. In addition, it has also been an excellent case for Finland to show its capabilities in cleantech export and contribute responsibly to solving a longstanding international environmental issue.
Waste by-product stockpiled on site for over 30 decades
Finnish cleantech export
The first shipment arrived in Finland in early 2017.  The project is ongoing and scheduled to be completed over approximately five years, as part of Fortum’s ongoing hazardous waste treatment operations in Riihimäki.
The HCB waste originated from Orica’s former solvent and plastic manufacturing plants
Key Facts
Orica’s HCB waste was produced as a waste by-product of now discontinued solvent and plastics manufacturing processes at the Botany Industrial Park, Australia between 1963 and 1991. There was in total  15,000 tonnes of HCB safely and securely stockpiled at the site. Most of this volume will be treated at Fortum’s high temperature incineration facility in Riihimäki, Finland.
Fortum Recycling & Waste has proven world-class technology, expertise and experience in safe destruction of international hazardous waste in accordance with stringent conditions set for the protection of human health and the environment.
The first shipment of waste was delivered and treated in Finland in early 2017
PROJECT AUSTRALIA
The export of 8000-10000 tons of hexachlorobenzene (HCB) waste to Finland for safe and permanent destruction by Fortum at the Riihimäki high-temperature incineration plant
Destruction of the hexachlorobenzene (HCB) stockpile | Fortum
Destruction of the hexachlorobenzene (HCB) stockpile
Project's lifespan expected to last for several years


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/battery-recycling/contact-information
Submit a contact request
Contact Team of Experts
Head of Business Line Battery
tero
+358 50 337 3206
Head of R&D and Concept Development
Second Life Solutions
erik
+358406885559
Spring Virtual Battery
tutzauer
+358 40 861 5071
Kenneth Ekman
jaakko
hollander
yrjana
savolainen
+358 40 748 1829
Director, Battery Growth and Operations
Erik Tutzauer
Battery Recycling Team at Fortum | Fortum
Loading form, please wait...
Commercial director, Battery Sales
Battery Recycling Team at Fortum
Ville Yrjänä
kenneth
+358 40 501 4836
Battery Related Businesses at Fortum
ekman
Contact our team of experts
Battery Recycling Concept
Jaakko Savolainen
+46703805479


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/environmental-construction-services
Read More
We provide water treatment solutions when conventional solutions are inadequate. We use the infra-structure of existing plants, supplementing them if necessary with units required for pre-treatment.
We offer new, cost-effective and environmentally friendly solutions for environmental construction.
Reception and treatment of industrial waste
Utilization of industrial waste
Remediation of soil
Environmental Construction
We are ready to take on full responsibility of our customers’ waste management. This also means we are designing cost-effective and environmentally sustainable solutions for our own by-product flows. We utilise by-products primarily in connection to our present activities such as: landscaping, road, open area and street construction, soil remediation, protection of ground water, the handling processes of waste and for landfill construction.
Treatment technology at Danish landfill show convincing results
Construction work
Environmental construction services | Fortum
We utilise by-products primarily in connection with our present activities, such as environmental construction, the construction of roads, open areas and streets for upgrading the soil, protecting ground water, waste processing and landfill construction. We offer improvement services for spoiled areas both as comprehensive projects and as partial consignments. We offer water processing methods tailored to you needs and timeframe.
We offer comprehensive services for environmental construction which help drive the change for a cleaner world. At our industrial waste centres, we handle waste ranging from household waste to construction and service activities’ waste, contaminated soil and industrial waste, among others.
We offer a wide range of remediation methods as well as solid expertise in the restoration of contaminated land areas. We select the soil remediation method according to the substances that caused the contamination, the substances' level of concentration, the size of the area, the nature of the soil and the risks associated with remediation.
Environmental Construction Services
Water treatment
We provide our customers with a wide range of industrial waste treatment and recycling options.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/construction-work
View contacts
Safety benefits
Construction work | Fortum
We apply our know-how and experience to finding and implementing new alternatives. If necessary, we will also help with applying for an environmental permit.
Our extensive expertise and wide range of services enable the construction of the insulation and water-routing systems required for landfill structures, for example. Our services also include the construction of new infrastructures, such as roads.
Related services
Environmental construction in one go
Recycling & Waste contact information and sites
Environmental construction sites include:
base structures for landfills
Economical benefits
We can manage all construction phases from project planning, assessment and scheduling all the way to final construction planning.
field, basin and earthwork structures
surface structures for closed landfills
dredge work
We recycle the client’s materials, industrial by-products and various waste materials as extensively as possible in environmental construction. This allows us to save virgin raw materials and recycle waste fractions.
stabilisation work


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/demolition-and-renovation-demolition
With Fortum in charge of the demolition work, you can be sure that all the demolition waste is treated sustainably.
Demolition and renovation demolition | Fortum
Remediation and treatment of contaminated water
Construction of new infrastructures
Safe removal of hazardous substances
Stack demolition
Tailored industrial demolition
Partial and total demolition
Removal of harmful substances
We handle industrial demolition projects according to the client’s needs both efficiently and in an environmentally friendly manner.
Remediation, reuse and disposal of contaminated soil
Construction waste reuse, recycling and disposal
Total demolition projects include:
Fortum is authorised to perform asbestos removal and dispose of asbestos waste at our reception centres. Work plans are always drawn up in writing for hazardous substance removal projects and submitted to the authorities in advance.
During the removal work, we pay special attention to protecting the employees and the environment, as well as the complete removal and disposal of the hazardous substances on-site.
Demolition of buildings and structures
We can provide appropriate and efficient tools as well as adequate resources for all demolition needs. We can react to changes in a way that does not compromise our customers’ plans for further use of the given site.
Such projects include:
We take the special requirements of renovation demolition into account. We prepare in advance for the changes of plans, which we often face at renovation sites, in order to maintain the overall project schedule.
Demolition planning
Demolition and renovation site materials
Building parts in current use are carefully protected against dust and mechanical damage. The demolition site is always carefully cleaned before being handed over to the client for further construction or other use. We also perform renovation demolition at architecturally protected sites.
Applying for permits
Tank, equipment and boiler demolition


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/environmental-construction-services/water-treatment
We remedy restorable municipal and industrial dumping grounds, build landfill treatment systems and maintain landfills.
Groundwater
Water from landfills and waste treatment sites
We improve the recycling rate of the plant by recycling water back into the process.
The most efficient way to treat groundwater is to remove the discharge source. We take account of the need to clean both the groundwater and the soil and identify a method or a combination of procedures that are most appropriate for the particular site in question.
We provide water treatment services for the different phases of industrial manufacturing processes. Our services include clean water services and treatment of wastewater to be reused in the process, drained into the sewage system or conducted into the water system
We also actively seek new utilisation applications for the fractions separated from sewage waste. Fractions that are not suitable for material utilisation go to licensed energy recovery or disposal.
At the time of drying, the sludge may be treated to recover raw materials suitable for further use, to minimise the hazardousness of the waste and to improve the options for final disposal. This helps return raw materials into circulation, saves costs and reduces the environmental impact.
In leachates from landfills as well as water generated in waste treatment sites, the concentrations of contaminants may still exceed target values, even if the waste is pre-treated and the landfill body is already restored. In this case, the water must be treated before it goes to a municipal or other public treatment plant.
Sometimes it is reasonable to treat the leachate before it leaves the landfill. This way, it is possible that the water may not have to be drained at all, and it may be possible to apply for a permit to release it directly into the water system.
The amount of waste may be reduced by drying the sludge, which helps to minimise the costs of treatment and the need to transport waste. In many cases, the extracted water may be returned to circulation on-site.
We treat ditch water in two different ways. If the volumes are large, on-site treatment is the simplest solution. If the volumes are small, we will collect the water to be treated by one of our Nordic plants.
Sewage waste
We plan and implement the treatment of process water on-site. We improve the recycling rate of the plant by recycling water back into the process. This helps reduce the volume of water going down the drain, which both protects the environment and saves costs.
When contaminated soil is remedied through soil disposal, the ditch may become filled with water contaminated with the same substances as the soil.
Many hazardous, soil-contaminating substances are water-soluble and may have settled in the groundwater from soil contaminated at an earlier stage. Pumping and cleaning can prevent hazardous substances from spreading into a larger area.
Safety is at the core of our operations. Professional work means working safely.
Sludges and other aqueous waste
Our water treatment solutions:
We customise water treatment methods to your needs and ensure a speedy launch.
Water treatment | Fortum
Industrial water
We also identify solutions for the further treatment and utilisation of the waste generated by the water treatment itself.
Ditch water
We receive and treat liquid waste generated during sewage maintenance, such as sand, oil and grease trap waste. Our equipment separates the fractions suitable for material utilisation from the treated waste, which are then used to replace virgin materials in applications such as environmental construction.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/reception-and-treatment-industrial-waste
We can process and utilise large masses of industrial waste
We start our collaboration at the source of the waste to achieve the best results. This helps to improve and optimise the customer’s processes and practices which reduces the overall waste produced and increases the reusability of the resulting waste.
industrial process waste.
Tailored treatment solutions
car shredding waste,
Contaminated soil
Industrial waste
Waste from construction and services
construction waste and
Our wide range of environmentally friendly treatment methods ensures an efficient utilisation of different types of waste.
We use a variety of methods to treat waste fractions, such as sorting, separation, solidification, stabilisation, and vacuum treatment. Much of the materials are utilised in the structures of our centres or delivered for use at other sites. Also, metals sorted from slag, for example, are supplied to the metal industries for reuse as material.
We base the selection and tailoring of treatment methods on our experience and expert analysis of the waste.
Reception and treatment of industrial waste | Fortum
We help our customers to reduce their environmental footprint and costs by treating waste for reuse.
Waste from the treatment of municipal waste
At our treatment centres, we treat and utilise:
Our treatment centres provide a technically, economically and environmentally sound solution even for non-recyclable waste. The acceptability of the waste at landfills is determined by the laboratory analysis. After possible pre-treatment, the waste is delivered for final disposal.
We can provide an extensive range of tailored reception and treatment solutions to meet your needs.
Waste treated at the treatment centres include ashes, slags, sludges, contaminated soil, sludge and sediments,
Other waste


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/remediation-soil
Various solvents
We can handle all phases of the cleansing project from the demolition of any old buildings on-site, water treatment, excavation and transport of the soil mass, to the utilisation of the treated mass and the construction of infrastructure in the area.
We offer the remediation of contaminated sites in the form of all-inclusive projects or subprojects.
Contaminated soil at an industrial site, old service station, landfill or sawmill, for example, often decreases the value of the property or jeopardises the environment
Oil products, such as petrol and various oils
Dioxins
Furans
Remediation of soil | Fortum
In all-inclusive projects, Fortum is responsible for the successful completion of the work from start to finish on a turnkey basis.
Stabilisation
Insecticides and pesticides
PCB compounds
Various heavy metals, such as arsenic, chromium, mercury, lead and zinc
Handling contaminated soil?
The most typical hazardous, soil-contaminating substances include:
Thermic treatment
Insulation
We ultimately customise treatment methods to meet our customers’ needs.
Chlorophenols
PAH compounds
Soil vapour extraction
Remediation methods with good results
Composting
Mass replacement
The most common methods we use for soil remediation are:
Contaminated soil may be remediated on- or off-site.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/utilization-industrial-waste
Bottom ash that comes from incineration is refined by separating its metals for recycling. After this, slag gravel, which is comparable with crushed rock, is refined out of the mineral material which replaces natural sand and crushed rock in earthworks. Slag gravel is used as construction material for many purposes.
See examples
Recycle by-products in a safe and environmentally friendly manner.
Various types of coarse crushed stone
Foundry sand and dust
We are ready to handle the even more challenging flow of by-products and its further development.
Slag gravel as construction material
Steel sand, tailings, and blasting grit
In the production of soil cement, a mixture of slag gravel and ash from the burning of biofuel is used as a substitute for cement, which reduces the carbon dioxide emissions of the construction industry. Finer slag gravel can also be used as a filler for pipe trenches.
Various types of sludge and dredging mass
Utilization of industrial waste | Fortum
Fibre clay and sludge
The bottom and fly ash from power plants
We monitor on a daily basis processed waste, the operating conditions for processing and treatment methods.
Typical fractions emerging from energy production and industry which can be utilised


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/recycling-waste/contact-information-and-sites
rws
28880 Pori
Sites in Norway
Äspered
Customer service is open Mon-Thu 7.30–16.30 and Fri 7.30–16.00.
806 47 Gävle
Sites in Sweden
Jägmästargatan 2B
+46 70 375 0233
852 31 Sundsvall
Sites in Denmark
Kaatopaikantie 316
P.O. Box 181
Kiruna
Kaserngatan 14
+45 8031 7100
Eko-Topila, Pitkäsaarenkatu 8
70420 Kuopio
115 42 Stockholm
Aarhus
28900 Pori
Leväsentie 23
Copenhagen
Norra Järnvägsgatan 1
6700 Esbjerg
P-vej 21, Prøvestenen
Ekoväylä 20
Raisio
4006 Stavanger
70780 Kuopio
Cisternvägen 28
Kuopio
Vassgatan 2
Myllyharjuntie 20
Helsingintie 541
+45 3257 9100
Oliehavnsvej 18
Espoo
+46 1930 5100
See the management team
Sites in Finland
+46 19 30 5200
fax: +46 1957 7021
2004 Lillestrøm
Recycling and Waste Management team
Hausjärvi
Customer service: Sweden
46860 Keltakangas
tel:
Salo
Vestianväylä 81
Gothenburg
70800 Kuopio
Ekokorventie
+358 10 7551 745
+358 10 7551 929
Äsperedsgatan 10-12
Avd. Svelleveien 33
Customer service is open Mon-Thu 8.00–16.00 and Fri 8.30–16.00.
Fortum Waste Solutions OW A/S
21600 Parainen
+358 10 7551 591
+358 10 7551 531
02920 Espoo
42300 Jämsä
405 21 Gothenburg
Raision Isosuo, Isosuontie 137
Pori
21220 Raisio
fax: +45 8031 7300
2300 Copenhagen S
Contact information and sites
Lindholmvej 3
Parainen
Tel.
Oulu
424 57 Gunnilse
Fortum Waste Solutions Norway AS
+358 10 7551 625
Kuulojankatu
37600 Valkeakoski
854 68 Sundsvall
+358 10 7551 537
Lillestr
Läntinen Teollisuuskatu  30
+358 10 7551 514
+358 10 7551 856
8000 Aarhus C
Recycling & Waste contact information and sites | Fortum
+45 6331 7100
Kirrinsannantie 3
Rehapolis I, Kiviharjunlenkki 4
ø
90220 Oulu
Jämsä
Sundsvall
Esbjerg
+358 10 7551 850
SE-692 85 Kumla
Rehapolis II, Kiviharjunlenkki 6
+358 10 7551 496
Stockholm
+358 10 7551 560
+46 70 375 7838
+358 10 7551 646
Paraisten Rauhala, Sydmontie 173
Ekokaari 33
Gävle
12210 Hausjärvi
Ravurinkatu 40
Turku
Ylivieska
5800 Nyborg, Denmark
Avd. Kirkeagata 3
Marjosaarentie
m
981 37 Kiruna
+45 7513 8600
+47 9707 3861
Selluntie 140
Vapelbäcksvägen
Kouvola
20380 Turku
+45 8694 5555
Customer service: Denmark
Olievej 10–12
24100 Salo
+358 10 7551 626
Topila, Pitkäsaarenkatu 7
84100 Ylivieska
Customer service: Finland
Valkeakoski
+358 10 7551 000
Customer service is open Mon-Thu 7.00–16.00 and Fri 7.00–15.00.
Svelleveien 33
Stavanger
denmark


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/fortum-recycling-waste-management-team
Head of Waste Management Services Finland
aaltonen
saarimaa
Head of Business Control
Fortum Recycling & Waste Management Team | Fortum
partanen
+358 40 57 77 533
+358 10 755 1585
Eeva Partanen
+358 40 528 7408
Senior Business People Partner
+4525291314
+358 40 570 1074
kalle
Jani Peltoniemi
Tiina Aaltonen
rahkonen
keranen
sami
tiina
Head of Waste Management Services Denmark
Sami Salmijärvi
salmijarvi
+358 10 755 1384
VP
VP, Recycling & Waste
+46723836075
svinhufvud
Fortum Recycling & Waste Management Team
+358 400 306 530
Head of Operational Excellence
+358503477629
Head of Strategy, R&D and Marketing
Kari Rahkonen
+358 50 529 8684
Executive Assistant
cedervall
Head of Customer Excellence
ahtiainen
marjo
jani
Marjo Keränen
Jens Peter Rasmussen
Jessica Cedervall
Tero Svinhufvud
Head of Waste Management Services Sweden
Head of Business Line Plastics, Metals, Ash & Slag
peltoniemi
Toni Ahtiainen


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/large-scale-tests-sand-treatment-plant-danish-landfill-show-convincing-results
Large-scale tests of sand treatment plant at Danish landfill show convincing results
MOPS is supported by the Danish Environmental Protection Agency's MUDP funds and deals with both detoxification and reprocessing of raw materials.
In March, the Regions in Denmark submitted a comprehensive plan for prioritizing, costing and cleansing the Danish generational pollutions to Environment Minister Lea Wermelin. Groyne 42 at Harboøre Tange, which for decades has been an unsolved environmental problem, is one of the pollutions that has been investigated and ready for clean-up.
Groyne 42 was used as a toxic waste dump in the years 1957 to 1962. The landfill is one of the historical Danish pollutions.
Danish generational pollutions - a national challenge
“Up to 80 percent of the contaminated sand can be cleansed by treating it once in the new plant. The remaining 20 percent must be treated twice, and thereafter it will meet the criteria in relation to both mercury and pesticides, so that it can be utilized for construction purposes. It is compelling and in line with what we had hoped and expected,” says R&D manager PhD Thomas von Kronhelm from Recycling & Waste.
Fortum's MOPS process focuses on three different matrices. Detoxification applies to the sand from Groyne 42. The other two matrices uncover the technology's potential for concentrating metals from fly ash and phosphorus from sewage sludge.
Chairman of the Committee for Regional Development in Central Jutland Denmark Jørgen Nørby (The Liberal Party) welcomes the news from Fortum: “It is very positive that another Danish solution is now in play for the purification of our generational pollution, and we look forward to studying the results. At Harboøre Tange in Western Jutland, we have three major generational pollutions - the chemical depot at Groyne 42 and the chemical company Cheminova's old factory site are the two sites ready to be cleaned up. We still wait for the Parliament to prioritize the funding so that we can get started”.
MOPS process and results_Remediation pilot for heavily contaminated soil
An efficient soil remediation technology
The United Nations Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO) has also shown interest in the MOPS technology, which holds international perspectives on sustainable solutions to environmental challenges and resource recycling.
In practice, this means that most of the sand meets the Danish Environmental Protection Agency's criteria for clean soil* and can therefore be used freely, while the rest is clean enough to be used for construction purposes - for example substrates for roads.
The core of the MOPS treatment is the reactor where the contaminated material is flushed by a special liquid under high-pressure which separates the problematic components and release them into a liquid part. The succeeding treatment of the liquid makes the components precipitate into a sludge part that contains the problematic material, while the cleansed liquid part can be reused as process water. The MOPS treatment comprises a detoxification as well as a recovery of raw materials.
Large-scale tests of sand treatment plant at Danish landfill show convincing results | Fortum
The MOPS technology in brief
In 2019/20 Fortum Recycling & Waste has tested the effect of the technology for cleaning of the heavily polluted sand at the Groyne 42 landfill in Western Denmark. The results are convincing.
After a longer test run, 90 tonnes of sand is cleansed of mercury and pesticides to a level where the majority can be used freely and the rest for construction purposes. It is now clear that the technology developed by Fortum Recycling & Waste to clean the sand at Groyne 42 is as effective as hoped. The now completed pilot test shows that the technology can remove 99.5 percent of the pollution in the sand.
The technology, commonly called MOPS (short for Multi-purpose Onsite Phase Separator), can roughly be termed as a large industrial washing machine with various steps. In the core of the process, sand is rinsed with a special liquid under high-pressure that separates the contaminated substances in a sludge phase. The process water is reused in the treatment. The sludge is transported to Fortum in Nyborg and treated by high temperature incineration. Then the sand is cleansed.
“We develop sustainable solutions that protect and recycle the resources of the nature. The MOPS technology has great potential both locally and globally, because many soil pollutants call for this type of purification process, and furthermore it is efficient and local,” says Kalle Saarimaa, Vice President, Recycling and Waste.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/recycling-waste/news-and-articles
20 December 2022, 13:05
News and articles | Fortum
Plastics
O&M services
14 September 2022, 10:30
58 results found
Fortum to enter the Energy-from-Waste business in the UK – seeks to transform the sector with a novel concept to recycle materials
08 November 2022, 11:00
14 September 2022, 13:00
Carbon2x
Ash & Slag
Industrial recycling services and products
Rethinking Recycling blog
New uses for recycled plastic speed ABB towards its sustainability targets
Fortum to start battery recycling operations in Germany, serving the European EV automotive industry’s rising demand for battery raw materials
Batteries
19 September 2022, 09:00
Metals
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic defies the conventions of fossil-based materials – new compound is carbon-neutral, yet on par with virgin plastic properties
We need to rethink CO2 in recycling to ensure sufficient and sustainable materials
10 October 2022, 13:10
07 December 2022, 13:00
Fortum’s battery material recycling facility gets ready to begin operations in 2023 – Staff members moving onsite in December
Service category


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/recycling-waste/carbon2x/we-need-rethink-co2-recycling-ensure-sufficient-and-sustainable-materials
Tony Rehn
Replacing fossil-based plastic
Our world uses over 100 billion tonnes of different materials each year, and less than 10 % of these materials end up being recycled. Disappointingly, the consumption of virgin materials is growing faster than recycling. Shortage of sustainable raw materials could become a more pressing issue than availability of energy in the future. Our expert and the Programme Director of Carbon2x, Tony Rehn gives us insights on how rethinking CO₂ emissions from waste incineration led to a novel recycling concept.
Learn more about the Carbon2x concept
+358404855857
The incinerated waste also includes vast amounts of carbon, which is a vital and valuable raw material. Nature is extremely efficient in circulating carbon. Following nature’s example, the industry must learn to become considerably more efficient in carbon recycling.
here.
In the spring of 2022, we launched a pilot project called Carbon2x at our waste incineration plant in Riihimäki. Our objective is to capture the plant’s CO2 emissions and utilize them as raw materials in the production of new high-quality materials such as CO2-based plastics. With the Carbon2x concept, the climate impact of waste incineration would significantly reduce, and contribute to improve the recycling rate of plastic packaging compared to the current level by 2030.
Program Director
We need to rethink CO2 in recycling to ensure sufficient and sustainable materials | Fortum
tony
rehn
CO2 is a valuable raw material
Plastic is everywhere. And will be even more so in the future. According to research, the global demand for plastics is expected to grow threefold by 2050, and there are still very few worthy alternatives to plastic in many industries such as pharmaceutical and food industry.
Availability and cost of energy have understandably been top concerns since the war in Ukraine sparked an energy crisis in Europe and globally. However, in the long perspective, I believe the green transition will gain speed from the crisis and there will be plenty of clean energy available in the future. In addition to getting rid of fossil-based energy, we should focus on finding solutions to the looming shortage of sustainable raw materials. This requires moving to the next level of circular economy.
Europe produces every year almost 100 million tonnes of waste that is converted into energy by incineration. The incineration of non-recyclable waste is an important part of the current waste disposal system and energy production, but it also produces harmful CO2 emissions.
Today, 90% of plastics is produced from fossil feedstock such as oil. To combat climate change, reducing the use of virgin fossil feedstock is of vital importance.
CO2 should therefore be considered as a valuable raw material. Simultaneously, we can reduce the dependence on fossil feedstock and improve self-sufficiency in Europe.
According to our initial analysis, up to 90% of the carbon from waste could be circulated by supplementing the mechanical recycling of plastic with waste incineration technology, which captures the CO2 emissions and utilizes them in the production of new materials.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/carbon2x
Fortum is launching a pilot at its waste incineration plant in Riihimäki with the aim of capturing the plant’s CO2 emissions and utilizing them as raw materials in the production of new high-quality materials such as plastic.
Carbon2x - Recycled materials from waste
Key benefits of Carbon2x
Fortum launches a new pilot project
Carbon capture and utilization will have a significant role in mitigating climate change and promoting circular economy. Carbon2x enables the use of waste as energy and molecular level recycling without emissions.
Fortum Carbon2x: Rethinking CO2
Carbon2x turns waste into valuable feedstock for new products​, such as high-quality plastic than could be used for food and pharmaceutical packaging. This has not been possible with mechanically recycled plastic due to hygiene reasons.
Every year, Europeans generate nearly 100 million tonnes of unrecycled waste that is turned into energy. Incineration is an important part of the current waste management system. But we can do even better. We at Fortum believe that all carbon belongs in circulation. This means that also emissions are turned into new raw materials​. To do this at scale, we need to rethink CO2 in recycling. Our solution: Carbon2x.
Customer release (B2B)
Carbon2x - Recycled materials from waste | Fortum
Carbon2x enables a lower carbon footprint by capturing and recycling carbon (CCU) from waste incineration. It can help decarbonize hundreds of waste-to-energy plants in Europe alone.
Fortum launches a ground-breaking pilot project – aims to produce new materials from the CO2 emissions of waste incineration
Rethinking CO2
Fortum’s novel concept to recycle materials receives funding from Business Finland
31 August 2022, 15:15
Carbon2x increases the circulation of materials by complementing mechanical recycling. There will ​always be materials that cannot be recycled – at all or anymore. As they are used as energy, Carbon2x captures the CO2 released in incineration and turns it into new raw materials.
Climate action
Fortum’s objective is to reuse, recycle and utilize as much of the waste stream as possible.
Circularity
New sustainable materials
According to our estimate, the Carbon2x programme could help improve the recycling rate of plastic packaging significantly. By adopting the concept at a large scale, the recycling rate of plastic packaging in Finland can be doubled compared to the current level by 2030 – simultaneously, 90% of the carbon dioxide released into the atmosphere can be captured and absorbed into products.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/04/fortum-launches-ground-breaking-pilot-project-aims-produce-new-materials-co2-emissions-waste-incineration
says.
As a strategic programme of Fortum’s Recycling and Waste business, Carbon2x can help the company reduce the CO2 emissions of its waste treatment operations significantly and produce high-quality raw materials for new products.
In addition to the energy produced by waste incineration, in the future Fortum will focus more on producing valuable materials from the recycling process.
Carbon recycling is the most efficient way to produce climate-friendly plastic
Europe produces almost 100 million tonnes of waste that is converted into energy by incineration. The incineration of non-recyclable waste is an important part of the current waste disposal system and energy production, but it also produces harmful CO2 emissions. At the same time, the waste also includes vast amounts of carbon, which is a valuable raw material when utilized correctly. The carbon from waste cannot be recycled adequately using the current mechanical methods that are based on separate collection and the purification of materials.
According to research, the global demand for plastics is expected to grow threefold by 2050, and there are still very few worthy alternatives to plastic in many industries such as pharmaceutical and food industry. Today, 90% of plastics is produced from fossil feedstock such as oil. To combat climate change, reducing the use of virgin fossil feedstock is of vital importance. To achieve this, new solutions are needed to complement mechanical recycling. Capturing and recycling carbon from waste incineration as new raw materials form a part of this solution.
The Carbon2x programme promotes Fortum’s objective to be carbon neutral in its European power generation in 2035.
, Vice President of Recycling & Waste at Fortum.
Fortum launches a ground-breaking pilot project – aims to produce new materials from the CO2 emissions of waste incineration | Fortum
In addition to Finland, Fortum has waste incineration plants in Denmark and Sweden. Next to these, the company plans to start waste incineration operations in the UK as well. These plants are also aiming for carbon capture and further processing of the CO2 emissions and utilizing them as raw materials in the future. At these other facilities, Fortum is looking to test existing suitable technologies. “In Denmark, for example, we are researching the refining of methanol with existing technology, but in Riihimäki we are refining methane with a completely new way, with new technology,”
20 April 2022, 12:06 EEST
“According to our initial analysis, up to 90% of the carbon from waste could be circulated by supplementing the mechanical recycling of plastic with waste incineration technology, which captures the CO2 emissions and utilizes them in the production of new materials. As a result, the climate impact of waste incineration would become net negative, and the recycling rate of plastic packaging in Finland could be doubled compared to the current level by 2030,” states
“We have worked with different material flows for a long time already and at Fortum, we believe that we can further improve recycling. Following nature’s example, the industry must learn to become considerably more efficient in carbon recycling. The Carbon2x concept considers carbon dioxide a valuable raw material that can be used to produce new materials. Simultaneously, we can reduce the dependence on fossil feedstock and improve self-sufficiency in Europe,” states
Read more about the Carbon2x concept on Fortum’s
Fortum is launching a pilot at its waste incineration plant in Riihimäki with the aim of capturing the plant’s CO2 emissions and utilizing them as raw materials in the production of new high-quality materials such as plastic. The Carbon2x concept can significantly reduce the climate impacts of waste incineration and double the recycling rate of plastic packaging in Finland.
Fortum and Uniper form a European energy group committed to enabling a successful transition to carbon neutrality for everyone. Our 50 gigawatts of power generating capacity, substantial gas import and storage operations, and our global energy trading business enable us to provide Europe and other regions with a reliable supply of low-carbon energy. We are already Europe’s third largest producer of CO2-free electricity, and our growth businesses focus on clean power, low-carbon energy, and the infrastructure for tomorrow’s hydrogen economy. In addition, we design solutions that help companies and cities reduce their environmental footprint. Our 20,000 professionals and operations in 40 countries give us the skills, resources, and reach to empower the energy evolution toward a cleaner world.
“At the first stage of the pilot that begins in Riihimäki in the spring of 2022, the carbon dioxide captured from the end of the plant’s chimney will be combined with hydrogen to produce methane. However, we consider the production of methane to be merely an intermediate phase, as our deeper interest lies in the production of products that are of higher degree of quality, like specialty plastics,” says
Carbon2x – Moving towards the next generation of circular economy
In addition to Fortum, in Europe alone there are hundreds of other companies with waste incineration plants that could adopt the Carbon2x concept.
Fortum’s Recycling and Waste business aims to significantly improve the circulation of materials in waste streams using next-generation circular economy solutions. In Europe, the green transition is gaining speed, and there will be plenty of clean energy available. At the same time, there will be a dire shortage of valuable raw materials. Therefore, recycling must be reimagined as well.
Local news
The production of CO2-based materials starts from the premise of using zero-emission electricity such as renewable energy sources or nuclear power. Fortum is in a good position to develop the Carbon2x concept, as the company can offer plenty of clean electricity as well as comprehensive recycling solutions to process the ash from waste incineration. These solutions also have a significant role in minimizing climate impacts and increasing the circulation of materials.
, Carbon2x program director at Fortum.
Saarimaa


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/08/fortums-novel-concept-recycle-materials-receives-funding-business-finland
, Carbon2x Programme Director, Fortum Recycling & Waste.
“The CCU pilot that was up and running in Riihimäki over the spring and summer proved that the CO2 emissions of waste incineration can be used to make new materials. Our pilot was successful in capturing 15 litres of CO2 per minute and converting it into 10 litres of methane,” Rehn says.
“We are very excited and pleased about the funding decision that will help us accelerate the development work of our three-year research project. The pilot stage, which has just ended, was one of the first steps in testing how to utilise the CO2 emissions from our Waste-to-Energy plant in Riihimäki to produce new sustainable materials. The next target is to use our own ‘home-grown’ methane as a feedstock for producing special plastics. The funding will support us in this work,” says
31 August 2022, 15:15 EEST
The Carbon2x concept, launched by the company in April 2022, aims to capture emissions from waste incineration and turn them into CO2-based, high-quality raw materials. It will help reduce dependence on fossil-based raw materials, improve Europe’s self-sufficiency, and decarbonise waste incineration.
The target of the Business Finland-supported three-year research programme is to evaluate different technologies and processes together with SME partners and research institutes in order to find the most feasible technologies for producing special plastics in the future. At the same time, Fortum foresees piloting different CCU technologies and solutions in its other Waste-to-Energy facilities in the Nordics in preparation for a possible large-scale industrial demo plant that could potentially begin in 2024–2027.
Fortum’s novel concept to recycle materials receives funding from Business Finland | Fortum
The funding news follows the successful conclusion of the pilot that recently ended at Fortum’s Waste-to-Energy plant in Riihimäki. The pilot placed Fortum among the first companies in the world to have successfully captured its own CO2 emissions and used the emissions to produce methane.
Fortum has been granted EUR 1.5 million in funding from Business Finland to accelerate the development of the Carbon2x concept, a novel way to recycle materials.
For more information


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/carbon2x/carbon2x-pilot-riihimaki-finland
Carbon2x pilot in Riihimäki, Finland
The Riihimäki pilot will specifically look at the production of methane by combining the plant's CO2 emissions with hydrogen.
Carbon2x pilot in Riihimäki, Finland | Fortum
Carbon2x is a strategic programme of Fortum’s Recycling and Waste business and it can help the company reduce the CO2 emissions of its waste treatment operations significantly and produce high-quality raw materials for new products.
Benefits of CCU technology
Carbon2x Riihimäki
Carbon capture and utilization will have a significant role in mitigating climate change and promoting circular economy. Carbon2x enables the use of waste as energy and molecular level recycling without emissions. In the Carbon2x programme, non-recyclable or non-reusable waste is processed at Fortum’s waste incineration plant in Riihimäki. At the first stage of the Carbon2x programme, the carbon dioxide captured from the flue gases of waste incineration is combined with hydrogen to produce methane and methanol. From Fortum’s perspective, this is an intermediate phase, as our deeper interest lies in the production of products of higher degree of processing such as specialty plastics.
Documents
Carbon2x captures emissions from waste incineration and turns them into CO2-based, high-quality raw materials. It will help reduce our dependence on fossil-based raw materials, improve Europe’s self sufficiency, and decarbonize waste incineration.
The results of the pilot, which is a cooperation with the Finnish start-up company Q Power, will boost Fortum’s 3-year research project that aims to produce special plastics out of methane.
Carbon2x and the waste-to-energy ecosystem
Fortum is piloting Carbon2x at its Riihimäki waste-to-energy plant during 2022. The goal of the pilot is to test the carbon capture and utilization of the plant's carbon dioxide (CO2) emissions.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/09/fortum-enter-energy-waste-business-uk-seeks-transform-sector-novel-concept-recycle-materials
, tel. +358 41 503 1337
Fortum to enter the Energy-from-Waste business in the UK – seeks to transform the sector with a novel concept to recycle materials | Fortum
Fortum, a leading European energy company and a forerunner in environmental services development, is expanding its UK-based operations and is starting to build a new Energy-from-Waste plant in Glasgow, Scotland.
daniel-huhtaniska
(PDF, 749 KB)
“The UK Energy-from-Waste market is in an interesting development phase and will, over time, offer the potential for further investments in Energy-from-Waste. At Fortum our objective is to reuse, recycle and utilise as much of the waste streams as possible; we want to make waste incineration fully circular. This means that also CO2 emissions should be turned into new raw materials. To do this at scale, we need to rethink how we do recycling in general. In the UK alone, there are 48 EfW plants, meaning that 11 million tonnes of CO2 could be captured and reused in a year. We want to tap into this potential and bring our competence and track record of pioneering waste solutions to the market,” states
, tel. +358 50 350 2861
“We have a holistic approach and competence in waste management. This wider entry to the UK enables us to investigate the investment potential for our other strategic growth areas, such as the recycling of batteries and Waste-to-Energy ash recycling. In the future, also in the UK, we could not only capture and use the emissions from the waste incineration, but also recover and reuse valuable raw materials from the ash. For us, the concept of ‘waste’ does not exist. There is only material that can be used and reused again, with the right solutions and competence in place,” concludes Kalle Saarimaa.
, which has already concluded the first round of pilot testing. The concept aims to capture emissions from waste incineration and turn them into CO2-based, high-quality raw materials. The company estimates that Carbon2x will help reduce the dependence on fossil-based raw materials, improve Europe’s self-sufficiency and decarbonise waste incineration.
Maiju Daniel-Huhtaniska, Communications Manager, Fortum Recycling & Waste,
For several years, Fortum has been providing operation and maintenance services to external energy industry customers in the UK. Entering the Energy-from-Waste business in the UK further expands the company’s presence in the market. Next to the UK, the company is also looking to expand into other markets in continental Europe.
14 September 2022, 10:30 EEST
The market entry is a major step forward in Fortum’s ambition to transform the Energy-from-Waste sector with its novel
In the UK, a total of 3,600 million kilograms of plastics is used for making products every year. At the same time, only 41% of this plastic is collected for recycling. Carbon2x can help recycle these plastics that are not currently captured in separate collection. Simultaneously, 90% of the carbon dioxide released into the atmosphere can be captured and utilised as new products; as a result, the climate impact of waste incineration would become net negative, when Carbon2x is applied.
Kalle Saarimaa, Vice President, Fortum Recycling & Waste,
maiju
Carbon2x concept


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/10/fortum-circo-recycled-plastic-defies-conventions-fossil-based-materials-new-compound-carbon-neutral-yet-par-virgin-plastic-properties
, which combines post-consumer recycled polypropylene with softwood cellulose fibre from responsibly grown forests, is even more sustainable as its carbon footprint is neutral,”
Plastics, Fortum Recycling & Waste,
Mikko Koivuniemi
Mikko Koivuniemi,
“Assessing the life-cycle and the carbon footprint of the Fortum Circo® recycled plastic is an important part of our product development, as Fortum’s ambition is to produce materials that work in technically demanding applications and, at the same time, are as sustainable as possible. The climate change impact of our basic Fortum Circo® recyclates is already about 50% smaller than that of virgin granulates. Now we can proudly state that
Addressing the global plastics waste issue and striving to support manufacturers’ needs for sustainable materials, Fortum has developed Fortum Circo® recycled plastic as a sustainable solution to replace virgin plastics in plastic products. Now the company is expanding the product range of Fortum Circo® recycled plastics and presenting new compounds at the K-Messe trade exhibition.
“By complementing the recycled plastic with carefully selected and tested additives, we can improve both the technical and environmental properties of the Fortum Circo® recycled plastic,” Koivuniemi notes.
the
Without compromising the technical properties, the carbon footprint of the cellulose fibre-reinforced compound is zero, as demonstrated in the recent carbon footprint study.
The study has been conducted by LCA Consulting Oy, in line with LCA standards ISO 14040 (2006) and ISO 14044 (2006) and carbon footprint standard ISO 14067 (2018). The
koivuniemi
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic defies the conventions of fossil-based materials – new compound is carbon-neutral, yet on par with virgin plastic properties | Fortum
, +358 40 552 5363
The carbon footprint study shows that the carbon footprint of cellulose fibre-reinforced Fortum Circo® PP-CF 40 is close to zero, making the material carbon-neutral.
carbon footprint of a manufacturer’s final product consists largely of the environmental impact of the raw material used.
Read more about Fortum Circo® compounds
About the carbon footprint study
Moving forward, Fortum will focus on developing new compounds, tailoring materials according to customers’ needs and continuing to develop recycled plastic compounds for completely new products and product categories.
This result is significant, considering that
“For the technical aspect, compounds offer improved properties, such as higher stiffness, rigidity and impact strength. We wanted to develop a material that also meets the aesthetic and haptic requirements of demanding applications. Developing compounds that have qualities on par with virgin plastic but are more sustainable is at the strategic core of our plastic business line,” Koivuniemi concludes.
It should be noted that both biogenic and fossil-based carbon stored in the Fortum Circo® compounds are released back to the atmosphere when the products made of them are removed from service. With the cradle-to-gate system boundary, the products are carbon-neutral in terms of the total GWP impact, mainly due to the high amount of biogenic carbon stored in the cellulose.
Business & Technology Development Manager, BL
To ensure the quality of the study and that the ISO 14040, ISO 14044 and ISO 14067 requirements are met, a critical review will be conducted at the end of the study. The results presented in this release are preliminary, as the study has not yet been critically reviewed.
our new cellulose fibre-reinforced compound Fortum Circo® PP-CF 40
system boundary of the study is cradle-to-gate, i.e. the study represents a partial carbon footprint. In addition to fossil GHGs, the biogenic emissions and removals are included in the carbon footprint.
10 October 2022, 13:10 EEST
, Business & Technology Development Manager, Fortum, celebrates the achieved climate-friendly results of the cellulose fibre-reinforced compound.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/recycled-plastic-granules/fortum-circo-pp-cf
The PP-CF series is available in different characteristics. The main variable is the amount of cellulose fibre, with both rough and fine versions available. Superior sustainability in processability is achieved through low cycle time and product design due to the low density vs. stiffness along with the unique combination of recycled PCR plastics and renewable content. The material is resistant against sink marks and has controlled shrinkage.
Automotive
Sustainability: recycled plastics & renewable fibres
Low density vs. stiffness
Electrical & electronic products
Fast production cycle time
Fortum Circo® PP-CF is a compound of recycled plastic reinforced with cellulose fibre for injection moulded applications with low CO2 emissions. The climate change impact of recycled polypropylene is half that of virgin plastic and the carbon footprint of cellulose fibre is negative, making the compound carbon-neutral. Not only is the material an environmentally friendly option, it also meets the technical, aesthetic and haptic requirements of demanding applications.
Interested in the technical information of Fortum Circo® PP-CF?
Natural grey - or choose your color
Excellent stiffness
Post-Consumer Recycled (PCR) plastic
Pleasant haptic sensation
Fortum Circo® PP-CF series fits a wide variety of applications, such as
Fine or rough fibres from sustainable sources
Get to know other Fortum Circo® products
Check
REACH & RoHS compliant
Consumer goods
Fortum Circo® PP-CF | Fortum
Injection Molding
100% Recyclable
Low tool wear vs. glass fibres
Fortum Circo® Data sheets
Furniture & décor


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/download-data-sheets-pp-cf
Fortum Circo® PP-CF is a compound of recycled plastic reinforced with cellulose fibre for injection moulded appli­ca­tions.
compounds, PP-CF
© Fortum 2022. All rights reserved
Fortum Circo® recycled plastics data sheets, PP-CF
Fortum Circo® recycled plastics data sheets, PP-CF | Fortum
Download the technical data sheets by filling in your contact information.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/contact-information
Contact our plastics team!
Business & Technology Development Manager
+358 40 120 6815
seppo
+358 40 552 5363
rasmus
Seppo Kuusela
+358 40 081 5484
Fortum Circo® contact information | Fortum
kuusela
Sales Manager
Brand Sales Manager
+358 50 439 8068
Product Line Specialist
Anniina Rasmus
Fortum Circo® contact information
anniina
Kari Aaltonen


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/news-and-articles/reference-abb
“From the top-level strategy, we have derived what it could mean on the local level. For example, the Porvoo factory has examined how we can contribute to the overall targets. One pillar in the strategy states that we preserve resources, and we want to cover a vast majority of our portfolio with products based on circularity. In Porvoo, we are doing our best to reach this portfolio target, and using Fortum Circo contributes to this effort,” Marko Utriainen says.
“We are always looking for ways to reduce waste and minimise our environmental footprint throughout the complete value chain and over the entire lifecycle of our products. Our customers are urging us to take this path, but it is our own ambition to take it as frontrunners, leading the industry. This is something that differentiates ABB from the competition, but hopefully also inspires others to follow,” says
Marko Utriainen
, Head of ABB Oy, Wiring Accessories, says.
Shared commitment is essential
, Global Product Manager, Installation Materials and Solutions, at ABB.
“It is very important to talk about sourcing and raw materials in this context, not only our own operations. We have a supplier sustainability programme in place. In cooperation with Fortum and through using Fortum Circo, we work to do our part, striving to lead the industry here in the Nordics. This is our shared goal in factories as well as in portfolio management,” he says.
Taking strides towards a more sustainable future is not a task that any one company can manage alone. Cooperation between ABB and Fortum in the development and adoption of the new material has been active and fruitful. The companies have found a joint interest in building up an ecosystem that supports further development and novel applications for Fortum Circo. According to Davidovic, the shared commitment and cooperative spirit have made the journey a positive experience.
In the manufacturing industry, material choices are one part of the big sustainability puzzle – but an important one. Customer expectations are increasing, with more and more attention paid to the environmental impacts of each product and project. At the same time, high quality must be maintained and costs kept at an appropriate level. ABB sees Fortum Circo, which is made of post-consumer plastic waste, as a sustainable solution with significant potential.
Using a material made of recycled plastic is part of ABB’s comprehensive sustainability strategy 2030, which is linked to the United Nations’ Sustainable Development Goals. The ambitious plan includes, among other things, a target of zero landfill waste, and “Mission to Zero™” – a programme to make factories carbon neutral.
Comprehensive sustainability approach covers entire life cycle
19/9/2022
One piece in a larger strategy
Interested to know more about Fortum Circo® recycled plastics?
New uses for recycled plastic speed ABB towards its sustainability targets | Fortum
ABB, a technology leader and Nordic frontrunner in electrification, began using Fortum Circo® plastic recyclate in 2020. The material was first used to manufacture junction box covers. Since then, the company has expanded the scope of use many times to include new products. Using a material made of consumer waste fits perfectly into ABB’s ambitious sustainability approach.
“In our Porvoo factory where we manufacture electrical installation products, we are constantly learning. Finding the best material for any purpose is a journey during which we gain experience on what we can expect, which helps us plan for the future,”
“ABB and Fortum both strive for more and more sustainable solutions in the future. We are both links in a chain – with Fortum supporting our sustainability targets by supplying recycled raw material like Fortum Circo, so that we in turn can support those of our customers,” Marko Utriainen concludes.
Customer cases and news
“When we find a material recipe that fulfils all the required standards and works in Nordic conditions, we have something very special. If we succeed in this, I see huge potential in Fortum Circo, covering all the products we manufacture from plastics. We have already received very positive feedback on Fortum Circo from customers. We believe in this.”
When ABB manufactures electrical wiring and installation products, there are strict standards for safety that must be followed. In addition, the products must be suitable for the environmental conditions of the region where they are installed – for example, cold Nordic winters. Finding the right material that fulfils all criteria is no easy task, but having the right partner can make it easier.
Looking into the sustainability of raw materials and sourcing was a strategic step forward, and exploring the possibilities of Fortum Circo contributed to this. The success with the first application inspired ABB to expand the use of the recycled plastic material to other products.
The journey began with cross-checking the material requirements, deciding the products and testing and developing the right material. Together with the Fortum Circo team, ABB found initial solutions with suitable technical requirements and minimised risks and ramped up from there.
A journey of constant learning
The Porvoo factory, where Fortum Circo is used and tested, is one of the pilot factories in this programme. It has already achieved 100% carbon neutrality in own operations and generated significant energy savings with a geothermal heat system, solar panels and by recycling heat from the factory.
Easiness
Dusko Davidovic
Sustainability and circularity are an overarching approach at ABB. The company looks at the complete life cycle of its products and services, from design, sourcing, and material inputs to manufactured products, operations, marketing and selling, life cycle performance, and end of life alternatives. According to Dusko Davidovic, this is a new approach in the industry.
“ABB’s values are Courage, Care, Curiosity and Collaboration. It is important to us that they are not just words but manifested in what we do. There has obviously been collaboration in this project, but I think care also plays into it, as we are caring for the planet by choosing recycled materials. We have the courage to try and do something different, even if it is not always easy. And curiosity is definitely part of this work on both sides, and embedded in our DNA,” Davidovic says.
In the end, shared goals are key when it comes to developing more sustainable materials, reducing waste generation and making circular economy a part of everyday life. While customer expectations are increasing, so is the eagerness of companies like ABB to surpass them.
Interested to learn more about Fortum Circo® grades?


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/news-and-articles
Standing up for plastic: Self-rising chair foretells a rise in the use of recycled plastic
Bioplastic vs. Recycled plastics in terms of sustainability
Customer reference cases
The combination of wood and recycled plastic creates natural luxury
What will the future of plastics be about?
Fortum Circo® news and articles
Fortum Circo® customer cases & news | Fortum
Plastex chooses domestic recycled plastic
New generation school chair made from Fortum Circo® recycled plastic nominated in Plastics Recycling Awards 2020
Biolan black garden soil to be packaged with recycled plastic
ABB’s junction boxes give new life to plastic waste
Consumer insights lead to a new product
Learn about Fortum Circo customer cases, news and current issues.
Fortum Circo® customer cases & news


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/news-and-articles/reference-kekkil%C3%A4-garden-composter
, Sustainability Manager of K-Group's Building and Technical Trade division.
Consumer insights lead to a new product | Fortum
"Households are sorting more and more plastics at home, and that creates the basis for recycling and for products made from recycled plastic. A successful recycling chain – from plastic waste to a finished product on the store shelf – requires every link in the chain, from consumers to manufacturers of materials and products, brand owners and operators in the trade industry. This kind of cooperation with brand owners, producers and retailers speeds up the introduction of new products to the market, and the Garden Composter is a perfect example ", says Brand Sales Manager
Janne Kanervo
Kekkilä's goal is to bring consumers easy and functional solutions for a more sustainable everyday life. "We are constantly looking for new ways to increase the share of recycled materials and side streams in the manufacturing of our products. A garden composter made from Fortum Circo recycled plastic that has been collected from Finnish consumers is a significant step towards a more sustainable tomorrow. The composter makes it easy for the consumer to implement a circular economy at home and reduce the amount of waste generated," sums up Product Manager
Fortum and the Finnish retail chain K-Group started collaborating last year in an effort to increase the use of recycled plastics in new products. The research and collaboration work was solidified when Kekkilä, a big horticultural company, joined the partnership to produce and launch to market the Garden Composter, a product made from Fortum Circo® recycled plastics.
Kekkilä composter made of Fortum Circo®
4/4/2022
The research, cooperation and innovation resulted in a tangible product, Kekkilä’s Garden Composter, when the horticultural company Kekkilä joined the effort. The raw material for the Garden Composter is Fortum Circo® recycled plastic, made from plastic packages collected from Finnish households.
"We want to invest in products that are more sustainable, and the consumer research gave us a good insight into which product groups customers want products that are made from recycled plastic. Kekkilä is a Finnish partner that we are familiar with, so it was easy to work with them to start developing a product made from recycled plastic," says
, Kekkilä.
, Fortum.
Leena Takaveräjä
Fortum’s and K-Group’s collaboration got under way last year with a consumer survey of K-Group’s customer community Kylä. The aim of the survey was to find out consumer perceptions of recycled plastic. The survey findings showed that consumers perceived recycled plastic as a suitable material for many purposes. Cleaning supplies, small household items, garden furniture and tools were seen as the best uses for recycled plastic. Consumers also felt that products made out of recycled plastic gave meaning to the sorting of plastic packages in households and wished that the origin of the material were communicated on products, for example with a specific symbol.
Interested to know more about Fortum Circo® recycled plastic?


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/news-and-articles/abbs-junction-boxes-give-new-life-plastic-waste
Marie-Sofie Seger
A variety of alternative solutions were mapped – from bioplastics to recycled plastics – but it quickly became clear that the Fortum Circo® recycled plastic from Finland had precisely the values ABB was looking for: consistent quality, versatility, domestic origin, and responsible recycling. The development work was accelerated by the spring 2020 regulation that construction sites must recycle 70% of materials.
The pigment was added to the Fortum Circo® raw material to give it the ABB trademark red colour. “The red colour in the new covers is lighter than before, and the aim is that it communicates the origin of the material, recycled consumer plastic waste. The colour also has an important function because it stands out well against, e.g., the grey cast surface in concrete elements,” Product Manager
ABB’s junction boxes give new life to plastic waste | Fortum
ABB is a technology leader that is driving the digital transformation of industries. The Porvoo factory has manufactured electrical installation products for a long time; the factory’s 110 or so employees and 50 robots annually produce about 25 million units mainly for the Nordic markets. Technical plastics, which are subject to strict quality and production standards, are used in the products.
“We are really satisfied with the raw material. We have been able to create a recycled material recovery chain to produce the product with a small carbon footprint in line with circular economy principles,” says
Petri Kotilainen
Since January 2020, all ABB junction box covers sold in Finland have been produced from recycled plastic raw material. They are manufactured from recycled plastic granules that are delivered to Porvoo from Fortum’s Riihimäki plastics refinery.
from ABB.
notes about the end result of the product development.
“Fortum Circo® recycled plastic was selected as the material for ABB’s junction box covers because the covers have a relatively short life cycle,” ABB’s Project Manager
The total carbon footprint of the junction box covers made in Porvoo is estimated to decrease by 21,000 kilos on an annual basis. This is equivalent to the hot water consumption of one average Finn over a period of 77 years.
The new recycled material has been well received at job sites and by wholesalers, and the feedback has been nothing but positive. ABB believes that creating partnerships is one of the most important issues in a circular economy.
, SVP, Head of ABB Oy.
A circular economy through collaboration
ABB aims to reduce its carbon footprint
“ABB is a Nordic frontrunner in the construction sector, and is now showing the way forward in circular economy solutions,”
25 June 2020, 14:10
The product development project advanced agilely in collaboration with Fortum, the raw material fulfilled ABB’s test requirements for technical plastics and its properties were top notch. Prior to taking the recycled plastic into use, ABB also audited Fortum Circo’s production and quality.
says about the phases of the development work.
from Fortum’s Recycling & Waste business unit describes the fruits of the cooperation.
Recycled plastic as a replacement for virgin plastic
“The impact at the size-class of ABB is still moderate, but most important is that the first step has been taken successfully, and we can press forward from here,” says
Sustainability, domestic manufacturing and recycling. These values sparked the collaboration with Fortum that helped ABB successfully increase the sustainable manufacturing of junction boxes. The post-consumer plastic waste collected in Finland is refined at Fortum’s plastic refining plant into Fortum Circo® recycled plastic – the new, sustainable raw material for ABB’s junction box covers.
“Fortum is a good partner that shares the same values with us; it knows plastics and also wants to drive advancements forward. The depth of the partnership is tested particularly if there are disruptions in the process. For us it is important that the material cycles through in Finland and we are able to achieve a smaller carbon footprint,” concludes ABB’s Marko Utriainen.
The junction box cover is used only during construction; after installation, the cover is removed from the junction box that remains inside the wall.
Read more about ABB Group
One of the sustainability targets of ABB’s Installation Products is to reduce the carbon footprint. It was decided to take the first developmental steps in materials; the volumes of plastic electrical installation products are significant on a yearly level, so it would be assumed that this would be impactful.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/news-and-articles/bioplastic-vs-recycled-plastics-terms-sustainability
Read more about Fortum Circo
An abbreviation bio- is often understood as an ecological and green option, but what does it actually mean in context with plastics? What is bioplastics, is that the greenest choice available when it comes to sustainability?
Are bioplastics really better for the environment?
Another newcomer to the plastic materials is bio-based plastics that are derived from biomass such as corn, sugarcane, cellulose or other renewable biological resources. It is sometimes stated that bio-based plastics save fossil resources and reduce a product’s carbon footprint, but yet another angle is the use of potential food crops, such as corn and sugar cane, as a raw material in a world where we still have malnutrition. Bio-based plastics are also produced from industrial waste streams that are a more sustainable alternative than virgin plastic. However, bio-based plastics do not always have the identical chemical and mechanical characteristics as the fossil-based alternative, which can cause problems for the recycling of the material and yet revoke the sustainability angle when not holding the value in the material.
Biodegradable & bio-based plastics - what they are all about?
In all, bio-based and biodegradable plastics are interesting developments, but it is important that conventional fossil-based plastics are not replaced by environmentally poorer materials with respect to the whole life-cycle or by plastics which limit the possibilities for recycling of conventional plastics.
The biodegradability of plastics in single-use products is sometimes considered as a solution to the littering problem caused by plastics. Bio-degradable plastics are plastics degraded by microorganisms under specified conditions. However, these plastics do not degrade easily under all conditions but degrade into harmful micro-plastics. In terms of the littering problem, it is to be noted too that more than 96% of waste is collected in Europe. Therefore we find it important to find the solutions for recyclable materials holding value rather than degrading fast.
In a truly circular economy, materials that hold value and can be recycled are better than single-use materials. The environmental impact of different materials should be counted throughout the whole lifecycle.  Some bio-based plastic products have a bigger carbon footprint compared to fossil ones when the whole manufacturing chain and the life cycle is covered by calculations. Therefore it is wise to recycle all plastics that already exist and save the CO2 included in them, and only after that take virgin resources, both fossil and bio, into use.
Recycled plastics vs. bioplastics in terms of sustainability Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/fortum-circo-approved-eu-toy-safety-standard
Toy Safety Standard was actually suggested by the customers. It is great to see that the use of safe and sustainable recycled material in new applications is important for toy and other product manufacturers, too. This is the best way to speed up the market uptake for new raw materials like Fortum Circo®,
“Our overall goal is to have safe materials that reduce the use of virgin plastics. We already test our materials as part of our R&D process and we were sure of its safety, but the initiative to get our Fortum Circo® tested for compliance with the
” Koivuniemi says.
development and regulation need to go hand in hand.
, Business & Technology Development Manager, Fortum.
In particular, the EN 71-3 Toy Safety Standard is designed to assess the potential release and migration of chemicals if a toy or components of a toy were to be swallowed by a child. The European Committee for Standardization (CEN) sets the standards for toy safety. CEN’s test results approve Fortum Circo® PP, HDPE and LDPE grades as compliant with Toy Safety Standard EN 71-3:2019.
Fortum Circo® approved for EU Toy Safety Standard | Fortum
“As raw material producers, our responsibility is to ensure the materials we make are Safe and Sustainable-by-Design, and the regulator needs to ensure the rules applied to the products are coherent and fit for purpose and assessed based on their actual use cases. At the same time, the packaging manufacturers need to consider the recyclability of their products and ensure as much of the product as possible can truly be recycled. This is done by making smart raw material choices,” Koivuniemi concludes.
To ensure regulation that is fit for purpose, material
“We are pleased to say that our Fortum Circo® meets the strict product safety criteria set forth in the European Toy Directive. Toys must remain safe throughout use in children’s play and under any circumstances the toys are subjected to during child’s play. Our R&D work puts a lot of emphasis on the safety and sustainability of our recycled plastic granules,” says
Fortum’s plastic recyclate Fortum Circo®, produced from post-consumer plastic waste, has been approved to be compliant with the EU Toy Safety Standard EN 71-3. Following the approval, Fortum Circo® can be used in the manufacturing of toys in the EU.
20 December 2022, 13:05 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/news-and-articles/plastex-chooses-domestic-recycled-plastic
But the greatest thing, says Ant-Wuorinen, is that recycling is further growing, and the new product is also the sustainable choice.
Renewal is a prerequisite for Plastex because every company should be interested in the condition of the planet.
Plastex believes that recycled plastic will become popular also beyond Finland, and the raw material must be made recognised.
is a portfolio of consumer-targeted plastic products, like watering cans, spray bottles, funnels and sleds. In addition to grey, the portfolio also includes lavender, green and black products.
The EKO product line
Plastex chooses domestic recycled plastic | Fortum
21 October 2020, 15:01
“Fortum Circo recycled plastic is grey, so it is very suitable for dyeing. We believe that the product will start to sell sustainability through new colour choices,” notes Ant-Wuorinen.
got under way with suitability testing and test runs with Fortum Circo recycled plastic. Ultimately, Plastex decided to invest in two blow-moulding machines so that the recycled raw material could be used efficiently in product manufacturing. That resulted in the creation of EKO, a new product line made entirely from recycled plastic.
“Our collaboration has become closer along the way, and Fortum has had the will to develop the raw material for our needs. And they’ve accepted and met the challenges too,” praises Ant-Wuorinen.
Plastex manufactures various home and garden products from plastic as well as customised plastic products for corporate needs. Millions of product units are made every year. So the choice of raw material is of huge significance when talking about sustainability.
Fortum is an important partner for Plastex, and not only because of its domestic origin.
“Sustainability and recycling are clearly important values in Finland. The possibility to acquire domestic recycled plastic from Finland has made it easy for us to start investing in sustainable plastic products,” Ant-Wuorinen says about the company’s new direction.
The collaboration
Plastex was considering alternative raw materials for petroleum-based plastics in 2016 – the same year that Fortum started producing Fortum Circo® plastic granulates from post-consumer plastics at the Riihimäki plastic refinery.
Plastex started out making injection-moulded products, like buttons, combs and toys, and petroleum-based plastics were used as the raw materials. Plastex was the first company in the Nordic countries to start manufacturing blow-moulded products, in the 1950s. The company is currently increasing the share of recycled and bioplastics in production to 35%. This is no small investment because it has acquired new machinery for the recycled raw material.
Plastex was previously known for its colourful plastic products, but recycled plastic has challenged this – in a good way. Certain colours have already taken a role in making recycled plastic recognised.
“A new standard is being created for the sector, and Finns can be proud of that,” says Ant-Wuorinen.
“We would like to use Fortum Circo recycled plastic more and more because it is a researched and safe raw material from a domestic supplier – it is the product’s sustainability assurance,” Ant-Wuorinen continues.
“Plastic is superior and durable, but sustainability is the challenge of our era, and we must respond to it,” says Marketing Director
“Finland also has the prerequisites to capture the plastic market. We already have a lot of good circular economy stories, like the bottle return concept. This recycled plastic produced from household plastic packaging could be the next success story,” says Ant-Wuorinen.
from Plastex.
Arto Ant-Wuorinen
“The value chain is splendid: genuine and original post-consumer recycled plastic from Riihimäki to Lohja,” Ant-Wuorinen chuckles.
“There were some initial challenges with the raw material, e.g. with quality fluctuations, but that has been remedied by working together. Now we are constantly thinking about how we can integrate Fortum Circo recycled plastic also into other products,” says Ant-Wuorinen.
“Finnish origin is a big value for us, and collaborating with a domestic raw material supplier sounded like a good alternative right from the start. Previously, our plastic raw material came from Qatar,” says Ant-Wuorinen.
Plastex, a Finnish manufacturer of plastic products, has invested in the use of domestic recycled plastic in collaboration with Fortum. For four generations, since the 1930s, the family-owned business has manufactured plastic products, and now recycled plastic is quickly replacing petroleum-based plastics.
Plastex will continue developing new products around recycled plastic, and it has at least one already on the drawing board. And the material of choice for it too is Fortum Circo recycled plastic.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/news-and-articles/biolan-black-garden-soil-be-packaged-recycled-plastic
“Using recycled plastic for packaging garden soil is a concrete step toward a circular economy, and Biolan wants to be a pioneer in sustainable growth and in creating a circular economy. We can all do our part if we so choose, even if it’s one bag of soil at a time!” says
Biolan garden soil packaged in the new material reaches the shelves of stores this spring. The new bag for black garden soil is identical to the old version, but to ensure their recyclability, the insides of the new bags are grey instead of black. This ensures the bags are identified correctly at Fortum’s plastic refinery when the bags end up there to be recycled again. After all, the recyclability of plastic can be significantly improved with the design of the packaging.
Biolan’s fertiliser containers have been made from recycled plastic for a while already. Now Biolan is turning its attention to the packaging materials of its soil products. Plastic packaging waste collected from Finnish households is used to replace the virgin plastic that Biolan’s garden soil bags were made of previously.
Many businesses are heavily investing in more responsible operations and want to use recycled plastic for their packaging. Due to this, RKW Finland has also invested in new production equipment that enables using recycled plastic as raw material even more efficiently than before.
This spring, Biolan will package 1.4 million bags of soil with recycled plastic
02 April 2020, 10:01
“Plastic is an excellent packaging material when it’s allowed to be recycled again and again”, summarises Mikko, and it is easy to agree with him.
, Sourcing Manager at Biolan. “Fortum Circo® as a plastic raw material is full of potential. We know that Fortum has optimised its processing of household plastic packages into recycled plastic in a way that ensures no compromises need to be made when it comes to quality or responsibility”, Leed continues.
The primary purpose of packaging is to protect the product it contains and prevent reduction in quality. Replacing plastic in packaging for a damp organic product like soil is challenging, especially since the soil is usually stored outdoors. However, we can reduce the environmental effects of plastic, and efficient plastic recycling and good design of plastic products and packaging are key factors in making that happen.
Mikko Leed
Developing new packaging materials requires innovation from partners as well and the whole supply chain must participate in the development and implementation processes. Biolan’s long-term partner and plastic packaging manufacturer RKW Finland had a key role in developing Biolan’s packaging. RKW Finland uses Fortum’s recycled plastic granulate for the new packaging.
Biolan black garden soil to be packaged with recycled plastic | Fortum
Household bread bags, plastic bags and cosmetics packages are given new life as packaging material for garden soil. This spring, Biolan,  a Finnish company manufacturing and selling products for ecological gardening as well as environmental products, will package 1.4 million bags of black garden soil for consumers in plastic manufactured with the Fortum Circo® recycled plastic.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/01/new-generation-school-chair-made-fortum-circo-recycled-plastic-nominated-plastics-recycling-awards-2020
Innovative cellulose fibre-reinforced Fortum Circo PP FC®  compound updates an iconic school chair for the 2020s.
Kari Soljamo
competition will be held on 26th March 2020 in Amsterdam. Read more about the finalists in the Plastics Recycling Awards Europe 2020 competition
Cellulose fibre-reinforced Fortum Circo PP FC® recycled plastic is a new type of material specifically developed to meet the requirements of a highly durable product. The compound is developed in collaboration with Elastopoli and is based on a patented process technology. “The material has qualities on par with virgin plastic, but its environmental impacts are significantly smaller than when using virgin plastic,” says Fortum’s
Plastics Recycling Awards Europe 2020
, Product Line Manager, Plastic Recycling.
“The chair gives students a concrete example of the circular economy and of the fact that recycling plastic is really worthwhile. When sorted and recycled, the daily plastic packaging waste generated at home, like bread bags, yogurt containers and shampoo bottles, can get a new life, for instance as a chair that is used every day,” says Isku’s Development Manager
competition.
Isku
Created through a collaboration between Isku and Fortum, a new school chair has been selected as a finalist in the international
A leader in Finnish know-how, quality and industrial innovation since 1928,
28 January 2020, 14:15 EET
The international
’s goal is to provide customers with high-quality furniture while ensuring responsible production. Read more about Isku
Read more about Fortum Circo® recycled plastics
New generation school chair made from Fortum Circo® recycled plastic nominated in Plastics Recycling Awards 2020 | Fortum
The product is the Isku classic school chair called Prima, which has been used in schools since the 1990s. The plastic components in the new version are made from Finnish recycled plastic. Fortum supplies Isku with the recycled plastic, the primary raw material of which is plastic consumer packaging collected from Finnish households. The recycled plastic is reinforced with Finnish, renewable cellulose fibre, which gives the material added strength, shortens the product’s manufacturing time, and further reduces the carbon footprint of the material.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/blog/what-will-future-plastics-be-about
Additionally, governments seek to limit emissions even more than before to support environmental targets. In its study, Bloomberg has estimated that decarbonising the plastics industry will require investments of $759 billion by 2050 from the industry – on top of the usual capacity investments. Although the number is big, it is merely one per cent of what it will cost to make the global energy industry carbon neutral.
But there’s trouble with the engine. As environmental awareness increases, the demand for fossil raw materials is declining, and transportation is electrifying as well. The demand for liquid fuels used in transportation is estimated to fall by one third from the predicted peak in 2027 by 2050. This will create a significant optimisation problem for refineries, because the distillation of crude oil always produces certain fractions that need to be put into use. The picture below shows a typical production breakdown of crude oil, in which approximately 80% of the production is petrol, diesel and jet fuel. Less than 10% ends up in plastics and other chemical industry products. However, the production cannot be adjusted to a great extent to significantly reduce liquid fuels and increase the share of feedstock for chemical uses.
The above picture shoes a typical production breakdown of crude oil, in which approximately 80% of the production is petrol, diesel and jet fuel. Less than 10% ends up in plastics and other chemical industry products. However, the production cannot be adjusted to a great extent to significantly reduce liquid fuels and increase the share of feedstock for chemical uses.
Over the years, the petrochemical industry has become one of the most significant global industries. Oil states control the liquid fuel markets and energy production through their natural gas reserves. A well-oiled petrochemical industry engine has been created in which good use is made of all refinery derivatives. A small share of the crude oil that gets refined is used as raw material for plastics. European plastics production in particular leans heavily on petroleum naphta, which is mainly used to produce ethylene and propylene, which are among the most important raw materials for plastics.
Fortum Circo® plastic recyclate
In any case, the need for plastics continues to increase, and in many applications, plastic is the best alternative when the environmental load during useful life and lightness in relation to properties are taken into account.
The world of plastics is changing as traditionally the manufacturing of plastics has been based on oil refining side streams. ​​​​​​​Our expert Mikko Koivuniemi, Business & Technology Development Manager, shares his insights about how we at Fortum see the future of plastics recycling.
The most promising alternative for acquiring feedstock for the plastics industry is recycling the carbon captured from waste incineration plants. Developing this route still requires time and significant amounts of renewable energy. However, converting CO2 emissions into materials is the only way of combining efficient waste management, material efficiency and sufficient volumes. Picture below presents a vision of the future of the plastics industry.
Source: U.S. Energy information Administration, Petroleum Supply Monthly, February 2021, preliminary data
piloting CO2 capture at the waste incineration plant
Alternative means for plastic production?
in Riihimäki, and our goal is to use the captured carbon as raw material in the production of new high-quality materials, such as plastic.
Business & Technology Development Manager, BL Plastics at Fortum Recycling & Waste
What will the future of plastics be about? | Fortum
In addition to alternative feedstocks, a technological change is needed in the polymer industry industry. The most important example of this is the electrification of cracker plants along with the shift from fossil fuels to renewable electricity.
Mechanical recycling is, in fact, currently the best operating model from the natural resources point of view, because the material balance in relation to energy consumption is fairly good. The downside is that the quality of mechanically recycled plastic is always poorer than that of virgin plastic, and use in, for example, food packaging is prohibited for the time being, excluding PET plastics.
About plastic recycling at Fortum
Fortum recycles consumer plastic packaging mechanically in its plastics refinery plant in Riihimäki and uses it to produce
New technology and cooperation are needed
Both chemical and mechanical recycling techniques require separate collection of materials, which is challenging if we want to reach recycling targets of above 50%. For consumers, recycling is entirely voluntary, and some materials are always thrown into mixed waste. In many European countries, including Finland, placing organic waste in a landfill is not allowed. Therefore, the only possible waste processing method is incineration into energy.
, which is an environmentally friendly and sustainable choice for raw material in the plastics industry. In addition, we are
The carbon neutrality of plastics is a complex and capital-intensive challenge. In Europe, the alternative naphta needed in plastics production can be obtained from chemical recycling or bio-based production. With the latter, availability is a problem: the amounts remain very limited if significant harm to biodiversity is to be avoided.
The problem with chemical recycling has so far been poor yield and energy intensity. In addition, current technologies are very specific when it comes to feed materials. Pilot projects have been successfully carried out mainly with pure polyolefin fractions, the recycling of which can also be carried out mechanically.
Traditionally, the manufacturing of plastics has been based on oil refining side streams, which have been available in abundance and with a low price. CO2 emissions have hardly factored in in pricing. As we proceed towards alternative materials, emission costs will increase the cost level of raw materials permanently. This is something we have to accept in industry and trade, and ultimately among consumers. Furthermore, the price of CO2 emissions must be on a level that truly steers development towards alternative and novel solutions.
There is no one correct solution. We need versatility in our toolbox, cooperation, and new technology. Regulation cannot lag behind development or – even worse – slow it down, as has now happened with carbon sequestration; capture and storage is recognised, but the legislation relating to carbon recycling is still very incomplete. In this, the key factor is not the years during which the carbon dioxide is stored, but more importantly, whether we are replacing fossil materials in packaging, for example.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/news-and-articles/combination-wood-and-recycled-plastic-creates-natural-luxury
, Product Sales Manager at Fortum.
“Comparing different composite products is difficult because of the various standards and side stream raw materials used, but we can be proud of what we have created in Iisalmi: our product is 85% recycled and 100% Finnish,” says
“It’s important for us that Fortum Circo is a material of a consistently high quality, as well as being easy to use, so high-quality end products can be developed for consumers who appreciate quality,” says Pasanen.
, Vice President, Marketing and Product Management at Lunawood.
“Stable, reliable, long-term partnerships are important for us, and having similar values is particularly important,” says Masalin.
Jari Pasanen
Oy Lunawood Ltd
“When you use a Lunawood Thermowood Composite, you know where the material came from and where the product was manufactured. This is the practical aspect we want to share.”
Natural luxury through cooperation
Responsibility and sustainable development are Lunawood’s key focuses, and operations around these focuses are being developed continuously. Recycled raw materials are a key part of the sustainability story of the Thermowood Composite product, which is why they are significant.
In 2017, Lunawood was one of the first companies invited to test Fortum Circo® recycled plastic, which impressed the entire production department with its consistent quality.
In Lunawood Thermowood Composite, plastic is used to continue the story of wood, making it even more sustainable. A sustainable natural luxury product is created in the process.
“From the outset, the goal has been to replace virgin plastic with a cost-effective but sustainable solution,” Pasanen explains.
Established more than 20 years ago, Lunawood is the world’s largest company manufacturing thermally modified, Thermowood® products from Nordic pine and spruce. The company has mills in Iisalmi and Kaskinen, and it delivers Lunawood Thermowood products to more than 60 countries. At its Iisalmi mill in 2010, the company developed the world’s first Thermowood composite material, which is still unique. Demand for the product continues to increase.
, Marketing Manager at Lunawood.
“Our cooperation with Lunawood has been effective, as well as being a good example of how forests and recycled plastic can be combined in a wonderfully ecological way,” says
“A composite terrace is long-lasting and practically maintenance-free: washing and brushing are enough. The sun turns the Lunawood Thermowood fibre grey and also maintains the surface of the composite,” Veikkolainen explains.
Lunawood is actively seeking new possibilities, because a Thermowood Composite is a versatile material for a diverse range of products. Landscaping is just one application.
A material with more than 85% recycled content
The Lunawood mill in Iisalmi, Finland, creates sustainable composite material from wood and recycled plastic. As a result of long-term product development, reuse has been found for industrial side streams: Lunawood Thermowood Composite TWPC contains 65% Lunawood Thermowood fibre and 20% Fortum Circo® recycled plastic.
Lunawood manufactures sustainable material for landscaping in Iisalmi, Finland
, Mill Manager at Lunawood.
Current applications of Lunawood Thermowood Composite include private and public sites, from jetties to terraces.
“In fact, all applications are suitable, because the material is durable and stylish. Interesting applications in Finland include the terrace of the Teerenranta Restaurant in Lahti harbour, the Radisson Blue Marina Palace hotel by the Aura River in Turku, and the lakeside terrace of Hotel Gustavelund in Tuusula. The terrace area is made from Luna TWPC 42x200 “BigBoy” composite planks because it must withstand weight and wear. Once a year at an event organised by the hotel, fancy sports cars are driven onto the terrace for display, so we can say with certainty that our terrace material meets even the highest requirements of our customers,” says Masalin.
Demand for Thermowood composites as a long-term solution is growing globally.
“We tried combining recycled plastic with Thermowood fibre for the first time in 2010, but the quality of recycled plastic wasn’t sufficient for our needs back then,” says
Johanna Veikkolainen
04 May 2021, 15:12
Lunawood Thermowood Composite contains twice the amount of wood as an equally sized piece of Thermowood. The material contains 65% Thermowood fibre and 20% recycled polypropylene plastic. The rest consists of binding and colouring agents. The recycled plastic comes from consumer plastic packaging, which Fortum uses to manufacture Fortum Circo® recycled plastic of a consistently high quality at its plastics refinery in Riihimäki.
“The growing demand for Lunawood Thermowood, and Thermowood Composites in particular, is driven by consumers’ desire to make responsible choices and find landscaping products that are increasingly sustainable throughout their life cycles,” says
The cooperation between Lunawood and Fortum is unique. Two Finnish operators have together found an interesting and sustainable solution that is a prime example of the circular economy and a fully Finnish export product.
“Unlike similar composite materials, it does not warp, shrink, expand or crack. The Thermowood fibre gives the product its dimensional stability. The product is also non-toxic and has the scent of Thermowood,” says Pasanen.
The combination of wood and recycled plastic creates natural luxury | Fortum
“Most of the carbon footprint of the product comes from its raw materials. The climate impact of Fortum Circo is 50% smaller than that of virgin plastic materials,” says
is an innovative pioneer in the thermal modification of wood and has grown to be the global Thermowood® market leader. The company’s status is based on the high-quality products, reliable customer service and professional employees. Lunawood is a target-oriented growth company which employs 125 professionals in Finland at production plants in Iisalmi, Kaskinen and Joensuu as well as the Lahti head office and main export markets. The company’s annual production capacity is 150,000 m3 and majority of the company’s production is exported. In 2020 Lunawood’s turnover was EUR 56 million.
Maija Masalin
A Thermowood Composite gives wood a long life, and plastic strengthens the union. Fortum Circo is a raw material with a consistently high quality, all the way to the end-product.
Lunawood’s long history in the production of thermally modified wood has led to the need for the efficient use of side stream: Thermowood fibre. Thermowood fibre is ideal for composites produced by compression, but plastic is needed as a reinforcement.
The strengths of a Thermowood composite include high quality and durability. Lunawood Thermowood Composite can be manufactured to size, and it keeps its dimensions thanks to Thermowood fibre.
, Brand Sales Manager at Fortum.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/02/standing-plastic-self-rising-chair-foretells-rise-use-recycled-plastic
To demonstrate what recycled plastics can do, Fortum has developed a chair made from Fortum Circo® recycled plastic produced from post-consumer plastic waste. The self-rising Virén Chair is inspired by
, Brand Sales Manager at Fortum Recycling and Waste.
Fortum Circo is a plastic recyclate produced from post-consumer plastic waste. With consistent and high quality, versatility and solid availability, Fortum Circo recycled plastic can be used in a wide variety of products and also customised into compounds to meet specific needs and requirements. Fortum Circo is made with no compromises: it is a safe and reliable solution for sustainable plastics production.
jussi
, a Finnish long-distance runner who fell in the middle of the 10,000-metre final in the Munich Olympics. The odds were not in his favour, but he got up, won gold, and set a new world record.
FORTUM CORPORATION ONLINE NEWS 17.2.2022
malkia
www.fortum.com/circo
17 February 2022, 08:00 EET
“The Virén Chair is made from Fortum Circo® recycled plastic compound reinforced with cellulose fibre to strengthen the material and reduce its carbon footprint. The carbon footprint of Fortum Circo® recycled plastic is about half that of virgin plastics. The added cellulose fibre, originating from renewable sources, also absorbs carbon, further reducing the carbon footprint of the material,” Rasmus points out.
Standing up for plastic: Self-rising chair foretells a rise in the use of recycled plastic | Fortum
Fortum wants to expand the use of recycled plastics by developing recycled plastic compounds. In this process the qualities of the recycled plastic are enhanced so that the compounds can be used for products that are more technical and challenging in terms of production, of which the Virén Chair is a good example.
Jussi Mälkiä
Read more about Fortum Circo® recycled plastic
, Brand Manager at Fortum.
Download press materials here
Anniina Rasmus, Brand Sales Manager, Fortum Circo®, +358 40 081 5484,
Lasse Virén
The Virén Chair - a chair that will always stand up if it falls
The chair has been developed together with variety of professionals from engineers to physicists and researchers.
Fortum as a forerunner in creating recycled plastic compounds
“The story of Lasse Virén – and especially his legendary win in the Munich Olympics – is still inspiring for many of us. Our ambition was to honour comebacks, progression and resilience through the Virén Chair and to show what can be achieved with recycled plastics today. Furthermore, the Virén Chair pays respect to Finnish design with characteristics of plastic furniture developed in the 1960s by Finnish designers,” says
Jussi Mälkiä, Brand Manager, Fortum, + 358 50 352 5328,
Read more about the Virén Chair and its development
“Plastic is in many ways a superior material that is hard to substitute. The consumption of plastic is growing globally all the time; the discussion around plastics should instead focus on how to increase recycling. We should make sure that the value of the material is preserved by recycling the plastic and converting the waste into reusable material whenever possible,” says
By 2019 only 9% of the plastic waste ever generated had been recycled, and in 2019 only 14% was collected for recycling (source: UNEP). The real problem lies in the deficient waste management systems, not the plastic material itself.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/virenchair/
Virén Chair
Interested in Fortum Circo® -
The Virén Chair is a testament to what can be achieved with recycled plastics today. As still in 2019 only 14 % of all plastic waste globally was collected for recycling, the chair aims to draw attention to a sustainable alternative to virgin plastics that can help many industries decarbonise and lower their environmental impact. Made from Fortum Circo® recycled plastic, produced from post-consumer plastic waste, the Virén Chair always stands up if it falls, truly embodying the rise of recycled plastics.
Brand Sales Manager, Fortum Circo®
Fortum Virén Chair
+358 400 815 484
Watch the video to see how
Virén Chair is not in production nor is it for sale. Only a limited amount of prototypes are produced to showcase Fortum Circo®.
anniina.rasmus@fortum.com
Scroll down
The Virén Chair is named after and inspired by the Finnish long-distance runner Lasse Virén. In the 1972 Munich Olympics, Virén fell in the middle of the 10,000 meters final. Against all odds, he got up, won the gold, and even set a new world record – becoming an icon of perseverance that continues to inspire us and future generations. The year 2022 marks the 50th anniversary of Virén’s legendary run, making it the perfect time to pay tribute and encapsulate his spirit. The chair will forever represent Virén’s legacy, comebacks and progression, showing what resilience can help achieve, be it in the realm of sports or plastic recycling.
Reimaging the future of recycled plastics
Reference:
Fortum Circo®
Download press kit
Footer
Standing up for recycled plastic
Technical Details
This chair picks itself up if it falls.
recycled plastic raw material?
Special thanks to collaborating partners
1. unep.org/news-and-stories/story/plastic-recycling-underperforming-sector-ripe-remake
Inspired by one of the greatest comebacks in history
Recycled plastics are often used in quite simple products. Fortum strives to expand their use by developing recycled plastic compounds. In this recycling process the qualities of the recycled plastic are improved so that the compounds can be used for more technical and production-wise more challenging products, of which the Virén Chair serves as a prime example. The Virén Chair was developed together with engineers, physicists and researchers to stand up completely without robotics using nothing but motion and its own design. The chair pays respect to Finnish design with characteristics of plastic furniture developed in the 1960s by Finnish designers.
Fortum Circo® is a plastic recyclate produced from post-consumer plastic waste. With consistent and high quality, versatility and solid availability, Fortum Circo recycled plastic can be used in a wide variety of products and also customized into compounds to meet the specific needs and requirements. Fortum Circo is made with no compromises: it is a safe and reliable solution for sustainable plastics production.
Note:


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/newsroom/forthedoers-blog/battery-recycling-eases-raw-material-shortage
There are currently global challenges in the availability of many crucial raw materials. As electric vehicles become more and more common, the battery industry is booming, but a shortage of the necessary metals is expected to arise in the near future. Recycling used batteries is a solution that reduces the need for new raw material as well as the generation of waste.
In addition to the hydrometallurgical recycling process taking place in Harjavalta, we also operate a mechanical battery recycling plant in Ikaalinen, Finland, where EV batteries are dismantled and mechanically processed. The valuable black mass of the batteries is taken from Ikaalinen to Harjavalta to be hydrometallurgically processed. Fortum also operates a recycling plant in Tornio specialised in recycling metal industry waste streams that contain valuable metals used in batteries, which are recovered and recycled to support the availability of secondary raw materials in battery production.
The need for more batteries puts pressure on raw material production. However, the availability of metals will not be able to keep up – for example, the production of nickel will not be sufficient to meet the demand, nor will the lithium supply. Recycling battery materials – as well as making use of production waste streams – is therefore not only a way to reduce waste but a crucial part of the future battery value chain. By recycling production waste as well as used batteries, we can create a new industry that applies the principles of circular economy while supporting European battery manufacturing.
Head of Business Line, Batteries
Nearly all battery metals can be recovered and recycled
We already have a strong customer base for recycled battery materials, and we are able to recycle the waste material produced by European companies in the value chain into high quality raw material. Fortum has been running a pilot battery material recycling plant in Harjavalta, Finland. The plant is already operating commercially, although the scale is small. The purpose of the pilot is to test new technologies to recycle different materials. The learnings from the pilot will be applied in the technological solutions of a new, commercial scale hydrometallurgical plant in Harjavalta, which will be operational in 2023.
Primary materials will continue to be needed too because of the high demand. Finland is in a good situation in this regard, as we have deposits of all the materials needed in today’s batteries – nickel, cobalt, manganese, lithium, and graphite. We are, in fact, unique in Europe when it comes to these natural resources. We already have a lot of industry that refines these metals, which helps in getting new battery industry investments in Finland.
Battery recycling eases raw material shortage | Fortum
Currently, practically all metals used in batteries can be recovered and recycled. These include nickel, manganese, cobalt, and lithium. However, the recycling of other components such as graphite, the liquid electrolyte and the separator plastic between the cathode and anode surface still require further development, which is ongoing. I believe that we are not far from being able to recycle the liquid electrolytes as raw material for the chemical industry.
The European battery industry is developing at an incredible pace, and the growth of electric transport has surpassed all predictions in both scale and speed. At the same time, investments in green energy are increasing even more strongly. This means that there will be massive demand for batteries in both the transport and energy sector, and the battery industry is expected to grow significantly in Europe.
Batteries play an important role in the energy transformation, primarily as a key enabler of the electrification of transport. If hydrogen becomes a significant power source in transportation, batteries will be needed in hydrogen-powered vehicles as well. They are also used as energy storage, in balancing the electric grid, and to augment hydropower plants in hybrid solutions.
The metals in the active material of batteries are mainly reused as raw material in new batteries, but there are other applications for recycled battery materials as well. The metal refining industry gladly makes use of recycled metals to reduce the need to acquire virgin raw material.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/fortums-battery-material-recycling-facility-gets-ready-begin-operations-2023-staff-members-moving-onsite-december
Fortum makes new Harjavalta recycling plant investment to expand its battery recycling capacity
07 December 2022, 13:00 EET
“I’m pleased to say that we have already successfully completed testing of the automation system during a 2-week test period in the summer. Most recently, in November, we have started the process automation signal testing to verify the operation of process equipment such as pumps, mixers, valves and measuring devices from the automation system. Everything is going according to plan and we are very excited to welcome our staff to move into the site during December,” says
, Head of Business Line Batteries at Fortum.
Fortum’s Harjavalta facility is currently operated as an industrial-scale pilot plant. The nearly completed deployment tests mark the shift towards industrial-scale hydrometallurgical recycling of battery materials. Once completed, the Harjavalta site will be among the largest hydrometallurgical recycling facilities in Europe in terms of recycling capacity.
“Our new hydrometallurgical facility in Harjavalta will efficiently recycle the valuable metals found in the lithium batteries used in electric cars, as well as various waste fractions generated in the battery production chain. Growing the battery recycling industry in Europe is crucial to ensure a sustainable EV and battery sector that can help the EV and battery industry as well as the EU to reach the set policy targets on recycling and to reduce the dependency on imports of battery materials,” notes
new battery material recycling facility
The construction work and the gradual deployment tests of Fortum’s
The office and social space wing will be ready for use in early December. At that time, the entire personnel of the facility can move to the new facility. The commercial operations will begin after the commissioning period in Q2/2023.
Fortum’s battery material recycling facility investment progresses – Deployment testing starts after summer
Read our previous news related to topic:
Fortum’s battery material recycling facility investment progresses - the cornerstone of the new facility was laid
in Harjavalta, Finland, are being completed according to plan. Staff members will move to the site in December as the last installations are being made. The new state-of-the-art hydrometallurgical plant is on track to start commercial operations in the second quarter of 2023.
Fortum's new hydrometallurcigal recycling facility is getting ready
Fortum’s battery material recycling facility gets ready to begin operations in 2023 – Staff members moving onsite in December | Fortum
Fortum’s recycling facility under construction is an investment in sustainable solutions for the future. The new facility will significantly increase the recycling capacity of battery materials in Europe. Fortum’s Central European recycling operations currently being prepared to start local recycling operations in Germany will be connected to the fast-growing Finnish sustainable battery raw materials cluster. With these expansions Fortum will help to ease the raw materials gap the European automotive industry is facing.
Holländer


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/06/fortum-makes-new-harjavalta-recycling-plant-investment-expand-its-battery-recycling-capacity
Fortum has made the investment decision to expand its lithium-ion battery recycling capacity by building a new state-of-the-art hydrometallurgical plant in Harjavalta, Finland. The investment, marked at ca. EUR 24 million, will be a major step in increasing Fortum’s hydrometallurgical recycling capacity and enabling the production of sustainable battery chemicals. The new facility will be able to efficiently recover scarce metals from old electric vehicle lithium-ion batteries while also recycling various waste fractions derived throughout the battery supply chain.
barrette
17 June 2021, 08:00 EEST
Lithium-ion batteries play a key role in enabling the transition to clean energy and the growth of e-mobility. With the rapid electrification of transportation and the move towards renewable energy sources, the demand for lithium-ion batteries is expected to grow more than ten-fold by 2030, significantly increasing the need for critical metals used in the production of lithium-ion batteries. Fortum’s new Harjavalta facility will help to meet the rising demand for recycled battery materials and enable the sustainable recovery of lithium, nickel, cobalt, and manganese, which are all essential in the manufacturing of new electric vehicle batteries.
In March, Fortum’s hydrometallurgical battery recycling operations were identified as one of four Fortum projects to be shortlisted for the EU’s Innovation Fund for low-carbon technologies. The four Fortum projects made it through to a shortlist of 70 candidates for financing from the EU’s EUR 1 billion first Innovation Fund. Fortum has also received IPCEI (Important Project of Common European Interest) grants from Business Finland in conjunction with the EU Commission’s European Battery Innovation project. The grants were given in conjunction with the development of Fortum’s mechanical recycling plant in Ikaalinen, Finland and the hydrometallurgical recycling plant in Harjavalta.
Simon Barrette, Communications & Marketing Manager, Fortum Recycling & Waste, tel. +358 40 728 9477,
Fortum is currently operating an industrial-scale hydrometallurgical pilot plant in Harjavalta. The new facility to be built, which is expected to be operating in 2023, will enable a significant increase in Fortum’s processing and recycling capacity. The new plant will enable Fortum to recycle the major part of the EV batteries reaching their end-of-life in Europe.”
Kalle Saarimaa, Vice President, Fortum Recycling & Waste, tel. +358 41 503 1337,
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 17.6.2021
Tero Holländer, Head of Business Line Batteries, Fortum Recycling & Waste, tel. +358 40 861 5071,
“Fortum is investing in a greener future by further investing in its hydrometallurgical recycling facilities. The new facility in Harjavalta will create approximately thirty jobs in the near future, but its impact will be felt throughout Europe as it will be the largest facility in the market of its kind once completed,” says
Vice President, Fortum Recycling & Waste. “Our solid offering covers several key segments of the battery value chain and we look forward to our collaboration with key players in those fields. As the electrification of transportation gathers pace, the raw materials gap faced by the automotive industry is increasingly becoming a serious challenge. Our new facility will strongly support the existing Finnish and European battery manufacturing ecosystems, but it will also help the entire industry produce more sustainable batteries in Europe.”
Read our latest battery related news and releases
Fortum uses a combination of mechanical and low-CO2 hydrometallurgical technologies to recycle the batteries as sustainably as possible and with the lowest carbon footprint. The lithium-ion batteries are first disassembled and treated during a mechanical process at Fortum’s plant in Ikaalinen. The battery’s black mass, containing critical metals, is collected and then taken to Harjavalta for hydrometallurgical processing.
Fortum makes new Harjavalta recycling plant investment to expand its battery recycling capacity | Fortum
Kalle Saarimaa,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/battery-recycling/news-and-releases
Batteries play a significant role in several businesses at Fortum.
17 May 2022, 13:00
Fortum receives funding from Business Finland for lithium recovery at the Harjavalta battery material recycling facility
02 November 2021, 14:00
17 December 2021, 10:45
Low-carbon footprint is a key driver in the development of Fortum’s battery material recycling
News and press releases related to battery recycling
Battery Recycling News and Releases | Fortum
12 September 2022, 16:00
Battery Recycling News and Releases


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/09/low-carbon-footprint-key-driver-development-fortums-battery-material-recycling
In the development of Fortum's battery recycling technologies, a lot of emphasis is put into managing the carbon footprint of the operations – in addition to considerations linked to material efficiency and profitability. To better understand the carbon footprint of Fortum’s battery material recycling and how the sustainability of the recycling service could be further improved, Fortum ordered a carbon footprint analysis from LCA Consulting Oy, a Finnish-based sustainability and life cycle assessment consultancy.
12 September 2022, 16:00 EEST
“At Fortum, we strive to have a recycling technology that produces as few emissions as possible. I’m pleased to see that based on these results, the CO2 efficiency of our process is already at a very good level, and even below the figures for primary production. This carbon footprint study gives us an important benchmark that we’ll use to further optimise our technology. The data will support the process development so that the carbon footprint can be further calculated. The study results also provide us with data to show our customers how recovering the battery materials with our technology contributes to their manufacturing footprint,” says
, Head of Business Line, Batteries, Fortum.
“We offer advanced recycling expertise at every stage of the battery life cycle, from handling and transporting to the low CO2 hydrometallurgical technology. The carbon footprint study indicates that most of the fossil CO2 in our battery recycling comes from the hydrometallurgical process, in which up to 95% of valuable metals are recovered and recycled into secondary battery chemicals,” Holländer concludes.
The complete cradle-to-gate study assessed the potential carbon footprint of Fortum's nickel and cobalt products to determine which processes and life cycle phases have a high contribution to the carbon footprint. The study was conducted according to ISO 14067, ISO 14040 and ISO 14044 standards and it was critically reviewed by external party.
(PDF, 802 KB)
With the use of EVs and electric cars set to soar, car manufacturers are rivalling to have the most sustainable battery, and battery manufacturers are competing to have the lowest emission battery materials. Sourcing the battery raw materials can be problematic and comes with a heavy carbon footprint. In this quest for sustainable batteries, it is clear that access to sustainable battery recycling technologies becomes a prerequisite.
To further guide transparent and detailed exchanges on Fortum’s recycling technology and its environmental footprint in the future, it is also necessary to differentiate the carbon footprint between the recycling processes and the products resulting from the processes. Fortum will further assess the carbon footprint of the mechanical recycling of batteries to be disposed of and will separately analyse the carbon footprint of processing recycled products assigned to a recycled battery material, like the NiSO4 crystal, produced in Harjavalta’s hydrometallurgical process.
Read our latest battery related news
Fortum’s efficient and low-carbon recycling process ensures that the valuable raw materials contained in the batteries are recovered and used as recycled raw material for new batteries. The technology and the battery treatment processes have been developed in-house and optimised for high safety, sustainability, and a high recovery rate.
Low-carbon footprint is a key driver in the development of Fortum’s battery material recycling | Fortum
Tero Holländer, Head of Business Line, Batteries, Fortum, +358 40 861 5071,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/05/fortums-battery-material-recycling-facility-investment-progresses-deployment-testing-starts-after-summer
“The recycling facility under construction is an investment in sustainable solutions for the future. Accordingly, we want the construction process to reflect this, which is why we have invested in low-carbon technologies and have ensured a high recycling rate at the construction site,” Holländer explains the construction process.
Once completed, the new facility will significantly increase the recycling capacity of battery materials in Europe. It will efficiently recycle the valuable metals found in the lithium batteries used in electric cars, as well as various waste fractions generated in the battery production chain.
Fortum’s battery material recycling facility investment progresses – Deployment testing starts after summer | Fortum
The new facility will strongly support the existing Finnish and European battery manufacturing ecosystems and will improve self-sufficiency in Europe by restoring the critical materials needed to produce more sustainable batteries in Europe.
The construction of Fortum’s new battery material recycling facility in Harjavalta, Finland, is progressing according to plan; the first deployment testing will start after the summer. The new, state-of-the-art hydrometallurgical plant is on track for completion in early 2023.
“I’m pleased to see that the construction work is advancing as planned amid turbulent markets. We are already looking forward to starting the deployment testing, as this will mark the shift towards industrial-scale hydrometallurgical recycling of battery materials,” notes
Fortum's new hydrometallurcigal recycling facility is being built in Harjavalta, Finland
17 May 2022, 13:00 EEST


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/11/fortums-battery-material-recycling-facility-investment-progresses-cornerstone-new-facility-was-laid
Read more about the Harjavalta recycling plant investment
Lithium-ion batteries enable the growth of electric transportation and the transition to clean energy. Demand for batteries is expected to grow more than tenfold by 2030, significantly increasing the need for critical metals used in their production. Fortum’s new recycling facility in Harjavalta will meet this demand, and it will significantly increase Fortum’s hydrometallurgical recycling capacity and enable the production of sustainable battery chemicals.
The new facility can efficiently recycle the valuable metals found in the lithium batteries used in electric cars, as well as various waste fractions generated in the battery production chain. Construction work on the new facility is underway and is scheduled for completion in early 2023. Upon completion, the facility will represent the latest technology and Fortum’s expertise in battery material recycling.
Minister
, Head of Business Line, Batteries at Fortum, summed up the work of creating a new business as a long process that requires vision, courage, and resources – but, above all, cooperation. Even though it will be more than a year until the new facility is operational, a lot of work has already been put into the investment, for which the City of Harjavalta, Business Finland, the Ministry of Employment and the Economy, partners, and Fortum’s battery business group received praise at the event.
Fortum’s battery material recycling facility investment progresses - the cornerstone of the new facility was laid | Fortum
The cornerstone of Fortum’s new battery recycling facility was laid on 1 November 2021 at a festive ceremony in Harjavalta, Finland, where the Minister of Economic Affairs Mika Lintilä, Fortum’s CEO Markus Rauramo, and Mayor of Harjavalta Hannu Kuusela were guests of honour.
emphasised in his speech the importance of the battery circular economy as an enabler of new business for the Finnish battery sector and praised Fortum’s pioneering work in the development of recycling technologies suitable for an industrial scale. “Responsible business and sustainable growth are at the heart of the national battery strategy. Fortum’s battery recycling facility in Harjavalta is an important part of building a sustainable and growing battery industry in Finland and throughout Europe.”
“This day is very special for us at Fortum. In a moment, we will lay the foundation stone for a facility that not only represents a new business opportunity for our company, but is an important step for all of us towards a cleaner future,” said
in his keynote speech.
02 November 2021, 14:00 EET
The recycling facility under construction in Harjavalta is a significant investment in sustainable solutions for the future. Rauramo estimated that the facility is an even more significant investment than its size.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/12/fortum-receives-funding-business-finland-lithium-recovery-harjavalta-battery-material-recycling-facility
17 December 2021, 10:45 EET
17.6.2021
Previous releases related to Harjavalta recycling plant investment:
Upon completion, the new facility will enable efficient recycling of the valuable metals found in the lithium batteries used in electric cars and various waste fractions generated in the battery production chain as well as production of sustainable battery chemicals made from recycled raw materials. The cornerstone of the new facility was laid in November 2021, and the facility is scheduled for completion in 2023.
Fortum receives funding from Business Finland for lithium recovery at the Harjavalta battery material recycling facility | Fortum
* Updated on 21.12.2021: The funding granted to the project is part of the European Union's NextGenerationEU funding from Finland's Sustainable Growth Program.
Fortum has been granted funding of EUR 10 million from Business Finland, enabling lithium recovery from recycled battery materials at the hydrometallurgical recycling facility being built in Harjavalta, Finland.
Efficient and sustainable recycling of battery materials is necessary as the demand for batteries grows in the electrifying world. Customers are also increasingly more interested in responsible recycling of battery materials. Innovative recycling and recovery methods strengthen Finland’s competitiveness in the battery sector and advance national climate targets.
“We are really pleased about the funding decision enabling lithium recovery with new technology at the facility we are currently building. Lithium recovery strengthens Fortum’s position as a frontrunner in sustainable battery recycling. The funding granted by Business Finland has a significant impact on the development of our battery recycling business,” says
1.11.2021
Tero Holländer, Head of Business Line Batteries, Fortum Recycling & Waste, tel. +358 40 861 5071,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/09/fortum-start-battery-recycling-operations-germany-serving-european-ev-automotive-industrys-rising-demand-battery-raw-materials
tel. +358 40 861 5071
The battery black mass obtained will be recycled at Fortum’s novel hydrometallurgical recycling facility in Harjavalta, Finland, from where it can be fed back to the European battery value chain.
, Head of Business Line, Batteries, Fortum
Tero Holländer, Head of Business Line, Batteries, Fortum,
, tel. +358 50 350 286
, Vice President, Fortum Recycling and Waste.
, says
“If you imagine that for a fully electric car lithium-ion battery, you need approximately 50 kg of nickel, 8 kg of lithium and 7 kg of cobalt, you start to comprehend the size of the challenge of the raw materials shortage in Europe. For the EV and battery sector to be sustainable, we need to recover raw materials from the battery production process in the most sustainable way. Fortum has comprehensive expertise in this technology through its own in-house R&D and IP development. Our unique low-CO2 battery recycling solution makes it possible to recycle over 80% of the battery, and 95% of the valuable metals contained in the battery’s black mass can be put back into circulation”, explains Holländer.
Fortum is expanding its lithium-ion battery recycling capacity by building a new state-of-the-art hydrometallurgical plant in Harjavalta, Finland. The recycling facility under construction in Harjavalta is a significant investment in sustainable solutions for the future. The new hydrometallurgical battery material recycling facility will be operational in 2023. Once fully operational, the new facility will enable a significant increase in Fortum’s processing and recycling capacity. Fortum’s Harjavalta facility is currently operated as an industrial-scale pilot plant.
14 September 2022, 13:00 EEST
The market entry is a major step forward in Fortum’s ambitious bid to become Europe’s top recycler of EV batteries and battery materials. The newly established company in Germany aims to address the European automotive and battery manufacturing industry’s rising demand for battery raw materials. The new recycling hub for ‘end-of-life’ lithium-ion batteries and wastes from battery manufacturing is expected to start its operations by the end of 2022, in the industrial cluster at Baden-Wurttenberg in southern Germany.
The Germany-based battery recycling operations will allow Fortum to help bridge the raw materials gap the automotive industry is facing, which is even more in focus with the upcoming EU-wide battery regulation that is expected to drastically increase the quantity of recycled raw materials in new batteries.
Maiju Daniel-Huhtaniska, Communications Manager, Fortum Recycling & Waste,
(PDF, 807 KB)
“Our new central European recycling operations provide a unique possibility for local manufacturers to connect on the fast-growing Finnish sustainable battery raw materials cluster. For now, our recycling operations will create approximately twenty jobs in the near future. However, the full impact of the hub will be much broader as a result of its connection to our hydrometallurgical recycling facility located in Finland, where a major part of the European EV batteries reaching their end-of-life could be recycled as of next year”, says
Fortum’s hydrometallurgical battery recycling operations have received IPCEI (Important Project of Common European Interest) grants from Business Finland in conjunction with the EU Commission’s European Battery Innovation project, underpinning the strategic role of the EV batteries recycling development work done by Fortum.
Fortum, a leading European energy company and a forerunner in battery recycling technology, has founded Fortum Batterie Recycling GmbH in Germany to provide safe and sustainable electric vehicle (EV) battery recycling in central Europe.
“We are bringing our competencies and superior battery recycling technology into the heart of the European automotive market to provide on-site services to companies operating within the automotive and battery industry. We will offer our low-carbon recycling technology in Germany, leveraging industrial synergies with the automotive and battery manufacturers”
Fortum to start battery recycling operations in Germany, serving the European EV automotive industry’s rising demand for battery raw materials | Fortum
About Fortum’s Harjavalta battery material recycling facility in Finland


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-estonia
Fortum in Estonia
Fortum has Financial Services in Estonia. Financial Services' back office is located in Tallinn and provides accounting, reporting, payroll and tax services to more than 100 Fortum companies globally. The back office has approximately 50 employees.
Fortum has an office in Tallinn providing financial services to our companies.
Fortum in Estonia | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-united-kingdom
Fortum in United Kingdom | Fortum
Our services and solutions include power, heat and steam sales, electric retail sales, district heating and cooling, power solutions, electricity trading services, nuclear expert services, energy efficiency services, electric vehicle charging, bio-oil to replace fossil fuels, environmental management and material efficiency services.
Download Fortum's Tax Principles
We have been operating in the United Kingdom since the 1990s. We offer our customers a consistent and environmentally friendly performance. We provide care and services of the highest standards with an excellent track record in power plant technology, operations and maintenance.
Fortum's Tax Principles are approved by the Fortum Oyj Board of Directors and apply to our operating countries globally.
Fortum in United Kingdom
Our operations in the United Kingdom are focused on operation and maintenance services for industry and energy companies.
Modern Slavery Statement
Fortum's tax principles
We fully subscribe to the values embodied in the UK Modern Slavery Act 2015 and condemn any occurrences of practices contravening the Act. We expect our business partners to act responsibly and to comply with the Fortum Code of Conduct and our Supplier Code of Conduct.
Read the Modern Slavery Statement


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-ireland
In addition, FFI DAC’s subsidiary Fortum eNext Ireland Ltd. provides services for some local district heating networks and power plants in Ireland.
Fortum in Ireland
​Our office in Ireland is located in Shannon and employs five professionals in economics and finance, treasury, taxation, law and accounting​. FFI DAC is located in Ireland as Ireland offers a stable and well developed infrastructure for financing and holding operations.
Fortum owns and runs operations in Ireland both globally and locally. Our companies in Ireland create shareholder value by owning and financing some key Fortum operations, such as Uniper, supporting their profitability and carrying the risks related to the financing, shareholdings and operations. You can find more details on the setup of our acquisition structures from our 2018 Tax Footprint
Fortum in Ireland | Fortum
The strategic objective of FFI DAC is to protect Fortum Oyj balance sheet from equity related risks in subsidiaries, such as Uniper. The operative objective is to safeguard the safe financing of our operations. By creating a strong and stable company in FFI DAC with qualified management and employees, it can meet these objectives through absorbing possible losses in shareholdings and offering efficient financing while maintaining it’s own share value. This prevents Fortum Oyj from having losses in their books, therefore protect Fortum Oyj’s distributable equity and shareholder value.
Read more here:
Fortum owns and runs opera­tions in Ireland both globally and locally.
Fortum Finance Ireland DAC (FFI DAC) offers efficient long-term financing for Fortum Group companies. FFI DAC financing is organised in independent, stable loan portfolios ensuring predictable and safe financing for Fortum Group companies.​​
South Dublin County Council with support from Amazon Web Services (AWS) and Fortum eNext create Ireland’s first publicly owned, not-for-profit energy company


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/12/south-dublin-county-council-support-amazon-web-services-aws-and-fortum-enext-create-irelands-first-publicly-owned-not-profit-energy-company
South Dublin County Council (SDCC) has established Ireland’s first publicly owned, not-for-profit energy company, to provide low carbon heat to local community buildings. Trading as Heatworks, the company will deliver the Tallaght District Heating Network, estimated when completed to reduce carbon dioxide emissions in the South Dublin County area by nearly 1,500 tonnes per year.
, Chief Executive of South Dublin County Council, said, “The Tallaght district heating network shows how public-private collaboration using well-established district-heating technology can construct a system to recycle heat from an Amazon Web Services data centre to meaningfully contribute to helping Ireland achieve its 2030 sustainability targets. We believe the work we have done with Fortum eNext and Amazon Web Services to create this scheme can become a template for other districts across Ireland. We look forward to future collaborations as South Dublin County moves towards a low-carbon future.”
South Dublin County Council is one of four local authority areas in the Dublin region. The Council provides and funds a broad range of services including housing, roads, walking and cycling routes, parks and playgrounds, libraries, sports facilities, litter control, art centres, enterprise units, fire services, community infrastructure and financial support. It also serves as a platform for local democracy with 40 councillors spread across seven electoral areas.
, Amazon Web Services (AWS) Ireland country manager. “Our support for the district heating scheme demonstrates our continued commitment to building a more sustainable future for Ireland. We are pleased to participate in this unique project that will help the country meet its 2030 renewable energy targets.”
About Amazon Web Services
Photo: SDCC
https://aws.amazon.com/
from Fortum eNext, “Our know-how has been developed and tested during our 25-year-long presence in Ireland and the UK, where we have delivered power plants and long-term operation and maintenance services for different kinds of power plants and customers.”
Fortum’s vision as a clean energy company is to work with partners in reshaping the energy system, improving resource efficiency and providing smart solutions for the future. District heating is an endemic feature of the city and town communities in Finland, Sweden and northern Europe, and Fortum is a major player in these energy systems. Fortum’s delivery will meet local heat demand with a low-carbon solution that is scalable for future heating demand and follows a modular design principle. Developing green solutions for cities’ district heating networks and electrifying customers’ processes aligns well with Fortum eNext’s strategy on decarbonisation.
Mike Beary
About South Dublin County Council
South Dublin County Council with support from Amazon Web Services (AWS) and Fortum eNext create Ireland’s first publicly owned, not-for-profit energy company | Fortum
The system will initially heat 47,000 m2 of public sector buildings, 3,000m2 of commercial space, and 135 affordable rental apartments.
Fortum eNext has been contracted to design, install and operate the network due to the company’s extensive experience with district heating throughout Scandinavia and Eastern Europe.
All products and services
About Codema
The network will use excess heat from a customisation to Amazon Web Services’ (AWS) recently completed data centre to provide low carbon heat to public sector, residential and commercial customers. AWS will provide recycled heat free of charge to the scheme as part of its broader sustainability activities, and its continued assistance to Ireland in meeting its EU 2030 national heating and carbon-reduction targets. The district-heating company has contracted Fortum, a large Finnish energy supply company with extensive district-heating experience throughout Scandinavia and Eastern Europe, to carry out the design, installation, and operation of the Tallaght network.
Partners
For more information on Amazon Web Services visit:
The Tallaght District Heating Network is partly funded by the European Union's Inter-Reg NWE programme (Heatnet), a multi-million euro fund promoting carbon reduction through district-heating in Europe's north-west, by a further €4.5 million from the Project Ireland 2040 Climate Action Fund and through direct funding from SDCC.
The supply of low-cost, low-carbon heat is expected to increase commercial competitiveness, attracting more innovative businesses and development to Tallaght town centre, facilitate educational programmes and start-up opportunities in renewable energy solutions, as well as helping to mitigate fuel poverty as the heat network expands over time.
“We are extremely proud that we were chosen to provide this low-carbon heat solution as part of an innovative project in a strongly competitive market,” said General Manager
The project will begin supplying heat before the end of 2021, with initial customers being SDCC and the nearby Tallaght campus of the Technological University Dublin (TU Dublin). The council buildings heated by this project in the short term will include SDCC’s County Hall and Tallaght County Library followed by the Rua Red arts-hub and Civic Theatre.
About Fortum eNext
The collaboration between SDCC, AWS engineering teams, Fortum eNext, and the City of Dublin Energy Management Agency (CODEMA) has resulted in a low-carbon solution optimising the potential of recyclable heat combined with additional heat-pump technology – the first example of its kind in Ireland.
By 2024, the heat will also be supplied to nearby developments recently approved with planning permission, including affordable housing units, residential properties and student accommodation.
Bounded by the River Liffey to the North and the Dublin Mountains to the South, the County lies 16 kilometres south-west of Dublin city centre and has an administrative footprint of 223sq. kilometres. The County has nine main villages Clondalkin, Lucan, Palmerstown, Rathfarnham, Tallaght, Templeogue, Saggart, Rathcoole and Newcastle and is bounded by the adjoining counties of Wicklow, Kildare, Dublin City, Fingal and Dún Laoghaire.
sustainability in the cloud
14 December 2020, 12:10 EET
Kari Lahti
Daniel McLoughlin
Our products and services at one glance
Codema is Dublin’s Energy Agency and is committed to leading Dublin's low-carbon transition towards 2030 and 2050. We act as the energy adviser to the four local authorities in Dublin - Dublin City Council, Dún Laoghaire-Rathdown County Council, Fingal County Council and South Dublin County Council - and support each council in leading and influencing this low-carbon transition by improving their energy efficiency, incorporating renewable energy technologies and reducing their greenhouse gas emissions.
“We’re thrilled to be supporting Ireland’s first district heating scheme, which will see the excess heat from our data centre being used to reduce carbon emissions in Tallaght over time,” said


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/get-ready-tomorrows-energy-production-0/we-offer
Products and services for thermal power plants
Low-carbon solutions for local energy systems and electrifying customers' processes
Year after year
High customer satisfaction
Combining plant owner perspective with strong engineering know-how
A wide range of services to power and heat producers | Fortum
Unique expertise
- All -
Safety and sustainability
Productivity and performance development services for bio, gas and waste-to-energy plants
Future-proof performance with Fortum eNext
Environmental performance services
Together with our customers we are tackling the challenge of providing clean, reliable and affordable energy to end-users. This includes developing low-carbon solutions for local energy systems and electrifying customers' processes.
A wide range of services to power and heat producers
For thermal power plants
Turbine island upgrading, overhaul and troubleshooting services for steam and gas turbines, generators and systems
Solutions for low-carbon economy
Find your local eNext contact
Explore our offering by filtering the products according to your area of interest.
Our expert services cover all essential aspects of operations and maintenance to keep your assets running optimally both from a technical and financial perspective. We provide concrete solutions for production process improvements, daily O&M practices, and efficient maintenance management.
Looking for more information?
Turbine and generator services
Whether your plant is at a planning stage or already existing, or whether it is based on bio-energy, waste incineration, gas, coal or peat, we offer a range of services to improve your plant's technical and economical performance:
Long-term O&M (operation and maintenance) services and mobilisation
Versatile expert services
All Products & Services
Fortum eNext has extensive experience in commissioning, operating & maintaining as well as upgrading our customers' assets across the globe. We help you optimise your energy production on the journey towards a cleaner world.
Highest standards in safety and sustainability


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/environmental-performance/low-carbon-solutions
Sustainable heat supply
Low-carbon solutions for local energy systems
Ilkka Salmensaari
Manager, Energy Systems
Ensure the optimal mix of clean energy solutions
The ideal mix of energy solutions and optimised operation modes ensure a high security of heat supply in a sustainable and economical way.
+358 50 453 4876
salmensaari
Optimising regional energy systems and incorporating new CO2-free ways of producing heat enable our customers to take a step towards a clean energy future.
A step towards a clean energy future
Low-carbon solutions for local energy systems | Fortum
Fortum's aim is to work with our partners in reshaping the energy system, improving resource efficiency and providing smart solutions for the future. A good example of this is district heating, popular especially in the Nordic countries, as it can use waste heat from data centers and industry to heat buildings. Fortum is a major player in these energy systems, and our role is to help customers with decentralised, low-carbon energy solutions to supply clean district heating for the needs of municipalities and city districts. We enable cost-efficient heat pump, waste heat recovery and biomass boiler solutions to meet your requirements and energy targets.
Low-carbon district heating solutions are attracting growing international interest
Back to Environmental Performance main page


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/environmental-performance
We facilitate the transition to a low-carbon energy system by developing solutions to decarbonise processes and optimise regional energy systems.
Making energy transition possible
The energy industry is undergoing an immense transformation and the development is faster than ever. Fortum’s purpose is to drive the change for a cleaner world; providing power and heat producers with smart and sustainable solutions to help them maintain shareholder value plays an important role in achieving this goal.
Helping energy producers to decarbonise operations
Fortum to design, install and operate Dublin's first low-carbon district heating network
The regional energy systems that we design and build are customer-focused, sustainable and cost-efficient to operate and maintain. Our expertise is backed by over 100 years of technical experience and commercial know-how with district heating throughout Europe.
Environmental Performance | Fortum
Environmental Performance services
We at Fortum eNext help utilities and energy intensive industries revise energy processes and technologies, future-proofing them for years to come. Optimising regional energy systems and incorporating new CO2-free ways of producing heat enable our customers to take a step towards a clean energy future.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/environmental-performance/operational-excellence
Offering value for many years to come
Building on our utility heritage and know-how of running and optimising our own fleet, we always look at our customers’ situation holistically and aim to offer value for many years to come.
Our comprehensive expert services cover energy efficiency and O&M audits, maintenance management studies, investment analyses, and lifetime assessments. To achieve substantial benefits and to create value for many years to come in such areas as production efficiency, operational economy, reliability or availability, it is necessary to see the overall picture as the starting point. We work in close collaboration with our customers to gain a deep understanding of their needs, as well as to recognise hidden areas of improvement. Depending on the case in question, audits and feasibility studies may include questionnaires, model-based calculations, and peer-group benchmarking, which are utilised for more accurate and in-depth analyses. As a result, we provide the client with a targeted solution proposal to capture all the potential value available in the case.
Create lasting value with operational excellence
Operate your plant reliably and cost-efficiently
Create lasting value with operational excellence | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/clean-heat-production-finland/governor-state-washington-capture-and-use-waste-heat-poetry-energy
, Director, Energy Markets from Microsoft joined the delegation to discuss the collaboration.
The Governor was highly interested in the waste heat solutions and wanted to know more about, for example, the heat pump technology, the flexibility offered to the electricity market by the district heating network and thermal batteries, and the cost-effectiveness of building new district heating networks.
“There is potential for waste heat recycling and distributed energy systems in the US. Obviously, the distribution system is easier to build when developing it alongside the communities it would serve, but in the State of Washington, we are examining the potential in dense urban areas where district heating is most efficient,” Governor Inslee said.
The delegation of around 20 guests, including representatives from Alaska Airlines, the Department of Commerce and the Port of Seattle, the University of Washington and Washington State University, was travelling to Nordic countries for a trade mission.
Governor of the State of Washington: capture and use of waste heat is poetry in energy | Fortum
“District heating offers great potential to reduce emissions and increase energy self-sufficiency. It is particularly attractive in countries that have in the past largely relied on gas and are now looking to decarbonize heating. Cities such as London and Dublin are developing local district heating solutions to deliver low-carbon heat to homes, public buildings and businesses”, said
Patrik Öhlund
www.fortum.com/data-centre-project
“The Suomenoja power plant demonstrates how innovation can help to mitigate climate change. To not waste heat, and to be able to use waste sewage for heat is such an elegant solution. To me, capturing and using waste heat is like poetry in energy, making use of what would otherwise be lost,” said Governor Inslee, co-writer of the 2007 book
www.espoocleanheat.com
Apollo’s Fire: Igniting America’s Clean Energy Economy
Governor of the State of Washington: capture and use of waste heat is poetry in energy
Internationally, district heating has been a well-kept secret that is now attracting growing interest. A delegation headed by Jay Inslee, Governor of the State of Washington, visited the Suomenoja power plant in Espoo, Finland, in September 2022.
Furthermore, in a collaboration that is largest of its kind, Fortum will capture waste heat from the server cooling process of Microsoft’s large data centers to be built in the area.
Pictured from left: Jay Inslee, Governor of the State of Washington, Patrik Öhlund, Director, Energy Markets (EMEA region), Microsoft, Timo Piispa, VP Heating and Cooling, Fortum, and Noelle Walsh, Corporate VP, Microsoft
Showcasing clean heat in Finland
Once heat from these data centers can be used in full, altogether 60 percent of all the district heat in the area will be recovered from various processes instead of being wasted.
Heating & cooling
Noelle Walsh
, Corporate VP and
The delegation focused on emission-free waste heat and how it can be used to decarbonize heat production. The Suomenoja site hosts, among other things, a heat pump plant that plays a notable role in achieving carbon-neutral district heating in the Espoo, Kauniainen and Kirkkonummi regions by 2030 by recovering waste heat from treated wastewater.
, VP, Heating and Cooling at Fortum.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/heating-cooling/espoo-clean-heat
Download the full press kit in English
40%
50%
Media kit (FI)
A 25-megawatt unit, the largest in Finland, was built in the Suomenoja, Espoo heat pump plant in 2021. All three units recovers excess heat from treated wastewater, as well as from seawater in the summer. The plant covers approximately
In Finland, Fortum is showcasing a next generation district heating system. Operating since 1954, it is currently undergoing a major transformation to replace fossil fuels with smart and flexible solutions that are largely based on renewable electricity: waste heat utilization, heat pumps, heat accumulators and electric boilers. Approximately 40 percent of district heating demand will be met by recycling emission-free waste heat from Microsoft's new data centers. Artificial intelligence optimizes the operations of the entire system.
2020's (est): Recycling waste heat from Microsoft's data centre region
of the demand in the district heating network area.
is a local system for cities that transfers energy in heated water from energy sources to heat users in a network of underground pipes. It is the only way to recycle heat energy from numerous different and distributed sources to thousands of buildings under one optimized infrastructure. The heat is typically used to warm buildings and tap water.
District heating at Fortum
Demand side response (DSR), or smart control of district heating, optimises both the heat production and the heating of buildings at differing intervals so that heat can be allocated to where it is most needed at a given time. With demand side response, the use of back-up heat plants can be reduced, resulting in lower emissions.
More information about Espoo Clean Heat
District heating is a reliable and convenient heating method - This is how over 50% of the Finns think
2020: A bio-heating facility in Kivenlahti
A growing number of data centers is needed to accommodate the increasing global digitalization. It makes sense to locate big data centers near cities where waste heat from servers can be recycled to district heating networks. This decarbonizes heating on a large scale, creating substantial climate benefits and stable heating prices. In Finland, Microsoft's two large data centers will provide 40% of the consumed heat in the network area.
Share of carbon neutral district heating in Espoo (forecast)
Spearheading Clean Heat in Finland
2020-2028 (est): Industrial-scale air-to-water heat pumps
Press kit (EN)
Media kit
The technology that is used in air-to-water heat pumps at homes has been developed to an industrial scale in several of our pioneering projects. Within a few years, these plants will produce a significant part of the Espoo area's district heating. At the same time, they create cooling for local needs.
Why AI-driven district heating plays an important role in the climate challenge?
20%
Fortum and the City of Espoo have committed to this transformation that will result in carbon-neutral district heating by 2030 in the Espoo, Kauniainen and Kirkkonummi regions. The use of coal will be discontinued in 2025. This project, called Espoo Clean Heat, provides a flagship example of efficient decarbonization and a transition to local self-sufficient heating on a large scale.
A biomass-fired 49-megawatt heating plant was commissioned in 2020 on the Kivenlahti, Espoo site where two wood pellet boilers were already producing district heat. The new facility replaced one of the last two remaining coal-fired units in the Suomenoja power plant and increased the share of carbon-neutral district heating in Espoo to
2022: AI-driven smart steering to reduce emissions
Read more about district heating
Media kits
Read more about the benefits of district heating
Examples of clean energy projects
How we can help the transition to low-carbon energy systems
60%
Citizens of Espoo feel that heating should be environmentally friendly - 20% of them think that it's the most important feature of heating
District heating is the most popular heating method in Finland - almost 60% of the new building space is heated by district heat
2021: A third heat pump unit to recover heat from waste water
Espoo Clean Heat | Fortum
Download the full press kit in Finnish here
Waste heat utilization gaining interest in the Washington State, US
Carbon neutral district heating in Espoo in the 2020s


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/clean-district-heating-public-transportation
Carbon-neutral district heating to Espoo in the 2020's
It has been very pleasing to see that the Programme of the Prime Minister
In Finland, many residential areas and new constructions are currently contemplating the future’s most sustainable solution for heating. Eco-friendly heating is also an advantage when selling residential units. At the moment, a variety of building-specific solutions based on carbon-neutral electricity are available. However, these solutions are kind of like private cars. The overall system they form is not as efficient or as climate-friendly as a centralised solution: public transportation or district heating.
Public transportation has many advantages compared to private motoring: resources are used more wisely and emissions remain smaller. Moreover, overall optimisation is much easier, e.g. from the perspective of traffic congestion, as there are fewer moving units and their timetables are known. From the individual’s perspective, it’s an easy, reliable and ecological transportation solution.
The district heating system can very well be compared to urban public transportation. Water that is heated in the district heating network circulates in underground pipes and warms buildings and the domestic hot water used in them. As a centralised solution it can use the resources in a more optimum way by using the shared infrastructure and utilising recycled waste heat energy from different kind of sources. Customers don’t have to worry about it.
Up to now, the heating has been done with fossil fuels, but a rapid transformation is currently underway in Finland: district heating systems are being converted to become carbon neutral. For example, the solutions we are pursuing in the city of Espoo are not based on combustion, but on waste heat, geothermal, and electricity. With the increase in the number of electric heat pumps, the opportunities for ecological district cooling also increase.
The Finnish energy system couldn’t handle that without significant additional investments. The district heating system is already scaled for extreme low temperatures, but building-specific systems typically are not scaled for extreme low temperatures; instead, a sufficient temperature is achieved by supplementing with direct electric heating. This puts an added load on the electricity system.
Antti Rinne
We have calculated that during extreme low temperatures in Finland, the required amount of electricity generation capacity would be 1.5 times higher without the district heating system.
Clean district heating is like public transportation
Artificial intelligence will make district heating an even better solution
A carbon-neutral district heating system controlled by artificial intelligence is capable of an energy efficiency that isn’t possible with building-specific solutions. For example, as wind power increases, a district heating system can store surplus electricity as heat and use it for district heating when the wind isn’t blowing. An artificial intelligence-controlled district heating system can reduce energy consumption in areas where it isn’t needed at that particular time. A district heating system also helps with security of supply – the network stays warm also during long power outages.
Also district heating will become carbon neutral
Clean district heating is like public transportation | Fortum
19 August 2019, 16:33
District heating is an outstanding solution for the customer looking for convenience: a small initial investment for the housing company and low-maintenance technology. In the future, residents will have better control of the conditions in their own units: cooling and warming them to their own comfort level.
A district heating network is part of the Nordic infrastructure that is currently the envy of the rest of Europe. District heating is the choice for urban residents who are eco-conscious and responsible. Now and in the future.
What’s more, without district heating networks our electricity system would be burdened.
Why is district heating the most sustainable and effortless way to provide heating in urban areas.
’s Finnish Government mentions transferring the heat pumps generating heat for the district heating network to the electricity tax category used by the industry. From the perspective of investments replacing fossil-based production, it would be important for this tax reform to become effective immediately as of the beginning of next year.
Why is district heating a better alternative than building-specific solutions?
In fact, wouldn’t it make sense to also integrate building-specific systems into the district heating network? For example, a high-capacity heat pump solution could sell any surplus heat that the building doesn’t need to the district heating network. In the future we will see more and more of these kinds of district heating and building-specific heating combinations, i.e. hybrid solutions.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/why-ai-driven-district-heating-plays-important-role-climate-challenge
In the district heating system, energy recycling means the utilisation of a mix of electrical heat pumps, waste heat, ground heat and geothermal production instead of traditional combustion-based heat production. This kind of district heating system supports carbon neutral energy system which is based on the clean electricity.
As we have heard from the IPCC report, humankind has 11 years to prevent the climate warming catastrophe. The challenge requires massive electrification based on renewable energy sources and integration of the entire energy system. We must also recycle materials and energy more efficiently.
Why AI-driven district heating plays an important role in the climate challenge? | Fortum
04 January 2019, 11:27
Heat can be produced from electricity and heat can be stored. On a daily basis, heat can be stored in district heating networks, heat accumulators and in buildings. In the future, heat can be even stored in longer-term seasonal storages. District heating also significantly differs from other heating options by enabling energy recycling through the district heating network. For example, it can recycle the excess heat of buildings, industrial processes, data centres and sewage water and utilize it in cost-efficient way.
Smart and sustainable district heating holds great potential to reduce emissions. However, maximising this potential will require residential buildings, commercial buildings and other counterparties to actively connect to the district heating networks. The only way to recycle the energy is inside the network. Individual heat pumps and other similar stand-alone solutions cannot transfer heat between consumers. This needs to be kept in mind when considering the actions we in society want to take to resolve the climate challenge.
Heat demand varies by season, week day, time of day, temperature etc. Traditionally, demand peaks have been covered by increasing heat production. Usually this has meant producing extra heat at heat plants, often by using fossil fuels.
The district heating network also provides an irreplaceable flexibility element for the new energy system. The increase of wind and solar power will also affect the future electricity market. However, because the wind is not always blowing and the sun is not always shining, the future electricity system will require flexibility, i.e. ways to store the energy. The district heating system will enable this.
Next generation district heating – great potential to reduce emissions
Artificial intelligence (AI) to optimise the entire district heating system
AI development work and integration into operations continues. Artificial intelligence will enable automation of district heating when electrification increases the amount of controllable units as the energy system becomes more complex. This way, the district heating system becomes an enabler of flexibility for the electricity system. It can provide mechanisms for the frequency market and cost efficiently decrease investment needs for the electricity distribution network.
In the future, demand and supply in a smart district heating system can be optimised and controlled automatically in order to bring flexibility to the system. Buildings are used for different purposes and at different times. Everything does not have to be heated simultaneously. For example, when spaces are not being used, heating and ventilation could be reduced. Or, for example, to avoid peak loads, heating could be reduced while hot water is being used. Consumers wouldn’t notice these kinds of short interruptions.
How can buildings provide flexibility for the system?
As combustion-based heat production decreases and heating becomes electrified, heat production will be scattered here and there. Instead of a few large primary production plants, there will be many smaller production units that will supply heat for the district heating network, each in its own way. This will lead to a complex district heating system.
Fortum has developed artificial intelligence to optimise the district heating system and its operations; this will enable the flexible district heating system of the future. AI predicts the heat demand of our customers, steers the usage of storages and guides the control room in the optimal utilisation of assets. In practice, already now, this often also means the prioritisation of carbon-neutral production. AI has already been implemented in Fortum’s district heating systems in Finland, the Baltic countries, Poland and Norway.
Fortum cooperates with several different actors in different countries to provide energy savings at the real-estate level. However, just the real-estate level is not enough – a demand side response is needed at the entire district heating system level. Centralized demand side response is a kind of virtual battery, which enables real-estate level steering from the district heating system’s point of view. Fortum has started the development, and the first pilots will be done in the near future in cooperation with the City of Espoo in Finland.
The author leads the development of smart energy systems in Fortum’s Heating & Cooling business


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/heating-cooling/demand-side-response
What is Fortum's AI-driven Smart Steering of District Heating?
By controlling heat consumption and production, all users together enable more sustainable district heating and can curb climate change. The more buildings are covered by demand side response, the more ecological and efficient our overall energy system is.
District Cooling
Throughout the day, heating flexes in different buildings without the heat users noticing any change in the indoor temperatures or in the availability of hot water. With demand side response, solar heat stored in a building’s structures can be put to use. In addition to such daily flexibility, smart control of district heating can reduce excessive seasonal heating during the early days of spring.
Espoo Clean Heat - Carbon-neutral district heating in Espoo in 2020's
Demand side response - Smart steering of district heating | Fortum
District heating warms your home reliably
Artificial intelligence-based control system determines in advance how much heating of how many buildings can be controlled when large amounts of heat is needed. It can take into account that winter nights and mornings are cold and that the sun will increase the daytime temperature. Warm water is needed for morning showers and heat must be allocated for this. On the other hand, all buildings do not require heat simultaneously. In the morning, the temperatures in shopping centers can be lowered momentarily to allow more heat for showers, for example.
Demand side response - Smart steering of district heating
Demand side response (DSR), or the smart control of district heating, optimises heat production and heating of buildings at differing intervals to allocate heat where it is most needed at a given time. With demand side response, we can reduce the use of back-up heat plants and emissions.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/heating-cooling/district-heating
Future district heating
District heating warms your property reliably
District heating is a convenient and reliable form of heating buildings. Buildings are connected to underground pipe network that carry warm water to heat houses. It also provides customers safe household water for consumption and washing. Heat energy can be captured from numerous sources such as air or waste heat generated by industrial processes.
Two-way district heating
Carbon-neutral district heating is an integral part of the energy system and energy recycling
Demand side response - DSR, or the smart control of district heating, optimises heat production and the heating of buildings at differing intervals so that heat is directed to where it is most needed at that time. With demand side response, we reduce the use of back-up heat plants - and emissions.
AI-driven demand side response reduces the required amount of heat energy
District heating is a convenient, modern and reliable form of heating.  A centrally run and energy efficient system is also good for the environment, since the heat increasingly comes from recycled energy. With district heating, you enjoy comfortable living and contribute to a sustainable society.
With two-way district heating, companies and businesses both big and small can sell their excess heat to us. We are providing cost-efficient cooling and heat recovery systems for data centers in Espoo. The excess heat from data centers is recovered and returned to district heating network.
We use waste heat from wastewater for district heating in Suomenoja, Finland
CO2 free waste heat from data centers is recovered and recycled to the district heating network
In Poland: Wrocław, Częstochowa and Płock
In Finland: Espoo, Kauniainen and Kirkkonummi
Read about our unique cooperation with Microsoft >>
District heating will be based on distributed and flexible solutions: waste heat, heat pumps, boilers and heat accumulators
Shared heating infrastructure makes sense
District heating warms your property reliably | Fortum
We provide district heating in several cities
AI-driven smart steering to reduce emissions


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/heating-cooling/cooling
Urban solution
District cooling is a clean and modern urban solution. It efficiently creates a cool indoor climate.
How does district cooling work?
Cooling
In a district cooling network the energy is redrawn from the warm buildings to the district cooling water. The energy in the network can then either be reclaimed to bring heat to buildings and tap water in wintertime or be cooled down with for example environmental friendly sea water in summertime.
FAQ - District cooling
District cooling for buildings
Cooling | Fortum
Citycenter Ainoa is one of the first users of Fortum's district cooling solution in Espoo. More than 90% of the thermal energy removed from the building complex is utilised in the area's district heating.
Advanced district cooling is ideal for densely built urban areas where district cooling and heating networks serve a large number of users. We offer district cooling in Sweden and Finland. In Stockholm, we have the world's largest district cooling network.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2019/09/fortum-discontinue-coal-use-espoo-2025-espoo-clean-heat-project-make-district-heating-carbon-neutral
“Fortum's decision to discontinue the coal use and make district heating carbon-neutral is the most significant climate action in Espoo. Espoo’s target is to be carbon-neutral in the next decade. As the UN forerunner city, Espoo is committed to developing solutions that support carbon-neutral living in cities. Energy solutions play a significant role in this. The new clean energy solutions developed and deployed in Espoo are globally great examples of sustainable innovation,” says
Clear steps towards carbon-neutral district heating
Fortum and the City of Espoo have committed to carbon-neutral district heating in the district heating network operating in the Espoo, Kauniainen and Kirkkonummi regions in the 2020s. Now the development work is being accelerated with a new intermediate goal to discontinue the use of coal in 2025. The accelerated project for carbon-neutrality in 2020's is called Espoo Clean Heat.
Fortum to discontinue the coal use in Espoo in 2025 – Espoo Clean Heat project to make district heating carbon-neutral
*The survey was conducted in summer 2019 in Bilendi Finland’s online panel; 1,250 Finns participated in the survey.
“The first of the two coal-fired units will be decommissioned already in next summer. To replace the remaining coal production, we are pursuing new solutions – from utilising the waste heat of data centres, wastewater and industry to electric heat pumps, geothermal, smart demand-response solutions, and bioenergy. Since we are focusing on finding combustion-free heating solutions, the entries in the Government Programme for a lower electricity tax than today for heat pumps and data centres connected to the district heating network will play a key role in achieving our goal,” says
According to a survey,* Finns see companies as more significant actors than the public at large in mitigating climate change. Fortum and the City of Espoo have together already taken significant steps to replace coal with carbon-neutral solutions: the new Kivenlahti bioheating plant will come on stream next summer, the Otaniemi geothermal plant is expected to be commissioned late next year, and the new heat pump unit utilising waste heat from wastewater will start its operations at the Suomenoja power plant in 2021. With these actions, Espoo’s district heating production will achieve 50% carbon neutrality in 2022. Discontinuing the use of coal in 2025 will raise the share of carbon-neutral production to about 85%.
24 September 2019, 10:00 EEST
More information about the project: www.espoocleanheat.com
, Fortum’s Head of Heating & Cooling Finland.
, Mayor of the City of Espoo.
Pasi Laitala
Jukka Mäkelä
Finns not very familiar with how district heating works
“The operating principle behind district heating is very simple: technology is used to heat water, and that water is circulated through underground pipes to warm buildings. The climate impacts are largely dependent on what technology is used to heat the water. Just as the car industry is currently giving up combustion engines, we too are looking for ways to produce heat without combustion – for example, with electric heat pumps that utilise waste heat. In the Nordic electricity market already 80% of the electricity is carbon neutral,” Piispa says.
District heating is definitely Finland’s most common form of heating: According to Finnish Energy, close to 60 per cent of new construction volume is heated with district heating. However, based on the survey conducted by Fortum, Finns are not very familiar with how district heating works: more than one third of Finns don’t know how district heating is produced.
Fortum to discontinue the coal use in Espoo in 2025 – Espoo Clean Heat project to make district heating carbon-neutral | Fortum
“Locating the data centres in Espoo and deploying geothermal heat are currently common development projects. In addition to these, it is important to improve energy efficiency and to utilise the smart heat control in buildings, which is already in use in all of the Espoon Asunnot apartments. We are especially focusing collaboration on solutions where energy is produced with alternative methods to combustion,” says
, Espoo’s Director for Sustainable Development.
FORTUM PRESS RELEASE 24 SEPTEMBER 2019


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/services



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators/generator-maintenance
Upgrades and repairs
New components
Overhauls
Why generators fail and how can this be prevented?
Repair, don’t replace – generators can continue serving decade after decade
Spare parts
High-speed balancing of generator rotors at our workshop
Generator maintenance and repair | Fortum
More than just keeping your generators in operation
Generator maintenance
Our generator maintenance and diagnosis is based on more than 100 identified failure modes. The data we collect is analyzed by our generator experts and the resulting risk assessment for the generator and its components minimizes the risk of downtime and its consequences. The final report gives plant owners a powerful basis for updating their maintenance plans and guides future investments intended to reduce risks to an acceptable level.
Rotor rewinds
Stator rewinds
Every hour of generator downtime means a loss of production so all generator maintenance activities must be carefully planned and executed. Our skilled experts ensure that your generators are serviced in a timely and reliable manner, with the shortest possible downtime. We perform all types of generator maintenance services: small inspections, major overhauls, and spare part manufacturing and delivery as well as upgrades and modernisations.
The OEM-independent engineering know-how combined with Fortum’s utility background and experience in running and maintaining our own fleet, allows us to tailor the best possible solutions for each customer need and helps you save both time and money.  We also have a fully equipped workshop and balancing facilities for generators in Västerås, Sweden.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/blog/enext/repair-dont-replace-generators
13 December 2021, 14:54
With specialised engineering, generators can remain in service for many more years. Our philosophy is that it always makes sense to repair and modernise existing equipment rather than buying and manufacturing new. As an OEM-independent service provider with technical expertise and workshop skills – and with more than 30 years of experience in generator services – we are able to modernise and repair equipment and technologies from many different suppliers.
For one hundred years, the Swedish company ASEA – later ABB – has provided factories and power plants around the world with different types of generators. One type of generator widely in production was the GTP-type. Approximately 2000 ASEA/ABB GTP-type generators were manufactured between 1920–1988, and we estimate that around 500 are still in operation around the world.
All operators in the energy sector need to optimise operational efficiency and minimise costs in order to stay competitive and profitable. A generator is crucial in the process and a very expensive piece of machinery, which makes it difficult to replace. Therefore, from an economical point of view, repairing the generator is advantageous as long as there are components and a skilled service supplier available.
Another ASEA GTP-type rotor rewound and redesigned at Västerås generator workshop
A generator is a technically complex piece of machinery designed for long life. Repairing and modernising an existing generator rather than buying and manufacturing a new one, always makes sense – and it promotes sustainability. With attentive maintenance activities, generators can continue serving decade after decade.
We can also introduce improvements in both the design and the process of rewinding. The ability to do calculations on the generator’s electromagnetic side is the key here. When working on an older machine, the calculations have to be replicated because the exact same materials are no longer available. So we have to update the design and calculate the complete generator according to today’s material and requirements. Fortum eNext is one of the very few service providers able to also offer stator rewinds for this type of generator.
Repair, don’t replace – generators can continue serving decade after decade | Fortum
Rotors of this type are a unique design that Fortum eNext happens to know very well, because they were manufactured in a workshop in Västerås, Sweden, where we today run a dedicated workshop for generator maintenance services. This type of rotor has not been manufactured in nearly 40 years, but the engineering know-how of the technology of how these rotors are designed and how they should be rewound and high-speed balanced has been maintained at our workshop.
The technical lifetime of a generator is around 30 years, but in fact they can run much longer than that. Manufacturing new components and rewinding are two ways to prolong the lifetime. Customers from literally the other side of the world have shipped us their generator rotors for service. We were even able to offer a customer in Brazil the delivery of a completely new rotor based on the original design, but enhanced with upgrades and modern materials.
Read the description on Case Suzano


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/02/another-asea-gtp-type-rotor-rewound-and-redesigned-vasteras-generator-workshop
A generator is a technically complex piece of machinery designed for long life. Therefore, it always makes sense to repair and modernise the existing equipment instead of buying and manufacturing new. As an OEM-independent service provider – and with more than 30 years of experience in generator services – Fortum eNext is uniquely positioned to support power producers with very specialised technical expertise and workshop skills. Our generator maintenance and diagnostics is based on approximately 100 identified failure modes to support the condition-based maintenance of generators. Fortum eNext is one of the very few service providers able to also offer stator rewinds for this type of generator.
Improvements in design and rewind knowhow of ASEA GTP-type rotors
Leaf River Cellulose LLC, part of Georgia-Pacific Corporation, is a packaging company based in New Augusta, Mississippi, in the United States. The company operates pulp manufacturing mills producing filter-grade pulp and market pulp, which is used in the manufacturing of different kinds of filters and paper. Leaf River Cellulose offers its products around the world.
from Fortum eNext.
Repairing promotes sustainability
After having accepted Fortum’s offer, the customer put the rotor, weighing as much as 9 tons, on a boat from New Orleans to Stockholm from where it was transported by truck for servicing at the Västerås workshop. After the rewind and high-speed balancing was completed, the rotor was packed and shipped back in time for the coming outage. With this additional rotor, the customer now has two spares; in a future major overhaul, it will be possible to swap both rotors at the same time and, if needed, send both old ones for rewinding.
The rotor in question is of a unique design and one which Fortum eNext knows very well. These ASEA GTP-type rotors – later ABB – were originally manufactured in a workshop in Västerås, Sweden, where Fortum eNext today runs a dedicated workshop for generator maintenance services. Approximately 2000 ASEA/ABB GTP-type generators were manufactured there between 1920–1988; about 500 are still in operation and, as with Leaf River, crucial for customer processes.
15 February 2021, 14:39 EET
Late in 2020, Fortum eNext completed rewinding another ASEA GTP-type rotor and made the necessary design changes for it to fit in the customer’s existing fleet of turbogenerators. This was the fifth rotor rewind performed for the same customer in the United States.
The company’s mills have two turbo sets, each having one turbine and two generators. This means that there are four generators. To ensure a disruption-free supply of steam and electricity and to prevent forced outages, the rotor of the generator needs to be rewound on a regular basis and intermittently replaced with another rotor.
“The technology of how these rotors are designed and how they should be rewound and high-speed balanced has been maintained at our workshop. We were thus even able to introduce improvements in both the design and the process of rewinding. This case is a good example of how a good relationship with the customer and the high quality of work always pays off in the service business. This is the fifth rotor that the customer has sendt literally from the other side of the world to be serviced at our workshop. To us, it is a sign that our knowhow is appreciated,” says Senior Product Manager
Another ASEA GTP-type rotor rewound and redesigned at Västerås generator workshop | Fortum
The customer only had one spare rotor for four generators. But in 2018 the customer complemented their supply of spare rotors by purchasing a sixth rotor. Before the new rotor could be installed in the generator, it had to be rewound. It also required some modifications to make it compatible with the existing fleet of turbogenerators.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators/generator-maintenance/rotor-high-speed-balancing
Min length between main bearings (NDE - DE)
Cutting-edge equipment, experience and know-how
Before a rotor can be balanced, it must first be designated as ‘rigid’ or ‘flexible’. Rigid rotors operate well below their first critical speed, while flexible rotors may have one or even two critical speeds below their operational speed. In this context, ‘critical speed’ is defined as a rotational speed that matches the natural frequency of the rotor. It is essential to designate whether the rotor is rigid or flexible (and for the latter, the number of critical speeds below operational speed) in order to define the balancing procedure and the requirements for declaring the rotor well balanced.
Test run to establish influence coefficient matrix
Max rotor diameter
Min length between bearing (DE) and coupling flange
110,000 kg
SPECIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR BALANCING UNIT #2 (MAX 110,000 KG)
Fitting the rotor in the balancing machine
Run-out check before balancing
RSO measurement at standstill and during rotation
3.7 m
6.8 m
Fully equipped facility for generator and motor rotors, and other applications
Min length between bearing (NDE) and coupling flange (incl. adapter)
Unit 1 has two bearing pedestals with built-in vibration velocity meters in horizontal, vertical, and axial directions. Hydraulics allow the slide bearings to be varied between soft and stiff (soft pedestals are needed for low-speed balancing, stiff pedestals for high-speed balancing). Note that heat runs with current in the rotor can only be performed at low-speed.
Expert assistance for rotor evaluation and troubleshooting
Broad engineering knowhow
0.1 m
Extensive rotor balancing capabilities
Run-out check after balancing
Balancing documentation
Insulation resistance at standstill and during rotation
Our balancing facility is also fully equipped to simulate operating conditions and run a wide range of key electrical tests. Below examples of such tests that are performed at standstill and during rotation up to operational speed.
Bearings and bearing seals kept in stock
Example of a balancing programme:
Low-speed vs. high-speed balancing
30,000 kg
High-speed balancing of generator rotors | Fortum
Max rotor diameter (D)
Coast-down curves after balancing
4,320 rpm
Computer evaluation of unbalance
Max speed
In accordance with the Fortum eNext documentation policy, we fully document the work we carry out. This not only gives operators a written record of the current state of their equipment, it also simplifies future engineering and maintenance work. Examples of balancing documentation are:
Run-out measurements before and after balancing
Adjoining workshop for parts manufacture, repair, or modification
Securing balance weights
Resistance measurements at standstill
Unit 2 is for rotors above 30,000 kg, which require two or three bearing pedestals. All pedestals have built-in vibration velocity meters in horizontal, vertical, and axial directions. Journal bearings are mounted in stiff pedestals. Shaft movements can be measured.
Adjusting bearing pedestals in the balancing room
Electrical testing during rotation
Max bearing diameter
Returning rotor to delivery box or cradle
Over-speed test to 120% of nominal speed for 2 minutes
HV test and turn-to-turn insulation check performed with:
The smaller unit balances rotors from 1,300 kg to 30,000 kg and the larger one from 30,000 kg to 110,000 kg. An adjoining workshop houses our spare parts manufacture, repair, and modification operations.
1,250 kg
High-speed rotor balancing and electrical testing at our workshop
Originally commissioned to balance all newly built ASEA and ABB turbogenerator rotors produced in Västerås, the balancing facility now services new and repaired or refurbished rotors of any brand. Over the years, our skilled engineers have successfully balanced everything from the smallest exciter rotor to huge nuclear power turbogenerator rotors.
More than 700 rotors balanced and tested during the past 20 years
Flux probe measurement during rotation
As long as they fulfil the requirements for the balancing units, we handle rotors for motors and generators as well as other applications. Further requirements include bearings, bearing oil seals, and an adapter to the running motor. Our inventory includes stocks of these standard parts. In addition, our experienced engineers are on hand to make any adaptations necessary to fit your rotor; they can design and manufacture whatever parts are required. We can also use operator-supplied bearings, which we fit to our pedestals with adaptation rings.
Final trim balancing: G 2.5 quality according to ISO 21940
Low-speed balancing can be done (usually at speeds <900 rpm) for rigid rotors that do not require a high balance quality grade. High-speed balancing is needed for all flexible rotors and rigid rotors that require a very fine grade of balance quality. Moreover, due to the very high inertia energy of a rotor turning at high-speed, the balancing machine has to be built into a bunker or a thick concrete housing. Fortum eNext’s balancing units fulfil this requirement. Below is an example of a balancing test programme for a turbogenerator rotor.
Final balancing protocol of attached balancing weights and residual imbalance
Impedance measurement at standstill and during rotation
Determination of balancing speeds
Rigid vs. flexible rotors
420 mm
Min rotor weight
Balancing to nominal speed
Max rotor weight
Our engineering staff helps operators to evaluate the balancing test results and assists with troubleshooting. We have a proven track record in vibration analysis, both at our balancing facility as well as at the operator’s site. We use special computer systems that quickly acquire data and evaluate rotor unbalance. All information gathered is analysed so that balancing is completed in the shortest time possible. If problems like subharmonic excitation or thermal deflection occur, the software quickly analyses the vibration behaviour and generates valuable data for use in decision-making. In addition, data from the rotor’s previous balancing (or from a series of identical rotors) can be used to optimise the process even further.
Max length between bearing (NDE) and coupling flange
Over-speed test result with before and after residual imbalance
SPECIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR BALANCING UNIT #1 (MAX 30,000 KG)
At the balancing facility, we balance rigid and flexible rotors at low-speed as well as high-speed. We also perform over-speed tests at 120% of nominal speed to confirm structural integrity.
7.46 m
Electrical test protocols
1.4 m
Assembly of a new rotor before balancing
Electrical testing of turbogenerator rotors
0.9 m
Max length between bearing (DE) and coupling flange
Max length between bearing (NDE) and coupling flange (incl. adapter)
2.5 m
700 mm
Complete range of balancing skills and services
4,500 rpm
15.3 m
In addition, the rigid vs. flexible designation also affects the regulatory standard applicable to rotor balancing. For both rigid and flexible rotors, the standard ISO 21940 applies today. Oil & Gas industry requirements are usually API 541 or API 546, but there may be others that also apply. These standards also define the balance quality grade to be achieved.
Our skilled engineers have successfully balanced everything from the smallest exciter shaft to huge nuclear power turbogenerator rotors.
Fortum eNext runs a workshop designed for full-scope generator maintenance services in Västerås, Sweden. Next to the workshop facilities is the only independent high-speed rotor balancing facility in the Nordic countries, expanding the service capabilities even further. At the balancing facility, we operate two specialised machines that perform high-speed balancing and testing according to the ISO 21940 quality standard. Using the experience gained from working with more than 700 rotors, our engineers perform both hot and cold balancing, as well as electrical tests both at standstill and operational speeds.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/turbines-generators/turbine-maintenance
What are the most common types of steam turbine failures and how can those best be detected?
Our comprehensive expert services include root cause investigations, lifetime assessments, investment planning and owners engineering. In the event of a failure or a planned modernisation, we provide support for upgrades and repairs performed both on site and at our workshop. Rotor and stator re-blading, seal replacements and other repairs are an integral part of our services, in addition to repairs of old components or deliveries of new ones. Our expertise and references cover all brands of axial steam turbines as well as most GE and Siemens gas turbines.
Read the customer story
Re-blading
Watch the customer story on full revision of a steam turbine for Jyväskylän Voima CHP plant in Finland
Longer, care-free life for turbines
Case Umeå Energi: Fast reaction to findings prolonged turbine major overhaul by only four weeks
Turbine maintenance
Turbine maintenance and repair | Fortum
Turbines keep power plants running. A strong maintenance partner is crucial to maximising your plant’s output and minimising its risks. Fortum eNext provides full-scope maintenance services for steam and gas turbines from small inspections to large overhauls, including the required spare parts. We understand the big picture, which allows us to offer our expertise in lifetime assessments as well as maintenance and investment planning. We also have a thoroughly equipped workshop for turbine repairs in Naantali, Finland.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/fortum-worldwide/country-fact-sheets/fortum-finland
Read more about Fortum’s Loviisa nuclear power plant.
Fortum also has wind farms under construction in the Pjelax-Böle and Kristinestad Norr areas. Construction of the wind farms started in January 2022 and the wind farms are expected to be operational by the second quarter of 2024 at the latest.
Read more about our environmental approach within hydropower.
Fortum also has a partly owned CHP plant in Naantali.
Read more about our recycling and waste solutions.
Fortum's Recycling & Waste business in Finland offers waste recycling and management services for battery materials, post-consumer plastics, ash, and metals. We work with our customers to build responsible waste management solutions and ensure the recycling of valuable materials and the removal of harmful substances from the cycle. Our aim is to turn waste into new raw material whenever possible and keep it in circulation and utilized again and again.
The wind farm is jointly owned by Energy Infrastructure Partners (EIP) and Fortum. 70% of the renewable wind power it produces is sold directly to the Finnish energy company Neste through a long-term agreement.
Read more about Kalax wind farm.
Fortum in Finland | Fortum
Fortum co-owns Kalax wind farm that has been in operation since 2020. Kalax wind farm’s total capacity is 90 MW and its annual production exceeds 0.3 TWh.
Fortum is also a co-owner of the Olkiluoto nuclear power plant.
Consumer Solutions business
Fortum owns a nuclear power plant in Loviisa. Fortum’s Loviisa Unit 1 was taken into commercial use in 1977. Unit 2 followed in 1980. In 2021, the annual production totalled 8.2 TWh, i.e., more than 10% of Finland’s electricity production.
District heating and cooling
Read more about clean heat in Finland.
Fortum is a leading energy company in Finland. In Finland, we focus on the production of energy, electricity sales, district heating, and cooling, and smart solutions for the future. Energy companies and energy-intensive industries turn to us for our energy production-related expert services. Fortum employs around 2,400 people in Finland, and its headquarters is located in Espoo.
Fortum has, in total, 33 owned or co-owned hydropower plants in Finland with a power generation capacity of 1,553 MW (2021). Our fully owned hydropower plants are located in Oulujoki river system (eleven hydropower plants) and in Vuoksi river system (two hydropower plants). In addition, Fortum has 20 co-owned hydropower plants together with Kemijoki Oy.
Circular economy services
In Finland, all the electricity we provide to our consumer customers have been produced without CO2-emissions.
The company is also developing new sources of heat production methods like open district heating, where customer-produced heat is used in district heating (e.g., data centres).
Fortum produces district heating and cooling and sells it to its industrial and private customers. Fortum has a combined heat and power (CHP) plants in Espoo and Riihimäki. Fortum and the City of Espoo have committed to carbon-neutral district heating production in the district heating network operating in the Espoo, Kauniainen and Kirkkonummi areas during the 2020s. The intermediate goal is to phase out coal during 2025. This carbon neutrality project is called Espoo Clean Heat.
Fortum in Finland
Read more about our nuclear power.
In the spring of 2022, we applied for a new operating license for both units of the Loviisa nuclear power plant until the end of 2050. At the same time, we also applied for a permit to use the low and intermediate-level waste disposal facility located in the current power plant area of Loviisa until the end of 2090.
We are also planning a wind power project in the Katajamäki project area in Kajaani. The planning work for this project is still ongoing.
Read more about wind power.
Read more about our hydropower.
In our Consumer Solutions business we provide electricity, Charge & Drive e-mobility solution as well as related and digital services for consumers and businesses. Fortum is the largest electricity retail business in the Nordics with more than 2 million customers.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal/privacy/consultant-and-vendor-privacy-notice
We process personal data to comply with our legal obligations, for example, to comply with tax, accounting, securities, anti-bribery, anti-money laundering, health and safety rules and other legal obligation placed on Fortum.
– You may obtain and reuse the personal data you have once provided us. We can provide a selected set of the data delivered in a machine readable format, where the basis of processing has been either a contract or consent.
Privacy Notice for Suppliers and Externals
7. Who can access your personal data?
6. How long does Fortum store the personal data?
Managing work orders and assignments, evaluation, and general administration
Below you can see the list of your rights regarding personal data that we process about you. If you have any questions about your rights or want to exercise them, please contact us (see section 11. below). Please note that some of the rights may not be applicable, for example, if the data cannot be connected to you.
– You can ask for the information about you to be corrected if it is not accurate or if it needs to be updated.
4. What are the purposes and legal bases for processing personal data?
We process personal data to manage the professional relationship with our business partners. This involves contacting our stakeholders and arranging events.
Administrative information
– such as your bank account information, travel and other expenses, insurance information, tax numbers.
Fortum is a global company that has affiliates, business processes, management structures and technical systems that cross national borders. This means that your data may be transferred to countries other than the one where you are located, including also outside of the European Economic Area. We use appropriate safeguards, such as the standard contractual clauses provided by the European Commission, for these transfers to protect your data. You can obtain more information about the transfers by contacting us (see section 11, below).
Fortum has appointed a Data Protection Officer, whom you may contact by using the contact details give in this chapter.
To contact Fortum Corporation and to address any further questions and comments regarding your privacy, including contact with the Data protection officer by using the
We process personal data to improve and develop our internal services. Service development is done, for example, by collecting feedback directly from you in surveys and questionnaires; by utilizing the data generated from the use of our services in analytics; and by using recorded or transcribed phone calls in certain operations for training and service quality improvement. We also have internal reporting processes that utilize personal data.
Supplier & stakeholder relationship management
This varies country by country depending on the local laws. We delete or de-identify personal data when it is no longer necessary for the purposes it was collected for. For information on how long we hold your personal data for, please contact us (see section 11, below) for more information on the specific retention times.
”) processes your personal data. This notice applies to the processing of your personal data in the context of supplier and consultant relationships or when otherwise working with us as an external person. We may also provide you with additional privacy information in supplements or other notices regarding a particular system, product or service.
3. How does Fortum collect information about you?
, which share information for purposes mentioned below in section 6.
You and your employer– We receive information directly from you and the company with which you are working;
Privacy Notice for Suppliers and Externals | Fortum
- If we decide to sell, merge or otherwise reorganize our businesses, this may involve us disclosing personal data to prospective or actual purchasers and their advisers.
8. Does Fortum transfer personal data to third countries?
This privacy notice describes how Fortum (Fortum Corporation and its subsidiaries, “
We will disclose your data to certain competent authorities, such as government agencies responsible for tax collection, statistical information or to the police other law enforcement agencies, to the extent required under mandatory law. We may also disclose your personal data in relation to legal proceedings or at the request of an authority on the basis of applicable law, or court order or in connection with a trial or authority process, or as otherwise required or permitted by law.
We process personal data of external persons in order to administer their work and assignments. We provide them with work related tools, trainings and services, manage travel and expense claims and project hours, conduct contract performance evaluation, and manage insurances and payments. Personal data is also processed in contract management, for example when signing non-disclosure agreements.
– You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data based on Fortum’s legitimate interests, such as developing our products and services, and other purposes explained in sections 3 and 6 above. We may reject your request if there is a compelling reason for us to continue the processing.
- In certain circumstances you have the right to have the processing restricted.
5. Automated decision-making
You may always express your opinion or contest a decision based solely on automated processing, as well as request a manual decision making process instead by contacting us (see section 11. below).
with which the company you work for is conducting business. You may find the contact details to local Fortum companies below. If you want to exercise your rights or have any queries about the processing of your personal data, kindly contact the customer service of the local company.
In our privacy notice below, you can find information about how we collect, process and use the personal data. For the purpose of the EU General Data Protection Regulation 2016 (GDPR), the data controller is Fortum Corporation and its subsidiaries (“Fortum”). Information about the local country-specific controllers can be found in the Privacy notices of each country, see section “Contact information” at the end of this page.
describes the use of cookies on our external websites. On our internal sites, such as the intranet, we use cookies to enable the functioning of the services, and to collect analytical data about the site usage, for example, to see which content is popular.
– such as your resumé and competences, information about previous assignments or projects where you have been involved, where applicable, the results of background checks, credit information, photographs, accident records, project time and attendance management and information about work related equipment and services that you use in connection with working with us, including, e.g. recorded and transcribed phone calls, recordings of trainings, messaging, and information you publish about yourself in internal and external channels.
Third parties – We may receive information from third parties, such as national authorities (e.g. police and other enforcement agencies).
- We may share your personal data with authorized third parties, based on our legitimate interest, to the extent permitted by applicable law. In such cases Fortum will ensure there is a genuine need to share your personal data. Authorized third parties include, for example, Fortum’s customers, travel agencies, banks, telecom operators, insurance scheme providers, auditors, professional advisors, external legal counsels, actuaries, medical practitioners, trustees or other third-party suppliers.
Consultant and Vendor Privacy Notice
We will use your personal data for predefined purposes based on contract, consent, legal obligation and legitimate interest. Typically, the legal basis for processing your data is our legitimate interest to administer our contact persons’, external persons’ or consultants’ information for work related matters. In addition, we have certain legal and contractual obligations that require us to process personal data. Consent may be used in certain specific situations.
Fortum Cookie policy
- Our
The provisions here are supplemented by applicable mandatory law that prevails to the extent that there is a conflict with this Notice.
- We will delete the data at your request, if it is no longer legitimately needed.
2. What data does Fortum process?
Your employer
– If you have given a consent for data processing, you are always entitled to withdraw your consent.
- including your contact details (e.g. your name, phone number, and email address), demographic data (e.g. your gender, age, language, nationality, professional details), and your identification related information where needed (e.g. national ID number, passport number).
- We use subcontractors to provide us services. Such subcontractors may have access to your personal information and process it on our behalf, but they are not allowed to use the personal data for any other purpose than to provide the service agreed with us. We ensure that the processing of personal data by our subcontractors is done in accordance with this notice through appropriate contractual arrangements. Typical service providers that process personal data include for example IT software and service providers
– We may share your personal data for the purposes defined in this notice with the company with which you are legally employed by, based on our legitimate interest, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
1. Introduction


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/form/contact-people-services-finland
Name (first name last name)
Contact People Services Finland | Fortum
Country and Fortum Company that your request relates to
60 MB limit.
Contact People Services


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/contact-us
Fast
FI-00048 Fortum
Contact Nuclear Services | Fortum
Fortum Nuclear on twitter
Visiting address
PL100,
Have an inquiry regarding our services or just have questions? Please fill in the form below!
Head of Communications
Radiation Safety Services
Head of Nuclear Services
+358 44 300 2383
Piiparinen
Pia Fast
Follow us
Media Contacts
Sini
Contact form
Postal Address
@FortumNuclear
+358 40 825 7217
Our Nuclear Experts
Sini Piiparinen
Fortum Nuclear Services can support you throughout the full life cycle of an nuclear installation. Find the contact details of our experts below or send an inquiry trough the contact form. Don't hesitate to get in touch!
+358 40 147 8752
Sales Representative
Pia


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/major-investments-and-divestments
13 June 2018
Terms and conditions of Fortum's mandatory offer to the minority shareholders of Russian TGC-10 published
Fortum's share in Russian TGC-10 approximately 76%
Fortum sells its Grangemouth power plant in the UK to INEOS
19 August 2020
22 June 2021
22 March 2022
20 September 2021
Fortum and Uniper Wind&Solar team launches its first project − Pjelax-Böle and Kristinestad Norr wind parks to be built in cooperation with Helen
Final results of Fortum's MTO to TGC-10 minorities available end of October
31 December 2011
4 February 2022
Fortum initiates wind power cooperation in Russia with Bank GPB
Fortum completes acquisition of the Polish gas and electricity sales company Grupa DUON S.A.
31 August 2016
14 March 2008
Uniper
Fortum to sell its district heating business in Järvenpää, Finland for approximately EUR 375 million
Fortum completes divestment of its Swedish electricity distribution business
Major investments and divestments | Fortum
Fortum sells its Norwegian electricity distribution and heat businesses
Fortum diversifies its wind power cooperation in Russia
29 February 2008
Fortum sold its ownership in Uniper SE to the German State on 21 December 2022. Fortum’s representatives have resigned from the Uniper Supervisory Board. All releases regarding Uniper are available on this
19 May 2022
30 June 2021
12 December 2013
26 April 2017
Older investments' releases in News site
Fortum concluded the sale of its ownership in Uniper SE to the German State on 21 December 2022.  Fortum’s representatives have resigned from the Uniper Supervisory Board. All releases regarding Uniper are available on this
22 July 2008
27 April 2017
21 December 2016
Fortum's mandatory public tender offer to TGC-10 minorities has ended
20 December 2019
30 May 2014
07 October 2014
13 March 2015
Fortum considers strategic options for its ownership in Stockholm Exergi
Fortum continues the evaluation of the opportunities to divest its Swedish electricity distribution business
Sale of the electricity distribution business
Fortum to acquire Ekokem, a Nordic circular economy company
Fortum has made an indicative, non-binding offer to acquire Ekokem
Fortum completes strategic assessment of its electricity distribution business
03 April 2017
Fortum concludes the sale of its 50 % stake in Fortum Oslo Varme AS
Fortum and Rusnano establish investment partnership to create possibility to capture CSA wind opportunity in Russia
Fortum to sell its district heating business in the Baltics for EUR 800 million
05 January 2017
19 April 2011
Fortum to sell its Gasum shares to the Finnish State
Major divestments
31 January 2013
03 November 2014
12 December 2010
Restructuring of the ownership in Hafslund
Fortum's Gasum divestment completed
24 March 2014
Fortum concludes the sale of its 50% stake in Stockholm Exergi
08 January 2016
27 May 2016
21 December 2020
Gasum divestment
13 May 2016
Fortum's Russian subsidiary TGC-10 to be de-listed from the RTS
02 October 2014
Supplement to Fortum's stock exchange release earlier today: Key financials of Russian TGC-10
Fortum secures at least 51% of shares in the electricity and gas sales company Grupa DUON S.A. in Poland
Fortum, the Finnish State and Ilmarinen into a final agreement over sale of Fingrid shares
2 March 2021
18 January 2022
Fortum has obtained 100% of shares in the electricity and gas sales company Grupa DUON S.A. in Poland
09 April 2014
TGC-10
Fortum streamlines its Swedish hydropower operations
Fortum assesses its strategic position in the electricity distribution business
02 March 2016 F
12 March 2021
Fortum concludes the divestment of its electricity distribution business by selling the Swedish business for approx. EUR 6.6 billion
Fortum and City of Oslo restructure ownership in Hafslund and announce partnership for a greener Oslo
Fortum to acquire controlling stake in Russian TGC-10
Fortum to divest heat operations outside Stockholm in Sweden
Fortum participated in share auction of Russian TGC-10
22 October 2008
Fortum’s restructuring of Hafslund concluded
Oslo City Council approves Hafslund ownership restructuring between Fortum and the City of Oslo
Ekokem investment
01 June 2015
Fortum expands the shareholder base of its Nordic wind portfolio
Fortum concludes the sale of its district heating business in Järvenpää, Finland
22 December 2021
15 April 2015
Fortum completes divestment of its Norwegian electricity distribution business
Fortum to sell its 50% ownership in Fortum Oslo Varme AS to a Norwegian investor consortium for approximately EUR 1 billion
10 January 2020
15 October 2008
26 January 2011
Older divestments' releases in News site
Fortum's Russian subsidiary TGC-10 de-listed from the MICEX
31 July 2020
Fortum finalised the acquisition of wind power projects from Nordkraft
Fortum continues its investments in circular economy by acquiring Turebergs Recycling AB in Sweden
31 December 2020
IFRS 5 restatement of Fortum's income statement and cash flow for 2014 – Distribution segment treated as discontinued operations
28 February 2008
Fortum and RDIF to build the largest solar power plant in Russia
Fortum’s acquisition of Ekokem finalised
Fortum to sell its 50% ownership in Stockholm Exergi to an investor consortium led by APG for approximately EUR 2.9 billion
Strategic options for Fortum's district heating business
Fortum concludes the sale of its district heating business in Joensuu, Finland
08 April 2016
On this page we have collected the releases of Fortum's major investments and divestments. The releases of all transactions are available in our Newsroom.
Ekokem is now Fortum
Fortum sells its electricity distribution business in Finland to Suomi Power Networks
Duon investment
Heat operations outside Stockholm
Fortum completes divestment of its Finnish electricity distribution business
Fortum to sell its 10% ownership in Hafslund Produksjon to Svartisen
Fortum considers possible strategic options for its district heating businesses in Joensuu, Finland and in Pärnu and Tartu, Estonia
Major investments
link
25 June 2019
3 July 2020
07 March 2016
Sale of Fingrid shares
Fortum makes a public tender offer for the electricity and gas sales company Duon in Poland
04 August 2017
2 July 2021
27 November 2008
Fortum, the Finnish State and Ilmarinen into preliminary agreement over the sale of Fortum's Fingrid shares
Fortum's divestment of heat operations outside Stockholm in Sweden completed
Fortum to sell its district heating business in Joensuu, Finland for approximately EUR 530 million
Fortum concludes the sale of its district heating business in the Baltics
ortum received subscriptions representing 93.35% of the share capital in the tender offer of Grupa DUON S.A. in Poland
25 February 2016
15 June 2017
28 April 2008
Stockholm Exergi
Go to newsroom


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2008/02/supplement-fortums-stock-exchange-release-earlier-today-key-financials-russian-tgc-10
Fortum participated in a share auction conducted on 28th February to acquire a  
controlling stake in the listed Russian TGC-10. The key financials of TGC-1 are 
as follows:                                                                     
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| MEUR             |       Last twelve |              2006 |              2005 |
|                  |   months (LTM) as |                   |                   |
|                  |          of Q3/07 |                   |                   |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| Sales            |               590 |               493 |               430 |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| EBITDA           |                55 |                42 |                55 |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| EBIT             |                26 |                15 |                29 |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| Net profit       |                12 |                 8 |                19 |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| Balance sheet    |               677 |               574 |               542 |
| total            |                   |                   |                   |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| Interest-bearing |                61 |                40 |                -3 |
| net debt         |                   |                   |                   |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Fortum expects that the transaction will be earnings diluting for two years.    

The total consideration, EUR 1.7-2.7 billion, is to be financed with long-term  
bank loans. Fortum's pro forma net debt/EBITDA will be around 2.8x at           
acquisition assuming Fortum will reach 100% ownership of TGC-10. Fortum's offer 
per TGC-10 share was 111.8 rubles.                                              

On a pro forma basis, key features of Fortum's capital structure following the  
transaction are:                                                                
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
|                            |           Current 1) |             Pro forma 2) |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| Capital employed           |               13,544 |                   16,412 |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| Interest-bearing net debt  |                4,466 |                    5,954 |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| EBITDA                     |                2,298 |                    2,353 |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
| Adjusted net debt/EBITDA   |                  2.2 |                      2.8 |
| 3)                         |                      |                          |
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
1) Fortum 2007                                                                  
2) Pro forma is based on full-year 2007 of Fortum and LTM Q3/2007 of TGC10      
assuming 100% ownership based on bidding price.                                 
3) Based on EBITDA excluding capital gain from sale of Fortum's holding in      
Lenenergo amounting to 232 MEUR.                                                

Fortum Corporation                                                              
Maria Romantschuk                                                               
SVP, Corporate Communications	                                                  

Further information:                                                            
Mikael Lilius, President and CEO, Fortum Corporation, +358(0)10 45 29100        
Tapio Kuula, Senior Vice President, Fortum Corporation, +358(0)10 54 24112
Supplement to Fortum's stock exchange release earlier today: Key financials of Russian TGC-10 | Fortum
29 February 2008, 12:00 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/09/fortum-concludes-sale-its-50-stake-stockholm-exergi
Strategic reviews of the heating and cooling businesses in Poland and the Consumer Solutions business are still ongoing.
Ingela Ulfves, VP, IR and Financial Communications
Nora Hallberg, IR Manager, tel. +358 40 720 1775
Fortum News Desk, tel.
Investors & analysts:
Fortum concludes the sale of its 50% stake in Stockholm Exergi | Fortum
The total consideration of the sale amounts to SEK 29.5 billion (approximately EUR 2.9 billion based on the current currency rate). Fortum will record a tax-exempt capital gain of approximately EUR 2.4 billion in the City Solutions segment’s third-quarter 2021 results.
Fortum continuously reviews and optimises its business and asset portfolio to create value and enable new growth. In particular, Fortum has a good track-record in transforming and decarbonising assets and businesses. In 2020, Fortum divested the district heating businesses in Joensuu and Järvenpää, in Finland, and in July 2021, Fortum divested its district heating businesses in the Baltics.
EEST
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 20 SEPTEMBER 2021 AT 15.50
20 September 2021, 15:50 EEST
Fortum has today concluded the sale of its 50% ownership in the Swedish district heating and cooling company Stockholm Exergi Holding AB (publ) to a consortium of European institutional investors of APG, Alecta, PGGM, Keva, and AXA. The signing of the transaction was announced on 30 June 2021.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2014/11/fortum-sell-its-gasum-shares-finnish-state
Kari Kautinen, Senior Vice President, Strategy, Mergers and Acquisitions, +358 10 45 32174
Fortum’s purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future generations. Catering to the versatile needs of our customers, we generate, distribute and sell electricity and heat, and offer related expert services. Our operations focus on the Nordic and Baltic countries, Russia and Poland. In 2013, Fortum’s sales totalled EUR 6.1 billion and comparable operating profit was EUR 1.6 billion. We employ approximately 8,800 people. Fortum’s shares are traded on the NASDAQ OMX Helsinki.
Sophie Jolly, Vice President, Investor Relations, +358 10 45 32552
03 November 2014, 09:45 EET
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE, 3 November 2014 at 09.45 EET
Senior Vice President, Corporate Communications
The German E.ON has also agreed to sell its 20 %-shareholding in Gasum Oy to the Finnish State. Together these transactions will increase the Finnish State's holding from the current 24% to 75% of shares.
Fortum's decision to divest its shareholding in Gasum is part of the company's efficiency programme launched in 2012 and aiming at the disposal of non-core assets. Fortum focuses, in accordance with its strategy, on low-carbon power generation, energy-efficient combined heat and power (CHP) production and sales as well as innovative customer offerings.
NASDAQ OMX Helsinki
Fortum has agreed to sell its 31 %-shareholding in the Finnish natural gas company Gasum Oy to the Finnish State. The sales price for the total amount of Fortum's shares is approximately EUR 310 million. The transaction is expected to be closed shortly. Fortum will book a gain of roughly EUR 190 million, corresponding to approximately EUR 0.22 per share. The sales gain will be booked in 2014 fourth quarter results of Fortum's Heat, Electricity Sales and Solutions segment.
Media
Helena Aatinen
Fortum Media Desk +358 40 1982 843
Helena Aatinen, Senior Vice President, Corporate Communications +358 10 45 20480
Fortum to sell its Gasum shares to the Finnish State | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2017/04/fortum-and-city-oslo-restructure-ownership-hafslund-and-announce-partnership-greener-oslo
EUR 950 million and approximately EUR 130 million respectively.
US callers:
Fortum and the City of Oslo have entered into an agreement to restructure their ownership in Hafslund ASA, one of the largest listed power groups in the Nordic region. The transactions are subject to approval by the Oslo City Council (Bystyret), the necessary regulatory approvals and fulfilment of the customary closing conditions. The closing of the transactions is expected during the third quarter of 2017.
Fortum and City of Oslo restructure ownership in Hafslund and announce partnership for a greener Oslo | Fortum
Media call-back requests: Pauliina Vuosio, Corporate Press Officer, tel. +358
European callers:
In addition, Fortum will acquire 10% of Hafslund’s current Production business area.
businesses to make more environmentally friendly choices. KEA is also a contender for Norway’s carbon capture and storage pilot programme, and I believe that together with Fortum, its position will be stronger," says Pekka Lundmark, Fortum’s President and CEO.
Sophie Jolly, Vice President, Investor Relations and Financial Communications
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 26 APRIL 2017 8:30 EEST
"We are forming a strong partnership with the City of Oslo in areas where we can combine competencies to drive innovation for a greener Oslo, one of Europe’s fastest-growing urban areas. At the same time, we want to enable people and
+44 (0)330 336 9412
More details of the transactions are found as an attachment to this release.
50 453 2383
Fortum is a leading clean-energy company that provides its customers with electricity, heating and cooling as well as smart solutions to improve resource efficiency. We want to engage our customers and society to join the change for a cleaner world. We employ some 8,000 professionals in the Nordic and Baltic countries, Russia, Poland and India, and 62% of our electricity generation is CO2 free. In 2016, our sales were EUR 3.6 billion. Fortum's share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki.
Fortum will acquire 100% of Hafslund’s current Markets business area, which operates in Norway, Sweden and Finland. This will almost double Fortum's number of electricity retail customers in the Nordics – from 1.3 million to 2.4 million.
Fortum will sell its 34.1% stake in Hafslund ASA to the City of Oslo for approximately EUR 730 million before the proposed dividend for the Annual General Meeting 2017. Fortum will book a one-time tax-free sales gain totalling approximately EUR 330 million, which corresponds to EUR 0.37 earnings per share. The final gain will be determined at the closing of all transactions and will be reported in Fortum's Other segment.
+1 719 325 4746
Hafslund ASA is listed on the Oslo Stock Exchange and one of the largest listed power groups in the Nordic region. Hafslund is a pure-play energy and infrastructure company with a leading position as Norway's largest networks, district heating and power sales company, and is a medium-sized power producer. The regulated networks business accounts for around half of Hafslund's capital employed. Networks secure Hafslund stable and predictable returns in a period of low power prices.
Green partnership
Sophie Jolly, Vice President, Investor Relations and Financial Communications,
An international teleconference and live webcast, for institutional investors and analysts, regarding the transactions and the January-March 2017 results, will be arranged on Thursday 27 April 2017 at 16.00 EEST. To participate in the teleconference, please dial in some five minutes before the scheduled time:
tel.
The total debt-free price of the acquisitions is approximately EUR 970 million.
"In electricity retail, the combination of Hafslund and Fortum will have significant scale benefits, which will enhance the development of new technologies and services for customers. The proposed transactions support Fortum’s strategic growth and cash flow ambitions. We are naturally very excited to be able to develop sustainable solutions for yet another major
Hafslund’s Heat business area and the City of Oslo’s waste-to-energy company Klemetsrudanlegget AS (KEA) will be combined into one company, forming an integrated value chain in the waste-to-energy system. Fortum will acquire 50% of the combined company. The combined entity will be owned 50/50 by Fortum and the City of Oslo, with Fortum having operational responsibility. Heat and KEA will be consolidated as a subsidiary to Fortum, with a 50% minority interest.
26 April 2017, 08:30 EEST
Pekka Lundmark, President and CEO, and Markus Rauramo, CFO
European city. Our strategy implementation will continue and we still have significant financial headroom available for market consolidation," Pekka Lundmark concludes.
"We are very pleased to have Fortum as our industrial partner in district heating and cooling and waste-to-energy. Together we will better be able to develop new technologies for sustainable and smart solutions for Oslo and its inhabitants," says Raymond Johansen, Governing Mayor of Oslo.
The combined net cash investment of the transactions is expected to be approximately EUR 240 million. In 2016, the combined consolidated Sales and EBITDA of Hafslund Markets and Heat & KEA (on a 100% basis) were approximately
Confirmation code: 3832411
Webcast/teleconference for analysts and investors 27 April 2017
Hafslund
+358 10 453 2552
Additional information:


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2014/10/fortum-sells-its-grangemouth-power-plant-uk-ineos
Fortum sells its Grangemouth power plant in the UK to INEOS | Fortum
"The Grangemouth CHP plant is a highly efficient and modern power plant, and as INEOS has a long term plan to develop the Grangemouth site, this was a good opportunity for both companies. We look forward to continuing our good cooperation with INEOS by providing O&M services at the site", says
, Vice President, Nuclear and Thermal Power Division at Fortum.
The total sales price is approximately GBP 54 million (corresponding to approximately EUR 70 million). The sale has a positive impact on Fortum's Power and Technology segment's financial performance, and the final sales gain will be booked in the segment's fourth quarter 2014 results.
Richard Longden, Communications Manager, INEOS, tel. +41 799 626 123
02 October 2014, 11:15 EEST
Sasu Valkamo, Vice President, Nuclear and Thermal Power Division, tel. +358 50 453 2232
Commissioned in 2001, the Grangemouth power plant's power generation capacity is 145 megawatts (MW) and heat generation capacity 257 MW. It provides electricity and steam to INEOS’ petrochemical and refining plant. Excess electricity is sold to the national grid. Fortum will continue to provide operations and maintenance (O&M) services at the power plant.
Fortum has agreed to sell its UK-based subsidiary Grangemouth CHP Limited to its long term customer INEOS Industries Holdings Ltd. Grangemouth CHP Limited owns and operates a natural gas-fired combined heat and power (CHP) plant located at Grangemouth in Scotland.
The transaction is part of Fortum’s efficiency programme launched in October 2012 and aiming at the disposal of non-core assets. The core of Fortum’s strategy lies in our strong expertise in CO2-free hydro and nuclear power and resource-efficient combined heat and power production. We operate in the energy markets of our geographical home, and develop our electricity sales by providing innovative customer offerings for smarter energy use.
Corporate Communications
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 2 October 2014


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/08/fortums-acquisition-ekokem-finalised
Fortum has today finalised the acquisition of Ekokem Corporation with the four biggest owners, representing approximately 81% of the shares. Ekokem is a leading Nordic circular economy company specialised in material and waste recycling, final disposal solutions, soil remediation and environmental construction. Ekokem is headquartered in Riihimäki, Finland and generated sales of EUR 258 million in 2015.
Ekokem will be integrated as a business area into the City Solutions division and is consolidated into Fortum Group from the end of August 2016. Transaction costs (including transfer tax) of approximately EUR 12 million will be included in the result for the third quarter of 2016.
Sustainable city solutions a strategic priority for Fortum
Sophie Jolly, Vice President, Investor Relations and Financial Communications, tel. +358 10 45 32552
The biggest shareholders are the Finnish State (34.1%), the Association of Finnish Local and Regional Authorities (21.4%), Ilmarinen Mutual Pension Insurance Company (15.4%) and the Helsinki Region Environmental Services Authority HSY (10.5%).
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 31 AUGUST 2016 12.30 EEST
The debt and cash-free purchase price for 100% of the company will be approximately EUR 700 million. Based on Fortum’s estimate for 2016, the purchase price corresponds to approximately 11 times EBITDA.
31 August 2016, 12:28 EEST
www.ekokem.com
Ekokem
"Ekokem is a first-class company with experienced management and personnel. Supported by Fortum’s competence in waste-to-energy and strong financial resources, a true Nordic circular economy champion will be formed. We see excellent international growth opportunities for the business and intend to invest in the further development of Ekokem’s solutions," says
Net sales EUR 258 million
Sophie Jolly
Growing cities and urban areas are facing multiple challenges, such as high emissions from inefficient heating, cooling and electricity production, increasing amounts of waste, and high traffic pollution and noise. Fortum aims to use its expertise and experience to help cities solve these challenges sustainably and to support building a circular economy. Fortum’s solutions include efficient and reliable district heating and cooling, integrated electricity retail solutions and related applications, waste-to-energy and waste treatment, as well as enhancing e-mobility with smart charging solutions for electric vehicles. In addition, the company sees new revenue opportunities in various expert services in these areas.
Fortum announced the acquisition on 27 May 2016.
Fortum's new strategy, published on 3 February 2016, targets growth and continued profitability with a strong focus on clean energy, customers and shareholder value creation. Fortum's vision is to be the forerunner in clean energy. One of the strategic cornerstones towards the vision is creating solutions for sustainable cities.
Fortum’s acquisition of Ekokem finalised | Fortum
Fortum's vision is to be the forerunner in clean energy. We provide our customers with electricity, heat and cooling as well as other energy solutions that improve present and future life. Already 64% of our electricity generation is CO2 free. Our main markets are the Nordic and the Baltic countries, Russia, Poland and India. In 2015, we employed some 8,000 energy sector professionals, and our sales were EUR 3.5 billion. Fortum's share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki.
Reported EBITDA EUR 55 million, EBITDA margin was 21.1%
Mari Kalmari, Vice President, Publicity and Communications, tel. +358 10 45 29211
Investors, analysts and financial media:
Ekokem is one of the leading circular economy companies in the Nordics that provides environmental management and material efficiency services. Ekokem operates leading facilities for hazardous waste treatment and offers a broad spectrum of specialized environmental services. The company mission is to create value by improving their customers material and energy efficiency. Ekokem offers recycling, reutilisation, and final disposal solutions, as well as soil remediation and environmental construction services. Ekokem has been contributing to saving natural resources and promoting the circular economy for already 35 years.
In solutions for sustainable cities, Fortum targets growth primarily in its current home markets and also the wider European market. Fortum will also investigate possibilities in carefully selected urban areas in Asia.
, Fortum's President and CEO (27 May 2016).
The group employs approximately 630 skilled professionals in Finland, Sweden and Denmark. In January 2015, Ekokem acquired the Danish environmental management company NORD.
As of today, minority shareholders in Ekokem representing approximately 12% of the shares have approved the tender offer. Consequently, as Fortum’s total shareholding will exceed the 90% threshold Fortum will initiate a minority redemption process for the remaining shares directly after the end of the tender offer period (30 September 2016). Shareholders accepting the tender offer during the tender offer period will receive payments mostly in September 2016, whereas payments to the shareholders in the redemption process are estimated to take place in the spring of 2017.
Comparable EBITDA EUR 57 million
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 31 AUGUST 2016 12.30 EEST
The group’s key figures for 2015 were


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2017/08/fortums-restructuring-hafslund-concluded
The combined net cash investment of the transactions, including dividend
Hafslunds Heat business area and KEA will be consolidated with 50% minority
Hafslund Markets will be a part of the Consumer Solutions division and will be
ownership in Hafslund and announce partnership for a greener Oslo
results totalling approximately EUR 325 million, which corresponds to EUR 0.36
Fortum has sold its 34.1% stake in Hafslund ASA to the City of Oslo and
expects to book a one-time tax-free sales gain in its third quarter 2017
earnings per share.
electricity, heating and cooling as well as smart solutions to improve resource
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 4 AUGUST 2017 15:00 EEST
have been combined into one company and Fortum has acquired 50% of the combined
Transaction costs of approximately EUR 5 million will be included in the result
Fortum is a leading clean-energy company that provides its customers with
together with the City of Oslo, as originally announced on 26 April 2017.
10 453 6150, and
company. In addition, Fortum has acquired 10% of Hafslund’s current Production
CO2 free. In 2016, our sales were EUR 3.6 billion. Fortum’s share is listed on
area and the City of Oslo’s waste-to-energy company Klemetsrudanlegget AS (KEA)
Media: Mari Kalmari, Corporate Press Officer, tel. +358 40 520 1709
in the Generation segment.
a cleaner world. We employ some 8,000 professionals in the Nordic and Baltic
efficiency. We want to engage our customers and society to join the change for
consolidated into Fortum Group from 1 August 2017. The combined company of
Read more:
countries, Russia, Poland and India, and 62% of our electricity generation is
acquired 100% of Hafslund’s Markets business area. Hafslund’s Heat business
interest into the results of City Solutions from 1 August 2017. The Hafslund
Stock exchange release 26 April 2017 - Fortum and City of Oslo restructure
for the third quarter of 2017.
04 August 2017, 15:00 EEST
Investors and analysts: Rauno Tiihonen, Manager, Investor Relations, tel. +358
Måns Holmberg, Acting Head of Investor Relations and Financial Communications
Fortum has today concluded the restructuring of its ownership in Hafslund
Nasdaq Helsinki. www.fortum.com
Fortum’s restructuring of Hafslund concluded | Fortum
Production business area will be treated as an associated company and reported
business area.
received in May 2017, is expected to be approximately EUR 230 million. Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/12/fortum-streamlines-its-swedish-hydropower-operations
21 December 2020, 09:30 EET
The total purchase price on a debt and cash free basis is EUR 64.5 million. The transaction is expected to close in February 2021.
FORTUM CORPORATION ONLINE NEWS 21 DECEMBER 2020 9:30 EET
Fortum streamlines its Swedish hydropower operations | Fortum
Fortum has decided to sell eight small hydropower plants in Sweden to Downing Renewables & Infrastructure Trust plc. The power plants have an average annual power generation of 0.1 terawatt hours and a total capacity of 26 megawatts, representing 0.5% of Fortum’s Swedish hydropower capacity. The power plants are mainly run-of-river plants and not essential to Fortum’s strategic focus due to their small size and limited flexibility.
Måns Holmberg, Manager, Investor Relations and Financial Communications, tel. +358 44 518 1518
Per-Oscar Hedman, Communications Manager, Sweden, +46 70 214 7545


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/07/fortum-considers-strategic-options-its-ownership-stockholm-exergi
In 2019, Stockholm Exergi’s heating and cooling sales were 8.5 TWh and power sales 1.4 TWh. The EBITDA was SEK 2.8 billion. For Fortum, Stockholm Exergi is a joint venture and is accounted for using the equity method. In 2019, Fortum recorded EUR 24 million in ‘share of profits from associates and joint ventures’ from Stockholm Exergi, including Fortum’s share, EUR -22 million, of impairment relating to the early decommissioning of Stockholm Exergi’s last coal-fired power plant.
31 July 2020, 09:00 EEST
In line with its strategy and continued review of the business portfolio, Fortum has decided to assess strategic options, including possible divestment, of its 50% holding in Stockholm Exergi Holding AB (publ), the district heating and cooling company in Stockholm, Sweden. As part of the process, Fortum has initiated discussions on the matter with the City of Stockholm, owner of the other 50% share in Stockholm Exergi.
Since 2002, Fortum has co-owned Stockholm Exergi together with the City of Stockholm and during this time, the energy production has been developed to have an increased share of renewable and recycled energy sources. The production is now largely decarbonised with the ambition to be climate positive in 2025. Since 2014, Stockholm Exergi is a stand-alone company with its own governance and Fortum is only represented on the Board of Directors of Stockholm Exergi.
In February 2020, Fortum announced the strategic review of its district heating businesses in Poland, in the Baltics and in Järvenpää, Finland. In July 2020, Fortum agreed to sell its district heating business in Järvenpää, Finland. The reviews of Fortum’s district heating operations in Poland and the Baltics are still ongoing.
(PDF, 26 KB)
There is no certainty whether the assessment will result in any transactions and Fortum will inform the market, if and when appropriate.
Per-Oscar Hedman, Communication Manager, Sweden, tel. +46 70 214 75 45
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 31 JULY 2020 AT 9.00 EEST
Fortum considers strategic options for its ownership in Stockholm Exergi | Fortum
Ingela Ulfves, VP, IR and Financial Communications, tel. +358 40 515 1531


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2019/12/fortum-sell-its-district-heating-business-joensuu-finland-approximately-eur-530-million
“In line with our strategy, this is an excellent opportunity to extend our core district heating business to the Joensuu network in close vicinity to our existing networks. We value the solid fundamentals of the asset and see potential in further developing it along with the existing team, including continuing the peat-to-bio conversion of the Joensuu district heating business according to the plans laid out by Fortum,” says
, CEO of Savon Voima Oyj.
In June 2019, Fortum announced it would review and consider strategic options for the Joensuu and Estonian district heating businesses. The strategic review for the Estonian district heating business is still ongoing. In line with its strategy, Fortum continuously reviews its businesses to optimise its portfolio for value creation.
(PDF, 28 KB)
In 2018, Fortum produced approximately 550 GWh of heat and approximately 240 GWh of power in Joensuu. The operations currently employ three Fortum employees, who will transfer with the business as old employees. The operation and maintenance services are sourced from an external partner.
Fortum has today signed an agreement to sell its district heating business in Joensuu, Finland to Savon Voima Oyj. The total consideration on a debt- and cash-free basis is approximately EUR 530 million. Fortum expects to record a tax exempt capital gain of approximately EUR 430 million in the City Solutions segment’s first-quarter 2020 results. The transaction is subject to customary closing conditions and is expected to be completed in the first quarter of 2020.
20 December 2019, 15:30 EET
Arto Sutinen
“The Joensuu district heating business is centred around the highly efficient and modern combined heat and power plant. The business transformation to lower carbon intensity has largely been done and the detailed plans for further decarbonisation have been prepared. The divestment raised large interest among buyers and provided a great opportunity for us to sell the business to a reliable company with the ambition to further develop the business locally in Joensuu. In Finland, we can now focus our efforts on the decarbonisation project targeting discontinuation of the use of coal in 2025 in the district heating network in the City of Espoo,” says
, Executive Vice President, City Solutions at Fortum.
Timo Piispa, Head of Heating & Cooling Finland, tel. +358 50 453 2758
Fortum to sell its district heating business in Joensuu, Finland for approximately EUR 530 million | Fortum
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 20 DECEMBER 2019 AT 15:30 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2014/10/fortum-continues-evaluation-opportunities-divest-its-swedish-electricity-distribution-business
As announced earlier, Fortum is currently evaluating possibilities to divest its electricity distribution business in Sweden. Process continues according to plan and Fortum is starting the evaluation of the interest on the market. Fortum has not made any decisions on the business' future or the schedule of the process.
07 October 2014, 09:50 EEST
Background information for news desks:
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 7 OCTOBER 2014
Fortum owns and operates electricity distribution and regional networks and distributes electricity to a total of 903,000 customers in Sweden. The Swedish Distribution’s comparable operating profit was EUR 239 million on last 12 months basis at the end of the second quarter 2014. This was approximately 18% of Fortum's total comparable operating profit. The Swedish Distribution’s net assets at the end of the second quarter 2014 totalled EUR 2,642 million. The business employs approximately 380 persons.
Fortum originally announced the completion of the strategic assessment of its electricity distribution business in December 2013. The sale of the Finnish business was announced at the same time. The sale of the Norwegian business was announced in April 2014.
Fortum continues the evaluation of the opportunities to divest its Swedish electricity distribution business | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2013/01/fortum-assesses-its-strategic-position-electricity-distribution-business
Fortum is the leading electricity distribution company in the Nordic countries with altogether approximately 1.6 million customers in Finland, Sweden and Norway. The Distribution business area's sales during the last 12 months at the end of the third quarter 2012 was EUR 1,000 million and comparable operating profit was EUR 265 million. The business area's share of Fortum's comparable operating profit was approximately 16%. Net assets at the end of the third quarter 2012 totaled EUR 3,847 million. The business area employs approximately 900 people.
31 January 2013, 08:45 EET
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 31 January 2013 at 8.45 EET
Fortum sees that its distribution business holds value potential that could be captured to the fullest extent in a different setting. Furthermore, Fortum’s core-competence, where it seeks growth, is the production and sales of low-carbon power and energy-efficient heat.
tel. +358 10 45 24112 (available to the media 1.00pm-3.30pm EET)
Fortum’s largest division, Power, consists of Fortum’s power generation, power trading and power capacity development as well as expert services for power producers. Fortum’s Heat Division consists of combined heat and power (CHP) generation, district heating activities and business-to-business heating solutions in the Nordic countries and other parts of the Baltic Rim. The Russia Division consists of power and heat generation and sales in Russia.
Fortum's purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future generations. In accordance with its strategy, the company’s aim is to build on its strong Nordic core, create solid earnings growth in Russia and build a platform for future growth.
Fortum is the second largest electricity retail company in the Nordic countries with approximately 1.2 million customers in Finland, Sweden and Norway. Electricity sales is a competed business and there are altogether 350 electricity retailers in the Nordic countries. Fortum’s retail business is not included in the strategic review announced today.
Fortum assesses its strategic position in the electricity distribution business | Fortum
Distribution is a regulated business that has yielded a stable, somewhat over 8% comparable return on net assets. Fortum's Distribution business area's comparable EBITDA for the last 12 months at the end of the third quarter 2012 was EUR 466 million.
Corporate Communications: Helena Aatinen, Senior Vice President, +358 10 45 20480,
Fortum Media Desk: +358 40 1982 843
Investor Relations: Sophie Jolly, Vice President, tel. +358 10 45 32552
Fortum has decided to assess the future alternatives, including divestment, of its electricity distribution business. In accordance with its strategy, Fortum seeks in growth low-carbon power generation, energy-efficient combined heat and power (CHP) production and customer offerings. The assessment has no impact on Fortum's electricity distribution customers and excludes the company's electricity retail business. Fortum expects to conclude the assessment during 2013.
Fortum is the leading electricity distribution company in the Nordic countries with approximately 1.6 million network customers; ~900 000 in Sweden, 600 000 in Finland and ~100 000 in Norway. Fortum’s distribution businesses in Estonia were sold in the beginning of 2012. At Fortum, the Distribution business area is part of the company’s Electricity Solutions and Distribution Division that is also responsible for retail sales of electricity.
Further information to news desks:
Tapio Kuula, President and CEO,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/03/fortum-sell-its-district-heating-business-baltics-eur-800-million
www.partnersgroup.com
Partners Group is a leading global private markets investment manager. Since 1996, the firm has invested over USD 145 billion in private equity, private real estate, private debt and private infrastructure on behalf of its clients globally. Partners Group is a committed, responsible investor and aims to create broad stakeholder impact through its active ownership and development of growing businesses, attractive real estate and essential infrastructure. With over USD 109 billion in assets under management as of 31 December 2020, Partners Group serves a broad range of institutional investors, sovereign wealth funds, family offices and private individuals globally. The firm employs more than 1,500 diverse professionals across 20 offices worldwide and has regional headquarters in Baar-Zug, Switzerland; Denver, USA; and Singapore. It has been listed on the SIX Swiss Exchange since 2006 (symbol: PGHN). For more information, please visit
or follow us on
The transaction is a continuation of Fortum’s strategy execution, whereby Fortum continuously reviews its businesses to optimise its portfolio for value creation. In June 2019, Fortum announced it considered the strategic options for its district heating businesses in Estonia and in February 2020, Fortum announced it would review the district heating businesses in the other Baltic countries.
In 2020, Fortum divested the district heating businesses in Joensuu and Järvenpää, in Finland. The strategic reviews of the heating and cooling businesses in Poland, its 50% stake in Stockholm Exergi, and the Consumer Solutions business are currently ongoing.
Fortum has signed an agreement to sell its district heating business in the Baltics to Partners Group, a leading global private markets firm, acting on behalf of its clients. The total consideration on a debt- and cash-free basis is EUR 800 million. Fortum expects to record a tax exempt capital gain of approximately EUR 240 million in the City Solutions segment’s second-quarter 2021 results.
(PDF, 766 KB)
In the Baltics, Fortum provides district heating in five cities (Tartu and Pärnu in Estonia, Daugavpils and Jelgava in Latvia and Klaipeda in Lithuania). Further, in those cities Fortum owns four CHP plants as well as a 49% share of the Kaunas CHP (commissioned in 2020) in Lithuania, through a joint venture.
David Daum
The transaction is subject to customary closing conditions and is expected to be completed in the second quarter of 2021.
“This investment reflects Partners Group's continuing commitment to transformational investing in assets that have meaningful impact on the communities in which they operate. The assets deliver heating to thousands of homes and businesses across the Baltic region, an area known for the severity of its winters," says
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 12 MARCH 2021 AT 11:30 EET
Partners Group
, Managing Director, Private Infrastructure Europe, Partners Group.
12 March 2021, 11:30 EET
“The divestment is in line with our portfolio optimisation and follows our successful divestments in Finland in 2020. The assets raised large interest among buyers as the business transformation to lower carbon intensity for these assets has largely been done,” says
In 2020, Fortum's sales in the Baltics was 1.4 TWh of heat and 0.6 TWh of power with an EBITDA of EUR 54 million, including subsidies for bio-based energy. The operations currently employ 271 Fortum employees, who will transfer with the business.
Fortum to sell its district heating business in the Baltics for EUR 800 million | Fortum
Fortum News Desk, tel. +358 40 198 2843


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/12/fortum-diversifies-its-wind-power-cooperation-russia
+358 40 5151 531
The 50-MW Ulyanovsk 2 wind farm, commissioned in January 2019, was the first joint project completed by the Fortum-Rusnano Wind Investment Fund. The 300-MW Rostov wind farms started supplying power and capacity to the market earlier this year.
Fortum is diversifying its cooperation in wind power generation in Russia in collaboration with the Russian Direct Investment Fund (RDIF). The Fortum-Rusnano Wind Investment Fund has sold the 50-MW Ulyanovsk 2 and the 300-MW Rostov wind farms to a joint venture recently established with RDIF for this purpose. Fortum’s ownership in the joint venture is 49%.
The transactions are made within Fortum’s earlier communicated maximum equity commitment of RUB 15 billion for development of renewables in Russia.
FORTUM CORPORATION ONLINE NEWS 31 DECEMBER 2020 15:00 EET
Rauno Tiihonen, IR Manager, tel.
31 December 2020, 15:00 EET
In line with its strategy Fortum aims to grow a sizeable portfolio of onshore wind and solar based power generation both by utilising various forms of cooperation and its own balance sheet.
Fortum diversifies its wind power cooperation in Russia | Fortum
Måns Holmberg, IR Manager, tel. +358 44 518 1518
Ingela Ulfves, VP, IR and Financial Communications, tel.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2019/06/fortum-considers-possible-strategic-options-its-district-heating-businesses-joensuu-finland-and-parnu-and-tartu-estonia
Fortum considers possible strategic options for its district heating businesses in Joensuu, Finland and in Pärnu and Tartu, Estonia | Fortum
(PDF, 25 KB)
Margo Külaots, Head of Heating & Cooling Estonia, tel. +372 505 2986
Fortum has decided to assess strategic options, including possible divestment, of its district heating and cooling businesses in Joensuu, Finland as well as in Pärnu (100% ownership) and Tartu (60% ownership), Estonia. In line with its strategy, Fortum continuously reviews its businesses to optimise its portfolio for value creation.
In 2018, Fortum produced approximately 550 GWh of heat and approximately 240 GWh of power in Joensuu. The business generates an EBITDA of approximately EUR 20 million and currently employs less than 10 Fortum employees as operation and maintenance services are sourced externally.
25 June 2019, 09:00 EEST
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 25 JUNE 2019 AT 9.00 EEST
Based on initial assessments, the district heating and cooling businesses in Joensuu and Estonia have been identified as operations that potentially could benefit from a different ownership structure. These business operations are entering into a more stable phase as measures to improve operational efficiency and the transformation to lower carbon intensity has largely been done.
Correspondingly, Fortum's pro rata share of the production in Estonia was approximately 530 GWh of heat and approximately 280 GWh of power with an EBITDA of approximately EUR 30 million, including subsidies for renewable energy. The operations currently employ around 130 persons.
Release category: Investor News
Juha Luomala, Communications for Heating & Cooling Finland, tel. +358 50 592 3993
There is no certainty whether the assessment will result in any transactions and Fortum will inform the market if and when appropriate.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2014/11/fortums-gasum-divestment-completed
03 November 2014, 16:45 EET
Kari Kautinen,
Fortum's Gasum divestment completed | Fortum
The sales price for the total amount of Fortum's shares is approximately EUR 310 million. Fortum will book a gain of roughly EUR 190 million, corresponding to approximately EUR 0.22 per share. The sales gain will be booked in 2014 fourth quarter results of Fortum's Heat, Electricity Sales and Solutions segment.
Senior Vice President, Strategy, Mergers and Acquisitions, +358 10 45 32174
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE, 3 November 2014 at 16.45 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2013/12/fortum-completes-strategic-assessment-its-electricity-distribution-business
US callers: + 1 212 444 0481
12 December 2013, 08:10 EET
Tapio Kuula, President and CEO, tel. +358 10 45 24112
"Divesting electricity distribution business would, according to our conclusions, give us more strategic freedom and improve our possibilities for higher value creation. During the assessment process, we carefully studied all the alternatives in order to find the best solution for Fortum and the electricity distribution business. I firmly believe that we came to the right conclusion also from the perspective of our distribution customers and the society at large. The development possibilities in the distribution business are better when the business can be developed purely from its own standpoint," says Fortum's President and CEO
An international teleconference conducted in English for analysts and investors will be held today, 12 December 2013 at 14.30 EET. The dial-in numbers:
A live audio webcast of the call will be available together with the slide presentation on Fortum’s website at www.fortum.com/investors.
Fortum Distribution's sales during the 12 months ending at the end of the third quarter 2013 amounted to EUR 1,105 million, comparable operating profit was EUR 356 million and comparable EBITDA was EUR 575 million. This represented an 18% share of Fortum's sales and a 20% share of comparable operating profit. Gross investments in Distribution totaled EUR 285 million during the same period. Net assets at the end of the third quarter 2013 totaled EUR 3,786 million. At the end of the third quarter 2013, the business served approximately 1.6 million customers in Finland, Sweden and Norway and employed 860 people.
There will be a replay facility available for one week after the teleconference:
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE, 12 December 2013 at 08.10 EET
Fortum is the leading electricity distribution company in the Nordic countries with over 1.6 million network customers; ~903 000 in Sweden, 640 000 in Finland and ~102 000 in Norway. Electricity distribution is a nationally regulated business. At Fortum, the Distribution business area is part of the company’s Electricity Solutions and Distribution Division that is also responsible for retail sales of electricity.
Finnish callers: +358 (0)9 2310 1650
US callers: + 1 347 366 9565
The outcome of the assessment has no impact on Fortum's electricity retail customers. Fortum will continue to develop its electricity sales business as an integral part of the company's strategy and offer innovative products and services to its approximately 1.2 million electricity retail customers in the Nordic countries also in the future.
Helsinki.
Fortum's goal is to strengthen its balance sheet and prepare for future growth. In accordance with its strategy, Fortum seeks growth in low-carbon power generation, energy-efficient combined heat and power (CHP) production and sales as well as innovative customer offerings. The Nordic and Baltic countries as well as Russia are the geographic home market of Fortum, but the company seeks new business prospects also elsewhere in line with its strategy.
Fortum completes strategic assessment of its electricity distribution business | Fortum
Confirmation code:  3501655
In 2012, Fortum’s sales totalled EUR 6.2 billion and comparable operating profit was EUR 1.7 billion. We employ approximately 10,400 people. Fortum’s shares are quoted on NASDAQ OMX
Fortum is the second largest electricity retail company in the Nordic countries with approximately 1.2 million customers in Finland, Sweden and Norway. Electricity sales is a competed business and there are altogether 350 electricity retailers in the Nordic countries.
European callers: +44 (0)20 3427 0503
Finnish callers: +358 (0)9 2310 1621
European callers: +44 (0)20 3427 0589
"Along with the global megatrends, such as the ever increasing environmental challenges, the shift in the economic power balance and technological development, the energy sector is currently under turmoil, which is further fuelled by the tough economic times. In periods like these, opportunities may arise that only a company with a stable financial footing can seize," Tapio Kuula concludes.
Further information on Fortum:
Tapio Kuula
Fortum has completed the assessment of the future alternatives of its electricity distribution business that was launched in January 2013. After thorough consideration, the company has concluded that divesting the electricity distribution business is the best solution for the business and its customers, Fortum's shareholders and the company's other businesses. Focusing on electricity and heat production and sales, is estimated to improve Fortum's long-term value creation. Fortum evaluates the possible divestment opportunities country by country.
Fortum’s purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future generations. We provide sustainable solutions that fulfill the needs for low emissions, resource efficiency and energy security, and deliver excellent value to our shareholders.
A press conference (in Finnish) will be held today, 12 December 2013 at 11.00 EET in the auditorium of Fortum’s head office, Keilaniementie 1, Espoo, Finland. The press conference will be webcasted on Fortum’s Finnish website (www.fortum.com/fi).


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/07/fortum-sell-its-district-heating-business-jarvenpaa-finland-approximately-eur-375-million
Fortum has signed an agreement to sell its district heating business in the Järvenpää-Tuusula area in Finland to a consortium consisting of Vantaa Energy Ltd, Infranode, and Keva. The total consideration on a debt- and cash-free basis is approximately EUR 375 million. Fortum expects to record a tax-exempt capital gain of approximately EUR 290 million in the City Solutions segment’s third-quarter 2020 results. The transaction is subject to customary closing conditions and is expected to be completed in the third quarter of 2020.
The transaction is a continuation of Fortum’s strategy execution, whereby Fortum continuously reviews its businesses to optimise its portfolio for value creation. In June 2019, Fortum announced it considered the strategic options for its district heating businesses in Estonia and in Joensuu, Finland. This resulted in the divestment of the district heating business in Joensuu in early January 2020. In February 2020, Fortum announced it would review and consider strategic options for the district heating businesses in Järvenpää, Poland and the Baltics. In June 2020, Fortum agreed to increase its ownership to 100% in the Tartu district heating business in order to increase the flexibility in potential future options for the Estonian district heating businesses. The strategic review for the district heating businesses in Poland and the Baltics is still ongoing and proceeding according to plan.
Vantaa Energy Ltd
03 July 2020, 09:00 EEST
(PDF, 38 KB)
Release category: Investor news
In 2019, Fortum produced approximately 330 GWh of heat and approximately 90 GWh of power in Järvenpää. The operations currently employ three Fortum employees, who will transfer with the business as old employees. The operation and maintenance services are sourced from an external partner.
Vantaa Energy is one of Finland’s largest city energy companies. We produce district heat and electricity and sell heating services. The energy sector has a significant role to play in combating climate change. We want to be part of the solution. We will stop using coal in our energy production in 2022. We are a growing circular economy energy company that invests in finding carbon-neutral energy solutions.
Infranode is a long-term infrastructure investor with a specific focus on the Nordic countries. Infranode covers the main infrastructure sectors of energy & utilities, renewables, digital infrastructure, transportation, and social infrastructure. Infranode has offices in Helsinki, Stockholm and Oslo and a team of 15 infrastructure investment professionals with extensive local and international experience. Infranode currently has c. EUR 1 billion of capital under management from some of the most renowned Nordic institutional investors. Our investors include e.g. Keva, LocalTapiola, European Investment Bank, the Swedish Municipalities Pension fund KPA Pension and AP4, the Swedish State Pension fund.
“We’re pleased that Fortum chose our consortium as the new owner of the district heating business in the Järvenpää-Tuusula area. Vantaa Energy has strong expertise in producing district heating services in a sustainable way. The share of renewable and carbon-neutral energy forms in production has been increased consistently, and the company will continue in the same direction. Keva and Infranode both have strong experience in implementing similar investments and expertise in the field of energy infrastructure in the Nordics," says
, CEO of Vantaa Energy.
“We are excited about the opportunity to invest together with Vantaa Energy and Infranode in this important Finnish core infrastructure in a developing and growing region. Keva is a long-term investor and this type of infrastructure investment fits excellently in our investment portfolio. The investment offers a stable, predictable, and long-term cash flow. The company uses considerable amounts of renewable energy, which naturally suits Keva well as a responsible investor,” says
“With this important investment, we continue in our effort to be a preferred infrastructure investment partner to Finnish municipalities. We are very happy for doing this investment in partnership with Vantaa Energy as co-owner and operating partner offering attractive synergies,” adds
Fortum to sell its district heating business in Järvenpää, Finland for approximately EUR 375 million | Fortum
Ari Huotari
“The divestment of our district heating business in the Järvenpää-Tuusula area follows the successful divestment of the Joensuu district heating business in line with our portfolio optimisation. We are pleased that the buyer is a consortium with a strong local presence with high ambitions to further develop the business in this area. In our heating business in Finland, we will continue our efforts on the decarbonisation project targeting discontinuation of the use of coal in 2025 in the district heating network in the City of Espoo,” says
Infranode
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 3 JULY 2020 AT 9:00 EEST
Jukka Toivonen
Keva
, Director at Infranode.
Fortum is a European energy company with activities in more than 40 countries. We provide our customers with electricity, gas, heating and cooling as well as smart solutions to improve resource efficiency. We want to engage our customers and society to join the change for a cleaner world. Together with our subsidiary Uniper, we are the third-largest producer of CO2-free electricity in Europe. With approximately 19,000 professionals and a combined balance sheet of approximately EUR 69 billion, we have the scale, competence and resources to grow and to drive the energy transition forward. Fortum's share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki and Uniper's share on the Frankfurt Stock Exchange.
Carl-Emil Lindholm
, CIO at Keva.
Timo Piispa, Head of Heating & Cooling Finland, call requests News Desk tel. +358 40 198 2843
Keva is Finland’s largest pension provider and it administers the pensions of local government, State, Evangelical Lutheran Church and Kela employees. Our 530-strong staff serve a total of 1.3 million public sector employees and pensioners as well as some 2,000 employer customers, i.e. local government organisations, State employers and parish unions. We are responsible for funding the pensions of local government employees and for investing their pension funds. The market value of Keva’s investments at the end of 2019 was EUR 56 billion.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/01/fortum-makes-public-tender-offer-electricity-and-gas-sales-company-duon-poland
, Executive Vice President, Heat, Electricity Sales and Solutions segment of Fortum.
Shareholders representing approximately 44% of Duon's share capital including the current members of the management board have committed to selling their shares to Fortum subject to certain conditions. Fortum does not own any of Duon’s shares at the moment.
Duon Capital Group
The price offered per share is PLN 3.85, representing 19.2% premium to Duon's three months' weighted average share price. The offer period commences on 28 January 2016 and is estimated to close on 26 February 2016. The offer has been made in compliance with the Polish legislation and rules of the Warsaw Stock Exchange, and it is subject to the Polish competition authority clearance.
Fortum’s purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future generations. Fortum’s expertise is in CO2-free and efficient electricity and heat production. The company also offers energy-related products and expert services to private and industrial customers and energy producers. Fortum’s main areas of operation are the Nordic and the Baltic countries, Russia and Poland. In 2014, the annual sales (excluding the divested electricity distribution business) totalled EUR 4.1 billion, and comparable operating profit was EUR 1.1 billion. The company employs approximately 8,000 people. Fortum’s share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki.
+358 1045 20480
Fortum makes a public tender offer for the electricity and gas sales company Duon in Poland | Fortum
Helena Aatinen, Senior Vice President, Communications, tel.
Sophie Jolly, Vice President, Investor Relations, tel. +358 10 45 32552
In Poland: Izabela Van den Bossche, Vice President, Corporate Communications, tel. + 48692209428
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 8 January 2016
Further information (call-back requests):
Duon sells electricity and natural gas. The company was founded in 2000, and it is currently one of the leading independent providers of electricity and natural gas in Poland. It is also a leading distributor and transporter of LNG. In 2014, its revenues were PLN 636 million (EUR 152 million) and EBITDA PLN 36 million (EUR 9 million). Currently, it employs approximately 600 people. The company has been listed on the Warsaw Stock Exchange since 2007 (DUO:WSE).
Duon sells electricity and natural gas in Poland on a third-party access basis (TPA), that is via transmission and distribution networks operated by distribution companies. It is one of the largest privately-owned retail electricity and gas sales entities in Poland. In addition, Duon is involved in the wholesale trading of electricity and gas. The company also supplies grid gas and LNG (Liquefied Natural Gas) via its own infrastructure. Duon's market capitalisation on 7 January 2016 was approximately PLN 393 million (approx. EUR 90 million).
"Duon would offer us a good growth platform on the Polish retail market as Fortum is looking for ways to grow faster in new energy services for consumers, communities and businesses," says
Markus Rauramo, Executive Vice President, Heat, Electricity Sales and Solutions segment
Fortum has made a public tender offer in Poland to purchase all shares in Grupa Duon SA, an electricity and gas sales company listed on the Warsaw Stock Exchange. Fortum will carry out the acquisition if it receives at least 51% of the shares by the end of the offer period. The transaction is aligned with Fortum's strategy to grow its share in electricity sales and related customer services.
Matti Saario, Head of Electricity Sales
Media enquiries and call-back requests:
Fortum has been operating in Poland since 2003. It currently has three combined heat and power (CHP) plants and over 800 km of district heating networks, which serve around 360,000 households in the cities of Płock, Wrocław, Częstochowa, Zabrze and Bytom. The overall power generation capacity is over 200 MW and heat generation capacity over 1,100 MW. Fortum is currently building a new multi-fuel CHP plant in Zabrze with the investment value of approximately EUR 200 million. The company has about 600 employees in Poland.
08 January 2016, 17:30 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/03/fortum-and-rdif-build-largest-solar-power-plant-russia
Fortum and the Russian Direct Investment Fund (RDIF) will build a 116 MW solar power plant in Kalmykia in Southern Russia. When commissioned, it will be the largest solar power plant in Russia. The project will be implemented by the recently established joint venture between Fortum and RDIF, which already has 350 MW of wind power plants in the Ulyanovsk and Rostov regions.
Fortum and RDIF to build the largest solar power plant in Russia | Fortum
02 March 2021, 11:00 EET
The solar power plant is estimated to be commissioned in its full scale in the second half of 2022. The first construction phase of 78 MW is expected to be commissioned in the fourth quarter of 2021 and the remaining 38 MW in 2022.
In line with its strategy Fortum aims to grow a sizable portfolio of onshore wind and solar based power generation. Fortum is one of the largest players on the renewable energy market in Russia with a portfolio of 2 GW of wind and solar power parks and development projects, together with its joint ventures. 670 MW of this capacity is operational.
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 2 March 2021


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/news-and-publications/all-news-and-releases
News archive | Fortum
April
3.1.2023
09.58 EET
Publish month
Managers' transactions
March
CORRECTION: Decisions by Fortum Corporation's Extraordinary General Meeting 2022
1512 results found
October
8.12.2022
In Fortum's news archive, you will find all the news and press releases we have published.
12.00 EET
24.11.2022
Fortum's website ranked 2nd best in Finland among corporate sites
12.34 EET
Fortum publishes guidelines for lobbying
29.11.2022
17.40 EET
New shares of Fortum Corporation registered with the Finnish trade register
May
13.00 EET
August
Fortum and Uniper strategic OneTeams discontinued as of 1 December
January
5.1.2023
December
15.41 EET
June
1.12.2022
10.50 EET
September
20.12.2022
February
July
7.12.2022
13.05 EET
November
23.11.2022


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2023/01/fortum-and-blastr-have-signed-letter-intent-use-joddbole-site-inkoo-green-steel-production
, +358 40 198 2843
3, January 2022
Fortum and Blastr have signed a letter of intent to use the Joddböle site in Inkoo for green steel production | Fortum
Fortum Newsdesk,
"At Fortum, we are delighted to see new activity at our Joddböle industrial site in Inkoo. Infrastructure inherited from our dismantled coal-fired power plant is available, and our plans are moving forward to develop activities in the area that will contribute to the decarbonisation of society," says
Green steel is a critical raw material for future renewable energy infrastructure and technology solutions such as wind turbines, construction, automotive and consumer products. Its demand is expected to grow to 50 million tonnes by 2030 in Europe alone, equivalent to one third of current steel demand. On completion, Blastr's Inkoo plant would produce two and a half million tonnes of high quality hot and cold rolled green steel per year.
Fortum has developed the Joddböle area since the dismantling of the Inkoo power plant in 2017-2020. The area has excellent conditions for industrial activities: a deep-water harbour and an excellent electricity transmission network.
Fortum and Norwegian company Blastr Green Steel have signed a letter of intent for the exclusive use of Fortum’s industrial site in Joddböle, Inkoo in western Finland to produce green steel. Next, Blastr will carry out the necessary preliminary studies, plans and environmental impact assessments to take the project forward. The investment in the project would be worth around EUR 4 billion and would employ up to 1 200 people in the operational phase. Production is planned to start at the end of 2026.
, Head of Industrial Customer Electrification from Fortum.
Blastr Green Steel news published on
Vesa Maso
03 January 2023, 15:41 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/11/decisions-fortum-corporations-extraordinary-general-meeting-2022
Nora Steiner-Forsberg, General Counsel, tel. +358 50 473 5010
23 November 2022, 17:40 EET
EET
Release category: Decisions of General Meeting
(PDF, 800 KB)
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 23 November 2022 AT 17:40
Decisions by Fortum Corporation's Extraordinary General Meeting 2022 | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/fortum-and-uniper-strategic-oneteams-discontinued-1-december
Fortum and Uniper strategic OneTeams discontinued as of 1 December | Fortum
As a result of the upcoming ownership change, Fortum and Uniper have together agreed to discontinue the OneTeam co-operations that were announced in December 2020. The parties will pursue development and operations in the areas of hydro, wind, solar, hydrogen and physical trading as two separate companies as of 1 December 2022. In hydropower, the discontinuation of the co-operation means that some 160 Fortum employees join Uniper in Sweden on this date. In hydrogen, the development portfolio is divided between the two companies, where the joint venture with Perstorp, Project Air, will be run by Uniper going forward.
02 December 2022, 12:00 EET
(PDF, 732 KB)
Fortum’s priority is to continue to provide energy and secure supply with much needed CO2-free power in the Nordics.  Fortum will also grow in new CO2-free power generation and other sustainable solutions in the Nordics. Hydro- and nuclear power are the foundation of Fortum’s CO2-free electricity production. The Nordics provide excellent prospects for growth in wind and solar power development that will play a key role in accelerating the green transition together with hydrogen.
FORTUM CORPORATION ONLINE NEWS 2.12.2022
The European energy market has changed profoundly due to the geopolitical developments in the last nine months. Fortum, the German government and Uniper have signed an agreement in principle on 21 September for a long-term solution that will allow the German State to take full control of Uniper. Upon completion, Fortum divests fully its ownership in Uniper. The agreed transaction is subject to regulatory clearances and eventually the approval by an Extraordinary General Meeting of Uniper.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/fortum-publishes-guidelines-lobbying
“We aim to be forerunners in transparent lobbying and stakeholder management. With these guidelines our commitment to open and transparent lobbying is made visible to external stakeholder groups,” says Fredrik Blomfelt, ESG Manager from Public Affairs.
The goal of Fortum’s lobbying is to ensure a favourable operational environment for Fortum’s business, support the strategy development and implementation while contributing positively to Fortum’s reputation and brand.
Fortum promotes transparency in lobbying and stakeholder management. We support regulation that advances transparency and ensure that our practices are aligned with the latest requirements. Fortum signs up to transparency registers in all markets where it operates if such register is available.
Fortum complies with all applicable international, national and local laws, regulations, and conventions in the countries where we do business.
Our positions are based on Fortum’s longer term strategic targets and business interests while taking into account also broader societal objectives and implications. We communicate about our lobbying objectives proactively and transparently.
Fortum actively engages with a variety of stakeholder groups in society. We promote open, transparent and two-way dialogue with different stakeholders.
Fortum cooperates with and participates in different organizations, coalitions and networks. Also in these situations, we always act in accordance with competition laws, Fortum’s Code of Conduct and Business Ethics Guidelines for Lobbying.
Guidelines for Lobbying
We are a constructive and collaborative partner in developing local and international regulatory environments. We offer our expertise in the preparation of political and legislative decision making. Our lobbying messages are always based on facts.
Fortum represents itself in stakeholder relations. While we occasionally utilize external advisors in our advocacy work, third parties do not represent Fortum.
01 December 2022, 12:34 EET
Business Ethics Guidelines for Lobbying (“Guidelines for lobbying”)
Transparency is an inbuilt principle in all Fortum’s operations. The guidelines apply to lobbying and external stakeholder management in all geographies where Fortum is present and complement the respective local rules and regulations. The guidelines are in line with Fortum values, and they complement the Group code of Conduct.
Fortum has published Business Ethics Guidelines for Lobbying. The purpose of the Business Ethics Guidelines for Lobbying (thereafter “Guidelines for Lobbying”) is to outline principles relating to Fortum’s lobbying practices and external stakeholder relation management covering all functions and business areas.
Fortum publishes guidelines for lobbying | Fortum
With regards to hospitality, we always act in accordance with Fortum’s Code of Conduct, and local laws and regulations. We do not accept or offer gifts that go beyond what is considered reasonable in the ordinary conduct of business or that may influence the decisions of any party. We do not provide financial support for party-political purposes.
When representing Fortum in any situation, we represent the views and interests of the company and not our personal opinions or interests. We ensure that Fortum’s interests are always a priority.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/public-affairs/business-ethics-guidelines-lobbying
Business Ethics Guidelines for Lobbying
The purpose of the Business Ethics Guidelines for Lobbying (thereafter “Guidelines for Lobbying”) is to outline principles relating to Fortum’s lobbying practices and external stakeholder relation management covering all functions and business areas.
The purpose of the Business Ethics Guidelines for Lobbying is to outline principles relating to Fortum’s lobbying practices and external stakeholder relation management covering all functions and business areas.
Business Ethics Guidelines for Lobbying | Fortum
Transparency is an inbuilt principle in all Fortum’s operations. The guidelines apply to lobbying and external stakeholder management in all geographies where Fortum is present,  and complement the respective local rules and regulations. The guidelines are in line with Fortum values and they complement the Group code of Conduct.
Fortum represents itself in stakeholder relations. While we occasionally utilize external advisors in our advocacy work, third parties do not represent us.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/public-affairs
Fortum’s Code of Conduct establishes the foundation for our way of operating in all countries where we do business. Without exception, all Fortum employees are expected to comply with the Code of Conduct, the laws and regulations guiding our operations and the Group policies, principles and guidelines. The anti-corruption and anti-bribery principle is included in our Code of Conduct for suppliers of goods and services.
Topical publications
Our advocacy related to climate change
All our positions
Opinion piece
Regulations supporting energy transition and new technologies
01 December 2022, 12:34
Position paper
As an active corporate citizen, Fortum offers energy industry expertise to decision makers and non-governmental organisations in energy-related issues. Fortum as a company does not support, directly or indirectly, any political parties or other political organisations. Nor does it participate in the financing of the election campaign of any single candidate.
In all our lobbying and communication we aim at being transparent and proactive.
11 August 2022, 13:22
Our key lobbying issues
Competitive business environment
Fortum urges the EC to reconsider recycling in terms of new technologies
We participate in many national and international organisations focusing on energy and sustainability
Key take-aways for the energy sector
Fortum has also joined several joint business initiatives promoting market driven energy and climate policy.
We interact with national authorities, legislators and decisionmakers in different ways through our businesses in the Nordic countries, Poland, Russia and India. Our key stakeholders in the EU policies include the European Commission,  European Parliament and the representatives of member states in the Council.
The purpose of Public Affairs is to ensure a good and supportive operational environment for all Fortum's business areas in all our countries of operation. We facilitate the successful development and implementation of Fortum's strategy by compiling and assessing information related to future policy and legislative developments and through pro-active, constructive and transparent lobbying in our operating countries. We contribute to Fortum's image as an constructive partner in policy developments.
Fortum has an informal Advisory Council consisting of representatives of Fortum’s stakeholder groups as invited by the Board of Directors. The Advisory Council aims to increase the dialogue and the exchange of views between the company and its stakeholders.
We believe in the future energy system with substantially lower emissions, higher resource efficiency and a higher share of power generation based on renewables.
Competitive electricity and heat market and effective carbon pricing
Public affairs contacts
We call for a balanced approach when developing policies, regulation or taxation in order to avoid excessive increase of fixed costs to energy generation that have negative impact on competitiveness. In general, all policy decisions should be in line with energy and climate policy objectives.
Fortum messages to the EU institutions
Fortum’s position on EU Nature Restoration Regulation
Energy Review series highlights key trends in our sector and introduces each time a topical theme
Our Code of Conduct
24 November 2022, 16:03
We call for development of the regulatory framework to facilitate a smooth transition to a new and flexible energy system. The roles of different actors in flexibility service market and principles relating to taxation of energy storages should be clarified. Within EU, the rules and principles should be the same.
We call for electricity market development based on competition, level playing field between different technologies and strong climate policy with the EU Emission Trading System as a key tool for decarbonisation.
Our active participation in national and international industry organisations and cooperation with NGOs help us to deepen our understanding of global megatrends and policy developments and their connections to our business.
Read more about our Code of Conduct
EU's Fit for 55 package
Climate Lobbying Review Updated 2022
Public Affairs | Fortum
We advocate market-based solutions to drive the necessary change in the energy system.
Our stakeholders
EU's Transparency register
Contact our Public Affairs team to find out more about our lobbying messages
Low-carbon
For us, customer is in the center and we engage them to drive the change towards a cleaner world.
Want to know more? You can find all our position papers from the mediaroom.
Energy review
Energy Review


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/public-affairs/energy-review
Plastics recycling in a circular economy
Let's not waste our waste
The Nordic countries have set very ambitious climate targets, but they will not be reached with the current measures. A lot of decisions will be made this decade about how to decarbonise different sectors. What would be the most cost-efficient way to decarbonise? What kind of policy road map would support the development?
Focus on climate and energy policies in Europe, August 2014
Building an efficient, Nordic power market, December 2016
Energy reviews in 2013-2016
Review in English, November 2019
Decarbonising of the Nordics
Driving to a cleaner future
Online news 24 Nov 2017
Challenges and opportunities in developing electromobility in Europe, October 2017
From national to Nordic regional grid planning
Online news 29 November 2017
Electricity retail market
Video: We believe in safe and sustainable circular economy
Online review in English, September 2020
More sustainable, less subsidised biomass, April 2016
For active energy consumers, May 2017
Recording of the launch webinar on 17 September 2020
Energy review | Fortum
Energy Review on the
Review in English
The Fortum Energy Review series highlights the key trends in our sector and introduces each time a topical theme.
Hydropower - an indispensable part of the tomorrow's energy system, September 2015
Online news 14 June 2017
Fortum's review on plastics in circular economy, September 2019
Focus on Nordic electricity market, March 2015
Earlier reviews focus on Nordic power market, biomass, hydropower, Nordic electricity market and European climate policies.
differences and harmonisation opportunities of the Nordic TSOs. The review consists of a report written by Pöyry and Fortum’s assessment based on the findings of the report.
Online news 6 November 2019
Energy review on circular economy, November 2017


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2017/11/fortums-energy-review-circular-economy-lets-not-waste-our-waste
The thermal treatment with energy recovery is a vital component of a circular economy. Rather than landfilling waste residues, they should be recovered as energy –and thus, help reduce the use of virgin fossil and renewable fuels in heat and electricity production.
EU waste legislation, the so-called Circular Economy Package, is under final reading. Fortum strongly supports the improvements connected to traceability and separation of hazardous waste as well as decontamination of the waste to be recycled by removing unwanted hazardous substances. This is vital for ensuring a safe circular economy.
24 November 2017, 12:45 EET
ONLINE NEWS 24 November 2017
, from Fortum’s Public Affairs.
Fortum’s Energy Review on the Circular Economy: Let’s not waste our waste
+358 50 452
Fortum’s Energy Review on the Circular Economy: Let’s not waste our waste | Fortum
Auli Westerholm, Public Relations Manager, Recycling and Waste Solutions, tel.
Energy Review in English
+358 50 5300 264
The EU-28 still landfills more than 62 million tonnes of municipal waste every year.  Landfilling biodegradable waste accounts for a major part of waste management’s negative impacts on climate change. This waste contains also a huge amount of recoverable energy. Therefore, Fortum supports banning the landfilling of recyclable and recoverable waste and suggests optimal use of Europe’s existing waste-to-energy capacity by allowing cross-border transfers of waste, if the alternative for the waste is landfilling.
“The ambitious recycling targets are needed not only for municipal waste, but also for industrial and commercial waste. We support quality recycling, which can be developed by eco-design and the co-operation of manufacturing and waste management,” notes one of the authors of the review,
Harri-Pekka Korhonen, Head of Heat Policies and Regulations, tel.
Fortum has published its updated version of Energy Review, which focuses on the Circular Economy. The original version was published in June 2017.
9321


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2017/06/fortums-latest-energy-review-electricity-retail-market-must-be-developed-towards-customer-centric-model
Merja Paavola, Vice President, Public Affairs, Fortum, tel. +358 50 396 1161
Fortum’s latest Energy Review: Electricity retail market must be developed towards a customer-centric model | Fortum
Fortum today published in Helsinki its latest Energy Review, which focuses on electricity retail market development.
“In the future, in order to leverage the opportunities that digitalisation brings, legislation related to retail markets must be renewed. The premise in renewing the retail markets must be a customer-centric model, an essential component of which includes the combined billing of electricity and electricity transmission. It is important to ensure an equal operating environment for all commercial players,” Jukka Toivonen says.
Consumers today already have the opportunity to be more independent in energy issues and to choose energy solutions that are best suited for their own energy needs. For example, consumers can utilise smart home solutions in controlling electricity consumption, produce electricity themselves, store it, or sell the excess electricity to grid. In the future, automation will help to control and monitor all aspects of household energy. With digitalisation, consumers expect energy companies to offer smart and easy-to-use services that widely utilise consumption data and, for instance, local weather information.
Jukka Toivonen, Head of Business Development, Consumer Solutions, Fortum, tel. +358 50 453 6729
ONLINE NEWS 14 June 2017
The Fortum Energy Review series highlights the challenges and opportunities we see in the energy sector. Our aim is to offer solutions that drive progress. We hope the Energy Reviews engage our stakeholders in a dialogue with us about the future of the energy sector.
Fortum’s latest Energy Review: Electricity retail market must be developed towards a customer-centric model
Fortum is a leading clean-energy company that provides its customers with electricity, heating and cooling as well as smart solutions to improve resource efficiency. We want to engage our customers and society to join the change for a cleaner world. We employ some 8,000 professionals in the Nordic and Baltic countries, Russia, Poland and India, and 62% of our electricity generation is CO2 free. In 2016, our sales were EUR 3.6 billion. Fortum’s share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki. www.fortum.com
, from Fortum’s Consumer Solutions division.
“The significance of flexibility will increase in the new energy reality, and, in fact, the timing of energy use is becoming a more important factor than the level of consumption,” notes one of the authors of the review,
The transition to a renewable energy-based solar economy has begun. The growth of weather-dependent electricity production, like solar and wind power, will strongly shape our current energy system. This change will reflect also on the electricity retail market, where the role of active consumers will grow. When the production structure of the energy sector changes, customers will be able to increasingly participate in maintaining the balance between electricity production and consumption by controlling their own consumption.
14 June 2017, 09:00 EEST


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2019/11/fortums-energy-review-national-regional-grid-planning
ONLINE NEWS 6 November 2019
06 November 2019, 14:50 EET
“As a true Nordic electricity company, we are able to witness the significant benefit that the common electricity market delivers to our societies every day. There are still many harmonisation opportunities for Nordic grid operations and planning to enhance our Nordic electricity market. The Nordic TSOs and policy makers should seize those opportunities and also increase the overall cooperation inside the region,” says
Fortum’s Energy Review: From national to regional grid planning | Fortum
Fortum’s Energy Review: From national to regional grid planning
Simon-Erik-Ollus
, Fortum’s Vice President, Trading and Asset Optimisation.
Simon-Erik Ollus, VP, Trading and Asset Optimisation, Fortum, tel. +358 40 179 0166
Fortum has today published its Energy Review on the differences and harmonisation opportunities of the Nordic TSOs (Transmission System Operators). The review consists of a report written by Pöyry and Fortum’s assessment based on the findings of the report.
Fortum believes that the regional Nordic electricity market is a key enabler for the Nordic countries to reach the ambitious goals for climate neutrality, energy transition and electrification at a lower cost than if each country were to optimise the electricity market from a national perspective.
https://www.fortum.com/sites/default/files/documents/fortum-energy-review-grid-planning-11-2019.pdf
Merja Paavola, VP, Public Affairs, Fortum, tel. +358 50 396 1161
The report reveals that despite the fact that we have a joint regional Nordic electricity market, the underlying infrastructure is largely nationally driven. The TSOs have different historical and operational perspectives. Grid investments are primarily driven by national interests and prioritisation. Even in joint projects where Nordic cost-benefit methodology is used, national interests often take precedence over common benefits. There are also clear differences in the approach to the existence and management of congestion in the transmission grid. In addition, the current balancing tools are not harmonised across the Nordic TSOs. Finally, the transparency of information about the market is not disclosed in a systematic way across the TSOs.
Energy Review:


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/09/fortum-energy-review-webinar-17-sep-2020-decarbonisation-nordics
Watch the recording here
Download the presentation by Copenhagen Economics
Fortum Energy Review: Decarbonisation of the Nordics on 17 Sep 2020
introduced the study, and commentators from Finland, Sweden, Norway and Denmark shared their views about the findings.
from Copenhagen Economics
We commissioned Copenhagen Economics to conduct a study about the subject, and the key findings were presented in the Fortum Energy Review webinar on 17 September.
What would be the most cost-efficient way to decarbonise?
Fortum Energy Review webinar on 17 Sep 2020: Decarbonisation of the Nordics | Fortum
Download the presentation by Lari Järvenpää
Presentation by Lari Järvenpää, Fortum
Study by Copenhagen Economics
Fortum Energy Review webinar on 17 Sep 2020: Decarbonisation of the Nordics
Presentation material from the webinar
Helge Sigurd Næss-Schmidt
Presentation by Copenhagen Economics
Decarbonisation of the Nordics
What kind of policy road map would support the development?
Recording of the webinar
Download the full study
The Nordic countries have set very ambitious climate targets, but they will not be reached with the current measures. A lot of decisions will be made this decade about how to decarbonise different sectors.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/media/media-room/energy-review/decarbonisation-nordics
Set ambitious national and Nordic targets for increased electricity use, supporting both direct and indirect electricity use. The Nordic countries have already almost fully decarbonised the power production sector, and direct and indirect electrification will play a key role in cross-society decarbonising (transportation, industry and buildings)
Ensure that the contribution of all carbon-neutral and low-carbon energy technologies are accepted and treated in a technology-neutral manner.  Enable the expansion of lifespan in economically feasible nuclear, (bio) CHP and hydro assets in the Nordics
Fortum Energy Review 2020
Declaration on Nordic Carbon Neutrality and the Nordic 2030 Vision and Roadmap for the Nordic Electricity Market into national policy road maps.
Carbon pricing to support rapid investments in carbon-neutral solutions
Decarbonising the Nordic region: A call for cooperation
In terms of the emissions reduction challenge, coherent and high enough carbon pricing is vitally important. It enables carbon-neutral technologies to become competitive and sends market-based price signals encouraging new, rapid investments for both the supply and demand of carbon-neutral energy.
Set national and Nordic electrification targets, including targets for production of hydrogen and e-fuels
The main findings of the CE study indicate that all Nordic countries are still far from achieving the emissions reduction targets with the measures implemented so far. The heavy industry and transport sectors (including air and sea transport) are particularly challenging to decarbonise. On the other hand, electricity production in the Nordics is already largely decarbonised, and district heating is also expected to be carbon neutral by 2030.
Energy Review: Decarbonisation of the Nordics
Consequently, these developments will significantly increase the demand for carbon-neutral electricity: CE estimates that full decarbonisation of the Nordics would incur 290 TWh of additional electricity demand (an approximately 75% increase compared to current consumption).
Nordic targets
Develop a common Nordic hydrogen strategy, including financial incentives, to kick-start hydrogen development. Hydrogen is increasingly seen as a solution to decarbonise the sectors that are difficult to electrify. While hydrogen development is at different levels, in general the Nordic countries are behind continental Europe. A joint Nordic hydrogen strategy would allow the region to take a needed leap in this development area – and could eventually help the Nordic region, as a whole, benefit from clean energy exports due to our competitive generation base
How to decarbonise the Nordics in the most cost-efficient way?
Nordic strategies
We hope that this study will advance the discussion on the most cost-efficient ways to achieve a carbon-neutral society and to reach the set targets. Below we have listed the main points of the study’s contents as well as Fortum’s recommendations for decision makers.
Electrification is the key
ForTheDoers blog post by Lari Järvenpää
*More about (EU) ETS: Emissions trading system
Develop a common Nordic position on the revision of ETS and look for a common solution to having more ambitious Nordic national decarbonisation policies without diluting the steering effect of the EU ETS
Translate the Prime Ministers
Support the EU to establish a legislative framework and develop incentives for negative emissions
Ensure that the existing baseload carbon-neutral generation capacity remains competitive, e.g. by remuneration for services provided by baseload capacity for the electricity system (e.g. inertia)
Agree on a common approach to key national policy instruments, such as energy taxation and carbon pricing. This should be made in order to ensure a level playing field for economic operators and customers across the Nordic market.
This current decade is critical in terms of limiting global climate warming to 1.5 °C as required by the Paris agreement. Clear decisions and strategies to set the path for decarbonisation of different sectors are needed within the next few years. Achieving the Paris goal requires a combination of measures, including innovative integration of energy forms and international collaboration. The Nordic countries have already committed themselves to more ambitious decarbonisation targets compared to the rest of Europe, but the concrete measures to get there remain, to a large extent, still undecided.
Electricity production in the Nordic countries is already almost fully decarbonised and extensive construction of new carbon-neutral capacity is possible. The study sees emissions reductions happening both directly through electrification and indirectly via production of e-fuels from electrically produced hydrogen derivatives.
In addition to adding the required production capacity, deep electrification requires a step change in transmission and distribution networks as well as in the integration of power markets. Considerably more investments and international collaboration with transmission links are needed, as well as better regulation both in transmission grids and distribution networks. Furthermore, significant state aid is needed to bring promising synthetic fuel technologies to scale and maturity.
Fortum’s recommendations for policy-makers
Energy Review: Decarbonisation of the Nordics | Fortum
Webinar presentations and recording
The CE study suggests first and foremost that the EU should increase the ETS* ambition so that it aligns with the overall 2050 decarbonisation target. As the Nordic countries aim to decarbonise even faster, the region should restructure the national energy taxes to dynamic carbon taxes compatible with national decarbonisation goals. Simultaneously, the system should prevent carbon leakage in sectors exposed to actual risk.
We at Fortum have been strong advocates for robust decarbonisation and ambitious climate policies as well as vigorous Nordic cooperation. We commissioned Copenhagen Economics (CE), an economics research consultancy, to assess the respective decarbonisation plans and pathways of all Nordic countries. This online Fortum Energy Review assesses the results and presents our own takeaways by building on the findings and analysis of CE.
Source: Gardarsdottir et al. (2019). “Comparison of technologies for CO2 capture from cement production—Part 2: Cost analysis”. Energies, 12(3), 542.
Available at: https://www.mdpi.com/1996-1073/12/3/542/pdf
Develop a joint, regionally coherent decarbonisation strategy for the Nordics to facilitate cost-efficient implementation of decarbonisation targets. This would be a logical next step for the countries already belonging to a closely integrated regional market.
See all webinar materials
Nordic EU energy agenda


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/decarbonising-nordic-region-call-cooperation
Hydrogen to the rescue?
We have certain EU-level instruments for steering European industries towards greener production and transportation. One such tool, indeed a highly important one, is carbon pricing in the Emission Trading System (ETS). However, this alone is not enough.
According to the report, the overall electricity demand in the Nordic region could grow by about 290 TWh from today’s roughly 400 TWh. This is a major increase in a very short timeframe. We therefore have to ensure that our existing clean electricity generation base is operating optimally. Decarbonisation should not be risked by undermining the commercial viability of hydro and nuclear power, which in addition to clean electricity also provide valuable so-called ancillary services to the electricity system.
report by Copenhagen Economics
jarvenpaa
Clean electricity demand to increase significantly
Head of Market Intelligence
Therefore, we at Fortum would like to see a joint Nordic hydrogen strategy, which would firstly clearly identify this unique opportunity, and secondly take decisive actions to bring the Nordic countries to the top of the hydrogen race. This is something that should be taken on without delay, as we are by no means the only ones interested in seizing this opportunity that entails trillions of cumulative investments over the next decades.
Fortum’s Trading and Asset Optimisation (TAO)
(CE), commissioned by Fortum; the report states that a more forward-looking approach should be adopted in the regulation of Transmission and Distribution System Operators (TSOs and DSOs), with a stronger focus on customer and overall energy market needs. According to the report, regulation should be drawn up in a way that encourages the adoption of new technologies and market mechanisms that support flexibility of demand and supply.
Increasing the clean electricity output is, however, not a one-size-fits-all solution. Certain sectors, especially in industry and transport, require large-scale energy storage, high temperatures or certain chemical properties – in essence, another way to replace fossil fuels. The answer to these needs could very well be found in hydrogen.
In order to make decarbonisation feasible, we need to have in place the necessary energy infrastructure, and it must be capable of carrying the needed volumes from sources of supply to sinks of demand. This is clearly not yet a reality.
If the energy infrastructure is not developed to serve the decarbonisation effort, we will simply not be able to reach our targets. A joint Nordic infrastructure body, together with a shared vision of carbon neutrality and harmonised instruments, would be an optimal setup for successful decarbonisation of the Nordic region. The need for significant investments in grid optimisation is also brought up in the new
25 September 2020, 10:55
Decarbonising the Nordic region: A call for cooperation | Fortum
Energy infrastructure - a bottleneck for development?
The next step
Nordic cooperation is key to decarbonising the region fast enough to reach our ambitious climate targets. This calls for harmonised taxation policy and joint infrastructure development. In addition, it is vital that we ensure the competitiveness of the existing clean electricity generation base and examine the possibilities afforded by hydrogen.
Fortum Energy Review: Decarbonisation of the Nordics
lari
Hydrogen also solves the intermittency problem of renewables, as it can be produced and stored when renewable energy is abundant and then used when solar and wind power are unavailable.
We have recognised development areas and tangible means to move forward in decarbonising the Nordics. Now, it is time for action. We call on the Nordic national governments to take on this joint task of harmonisation, infrastructure development and exploration of the possibilities of hydrogen. The road ahead is not an easy one, but if we commit to shared goals and cooperate across borders and industries, we can succeed.
The Nordic countries have abundant wind power and competitive nuclear power. We might have highly valuable and competitive resources to establish a hydrogen economy. Bloomberg has estimated that in the long run, the full cost of producing electricity-based hydrogen in the Nordics could be as little as 0.73 USD/kg, which is the lowest number in their global estimate base.
The CE report also acknowledges that if deep decarbonisation is to succeed, electricity will be in a much larger role in the overall final consumption mix than it is today. Clean electricity is a natural and competitive way to directly decarbonise many sectors, such as light-duty transport and parts of building heating.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2017/11/fortums-latest-energy-review-towards-cleaner-world-electromobility
Fortum’s latest Energy Review: Towards a cleaner world with electromobility | Fortum
ONLINE NEWS 29 November 2017
Fortum today published its latest Energy Review, “Driving to a cleaner future”, which focuses on electromobility. The publication was done in connection with the E-mobility Exposed talks event in Haltia, Espoo.
Fortum believes that further intra-regional harmonisation – the standardisation of plugs and sockets to overall system interoperability and the enabling of roaming – would support the uptake of electromobility in Europe. The overall objective should be to make EV charging easy. It is also highly important that EU charging be considered a commercial business activity and not a part of the regulated electricity infrastructure sector.
Monika Kuusela, Senior Manager, Public affairs, tel.
Fortum Charge&Drive
Rami Syväri, Acting Head of Charge&Drive, tel. +358 40 7095566
, Senior Manager, Public Affairs.
“Policy makers should ensure that post-2020 emission standards will further encourage the development and uptake of low-emitting vehicles. In the EU, the emissions trading system (ETS) set the cap for emissions, including those from electricity generation. Hence, moving emissions from the transport sector under the ETS would mean that EV emissions would not increase, regardless of the fuel and technology used for electricity generation,” states
“We at Fortum believe that e-mobility can deliver a whole range of benefits, from cleaner air and less pollution to better energy usage. Electric vehicles (EVs) also support the market for renewable energy sources (RES), with car batteries offering new opportunities for grid-connected storage and bringing prosumers into the electricity market,” notes
+358 40 8227054
E-mobility is growing in the EU, and its progress in Europe is expected to keep up with the global pace. Fortum believes that the electrification of transport will take off rapidly.
Energy Review “Driving to a cleaner future”
Energy Reviews on Fortum’s website
Rami Syväri
29 November 2017, 09:30 EET
, Acting Head, Fortum Charge&Drive.
Fortum’s latest Energy Review: Towards a cleaner world with electromobility


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/public-affairs/our-views-and-positions
Fortum and coalition partners warn against hydrogen status under EU Taxonomy unnecessarily restricting business options compatible with Paris-aligned strategies
15.6.2021
Read more about what we believe in and how we drive the change for a cleaner world.
Fortum welcomes the European parliament’s decision to accept the inclusion of nuclear power in the EU taxonomy
09.12 EET
20.12.2021
Fortum Group's position on the European Commission's proposal for a Carbon Border Adjustment Mechanism (CBAM)
11.8.2022
13.22 EEST
Position paper on the European Commission’s Proposal for a Methane Emissions Regulation
14.1.2022
3.2.2022
6.4.2022
19.28 EET
Fortum's feedback on the EC proposal for a revised Waste Shipment Regulation
Fortum Group's position on the European Commission's proposal for a revision of the EU emissions trading system (EU ETS)
Brand attributes
63 results found
6.7.2022
Our views and positions | Fortum
31.5.2022
08.00 EET
22.1.2021
16.00 EET
The inclusion of nuclear and gas in the EU Taxonomy is a crucial step towards European energy transition, but some criteria still need to be clarified
1.7.2020
Position paper on the European Commission’s Review of the EU Gas Market Design
26.11.2020
Nordic energy companies and associations call for technology neutrality and EU sectorial legislation in climate change mitigation and adaptation
16.06 EEST
Our views and positions
16.03 EET
15.07 EET
Renewables, carbon free energy sources and increased energy efficiency are essential to achieve EU’s climate neutrality goal by 2050
5.2.2021
Regulatory framework needed to speed up the development of a European hydrogen economy
07.00 EEST
12.3.2021
10.07 EEST
Public affairs
Environmental responsibility
12.2.2021
17.51 EET
All views and positions
Fortum's comments on the Corporate Sustainability Due Diligence directive
21.27 EEST
5.4.2022
EU proposal for a battery regulation: Fortum sees the ambitious targets as a prerequisite for a sustainable batteries value chain
23.8.2021
A robust and efficient emissions trading system is key for decarbonising the European economy
13.48 EEST
14.2.2022
Fortum calls for stronger enforcement and improvements of the Waste Shipment Regulation
17.24 EEST
A joint call for a prompt and strong revision of the EU ETS to effectively support the increased European climate ambition
19.2.2021
17.23 EET
11.48 EET
15.10 EEST
Nordic energy utilities call for swift revision of the EU 2030 climate and energy legislation
11.16 EET
Fortum Group’s messages to the EU draft rules on the Climate, Energy and Environmental State Aid Guidelines


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/06/joint-call-prompt-and-strong-revision-eu-ets-effectively-support-increased-european-climate-ambition
The EU ETS plays a key role, but all sectors must contribute jointly
Tighter MSR is needed to ensure future market resilience
Download the joint paper in pdf format
A joint call for a prompt and strong revision of the EU ETS to effectively support the increased European climate ambition | Fortum
+358 50 453 2330
A higher LRF needs to take effect from 2023
The main points of the letter are:
The European energy sector has consistently supported the EU emissions trading system (ETS) as the main instrument of the EU climate policy. In their joint paper that has been sent to the European Commission, several energy utilities call for a prompt and strong revision of the EU ETS.
t
Head of Public Affairs Finland
kankaanpaa


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/02/renewables-carbon-free-energy-sources-and-increased-energy-efficiency-are-essential-achieve-eus-climate-neutrality-goal-2050
Renewables, carbon free energy sources and increased energy efficiency are essential to achieve EU’s climate neutrality goal by 2050. Fortum has provided responses to the EU consultations regarding these issues.
The renewables, waste heat and all low carbon energy sources and technologies (like hydrogen and nuclear) should be treated in equal manner as all of those are adequately supporting the achievement of EU carbon neutrality target.
EU Renewable Energy Directive (REDII)
Head of Heat Policies and Regulations
Heating and cooling related regulations have to respect the locality of the markets and allow for further utilization of waste heat sources on parity with renewables. In addition to that, the nearby and on-site solutions should be equally enabled and promoted.
Including the buildings in the EU ETS should be primary tool to the decarbonization and improved energy efficiency of heating and cooling sectors as well as creating a level playing field amongst all heating and cooling solutions.
Renewables, carbon free energy sources and increased energy efficiency are essential to achieve EU’s climate neutrality goal by 2050 | Fortum
Download the position paper
Fortum's position
Revision of the Renewable energy directive (RED II) is not appropriate at the moment, due to unfinalized implementation of the previous version. However, if revised we would opt for the necessary changes implementing Green Deal. It is of high importance to provide coordination between REDII and the parallel revision of Energy efficiency directive (EED) and upcoming revision of the Energy performance of buildings directive (EPBD) to secure the policy coherence.
korhonen
The principle of energy efficiency first remains at the core of EU’s de-carbonization agenda. The focus should be on saving primary energy by measures covering the whole energy value chain. Therefore EU’s energy efficiency target can be binding but national targets should remain indicative. The revision of EED needs to address the CO2 free electrification of both H&C sector and industries, and to promote the cost-efficient use of CO2 free gases like hydrogen (energy system integration perspective).
Fortum’s key messages on the revision of the EU Renewable Energy Directive (REDII) and the Energy Efficiency Directive (EED)
Fortum’s proposals for the revisions of the EU Renewable Energy Directive (REDII) and the Energy Efficiency Directive (EED)
+358 50 452 9321
The dedicated regulatory framework for hydrogen should be developed as a whole (at the moment hydrogen market model is described in several directives), and in our view Renewables Directive is not the appropriate place to describe all the aspects related to this technology. Moreover CO2 free and green hydrogen should be given the parity in terms of promotion and adequate enablers.
Energy Efficiency Directive (EED)
The more ambitious promotion of efficient heating and cooling, will require dedicated EU steering combined with sufficient national flexibility, for example by: alignment of heating and colling policies (under EED/RED II) with national renovation strategies (EPBD), creating a market-driven support for upgrading existing and building new efficient DHC infrastructure in urban areas, utilization of urban and industrial waste heat through the district heating networks, removal of regulatory barriers for energy system integration i.e., in electricity network regulation.
It is important to promote well-functioning power markets and allowing support for less-mature technologies in a transitional phase, such as Carbon Contracts for Difference to cover the cost gap between conventional and low-carbon technologies, and avoid market distortions stemming from such support.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/07/fortum-welcomes-european-parliaments-decision-accept-inclusion-nuclear-power-eu-taxonomy
The war in Ukraine and persistently high energy prices underline the need to reduce Europe’s energy dependency whilst stepping up the transition towards clean power and clean gases. The complementary delegated act on EU Taxonomy helps support these objectives.
Throughout the development of the EU taxonomy framework, Fortum has called for a technology-neutral approach to climate neutrality and the appropriate recognition of the role of nuclear energy in the European energy transition.
Fortum welcomes the European parliament’s decision to accept the inclusion of nuclear power in the EU taxonomy | Fortum
On 6 July, the European parliament voted for the Complementary Delegated Act (CDA) on EU taxonomy, establishing criteria under which nuclear and gas activities can be regarded taxonomy-aligned. The outcome that is in favour of the CDA is an important step towards Finland’s 2035 climate neutrality target and EU’s objective to be climate neutral by 2050.
Corporate Vice President, Public Affairs
VP, EU Affairs
We also see that the taxonomy framework as approved today, can play an important role in facilitating the transition from fossil to clean gases, and in developing the European hydrogen economy.
geron
paavola
+358 50 396 1161
anne-malorie
merja
+32 47 865 2801
Therefore, we are pleased to see that the European parliament recognises the vital contribution of CO2-free nuclear power in the EU decarbonisation efforts. Also international fora, such as the IEA and the G7 Summit, have recently highlighted the increasingly important role of low-carbon nuclear power in the current geopolitical environment.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/03/fortum-and-coalition-partners-warn-against-hydrogen-status-under-eu-taxonomy-unnecessarily-restricting-business-options-compatible-paris-aligned-strategies
Fortum together with the other signatories believe it is essential that the technical criterion related to hydrogen as laid down by the draft delegated act on climate change is brought in line with the European Commission’s Communication on hydrogen so as to support the EU leadership ambition whilst not unnecessarily limiting business options compatible with Paris-aligned business trajectories.
Read the joint letter:
EU Taxonomy delegated acts on climate change
The European Union adopted an ambitious Clean Hydrogen Strategy in July 2020, and Fortum stands strongly behind it – now it’s time to ensure a regulatory framework which truly supports it. Nordic countries rely on abundant CO2-free power sources, and we are concerned that the CO2 threshold currently being considered does not regard hydrogen produced with the most decarbonised grid mix as sustainable under the EU Taxonomy.
Fortum has signed a joint letter with a large range of European stakeholders (ranging from energy producers, electrolyser manufacturers to industrial customers) stating that the upcoming Delegated Act for the Sustainable Finance Taxonomy should not introduce disproportionate constraints to hydrogen production. The letter was sent to the top decision-makers in the European Commission who will soon have to decide on the revision of the
While hydrogen is meant to be the energy vector able to decarbonise hard-to-abate sectors to achieve a carbon neutral Europe and further integrate renewable energies, today 95% of the hydrogen is produced from fossil fuels. In this context, ambitious and swift industrial deployment trajectories are needed to increase the competitiveness of renewable and low carbon hydrogen, triggering economies of scale, cost reductions and increased EU leadership. This will in its turn allow industrial consumers and the transport sector to switch away from fossil fuels.
Hydrogen produced with low carbon electricity brings both high emission reduction and strong synergies with renewable hydrogen as technology and cost structures are similar.
Download pdf
EU taxonomy should be beefed up to support carbon neutrality
Read the post
For more information, please contact:
Fortum and coalition partners warn against hydrogen status under EU Taxonomy unnecessarily restricting business options compatible with Paris-aligned strategies | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/eu-taxonomy-should-be-beefed-support-carbon-neutrality
It is likely that the taxonomy will serve as a basis for forthcoming legislation, and it is therefore vitally important to make this basis as solid as possible. We fear that the taxonomy or its underpinning principles will be used to govern the EU decarbonization process in a way that makes it impossible to meet the demand for clean energy. A regulatory measure that slows down the energy transition and discourages innovation – a likelihood mentioned in the Swedish
We at Fortum are committed to working towards a carbon-neutral European economy and fully support the EU’s ambition to mitigate climate change. We firmly support the EU objective of climate-neutrality by 2050, as well as a sound framework aimed at channeling the investments needed to implement the ambitious EU climate targets in line with the Paris Agreement.
The stakeholder feedback deadline for the taxonomy is today, 18 December 2020. Together with several other Nordic energy companies,
However, the delegated acts proposed by the Commission include requirements that make it harder to reach the goals of the Paris Agreement. The taxonomy in its proposed form places certain CO2 free energy forms in a disadvantaged position by imposing stricter, and to a large degree counterproductive, criteria on them. Whilst the purpose of establishing sustainable financing is well-intended, we fear that the current draft delegated acts on EU Taxonomy will rule out over 40% of European net electricity generation and 2/3 of European CO2 free electricity power generation.
The taxonomy holds significantly stricter sustainability criteria for hydropower, which is used extensively in the Nordic countries for balancing the power system, than for solar or wind power. This, in our view, goes against the principle of technology neutrality, which should be the basis for EU level regulation of sustainable energy production. Ironically, this might hinder the much-needed growth of solar and wind power as hydropower is the main enabler for these technologies. Hydropower is unique in the way it provides double environmental benefits; it is renewable and it enables more renewable power to be connected to the grid.
Furthermore, bioenergy is classified as a transitional energy form in the taxonomy, again going against the principle of technology neutrality. This classification is also in contradiction with the recent RED II directive which includes sustainable criteria for solid biomass. The directive is not set for a limited time and therefore does not consider bioenergy as transitional.
In addition to the content of the taxonomy, Fortum is concerned by the institutional aspects of the proposed delegated acts. In the EU legal framework, comitology procedure such as this one is intended for supplementing or amending non-essential parts of EU legislation. Imposing sustainability criteria that go beyond existing legislation should not, in our view, fall within the power of this procedure. This view is shared by Kim Talus, Professor of European Economic and Energy Law, in an article published in December 2020 by
ELS analysis
VP, Public Affairs Sweden
The EU recently issued draft delegated acts on climate change mitigation and adaptation. The EU taxonomy for sustainable activities creates a classification for sustainable economic activities to help the EU reach its ambitious climate targets. The intentions are good, but in its current form, the taxonomy is likely to prove counterproductive.
its significant concerns relating to the delegated acts.
of the taxonomy – is, in itself, unsustainable.
In addition to the problematic treatment of hydropower, the taxonomy leaves the criteria for nuclear power for a later stage. This creates an imbalance that makes it very difficult to assess the impacts of the taxonomy. Considering all power production forms at the same time would create a better environment for holistic analysis of different energy mixes.
Fortum has expressed
In Fortum’s view, the best way forward would that the European Commission takes the necessary time to review the delegated acts to ensure that they take a holistic view on the contributing energy sources. An impact assessment is also needed to evaluate the effects on not only the energy industry but on end users of energy, such as stock listed companies with non-financial reporting obligations. Technology neutrality and alignment with existing legislation should be the driving principles of the process.
The proposed criteria would lead to a large share of existing hydropower being classified as non-sustainable in the context of the taxonomy. This again could have impacts on energy companies’ possibilities to receive financing for hydro projects as financing institutions would take into account taxonomy alignment in their credit decisions. Although there is not much potential for new hydropower investments, major investments are made each year to refurbishing existing hydro plants and dams and improving their efficiency. Higher capital cost translates to higher production costs and hence reduces the competitiveness of hydropower compared to other renewable energy production.
EU Taxonomy should be beefed up to support carbon neutrality | Fortum
OGEL
Existing EU legislation, namely the water framework directive, already includes sustainability aspects regarding hydropower and the treatment of waterways. It has been applied for two decades and has steered water-related environmental and biodiversity measures successfully. Unlike the taxonomy, the water framework directive with its national applications also takes into account local biological conditions – what is an effective biodiversity investment for a river in Northern Sweden will not benefit a river in the south of France. Therefore these matters should not be regulated by generally applied and geographically blind criteria.
18 December 2020, 16:50
EU Taxonomy should be beefed up to support carbon neutrality
+46 70 2446942
As for hydrogen, the proposed criteria seem to exclude all production means but renewables, and even the Nordic energy grid mix would not be clean enough for sustainable hydrogen production. This kind of approach would be highly counterproductive when it comes to increasing hydrogen power development by excluding virtually all existing grid mixes in the EU. Wind and solar will represent an important bulk of the residual power mix, but they are not enough. We should make sure that we tap into all available CO2 free generation if we want to effectively decarbonize the European economy.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/11/nordic-energy-companies-and-associations-call-technology-neutrality-and-eu-sectorial-legislation-climate-change-mitigation-and-adaptation
could provide unintended effects that undermine national decarbonisation efforts. Our main concern is that the detailed criteria are defined in a non-objective and discriminatory way, thus leading to an
Call for technology neutrality in EU taxonomy for climate change mitigation and adaptation | Fortum
in their
EU taxonomy
decarbonisation strategies
arbitrary selection of the desired technologies
go beyond the powers conferred to the Commission
. Such an outcome would also
and undermining the trust in a most essential element of the European green deal and recovery.
Read the joint letter on the EU taxonomy
affect member states
to conduct
freedom
by the EU Treaty, as delegated acts are intended only to "
The signatories firmly support the objective of climate-neutrality by 2050, as well as a sound framework aimed at channelling the investments needed to implement the ambitious EU climate targets in line with the Paris Agreement.
Whilst well intended, the signatories are most worried that the
Fortum, together with other leading energy players in the Nordics, has issued a joint letter to the ambassadors of the Finnish and Swedish permanent representations in the EU. The purpose of the letter was to express a number of significant concerns in relation the recently issued draft delegated acts on climate change mitigation and adaptation.
identify the needed climate-neutral power mix
. Furthermore, this could also significantly
exclude more than 40% of existing CO2-free power technologies in the EU net electricity generation mix
The letter was sent to the ambassadors prior to the MESG meeting of 25 November where the recently issued draft delegated acts on climate change mitigation and adaptation were discussed. The purpose of the letter was to express a number of significant concerns in relation to the acts. The other companies and associations that signed the letter are Uniper, Vattenfall, Finnish Energy and Swedenergy.
This would be the case if the delegated acts were to
supplement or amend no essential parts of EU legislative acts"
In Fortum, we believe that transforming the European economy into a climate-neutral economy requires an approach that relies on a complementarity of energy technologies, ranging from all renewable sources (wind, solar, hydropower, biomass, geothermal, etc.), nuclear (where it exists), energy storage, and clean gases to carbon-negative technologies. The EU decarbonisation process should be founded on a market-based and climate-oriented policy, following strong carbon pricing, competition amongst climate-neutral technologies and a well-calibrated CO2 threshold.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/newsletter
You will receive the latest topical articles and blog posts about energy-industry and climate change to your email.
Subscribe to ForTheDoers newsletter | Fortum
Fortum ForTheDoers


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/02/robust-and-efficient-emissions-trading-system-key-decarbonising-european-economy
The ETS should be reinforced by revising the linear reduction factor (LRF) in line with the revised 2030 target by 2023 or 2024 at the latest. The market stability reserve (MSR) should be revised by continuing the 24% intake rate after 2023 and adjusting the activation thresholds (400 and 833 Mt).
The ETS should be extended by establishing a stand-alone transitional trading system for the new sectors in order to safeguard the operation of the existing ETS. Potential sectors for the extension include maritime, heating of buildings and, in the longer run, waste incineration.
Fortum’s proposals for the EU 2030 climate regulation
The flexibilities between ETS, ESR, LULUCF should not be increased; the aim should be that each climate policy pillar delivers credible reductions on a stand-alone basis.
Double coverage of sectors has to be avoided. Each sector should be included only under one climate policy pillar (ETS, ESR, LULUCF). The coverage of the effort sharing sector (ESR) should be gradually reduced and related activities moved to the ETS and LULUCF (land use, land use change and forestation).
Read more views and positions
The EU emissions trading system (ETS) must remain as the main instrument of the EU climate policy. The system must be further reinforced and extended in order to be able to deliver on the increased climate ambition.
The European Commission is planning to revise most of the EU climate and energy legislation in 2021. The “Fit for 55” legislative proposals are expected in the summer, and public consultations have just been finalised. Most relevant regulations for Fortum are the emissions trading directive, renewable energy directive, energy efficiency directive and the energy taxation directive. Fortum has provided responses to all consultations.
Fortum firmly supports increasing the EU 2030 climate target to at least 55%. The new target must be allocated between ETS and non-ETS sectors based on cost efficiency. Synergy of the climate target with renewable and energy-efficiency targets must be ensured.
Fortum’s key messages on the revision of the EU climate regulation
Separate targets for greenhouse gas emission reductions and carbon removals, including all forms of natural and technical solutions, are needed. A legislative EU framework for technological solutions for carbon removal and negative emission technologies should be incorporated into the Fit for 55 package.
A robust and efficient emissions trading system is key for decarbonising the European economy | Fortum
Fortum’s proposals for the EU 2030 climate regulation: Emissions Trading Directive (ETS), Effort Sharing Regulation (ESR) and land use, land-use change and forestry regulation (LULUCF)


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/07/fortum-calls-stronger-enforcement-and-improvements-waste-shipment-regulation
Second policy objective: Restrict the export of EU waste to third countries
melander
Require all consents/objections provided by authorities to be also provided in the national language of the notifier or as an English-language version.
Third policy objective: Strengthen the enforcement of the Waste Shipment Regulation’s provisions
Fortum calls for stronger enforcement and improvements of the Waste Shipment Regulation | Fortum
A facilitated notification procedure for non-hazardous waste for recovery, for which currently the same notification procedure applies as for hazardous waste. This includes unlisted waste and waste that requires special consideration according to the Basel convention.
Martina Melander
Together, many of these measures would reduce unnecessary administrative burdens for the companies and the competent authorities involved. History has shown that the measures cannot be achieved on a voluntary basis in each Member State; therefore, changes to the articles in the WSR are necessary.
Introduce common templates for notification contracts between the notifier and the consignee, accepted by competent authorities in all Member States.
Fortum supports the objectives of the Waste Shipment Regulation (WSR) to a great extent but would suggest an extended scope and additional topics to be addressed within each objective.
Allow changes in amounts for an existing valid consent for recovery so that the need for a renewal can be postponed.
Address waste leakage from the EU. This is one of the root causes of the lack of investments in recycling capacity in the EU. Addressing this concern and making “recycled in the EU” a benchmark for high-quality secondary materials would significantly promote investments in recycling and help transition to the EU’s circular economy.
the expert stakeholder questionnaire regarding the Waste Shipment Regulation Impact Assessment – Public Consultation (May 2020)
Below is a summary of our views. The whole policy paper is available
Ensure that the concept with pre-consented recovery facilities, which allows consents for transports for three years instead of one, is accepted and applied in all Member States and that the permit process for pre-consented facilities is facilitated.
Delays by authorities in the approval procedure for written notifications are very common. This violates the rules of the regulation. The time limits specified in the WSR for written notifications are: three working days for transmission/acknowledgement of a notification or request for additional information by the competent authorities; and 30 days for their decision on whether to object to shipments or to give their consent. These time limits are regularly exceeded by the authorities, without any viable reason and without incurring consequences. The ones negatively affected by these violations are the parties involved in the notification. Not only does it make planning difficult, but the delay can also shorten the valid periods for the consent since many authorities are not willing to adjust the shipping period to start on the day the consent is issued – even if the WSR gives them this possibility.
The export of waste to third countries outside the EU shall be subject to equally high environmental and human health protection requirements and controls as waste transports within the EU. If this cannot be ensured, no export shall be supported or allowed.
+46 703 757 864
The preamble to the WSR states:
Allow two different routes, including different means of transport, in the same notification.
Download the policy paper here.
First policy objective: the WSR should support the transition to a circular economy in the EU more effectively
Fortum Waste Solutions is one of the major waste management companies in the EU and a player in the transition to a circular economy within EU through its waste treatment, decontamination of waste streams and recycling of waste to generate valuable secondary raw materials. In addition, we offer remediation of contaminated sites and supplies cities with recovered energy. In doing so, we save natural resources and prevent waste that can harm the environment and human health from ending up where it should not.
This objective should remain the overall and primary aim of the Regulation. The main purpose of the WSR is therefore not to support the transition to a circular economy within the EU. At the same time, the WSR should not create unnecessary obstacles for that transition; rather, as far as possible, it should facilitate the transports of waste, not only green-listed, for recovery and use as secondary raw material, while maintaining a high level of environmental protection.  Possible measures to achieve this within the framework of the review of the WSR are:
Public Affairs Manager, Circular Economy
A strengthening in the enforcement of the Waste Shipment Regulation’s provisions can be seen from different perspectives. A focus on illegal shipments/treatments, as addressed in the Public consultation, is one important aspect strongly supported by Fortum. But stronger enforcement of the WSR-specified time limits for transmissions, acknowledgements and consents/objections by competent authorities for legal transports is also necessary. This might even support fighting illegal transports.
Introduce separate rules for transports of waste destined for the testing of recovery technologies.  This would facilitate investments in innovative and additional treatment capacity for recovery.
“The main and predominant objective and component of this Regulation is the protection of the environment, its effects on international trade being only incidental.”
Facilitate the procedure for renewal of an existing consent for transports under the same conditions as in the previous consent.
Recognise the importance of decontamination of material cycles in the WSR. One well established decontamination technology is waste incineration applying Best Available Techniques.
martina
Introduce an EU-wide harmonised electronic system for waste shipment procedures. Such a system should include a common reporting system for the traceability of hazardous waste as well as registration of the carriers holding the necessary permits for waste transports within the EU.
Fortum has submitted its extended views on the policy objectives via
The free trade on the internal market supporting circular economy activities, including shipments of waste between Member States, requires EU legislation to be adequately and equally enforced.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/02/inclusion-nuclear-and-gas-eu-taxonomy-crucial-step-towards-european-energy-transition-some-criteria-still-need-be-clarified
The inclusion of nuclear and gas in the EU Taxonomy is a crucial step towards European energy transition, but some criteria still need to be clarified | Fortum
On 2 February 2022, the EU Commission adopted the long-awaited Complementary Delegated Act (CDA) establishing criteria for the alignment of nuclear and gas activities with the EU Taxonomy. We welcome the inclusion of these core technologies in the EU Taxonomy but recognise that the final proposal leaves several issues open for interpretation.
We further welcome the EU Commission’s decision to acknowledge the role of natural gas as a necessary transition technology towards climate neutrality. However, the very narrow criteria of the EU taxonomy will make necessary investments in additional gas-fired power plants more difficult in countries where flexible gas is needed for the security of supply.
Throughout the development of the EU taxonomy framework, Fortum has called for a technology-neutral approach and the appropriate recognition of the role of nuclear energy in European energy transition, in line with the Paris agreement. Therefore, we are pleased to see that the complementary delegated act (CDA) recognises the vital contribution of CO2-free nuclear power in the EU decarbonisation efforts.
In line with Fortum’s strategy, our power generation in Europe will be carbon neutral by 2035. We are working towards a carbon-neutral European economy and fully support the EU’s climate commitments. The EU decarbonisation process should be founded on a market-based and climate-oriented policy, following strong carbon pricing, competition amongst climate-neutral technologies and a well-calibrated CO2 threshold.
Towards climate neutrality
However, we remain disappointed that the majority of existing nuclear is not included as was recommended by both the commission’s own research centre and the Finnish and Swedish governments. The final text leaves several issues open for interpretation and further discussions with authorities are also needed.
We are currently having a more detailed analysis on the business impact of the technical screening criteria, including an assessment relating to implications to the potential Loviisa nuclear power plant lifetime extension.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/02/regulatory-framework-needed-speed-development-european-hydrogen-economy
To support the demand for renewable and low-carbon gases in hard-to-abate sectors, the EU needs to take decisive steps in designing fit-for-purpose EU legislation to support the swift deployment of a hydrogen economy in line with the European Commission’s ambitions. In our view, the following four areas of action are crucial to make this transition happen:
Download the full paper with detailed comments (pdf)
A consistent and well-coordinated EU regulatory framework that supports the development of a competitive cross-border market and a pan-European network for hydrogen. The forthcoming legislation on EU gas decarbonisation should be the main instrument for this, complemented by the revision of RED II (REDIII) with due consideration to maintaining a flexible approach to business. Setting unnecessarily restrictive measures risks jeopardising the EU’s hydrogen ambitions and sectoral integration goals.
Regulatory framework needed to speed up the development of a European hydrogen economy | Fortum
Clear and consistent EU-wide definitions for hydrogen. To meet the increasing demand with manageable costs, all forms of carbon-free electricity should be able to play a role in the production of hydrogen. Instead of classifying hydrogen using various “colour codes”, the definition of sustainable hydrogen should thus be based on the carbon footprint of hydrogen. Such a threshold has been set as 3.4 tCO2/eqtH2 under the draft RED III and as 3.0 tCO2/eqtH2 under the draft Hydrogen and Gas Package. Power purchase agreements backed by guarantees of origin and stand-alone guarantees of origin of electricity should be used to define the renewable characteristic of hydrogen together with other forms of sustainable hydrogen.
Energy taxation fit for hydrogen. Hydrogen is not within the scope of the existing Energy Taxation Directive (ETD), so rules for its taxation require clarification. This should be done as part of the upcoming revision of the ETD. The key issue is to define which part(s) of the hydrogen value chain will be subject to taxation. The Directive should allow member states to apply lower tax rates or exempt electricity used for the electrolysis process from energy taxation. Specific levies on top of the price of electricity used for electrolysis should be reduced to a minimum. The usage, transmission and distribution of sustainable hydrogen should be similarly subject to lower tax treatment.
Support mechanisms and incentives focused on EU hydrogen production. To drive the demand for hydrogen, ambitious carbon pricing through the EU ETS is essential. However, as hydrogen technologies are not yet fully mature, support mechanisms are needed to speed up their deployment. Revised EU State Aid Guidelines should establish a common EU framework for hydrogen-related incentives and support mechanisms applicable in all member states. The focus should be on guaranteeing demand for sustainable hydrogen (e.g. competitive tenders and carbon contract for difference) together with incentivizing production.
February 2022
Fortum Group’s position on the regulatory framework needed to speed up the development of a European hydrogen economy


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/11/fortums-position-eu-nature-restoration-regulation
The existing hydro power production, the future renewable energy production and the security of energy supply must be safeguarded.
Fortum's key messages
Fortum proposes the following amendments to the commission proposal in order to safeguard the existing and future renewable energy production and the security of energy supply:
address obsolete barriers, which are those that are no longer needed for renewable energy generation, inland navigation, water supply or other uses.
Fortum supports the EU Biodiversity Strategy and its high ambitions to protect and restore species and habitats.
and ensure synergies with the already designated renewables go-to areas and ensure that the functioning of the renewables go-to areas, including the permitting procedures applicable in the renewables go-to areas foreseen by Directive (EU) 2018/2001 remain unchanged.”
the existing and future renewable energy production and
Art 11(6): “Member States shall coordinate the development of national restoration plans with
The cost-effectiveness and efficiency of the restoration measures must be ensured.
(PDF, 161 KB)
Fortum’s position on EU Nature Restoration Regulation | Fortum
The discussion in Finland and Sweden has been focused on the effects of the EU Nature Restoration regulation on forests. The proposal has potentially major consequences on CO2 free energy production as well.
The proposal includes unclear concepts and definitions that need to be clarified.
Art 7 (2) Member States shall remove the barriers to longitudinal and lateral connectivity of surface waters identified under paragraph 1 of this Article, in accordance with the plan for their removal referred to in Article 12(2), point (f). When removing barriers, Member States shall
Fortum’s position on EU Nature Restoration Regulation Full text
Biodiversity regulation should be aligned with climate change mitigation, renewable energy and security of supply goals.
Art 4(new point): When putting in place the restoration measures referred to in paragraphs 1, 2 and 3, Member States shall address areas, which are those that are not needed for renewable energy generation.
The proposal for a Nature Restoration Regulation could have unforeseen negative consequences for the energy system, in particular for hydro and wind power, and power grids.
Fortum e.g., has a lot of hydro power plants located in areas of habitat types listed in the Annex.
safeguard the existing renewable energy production that helps to secure the energy supply
The flexibility of the regulation should be maintained, allowing Member States to define their own restoration measures.
(remove: primarily)
High ambitions regarding biodiversity, that Fortum supports, should if needed, be supported by legislation which effects are carefully evaluated and overlapping regulation avoided.
the designation of the renewables go-to areas. During the preparation of the nature restoration plans, Member States shall


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/05/fortums-comments-corporate-sustainability-due-diligence-directive
Directors’ duties provisions are unclear and inappropriate
Regarding the obligations, a clear distinction between direct and indirect business partners must be made
SMEs should be included in the scope of the directive
Civil liability rules should be avoided
Fortum comments on CSDD
(PDF, 382 KB)
Clear definitions and obligations are needed
Fortum welcomes the EU initiative and the aim to create a level playing field for companies and avoid a fragmentation of due diligence obligations
Preferable to talk about the supply chain instead of the value chain
Key messages:
Further criteria for the complaints procedure is needed
Supervision of due diligence obligations by Member State authorities and coordination at EU level is welcomed
Fortum welcomes the EU initiative and the aim to create a level playing field for companies and avoid a fragmentation of due diligence obligations. EU level due diligence obligations should be prioritized over national due diligence initiatives. A level playing field is needed also on a global level, therefore Fortum strongly supports the proposal to include third-country companies operating in the Union market in the scope. It’s important that adverse human rights and environmental impacts in the supply chains of companies are addressed and mitigated. However, much work needs to be done to get a directive that works in practice. Coherence with other legislation, such as the EU Taxonomy and sustainability reporting is also essential.
Legal certainty for companies and reasonable administrative burden must be ensured
Fortum's comments on the Corporate Sustainability Due Diligence directive | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/04/position-paper-european-commissions-review-eu-gas-market-design
Natural gas provisions should generally be upheld as they contribute to the creation of liquid markets. Whilst long-term contracts (LTCs) for renewable and low-carbon gases should be promoted, the ban on LTCs of unabated fossil gas beyond 2049 is in line with the overall EU’s objective to reach climate neutrality in 2050.
Read the whole paper (pdf)
Gas storages are paramount to ensuring security of supply and providing flexibility to the overall system. Whilst discussions on storages are evolving quickly in light of the current geopolitical situation, the following points focus exclusively on the review of the Security of Gas Supply Regulation, as proposed by the European Commission on 15 December:
- Vertical unbundling: strict ownership unbundling rules, i.e. the effective separation of network operators from activities of production, supply and storage, should be enshrined into law.
Tariff rebates for renewable and low-carbon gases should in principle be supported provided that sufficient safeguards in terms of transparency, fairness of the cost-allocation system, non-distortion of market signals are inserted. Additional incentives, targeting the uptake of these gases, should be included in the proposals.
Executive summary
Position paper on the European Commission’s Review of the EU Gas Market Design | Fortum
In the transition phase, natural gas will keep playing an important bridging role, as it is deeply established in many Member States. Natural gas reduces emissions significantly by replacing oil, hard coal and lignite and providing flexibility to a system with an increasing share of fluctuating renewables. At the same time, all efforts should be made to deploy renewable and low-carbon gases such as hydrogen or biogas / biomethane on a large scale and facilitate the roll-out of technologies such as carbon capture, utilisation and storage (CCUS).
- Cross-subsidisation: in general, strict separation of different regulated asset bases should be the norm between the hydrogen and gas networks and public support / grants could be envisaged at early stages of hydrogen network development.
The methodology to certify the greenhouse gas emission savings of low-carbon gases should be clarified asap in an annex to the Gas Directive and links with the mass balancing system avoided, as physical tracking of molecules is technically impossible.
The Russian invasion of Ukraine has initiated discussions on the overall EU’s energy strategy, demonstrating the urgency to both accelerate decarbonisation efforts, especially through the deployment of renewables such as renewable and low-carbon gases, and to diversify gas imports to reduce dependencies and ensure the European industry’s and citizens’ security of supply.
- Joint procurement of strategic gas stocks by TSOs should be supported insofar that it remains a voluntary act and that stocks are used only for system stability purposes
+49 173 471 7427
- Third-party access (TPA): regulated TPA should be introduced for hydrogen networks and hydrogen storages, and negotiated TPA for hydrogen terminals under specific circumstances.
Clear definitions for the different types of renewable and low-carbon gases, including hydrogen - e.g. grid-connected electrolytic hydrogen -, are required. A definition for renewable hydrogen is currently missing and should be inserted in the EU framework.
The Russian invasion of Ukraine has initiated discussions on the overall EU’s energy strategy, demonstrating the need to accelerate decarbonisation efforts, especially the deployment of renewables such as renewable and low-carbon gases, including hydrogen. In the transition phase, natural gas will keep playing an important bridging role, as it is deeply established in many Member States.
Whilst the need for flexibility through temporary exemptions should be acknowledged during the first phase of hydrogen infrastructure development, strict regulatory principles will then have to be respected:
- Member States should be required to put in place the necessary measures to ensure security of supply and to demonstrate their choice in their national risk assessments. They should remain free to decide whether and in which form storage facilities should be used as there is no ‘one size fits all’ solution.
VP, Public Affairs Germany
- It should be left to the Member States to determine the entity that manages the purchase of strategic stocks, for instance market areas managers (for instance THE in Germany). In case TSOs are the chosen entities, it should be explicitly stated that the strategic stock can be used by TSOs exclusively to carry out their functions, i.e. safeguard transport network system stability, and not for the superordinate purpose of security of supply
LNG plays an increasingly important role in the EU energy mix as it helps to further diversify gas supplies and enhance competition. Measures increasing transparency will generally contribute to improving the efficiency of the system.
Blending of renewable and low-carbon gases provides for a cost-efficient, swift first step to energy system decarbonisation. The requirement for transmission system operators to accept cross-border flows of gases with a hydrogen content of up to 5% by volume strikes the right balance between support to hydrogen deployment and technical limitations.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/04/position-paper-european-commissions-proposal-methane-emissions-regulation
Methane emissions are a global issue. The creation of a Global Methane Monitoring tool and the strengthening of the International Methane Emissions Observatory (IMEO) are therefore positive. Importers to the EU play an important role in raising awareness on methane emissions. However, their liability should be limited to the provision of information they can effectively collect, such as the name of exporter.
Identifying, quantifying, and minimising sources of methane emissions across the energy industry is crucial to meet the objective of climate neutrality by 2050. The introduction of a dedicated EU Methane Emissions Regulation will significantly contribute to the mitigation of methane emissions at EU level but also globally.
A requirement to perform a yearly LDAR programme should be prescribed. Operators and authorities could then agree on increasing the frequency of LDAR surveys for specifically identified components, based on a number of factors including seasonality, previous experiences and assessments of leak intensity. A requirement to repair all detected leaks in a reasonable timeframe should be introduced.
Position paper on the European Commission’s Proposal for a Methane Emissions Regulation | Fortum
Methane Emissions Regulation
Methane’s global warming potential is estimated to be at least 25 times that of carbon dioxide over a 100-year horizon and even greater on a 20-year horizon. Identifying, quantifying, and minimising sources of methane emissions across the energy industry is therefore crucial.
’ legislative package on 15 December 2021, which aims to tackle methane emissions in the energy sector with a new proposal for a
In light of this, we welcome the publication by the European Commission of the ‘
Hydrogen and Decarbonised Gas Market
Sufficient time should be foreseen to enable operators, importers, verifiers and authorities to fulfil their requirements under this Regulation.
Proportionality is key when tackling methane emissions as a small amount of infrastructures and events are responsible for the overwhelming majority of methane emissions.
Venting and flaring events should be limited to the extent possible. However, they cannot be eliminated completely due to safety reasons. The ban on routine flaring and requirement to avoid venting should therefore be supported, provided that exemptions are foreseen in case of emergency and when unavoidable and strictly necessary.
The Methane Emissions Regulation should refer to existing technologies, practices and standards insofar as possible, including the Oil and Gas Methane Partnership (OGMP) 2.0.
A doubling of reporting efforts should always be prevented. Yearly methane emission reports mentioned in article 12 should also cover results of LDAR surveys and venting and flaring events to limit the administrative burden for both operators and authorities.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/08/fortum-urges-ec-reconsider-recycling-terms-new-technologies
2. Classification of waste as hazardous:
EU List of Waste should reflect new waste streams
The List of Waste must be revised to better reflect the emerging waste streams and of particular interest for achieving the objectives of circular economy
In order to ensure the interface between the EU POPS regulation and the WFD is coherent in terms of classification and enforcement, the WFD need a definition for POPS waste. Fortum therefore suggests the Commission add a definition for POPs waste in the revision of the WFD and revise the classification rules in EU LoW (2014/955/EU) as follows:
The current definition of recycling should consider the utilisation of captured carbon of waste origin for the manufacturing of materials. The calculation rules need to be revised to be applicable to materials recycled with these new technologies. For example: with waste streams that are technically difficult to recycle via conventional methods, CCU incorporated to a Waste-to-Energy plant could greatly increase e.g. the recycling rate of plastic packaging. Capturing and utilising carbon of waste origin to produce new products, such as plastics, can also enable the recycling of those plastic packaging wastes that have not been properly source separated (by households) and end up to municipal solid waste for energy recovery. New technologies have been developed to recover valuable minerals and metals from incineration residues, e.g. fly ashes, that historically have been disposed of. This practice should be recognised and incentivised in the revised WFD.
Koivisto
(PDF, 209 KB)
A definition for POPs waste must be added in the WFD in order to better align the WFD with the rules in EU POPs regulation
Fortum welcomes the revision the Waste Framework Directive (WFD) with the objective to improve waste management and increase the protection of the environment and public health by reducing waste generation and increasing reuse, and by improving separate collection and quality recycling. Making the best use of materials many times over saves natural resources.
Replace with:
2.d 'POPs waste' means waste which contains Persistent Organic Pollutants listed in annex IV of EU (2019/1021) exceeding the concentration limit values;
A definition for POPs waste must be added in the WFD
Fortum urges the EC to reconsider recycling in terms of new technologies | Fortum
As part of Fortum Corporation, the Fortum Recycling & Waste business area’s objective is to move towards a low-emission energy system and the optimal use of resources. Our goal is to support our customers’ businesses by conserving natural resources and promoting a circular economy. We work together with our customers to build smart and sustainable solutions to ensure the circulation of valuable materials and the removal of harmful substances from the material cycle.
'POPs waste'
The separate collection of well-defined recyclable waste streams (separated from waste streams containing legacy substances, such as persistent organic pollutants that are to be phased out from the material cycles) must be controlled, and the Waste Framework Directive must regulate this in a supportive manner.
In the EU List of Waste (2014/955/EU)
Fortum believes the success, to a large extent, is in the evolution of the waste directive to turn waste into a resource. It is very important to keep track of the waste streams containing materials of particular interest, e.g. materials originating from waste batteries. Therefore, we urge the EU to start revising the EU List of Waste (LoW) to reflect the emerging new waste streams.
Materials produced from incineration residues and captured carbon should be recognized in the scope of recycling
Martina Melander, Public Affairs Manager, +46703757864,
Add to article 3 Definitions:
Fortum Recycling & Waste employs approximately 1 000 employees in about 30 offices and treatment centres in Finland, Sweden, Denmark, Norway and UK.
New technologies for waste recycling are emerging rapidly, such as chemical recycling and material manufacturing based on captured carbon from waste treatment, including carbon capture and utilisation (CCU). The EU legal framework should remain technology neutral. Current recycling schemes based on separate collection and mechanical recycling have their limitations, economically and technically, and that is why the EU should remain open to new technologies in its actions to improve recycling rates.
The scope of recycling must be reconsidered
Contact: Janne Koivisto, Public Affairs Manager, +358503213639
Wastes containing polychlorinated dibenzo-p-dioxins and dibenzofurans (PCDD/PCDF), DDT (1,1,1-trichloro-2,2- bis (4-chlorophenyl)ethane), chlordane, hexachlorocyclohexanes (including lindane), dieldrin, endrin, heptachlor, hexaclorobenzene, chlordecone, aldrine, pentachlorobenzene, mirex, toxaphene hexabromobiphenyl and/or PCB exceeding the concentration limits indicated in Annex IV to Regulation (EC) No 850/2004 of the European Parliament and of the Council (1) shall be classified as hazardous.
Remove:
Janne
Fortums position paper for the WDF revision June 2022


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/02/eu-proposal-battery-regulation-fortum-sees-ambitious-targets-prerequisite-sustainable-batteries-value-chain
Fortum's response on the EU's proposal for battery regulation
The inconsistencies in the classification of waste batteries in the EU Waste Directive, the Battery Directive and the Waste Shipment Regulation cause different interpretations and practices within the internal market. When reviewing the list of waste 2000/532/EC, we stress the importance of including waste codes for the types of batteries that are foreseen to arise and waste codes for residues from treatment of waste batteries. With the current procedure to assign waste codes, waste batteries could arise in most chapters (activities), and it is relevant to assess if waste batteries should exist in all relevant chapters, or if the waste batteries should be dedicated to a separate chapter including waste materials occurring from the treatment of battery waste.
janne
Fortum welcomes the European Commission´s proposal COM(2020) 798 for a regulation concerning batteries and waste batteries, which sets minimum sustainability requirements for batteries in the entire value chain. Europe has a great opportunity to capture a large share of the global market for batteries manufacturing. In this paper, we give our opinion on the proposal with particular focus on industrial and electric vehicle batteries of the Li-ion type. Batteries are likely to be a key enabler for sustainable mobility and for the integration of renewable electricity generation in the grids.
Having a strong battery value chain is of strategic value and importance for Europe as well as for our industry.
Key messages
EU proposal for a battery regulation: Fortum sees the ambitious targets as a prerequisite for a sustainable batteries value chain | Fortum
, Public Affairs Manager, Circular economy,
Fortum is actively involved in several parts of the batteries value chain
The European Union has so far attempted various policy developments supporting the establishment of battery manufacturing in the EU and in securing the supply of critical raw materials. With this proposal for a regulation, attention has been put to the entire battery value chain from cradle to cradle. The information exchange from producer to recyclers has been improved by the proposal, however, attention to safe logistics and the safe recycling of worn-out batteries should receive more attention.
We welcome the high recycling targets and want to point out that collection targets are equally important and should apply to both portable and non-portable batteries.
koivisto
Download in pdf
We use batteries for energy storage, we provide charging stations for Electric Vehicles (EV), and we are currently developing a larger scale recycling solution for Li-ion batteries. The aim is to be a major supplier of secondary raw materials in batteries manufacturing.
The delegated acts on carbon footprint could support the use of recycled materials with a low carbon footprint and should be developed considering the entire batteries value chain, including recycling.
To create a level-playing-field within the internal market and in competition with non-EU countries, it is important to ensure that all batteries entering the EU meet the new, high sustainability standards set by the new EU regulation.
//janne
Don’t hesitate to contact us for more information about our views.
, Public Affairs Manager,
Public Affairs Manager
We welcome the modulation requirements of the financial contributions paid by the producers to the producer responsibility organisations. Extended Producer Responsibility (EPR) schemes should reward the use of recycled materials.
Janne Koivisto
The proposal for an electronic exchange system sharing information necessary for safe recycling and repurposing serves the objectives of the regulation to improve material resource efficiency in the batteries value chain. It may also improve the safety of the workers in waste management. We find it essential to secure the compatibility of the electronic information requirements introduced in the proposal.
We use a non-thermal hydrometallurgical and low-carbon emission recovery process to recover valuable materials from Li-ion batteries. The non-thermal recovery process makes it possible for Fortum to reduce CO2 emissions and have higher recovery yields compared to traditional thermal methods.
We welcome the targets on recycled content in industrial batteries, electric vehicle batteries and automotive batteries. This is a key measure to increase the demand of recycled raw materials and speed up investments in battery recycling. We urge the EU to also consider setting targets for the uptake of recycled raw materials in the manufacturing of portable Li-Ion batteries. Recycled content may also be derived from other waste sources than batteries, such as industrial waste streams.
The EU should take measures to prevent used batteries from leaking out from the EU by setting up an effective control mechanism for the exports of used batteries in order to secure the future supply of critical raw materials.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/08/fortum-groups-messages-eu-draft-rules-climate-energy-and-environmental-state-aid-guidelines
Read more: our contribution to the Commission's consultation
Investment aid should be preferred over operating aid. However, in new business models where operating expenses represent the majority of the costs, such as hydrogen electrolysis, there is a need for operating aid to help this technology mature and become competitive in the longer term.
For additional information, please contact:
Sebastian Veit
A functioning market and strong CO2 steering should remain key drivers for implementation of the climate targets, and we need to create the favourable framework conditions to encourage and facilitate investments in new clean technologies and innovations, such as hydrogen, synthetic fuels and CCS/CCU. Public support should be considered to help these new technologies mature and to facilitate their market take-up.
, Vice President, Corporate Public Affairs, Fortum (
sebastian
, Senior Vice President, Government Relations, Uniper (
Fortum Group highlights several core principles as essential drivers for the fulfilment of the Green Deal. These include among others a meaningful price signal including CO2 price, using public money rather than leveraging costs in the form of levies and using the carbon content as the main basis for an environmental bonus.
The attached paper includes our detailed comments regarding several items in the CEEAG draft important for the energy sector, such as development of the clean hydrogen economy, decarbonisation of the heating sector, advancing carbon removal technologies, supporting biodiversity and renewable energy, compensating energy system services (ancillary services) as well as acknowledging the role of natural gas in supporting a safe and secure energy transition.
Fortum Group’s messages to the EU draft rules on the Climate, Energy and Environmental State Aid Guidelines | Fortum
Our key messages
Meeting the EU’s climate goals will require substantial financial investments. We therefore fully endorse the efforts of the European Commission to support public and private investments, especially through the review of the Climate, Energy and Environmental State Aid Guidelines (CEEAG).
veit
The Fortum Group welcomes the objective of reviewing the EU State Aid rules in line with the EU climate neutrality goal.
We welcome the update of the State Aid guidelines. It is important to align State Aid rules with the objectives of the established EU climate neutrality goal and the EU’s ‘Fit for 55’ legislative package. Transparent, clear and smooth guidelines are key to support the implementation of State Aid without creating additional bureaucratic burden.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/12/fortum-groups-position-european-commissions-proposal-carbon-border-adjustment-mechanism-cbam
EU Transparency ID
The primary goal of the CBAM should be to support decarbonisation efforts outside the EU and provide incentives for third countries to introduce carbon pricing and therefore avoid the costs of the EU CBAM.
CBAM certificates will have an impact on the price of imported products, and this needs to be considered in existing and future contracts. As the price of CBAM certificates is based on a weekly average price of EUAs, price risk management in contracts is important.
Position paper in pdf
Fortum: 03501997362-71
kavita
Calculation of the carbon content in imported goods is the key for the successful operation of the CBAM. The European Commission’s proposal to use either default values or actual emissions is understandable. In our view, the asset-specific or marginal emissions should be used rather than country or price area averages. Using average values unjustifiably penalises less CO2-intensive imports, rewards more CO2-intensive imports, and misses the additionality effect that exports often have on production. In the power markets, Guarantees of Origin (GoO) are reliable instruments for proving the origin of a specific volume of electricity and its carbon content. For any imports without GoOs, the CO2-emissions of the marginal or price-setting power generation in the relevant price area should be used. Only as a last resort, the average emission intensity could be applied.
Fortum Group's position on the European Commission's proposal for a Carbon Border Adjustment Mechanism (CBAM) | Fortum
We support the European Commission’s approach to start piloting the CBAM with a few products in a limited number of sectors, including electricity. Cross-border power imports from third countries to the EU are likely to increase, potentially resulting in further carbon leakage. Combined with the EU’s strengthened climate ambition, it necessitates the establishment of the CBAM for the power sector. The CBAM could maintain the integrity of the EU’s climate policy in the power sector and ensure that the price of power imports reflects the actual carbon content.
Kavita Ahluwalia, Head of Global Positioning, Uniper (
Establishing the CBAM is challenging from an international trade perspective, and ensuring WTO compliance is certainly key for political acceptance of this instrument.
European industry is in global competition and subject to the EU climate targets and carbon price (EU ETS), whereas its competitors outside the EU do not have corresponding climate ambitions and pricing. Although evidence of realised carbon leakage is disputed, concern regarding the competitiveness of European industry is justified and needs to be further considered. It is not just a concern for industry, but also for the power sector. The Commission should continuously assess the risk for carbon leakage and revise carbon leakage policies accordingly. Whenever possible, overlapping carbon leakage policies should be avoided.
ahluwalia
In our view, the primary solution to preventing carbon leakage is more extensive global carbon pricing. However, currently only 20% of global emissions are subject to any kind of carbon pricing, and having a broad global pricing system in the near future is unlikely. In the absence of global carbon pricing, the EU’s increasing climate ambition necessitates stronger measures, such as the CBAM, to prevent carbon leakage.
For additional information:
Although it is logical and simple to start with scope 1 emissions, inclusion of scope 2 emissions ought to be considered during the 2023-2025 transitional phase, subject to the European Commission’s ability to collect sufficient data. Inclusion of scope 2 emissions is important, because industrial companies in the EU ETS pay for the marginal carbon costs of power generation in the electricity they procure, but their third country competitors do not. The inclusion of scope 2 emissions would thus facilitate the uptake of clean electricity (and heat/steam) in third countries. The ultimate goal should be to include all life cycle emissions of products in the scope of the CBAM.
Fortum and Uniper form a European energy group committed to enabling a successful transition to carbon neutrality for everyone. Our 50 gigawatts of power generating capacity, substantial gas import and storage operations, and our global energy trading business enable us to provide Europe and other regions with a reliable supply of low-carbon energy. We are already Europe’s third largest producer of CO2-free electricity, and our growth businesses focus on clean power, low-carbon energy, and the infrastructure for tomorrow’s hydrogen economy. In addition, we design solutions that help companies and cities reduce their environmental footprint. Our 20,000 professionals and operations in 40 countries give us the skills, resources, and reach to empower energy evolution toward a cleaner world. www.fortum.com ; www.uniper.energy
We welcome the proposal to phase out free allowances from sectors under the CBAM. This will have a big impact for the EU ETS, as the sectors under the CBAM cover about half of the allocation. We nevertheless have to acknowledge that electricity is not subject to free allocation (with the exception of article 10c), and therefore the CBAM will not be an overlapping measure in the power sector. As such, the CBAM should be applied to electricity in full from the very beginning.
Uniper: 285977820662-03
Kari Kankaanpää, Head of Public Affairs, Fortum (
20 December 2021
As a general principle, the CBAM should not undermine the effectiveness and operation of the EU ETS. The Commission’s proposal meets these criteria, as CBAM certificates and EU emission allowances remain as separate commodities and the CBAM is not overlapping with free allocation of allowances.
About Fortum and Uniper
This position paper presents Fortum Group’s priorities on the CBAM. The position has been jointly agreed between Fortum and Uniper.
The European Commission proposes to apply the CBAM to direct CO2 emissions (scope 1) only. This means that a potentially significant share of actual emissions embedded in imported goods would be excluded from the CBAM.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/01/nordic-energy-utilities-call-swift-revision-eu-2030-climate-and-energy-legislation
Stimulate the demand for carbon free energy carriers in order to speed up investments in generation assets and infrastructure. Ensure the strengthening of grids and interconnectors across EU regions to enable the full potential of carbon free electricity and clean hydrogen.
The CEO's of the three large Nordic utilities: Markus Rauramo of Fortum, Christian Rynning-Tønnesen of Statkraft and Anna Borg of Vattenfall
1. Strengthening and enlarging the EU ETS as a key driver for decarbonisation
3. Strengthening cost efficiency and markets through technology neutrality
The joint statement in pdf
ii. Introduce carbon pricing in other sectors like maritime, heating of buildings and transport, possibly through separate transitional ETS with a plan for future integration under the current EU ETS cap.
our already large and growing carbon-free asset basis
Direct and indirect electrification is not only the most cost-efficient solution and main instrument for decarbonising other sectors, but
Substituting fossil fuels with electricity will lead to significant increases in demand for electricity and clean gases. W
also contributes to realizing energy efficiency gains and sector
e remain fully committed to satisfy this demand with
We want to highlight three key elements with regard to a swift adjustment of the EU 2030 climate and energy policy framework:
Safeguard the technology neutrality principle in the Taxonomy Regulation by ensuring that the screening criteria are defined objectively and applied evenly in order to enable a full utilization of existing and new carbon-free power production assets to cost-efficiently deliver on the EU climate neutrality objective.
2. Enhancing electrification to accelerate the decarbonisation of the EU economy
Nordic energy utilities call for swift revision of the EU 2030 climate and energy legislation | Fortum
integration. Clean hydrogen should complement the use of carbon free electricity specifically in hard-to abate industrial and transport sectors.
Fortum, Statkraft and Vattenfall, the three largest Nordic energy utilities welcome the EU’s revised 2030 climate target of at least -55% as a crucial step on the path towards 2050 climate neutrality.
Promote well-functioning power markets and allow support for less-mature technologies in a transitional phase, such as Carbon Contracts for Difference to cover the cost gap between conventional and low-carbon technologies, and avoid market distortions stemming from such support. It is also key to maintain the unbundling principle for ownership and operation of storage and supply of required flexibility.
Secure a strong Market Stability Reserve (MSR) that can tackle unforeseen imbalances and policy overlaps also beyond 2023. This includes a permanent “intake rate” of 24% and a narrowing of the activation threshold band (400-833 Mt)
i. Focus on a swift revision of the current EU ETS:
The complementarity of technologies plays a key role in keeping transition costs down and making the energy transition affordable to customers. In this respect, we suggest to
The Nordic coalition:
Align the Linear Reduction Factor (LRF) with the new EU 2030 climate target from 2023.
We fully agree with the Commission's commitment to the EU ETS as the core climate policy instrument. In our view, carbon pricing should be applied as broadly as possible in the economy, possibly supported by other instruments particularly in the non-ETS sectors. We propose a two-step approach for the Commission’s upcoming legislative proposal for the revised EU ETS directive:
to reflect gradually declining hedging needs.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/12/fortum-groups-position-european-commissions-proposal-revision-eu-emissions-trading-system-eu-ets
This position paper presents Fortum Group’s priorities on the EU ETS. The position has been jointly agreed between Fortum and Uniper.
Gradual expansion of the EU ETS to other sectors (e.g. maritime transport, as proposed by the European Commission) will help safeguard climate ambitions at lowest cost to the overall EU economy.
We support the introduction of a separate Emissions Trading System for buildings and transport and the prospect of merging both systems into one in the near future. We urge the EU to implement a meaningful carbon price across all sectors as soon as possible and to make sure that eventually all carbon emissions from industry, transportation, and households that do not fall under the EU ETS are covered by the new ETS, to remove distortions of competition.
For this reason, preference is for a gradual or two-step approach that would first see new sectors included in a separate market-based trading system running in parallel to the current EU ETS. Such a parallel system could well include proven elements of the current ETS, such as the Linear Reduction Factor (LRF), carbon leakage provisions, and established MRV procedures, along with a review clause that would assess whether sectors or parts of sectors are ready for integration into the EU ETS.
We support the proposal to continue the 24% intake rate until 2030 and to adjust the market stability reserve (MSR) thresholds. Although the buffer zone proposal is appropriate and makes the system more predictable, the buffer zone may weaken the operation of the MSR. As such, a lowering of the upper threshold from 833 million should be considered. A lower upper threshold would mirror the lower hedging needs by power sector operators due to a growing share of renewable electricity and increased coal-to-gas switching.
Emissions in the ETS sector have decreased by about 35% between 2005 and 2019. Non-ETS as a whole has reduced by 10%.
. Its importance is becoming ever more apparent in the context of the EU’s long-term climate ambitions of achieving climate neutrality by 2050. This, along with an increased CO2 reduction target by 2030, is very much in line with our ambition of going carbon neutral with our European power generation by 2035.
As such, we very much welcome the efforts of the European Commission to review and strengthen the EU ETS. We call for a swift adoption of the file, as the market participants need predictability for investments and for the energy market. The later the ETS reform is adopted, the starker the immediate impact on them will be. The climate files of the Fit for 55 package should be adopted as soon as possible and independently of the most controversial and political files where the process may take more time. We understand that consistency of the ETS with other parts of the Fit for 55 package is important, but quick adoption is a preference.
Carbon Contracts for Difference may support innovation, but should neither undermine nor substitute incentives from the EU ETS. CCfD can be the right instrument to spur innovation and to reduce carbon emissions where the business case is not economically viable.
The new ETS
The emissions trading system is the most cost-efficient instrument to decarbonise the European economy. We commend the Commission’s approach to upholding cost-efficiency as the basis for the allocation of the 2030 target between ETS and non-ETS sectors.
Fortum Group's position on the European Commission's proposal for a revision of the EU emissions trading system (EU ETS) | Fortum
We think that waste incineration should be included in the ETS during the ongoing revision to encourage waste treatment facilities to decarbonize, incentivize households, services and industries to generate less waste and recycle more as the price of treatment increases. The inclusion of this sector would create incentives to reduce emissions e.g. in plants equipped with CCS/CCU technologies.
Both Fortum and Uniper have long been strong supporters of the EU Emissions Trading System (EU ETS). It continues to be regarded as the EU’s flagship policy towards achieving Europe’s climate objectives in a cost-effective manner – and rightly so, in light of its success to date
ETS ambition
We believe that CO2 removal and negative emissions technologies (e.g. bioenergy with carbon capture and storage, BECCS) complement the EU’s existing climate change mitigation tools and will be necessary for reaching net negative emissions after 2050. Carbon removals (both natural and technological) should be additional to emissions reduction. In order to make carbon removal and negative emissions technologies commercially viable and to upscale them, they should be incentivised. They should be better recognised in legislation and, ideally, promoted via market-based tools, i.e. carbon pricing.
Carbon contracts for difference
We support the proposal to increase the linear reduction factor (LRF) and implement a one-off rebasing of the cap. However, in the case that adoption of the revised directive is much delayed, allocation of rebasing over several years would be wise, in our view.
It is important to protect the operation of the existing ETS. The rapid inclusion of new sectors in the EU ETS, such as buildings or transport, may result in an overall insufficient, relatively low price signal for these sectors to decarbonise. Indeed, abatement efforts would mainly materialise in the current ETS sectors, leaving them exposed to a relatively high CO2 and thus higher exposure to carbon leakage, thereby jeopardising the industrial base of our European economies.
At present, the EU ETS Directive foresees a maximum funding rate of 60% of the relevant costs for projects financed through the Innovation Fund. This could be increased but only in cases where competitive bidding (e.g. via CCfD) are utilised. In any case, CCfD should be used in a very focused manner and only for the most promising technologies that help us leapfrog ahead.
A credible, reinforced, and expanded EU ETS, providing a reliable price on CO2 emissions whilst ensuring the necessary flexibility for operators, is key to achieving the European 2030 climate targets and the 2050 climate neutrality objective in a cost-effective way. At present, the EUA price is at an all-time high, a direct reflection of the political ambition set out in the European Climate Law and in the proposals of the Fit for 55 package, as well as a clear signal from the market and a sign of its trust in this instrument.
Carbon removals
The EU ETS proposal includes a new incentive: a Carbon Contract for Difference (CCfD) that has been mentioned in connection with the Innovation Fund. In the CCfD model, financial support is linked to the price of emissions allowances. We consider this an interesting funding model and it should be looked at in more detail, as it serves to promote the uptake of emissions reduction technologies.
However, we are concerned about the design of the new ETS. The setup of the new system seems complicated regarding the establishment of the cap and the MSR design. We urge for caution on price-based triggers in the MSR and instead would ask to opt for volume-based triggers, as we have in the existing ETS. The basic design of the two systems should be similar and the ground for future linking should be prepared now.
ETS scope
The EU needs a legislative framework for technological solutions for carbon removal and negative emissions technologies. Proven stationary removals should be integrated into the EU ETS. We welcome the Commission’s plan to issue a certification scheme for removals in 2022 as a first step.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/01/fortums-feedback-ec-proposal-revised-waste-shipment-regulation
Several new time limits for the notification process are introduced in Article 8 and Article 9 of the draft proposal. Fortum welcomes this, but all given time limits defined by a certain number of days must correspond to working days, not only for the competent authorities but also for the notifier. The Articles must also include a possibility for the notifier to apply for an extended deadline if necessary. Extended deadlines must be a possibility also for competent authorities, if due to reasonable delays in the handling of a notification. Delays could otherwise lead to unreasonable consequences for the notifier, i.e., the annulment of an unprocessed notification. If a notifier is not provided with a motivated explanation from the competent authority for an annulment of a notification, no administrative costs according to Article 29 shall be charged.
Different routes and means of transport in consents for general notifications
To prevent harmful substances from remaining in recycled material, these have to be continuously separated from the recycling loop. This is common knowledge in the process industry, where an effluent flow is a must in order to keep the material flow in the process free from contaminants. Separated harmful substances must be destroyed, which is usually done by using waste disposal operations. The purpose of so-called decontamination is to enable clean material loops by separating and disposing of waste with harmful substances. The concept of decontamination in this context is well known by the waste treatment sector and also recognised, among others, in the preparatory work for the EU strategy for Zero Pollution. The decontamination is not just a pre-condition for the recovery itself, but also for the transition to a circular economy. Fortum therefore suggests that the limitations for transboundary shipments for disposal within the EU should not include shipments with the purpose of decontamination. Accordingly, we suggest that shipments for decontamination be added to Article 11.1 (a) and that the definition of decontamination be added to Article 3 in the proposal.
Facilitate the procedure for renewal of an existing consent for transports under the same conditions as in the previous consent
We support the objectives of the Waste Shipment Regulation (WSR) to a great extent. Nonetheless, the draft proposal still has overall objectives and new wordings that need to be addressed and explained in more detail.
Decontamination of waste streams – a pre-condition for the transition to a circular economy
Fortum advocates two different routes in the same general notification as an option, including different means of transport. This would, for example, enable the notifier to include both sea and road transport in the same notification and to decide on either option depending on the conditions on the day of the actual start of a single transport. Ice can obstruct the seaway during a cold winter, although sea transport would be the preferred way of transport during all other seasons.
Annex 1C, IV, Specific instructions for completing the notification document, notes that the requirement for a second signature on the notification document shall be realised only “where practical”. Fortum suggests that the wording “where practical” be included also in Article 5(2).
As part of Fortum Corporation, the Fortum Recycling & Waste business area leads the change towards a low-emission energy system and the optimal use of resources. Our goal is to support our customers’ businesses by conserving natural resources and promoting a circular economy. We work together with our customers to build smart and sustainable solutions to ensure the circulation of valuable materials and the removal of harmful substances from the material cycle.
Fortum's feedback on the EC proposal for a revised Waste Shipment Regulation | Fortum
Second signature on the Notification document only where practical
Working days, extended time limits and administrative costs
In June 2020 Fortum submitted
Common templates for notification contracts
The proposal is lacking templates for notification contracts. Fortum suggests that common templates for notification contracts between the notifier and the consignee, with wording accepted by competent authorities in all Member States, be introduced. The present situation, whereby the wording may be acceptable in one Member State but not in other Member States involved in the process, causes unnecessary delays in the notification procedure.
Article 27 (1) requires that: “Any notification, information, documentation or other communication submitted pursuant to the provisions of this Title shall be provided in a language acceptable to the competent authorities concerned.” This requirement should be made mutual, i.e., provided in a language acceptable also to the notifier, or as alternative at least in an English-language version. This is already the practise for several authorities, but not all. Fortum supports the introduction of new time limits for the notification process as stated in Article 8 and Article 9 of the draft proposal. But it is of most importance that neither authorities nor notifiers are delayed in their commitments due to language difficulties. In terms of the consent, including the Movement document, following each transport, at minimum an English-language version must be provided to make it understandable also for the carrier staff. Not providing this can cause misunderstandings and unnecessary risks in connection with waste transports, since extended language skills is neither a normal nor reasonable request for carrier personnel.
The WSR and the draft proposal do not define the terms reception and acceptance, and the terms are used as if they are synonymous. For a reception plant, however, there is a big difference between these two occasions. Reception means that a waste delivery is unloaded at the reception plant, and normally also weighed. Acceptance means that the waste is checked, maybe analysed, and, only if the waste fulfils the criteria given for the delivery in the consent for the shipment, is accepted by the reception plant. As long as the reception plant certifies the acceptance and not only the reception of the waste in Box 18 on the Movement document, the time limit for this procedure must be at least three working days, instead of just one day as proposed in article 15 and 16.
Download the paper in pdf
BAT also for the treatment of exported waste
Article 13 (1c) in the draft proposal calls for the routing for all transports in a general notification to be the same. However, the wording in Annex II to the proposal opens up the possibility for alternative routing: Annex II (14): “Intended routing (point of exit from and entry into each country concerned, including customs offices of entry into and/or exit from and/or export from the Union) and intended route (route between points of exit and entry), including possible alternatives, also in case of unforeseen circumstances.” Fortum wishes that possible alternatives for routing, as expressed in Annex II (14), be included also in Article 13 of the Regulation.
Information and consents in a language acceptable also to the notifier
a policy paper on the EU’s Public Consultation on the Waste Shipment Regulation (WSR) revision
in which Fortum shared its extended view on the policy. In summary, Fortum supported the objectives but also suggested an extended scope and additional topics to be addressed within each objective. Fortum is pleased to see that several of the company’s policy objectives have been addressed in the draft proposal for a revised WSR. Nonetheless, the draft proposal still has overall objectives that need to be addressed and explained once more as well as new wordings that need to be addressed in more detail.
Fortum Recycling & Waste employs approximately 650 employees in about 30 offices and treatment centres in Finland, Sweden, Denmark, and Norway.
Fortum addressed this topic in the public consultation in June 2020. Annex II (1) of the proposal stated that: “In case the notifier has previously obtained consent(s) for the shipment of the same types of waste to the same facility, the serial number or other accepted identifier of notification document of these previously consented shipments may also be indicated.” It is not stated how this should influence the notification procedure. Fortum supports the idea that the procedure for a repeated consent under the same conditions as the previous is facilitated. If this is also the Commission’s intention, it should be expressed more concretely to support the competent authorities in the decision process.
Article 5 (2) prescribes: “When the notifier is not the original waste producer referred to in Article 3, point (6)(a)(i), the notifier shall ensure that the original waste producer or one of the persons indicated in Article 3, points (6)(a)(ii) or (iii), also signs the notification document.”
One day is not enough for acceptance of a waste delivery
The draft proposal establishes requirements for the treatment of waste exported from the EU. To avoid exports to countries with less stringent environmental standards, Fortum suggests that requirements equal to BAT, as set forth in EU legislation, shall apply also to treatment facilities outside the EU, when such requirements are a prerequisite for treatment within the union.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/public-affairs/our-messages-eu-fit-55-package
Decarbonisation efforts shared more evenly across all sectors
EU Fit for 55 package - our key takeaways
Hydrogen as an emerging technology requires the establishment of a consistent and business-oriented regulatory EU framework. Whilst the further expansion of renewables will be key in hydrogen development, limiting it to only new-build renewable installations (“additionality”) will not enable a cost-efficient and prompt development of the European hydrogen economy.
REDII with increased renewables ambition supports the climate goal
Renewable energy sources are an essential contributor to the further decarbonization of the energy sector, and they need to be complemented with clean dispatchable technologies such as low-carbon electricity, energy storage, and hydrogen produced from renewables and low-carbon energy sources.
Targets and legislative instruments need to be better synchronised
The hydrogen legislation must be well-balanced and technology-neutral
EU Fit for 55 package - our key takeaways | Fortum
We welcome the Commission’s proposal to strengthen the existing ETS by increasing the LRF of the ETS to 4.2% starting in the year after entry into force of the legislation, rebasing the cap, and strengthening the MSR. We appreciate the Commission’s proposal to increase the MSR intake rate to 24% until 2030. These changes will give long-awaited predictability for the companies in their decarbonization efforts.
Carbon pricing is the most cost-efficient, technology-neutral and flexible instrument in emission reduction. We welcome the Commission’s proposal to establish a standalone emissions trading system for heating of buildings and transport with a separate carbon price that will gradually converge with the main ETS. It is an appropriate approach to extend carbon pricing to new sectors without jeopardising the functioning of the existing EU ETS.
At the first glance, the Fit for 55 package seems to provide a balanced approach to various climate and energy policy areas. However, the synchronisation of targets and different legislative instruments remains a key issue going forward. It is of high importance to provide coordination between the Emissions Trading Directive and the parallel revision of the Energy Efficiency Directive (EED) and the revised Renewable Energy Directive (REDII). Renewable, low-carbon electricity and hydrogen produced from renewables and low-carbon energy sources together with increased energy efficiency all contribute to the achievement of the EU’s climate target.
Our key messages on the package:
The Fit for 55 package highlights cost-effective allocation of the efforts amongst various sectors; Fortum strongly supports this approach. Sector integration through electrification and hydrogen produced from renewables and low-carbon energy sources play an important role in decarbonising other sectors, increasing both cost- and energy efficiency.
Fortum Group welcomes the Fit for 55 package: it sets the EU on the right pathway towards climate neutrality by 2050 and demonstrates the EU’s global leadership in mitigating climate change. However, going forward it will be crucial to take a cost-efficient and technology-neutral approach for the necessary transformation of the European economy.
Ambitious, cost-efficient, technology-neutral and fair energy and climate legislation is crucial to set the path towards a climate neutral future.
The energy sector has a lot at stake in the EU Fit for 55 package
On 14 July 2021, the European Commission published an extensive legislative package (Fit for 55) that revises basically all EU climate and energy legislation. The aim of the package is to reach the new, tightened target of 55% less emissions by 2030 from 1990.
A fully new legislative element in the Fit for 55 package is the proposal for the carbon border adjustment mechanism (CBAM) including electricity imports from outside the EU. While it will support the competitiveness of the EU’s own production, it will also encourage third countries to develop their climate regulation and emissions pricing systems. Concerns remain with regard to its WTO compatibility and negative reactions from major trading partners such as the United States.
Extending carbon pricing to buildings and transport welcomed
ETS proposal increases the predictability of the decarbonisation efforts
Our messages on the EU Fit for 55 package
The revised REDII proposal covers renewable hydrogen whilst hydrogen produced from low-carbon energy has been left to the gas decarbonisation package due by year-end. Ensuring consistency between these legislative proposals is key.
CBAM is expected to enhance the climate efforts of the third countries
EU hydrogen legislation should take the carbon content and a robust and trustworthy guarantee of origin system as the main basis.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/energy-sector-has-lot-stake-eu-fit-55-package
The ‘Fit for 55’ legislation package aims to steer production, consumption and investments – in the energy sector as well as others – towards decarbonisation and climate neutrality. It is expected to include several items that are crucial for the energy sector to reach the climate goals. In this post I will reflect on the parts that I find the most important from an energy utility’s perspective: renewing the Emissions Trading System (ETS) , directives on renewables and energy efficiency, renewal of the EU energy taxation directive as well as a new Carbon Border Adjustment Mechanism (CBAM).
The EU has strived to prevent carbon leakage and safeguard Europe’s industrial competitiveness. In the Fit for 55 package, a new tool called the Carbon Border Adjustment Mechanism (CBAM) is introduced for this purpose. It would set a CO2 emissions-based cost for products imported from outside the union. This will undoubtedly raise international discussion from the point of view of WTO compliance and global trade policy. While it will support the competitiveness of EU’s own production, it will also encourage other countries to develop their climate regulation and create emissions pricing systems. Such a development is already visible e.g. in Russia. After all, climate change is a global problem and emission reduction a shared responsibility.
directives on renewables and energy efficiency
The LULUCF regulation, which concerns greenhouse gas emissions and removals from land use, land use change and forestry, is a significant point of interest, as well. Carbon sinks are an important tool in the battle against climate change. However, it is important to also include technological solutions like CCS/CCU/DAC to remove carbon from the atmosphere or flue gases in the legislation.
We see the
renewal of the EU energy taxation directive
It is of high importance to provide coordination between the ETS Directive and the parallel revision of the Energy efficiency directive (EED) and Renewable Energy Directive (REDII). Renewables, all low carbon energy sources and technologies (like hydrogen and nuclear) and increased energy efficiency should be treated in an equal manner, as all of these support the achievement of EU’s carbon neutrality target.
We would like to see carbon pricing gradually extended to cover a larger share of total emissions. This could be done by including more sectors in the ETS or by applying different pricing instruments in other sectors. It may be challenging to determine the best tools for each sector, and most likely there will be several different regulatory instruments in use across sectors. However, it is important that we pay close attention to cost-efficiency, as the methods of emission reductions have a major impact on the price of the energy transition, and on the way, costs are shared between member states.
Alignment across instruments needed
07 July 2021, 09:59
Furthermore, we cannot ignore aspects of social acceptability and fairness. If, for example, carbon pricing is applied to all heating, the consumer prices for heating would be likely to climb. We need measures to manage the transition and ensure that it is carried out in a way that does not cause undue strain on end users. The same applies to transportation – the costs for an individual driver will surely increase, causing acceptability issues among citizens.
a new Carbon Border Adjustment Mechanism (CBAM)
ETS as the key instrument in reducing emissions on market-based terms
Another place for alignment is in energy taxation, which is also a key instrument in reaching climate goals. The Energy Taxation Directive is under revision in the Fit for 55 package, but another significant file is the State Aid Guidelines regulation, which is still under preparation and not included in the July legislation set. Energy taxation and the state aid guidelines should in our view support the transition towards a climate-neutral society and create a common framework for member states.
What does Fit for 55 mean for energy sector? | Fortum
Less carbon leakage…
. Expanding the system to cover more sectors and making it stronger is vital if we want to reach the ambitious new climate targets. All sectors must participate in reducing emissions, and the new climate target should be allocated to different sectors on the basis of cost-efficiency. The ETS reform should enter into force by 2023–24 at the latest if we are to reach the 2030 emission reduction target.
The Commission’s proposals in July are only the first step. They will undergo the normal EU legislation process, which may take years. After that begins the national implementation phase, in which the new directives and regulations are incorporated into national legislation. While we want to see fast action, it is a simple fact that these things take time. We also need to look beyond 2030 and even 2050. Investments that play a part in taking us towards a healthier climate are made today, and businesses need to have predictability in order to make those investments. It is therefore crucial that we have clear, well-aligned legislation to set the path towards a climate neutral future.
…more carbon sinks!
The European Commission plans to give the proposals for new climate and energy legislation on 14 July. The EU is revising practically all of its energy and climate related regulation in order to reach the new target of 55% less emissions by 2030. What we in the energy sector would like to see is an ambitious, cost-efficient, technology-neutral and fair legislation package in which different targets and instruments are well aligned.
several proposals relating to the transportation sector.
There is still little information on the content of the Fit for 55 proposals, but some concerns have been voiced regarding the synchronisation of targets and different legislative instruments. Having a number of parallel regulatory instruments governing different production forms runs the risk of inconsistency and overlap. In addition, finding cost-effective means to implement changes may become a challenge.
Emissions trading remains the key
The change cannot happen overnight – but the decisions must be taken now
proposals on renewing the Emissions Trading System (ETS), regulation of the effort-sharing sector and LULUCF regulation
The ‘Fit for 55’ legislation package is expected to include:


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/public-affairs/corporate-public-affairs
+46 70 298 4125
Jami Arvola
+358407057389
Senior Manager, Public Affairs
blomfelt
+358 50 453 6090
soili
+358 50 4739062
Maarit Pihlajaniemi
Public Affairs Adviser
Mosa Alasaly
jami
sara
Advisor, Grant Management
alasaly
mosa
tatu
Tel: +358 40 7154696
Send email
fredrik
+358405320433
Soili Juuri
martta
aari
bjoorn
pihlajaniemi
+358 50 535 5591
Fredrik Blomfelt
arvola
Assistant, Public Affairs
Contact Fortum's Corporate Public Affairs Team
ESG Manager
Corporate Public Affairs
+46762238246
EU Adviser
hocksell
Head of Grant Management
viitanen
Brussels
Public Affairs contacts | Fortum
Martta Ääri
+358 44 062 0940
Sara Viitanen
juuri
Public affairs handle issues related to current and upcoming energy-related policies and legislations. On this page, you can find contact information to our public affairs team.
maarit
Jens Bjöörn


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/public-affairs/collaboration-partners
is the trade association for the nuclear energy industry in Europe. Its primary purpose is to promote the use of nuclear energy in Europe by representing the interests of this industrial sector.
(CEWEP) is the association of the owners and operators of Waste to Energy Plants, representing 394 Waste to Energy Plants from 18 European countries.
Confederation of European Waste to Energy Plants
(WEC): Fortum is a member of WEC via the national committees in Finland and Sweden.
(Renewable Energy Certificate System): Within the framework of this organisation, Fortum is working with 90 other, mainly European, companies to prepare rules and a system for the international trade of renewable energy certificates.
International Energy Agency
Scandinavian Polish Chamber of Commerce
Polish Chamber of Biomass
is an organisation that aims for continuous improvement in responsible operations in the coal supply chain.
Norsk Elbilforening
Polish Association of Energy Traders
Fortum is involved in the following organisations and funds:
Energiforsk
Indian collaboration partners
Finnish collaboration partners
PTEZ Polish Association of CHP plants
Norsk Solenergiforening
: Fortum has representatives in different committees.
Association of the European Businesses in the Russian Federation
French collaboration partners
supports dialogue between Finnish companies operating in France.
Eurelectric
Norsk Fjernvarme
Responsible Business Forum
Polish collaboration partners
European Union for Responsible Incineration and Treatment of Special Waste
is the international association of district heating and cooling.
Collaboration partners | Fortum
Euroheat & Power
Indian National Hydropower Association (INHA) organisation represents the views of Indian hydropower companies.
World Bank's Prototype Carbon Fund
(JHY) promotes knowledge of waste management, proper waste treatment, and waste utilisation in Finland.
Russian collaboration partners
are the oldest and largest employers organization in Poland, they represent 19 000 companies with over 5 mln employees.
Fortum participates in several national and international energy-sector and sustainability organisations. The list below includes the most significant of these. In addition, Fortum has joined several joint business initiatives promoting market-driven energy and climate policy.
represents and promotes the interests of European companies conducting business in Russia.
The Waste Management Association
Norwegian collaboration partners
is a Norwegian waste management and recycling association promoting and developing socially responsible waste management policies in Norway and Europe.
(CII) is a non-governmental and non-profit industry organisation.
is the sector association representing the common interests of the whole electricity industry at the pan-European level.
(FIBS): Fortum has been a member since 2013.
supports dialogue between Scandinavian companies operating in Poland and Polish authorities and organisations, furthermore develops business relations between Scandinavia and Poland.
creates a favourable investment climate in the energy sector.
French-Finnish Chamber of Commerce
is a solar energy association.
La Fabrique Ecologique
is a non-profit organisation representing the majority of electric car owners in Norway. It cooperates with the Norwegian government, the electric car industry, and other organisations.
Market Council unites its members operating in the wholesale electricity market.
COGEN Europe
International collaboration partners
promotes combined heat and power production in Poland.
Confederation of Indian Industry
Energi Norge
promotes ecology and sustainable development.
links companies that have operations related to district heat.
Confederation of Finnish Industries
Finnish Environmental Industries
(EURITS) represents more than 90% of the EU's specialist waste incineration sector. It exists to ensure waste's safe, legal, and environmentally sound incineration.
The International Solid Waste Association
Russian Union of Industrialists and Entrepreneurs
Avfall Sverige
is an independent NGO operating at the federal and regional levels to promote the interests of entrepreneurs and the industry.
(YTP) is an organisation set up by Finnish environmental companies that promote the sustainable use of natural resources and aim to strengthen the industry's stature.
World Energy Council
Corporate Responsibility Network
is the Swedish Waste Management and Recycling association with members from public and private waste management and recycling sectors.
is an organisation promoting the position of biomass in future energy policy.
is the energy-sector research organisation about heat and cooling in Sweden.
promotes the development of Combined Heat and Power, CHP production in Europe and globally.
is a national energy industry organisation.
is a membership organisation for the Norwegian district heating industry. Its primary objective is to promote the development of district heating and cooling in Norway, based on renewable and carbon-neutral energy.
Employers of Poland
Bettercoal
Swedish collaboration partners
is the biggest Polish non-profit organisation promoting responsible business.
Avfall Norge
Council of Power Producers
, IEA, is an autonomous organisation that works to ensure reliable, affordable and clean energy for its 28 member countries. Fortum is a collaborator.
(ISWA) promotes and develops sustainable and professional waste management worldwide. ISWA has 1,400 members in more than 90 countries, thereof national member organisations in 40 countries and some 100,00 members associated with its national member organisations.
(EBG) represents European business interests in India.
(PCF): Fortum is a shareholder in this fund, which invests in CO2-reducing joint implementation projects in Eastern Europe and clean development mechanism projects in developing countries. The emissions reductions achieved by the PCF are distributed to shareholders according to their share of ownership.
is a politically independent organisation active in developing energy-sector legislation.
European Business Group
Foratom
Energiföretagen Sverige
RECS International
(ET) is an industrial policy and labour market policy association representing Finland's electricity and district heating industry.
Svenskt Näringsliv
Polish District Heating Chamber of Commerce
(EK): Fortum cooperates with this leading business organisation in Finland.
Finnish Energy
is the Swedish power producers' and district heating producers' branch organisation.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/fortums-revised-strategy-and-business-structure-be-announced-march-tiina-tuomela-appointed-cfo-april
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 16 DECEMBER 2022 AT 15:40 EET
Nora Hallberg, Manager, Investor Relations, tel. +35 040 720 1775
16 December 2022, 15:40 EET
“I would like to thank Bernhard Günther for his contribution and commitment as CFO and for his work on closer integration with Uniper during the past two years. Now that Uniper is leaving Fortum Group, I am happy to support Bernhard’s decision. At the same time, I am very pleased to welcome Tiina back on the Fortum Executive team after two years at Uniper,” says
Following the divestment of Uniper to the German State and the ongoing process to exit Russia, Fortum is repositioning its geographic scope and strategic focus. A strategy review is ongoing and is planned to be announced in connection with the full-year 2022 results on 2 March 2023. At the same time, Fortum is reviewing its business structure and operating model, which also provides a natural opportunity for management rotation within the group.
, who has served as CFO since February 2021 and was Fortum’s lead in the joint project to explore a potential integration of Uniper into Fortum, has asked to step down as CFO.
President and CEO of Fortum.
Ingela Ulfves, VP, Investor Relations and Financial Communications
(PDF, 803 KB)
Prior to being appointed CFO and member of the Board of Management of Uniper, Tiina Tuomela (b. 1966, M.Sc. (Eng.), MBA) led Fortum’s Generation division in 2016 – 2021  and served on the Fortum Executive Management team 2014 – 2021. She originally joined Fortum in 1990, and has previously led Fortum’s Nuclear and Thermal Power Division as well as held several financial and managerial positions. Tiina Tuomela is also the Chair of the Board of Directors of the Finnish nuclear power company TVO and a member of the Board of Directors of the Finnish technology company Wärtsilä.
, who is currently CFO of Uniper, will return to Fortum and assume the CFO position and become a member of the Executive Management Team latest in the beginning of April 2023 . Bernhard Günther will remain CFO and member of Fortum Executive Management team until Tiina Tuomela joins. The full composition of Fortum’s Executive Management team going forward is also planned to be announced latest in March.
Tiina Tuomela
As part of this ongoing process,
Pauliina Vuosio, VP, Executive Communications tel. +358 50 453 2383
Release category: Changes board/management/auditors
Fortum’s revised strategy and business structure to be announced in March – Tiina Tuomela appointed CFO as of April | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/fortums-financial-calendar-2023
•    The record date for dividend payment: 17 April 2023
Release category: Financial calendar
•    The dividend payment date: 24 April 2023
•    January-March on 11 May 2023 at approximately 9.00 EEST
•    The ex-dividend date: 14 April 2023
•    January-June on 4 August 2023 at approximately 9.00 EEST
Ingela Ulfves, Vice President, Investor Relations and Financial Communications, tel. +358 40 515 1531
(PDF, 795 KB)
02 December 2022, 09:30 EET
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 2 DECEMBER 2022 AT 9:30 EET
•    January-September 2 November 2023 at approximately 9.00 EET
Fortum's financial calendar in 2023 | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/11/new-shares-fortum-corporation-registered-finnish-trade-register
The new shares are estimated to be admitted to trading on the Nasdaq Helsinki Ltd. stock exchange on 28 November 2022.
Release category: Total number of voting rights and capital
New shares of Fortum Corporation registered with the Finnish trade register | Fortum
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 25 NOVEMBER 2022 AT 9:00
The new shares carry full shareholder rights, including the right to dividend, as of the registration date.
(PDF, 797 KB)
On 23 November 2022, Fortum announced that the company’s Extraordinary General Meeting resolved on a directed share issue without payment to the Finnish state-owned holding company Solidium Oy. The 8,970,000 new shares issued by the company have been registered with the Finnish trade register on 25 November 2022. The total amount of shares outstanding in the company after the registration of the new shares is 897,264,465.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/11/correction-decisions-fortum-corporations-extraordinary-general-meeting-2022
The corrected stock exchange release reads as below.
Fortum corrects the stock exchange release published on 23 November 2022 at 17:40 EET. At the time when the voting started at the Extraordinary General Meeting, 5,927 shareholders were represented, which corresponds to 76.50% of the shares and votes, instead of 75.96%, that was erroneously stated in the original release.
24 November 2022, 09:58 EET
CORRECTION: Decisions by Fortum Corporation's Extraordinary General Meeting 2022 | Fortum
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 24 NOVEMBER 2022 AT 9:58


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/fortum-has-completed-divestment-uniper
Fortum has concluded the sale of its ownership in Uniper SE to the German State.
On 19 December 2022, the final agreements of the stabilisation package were signed between Fortum, the German State and Uniper and the Uniper Extraordinary General Meeting made the respective decisions. All required approvals for the completion of the stabilisation package, including the State Aid clearances from the European Commission, have now been obtained. Fortum’s representatives will also resign today from the Uniper Supervisory Board.
Fortum has completed the divestment of Uniper | Fortum
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 21 DECEMBER 2022 AT 17:00 EET
Today, Fortum has received the total consideration of the share transaction of approximately EUR 0.5 billion and Uniper has repaid the shareholder loan of EUR 4 billion granted by Fortum. Out of the EUR 4.0 billion parent company guarantee facility that Fortum has granted to Uniper, a total of EUR 3.0 billion will be released by year-end 2022. The remaining approximately EUR 1.0 billion, with a full German State back-to-back guarantee (indemnity), will be released latest at the end of June 2023.
21 December 2022, 17:00 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/12/finnish-government-has-published-its-proposal-windfall-tax-law-fortum-assess-proposal
Carlo Beck, Manager, Investor Relations, tel. +49 172 751 2480
Ingela Ulfves, Vice President, Investor Relations and Financial Communications, tel. +358 40 515 1531
The Finnish Government has today published its law proposal (HE 320/2022 vp) for a temporary windfall tax on the electricity sector. The proposal intends to implement EU’s Council Regulation 2022/1854 on revenue cap and solidarity contribution as an emergency intervention to address high energy prices. This model deviates from the models proposed in other European countries. The tax would apply to companies in the electricity sector within electricity generation, wholesale and partly retail sales in Finland. Pursuant to the proposal, the tax would be 30% of the companies’ net profits generated from the above listed electricity operations in Finland exceeding a 10% return on capital in the fiscal year 2023. The Finnish corporate income tax is 20%, consequently, the total nominal tax rate would be 50% on net profits generated in the scope of the defined windfall tax. The Government has estimated that, under certain assumptions, it would cumulatively collect EUR 0.5-1.3 billion of the temporary tax from industry participants during 2023.
(PDF, 810 KB)
The Finnish Government has published its proposal for windfall tax law - Fortum to assess the proposal | Fortum
Fortum News Desk, tel. +358 40 198 2843,
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 29.12.2022 AT 15:30 EET
Investors and analysts
Rauno Tiihonen, Manager, Investor Relations, tel. +358 10 453 6150
29 December 2022, 15:30 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/11/fortums-website-ranked-2nd-best-finland-among-corporate-sites
Compared to other European companies, Finnish companies continue to perform very well and have once again received the highest average score of all ranked countries. Especially the information targeted at investors and analysts is very comprehensive. However, according to the research, there is room for improvement in the information related to career opportunities.
Comprend Webranking is a worldwide survey of companies' online communication. It is based on the requirements of investors, analysts, financial journalists and job seekers for listed companies websites.
Fortum's website ranked 2nd best in Finland among corporate sites | Fortum
29 November 2022, 10:50 EET
Fortum's group website ranked second among Finnish listed companies in the annual Comprend Webranking survey. Among European companies, Fortum ranked third in the Utilities sector and 13th overall out of 500 ranked companies.
Finnish companies continue to stand out in Investor Relations and Governance
On our website, the "Governance", "Homepage", and "Share" sections get an excellent rating. For example, the "Share" section offers an extensive range of information, e.g. about stock graphs and dividend policy. Also, the general information about our company is clearly and easily accessible.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2008/10/fortums-russian-subsidiary-tgc-10-de-listed-micex
22 October 2008, 09:15 EEST
Fortum's Russian subsidiary TGC-10 de-listed from the MICEX | Fortum
Fortum's Russian subsidiary TGC-10 de-listed from the MICEX                     

Following the rules and regulations of the MICEX Stock Exchange, Fortum         
Corporation's Russian subsidiary, Territorial Generating Company No. 10 (TGC-10)
has been de-listed because Fortum's ownership in the company has increased over 
the 90% threshold.                                                              

TGC-10 is still listed on the RTS Stock Exchange. A similar de-listing decision 
is expected from RTS after 31 October 2008 unless Fortum decreases its ownership
in TGC-10 that. Fortum has no intention on doing so.                            

In April 2008, Fortum made a mandatory public tender offer (MTO) for the entire 
share capital of Territorial Generating Company No. 10 (TGC-10) to TGC-10       
minorities. At the end of September, Fortum's ownership in TGC-10 was over 93%  
including shares owned by TGC-10's fully-owned subsidiary.                      


Fortum Corporation                                                              
Maria Romantschuk                                                               
Senior Vice President, Communications                                           

Further information:                                                            
Kari Kautinen, Vice President, M&A, Fortum Corporation,                         
+358 50 453 2174                                                                

Distribution:                                                                   
NASDAQ OMX Helsinki                                                             
Key media                                                                       
www.fortum.com
Fortum Corporation                                                              
Stock exchange release                                                          
22.10.2008 at 9.15 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2008/10/final-results-fortums-mto-tgc-10-minorities-available-end-october
Final results of Fortum's MTO to TGC-10 minorities available end of October     

In April 2008, Fortum made a mandatory public tender offer (MTO) for the entire 
share capital of Territorial Generating Company No. 10 (TGC-10) to TGC-10       
minorities. At the end of September, Fortum's ownership in TGC-10 was over 93%  
including shares owned by TGC-10's fully-owned subsidiary. By that time Fortum  
had paid EUR 440 million for share purchases under the MTO. Clearing of the     
share transactions is still ongoing and the final results of the MTO will be    
known and published at the latest at the end of October 2008 when Fortum will   
have to submit the final report on the results to the Russian regulators.       

In the event that Fortum's shareholding in TGC-10 exceeds 95% as a result of the
MTO Fortum may redeem the remaining shares in TGC-10. The redemption of         
remaining shares is, however, subject to decision by Russian authorities.       
                                                                                

Fortum Corporation                                                              
Maria Romantschuk                                                               
Senior Vice President, Communications                                           

Further information:                                                            
Kari Kautinen, Vice President, M&A, Fortum Corporation,                         
+358 10 453 2174                                                                

Distribution:                                                                   
NASDAQ OMX Helsinki                                                             
Key media                                                                       
www.fortum.com
15 October 2008, 09:00 EEST
Final results of Fortum's MTO to TGC-10 minorities available end of October | Fortum
Fortum Corporation                                                              
Stock exchange release                                                          
15.10.2008 at 09.00 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2017/01/fortum-finalised-acquisition-wind-power-projects-nordkraft
approx. 50 MW
Fortum has today finalised the acquisition of three wind power projects from the Norwegian company Nordkraft.
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 5 JANUARY 2017 13.35 EET
The Nygårdsfjellet, Ånstadblåheia and S
approx. 90 MW
Nordkraft AS is a vertical integrated utility within hydropower (development, construction and production), distribution of power and power sales to end-users. It is owned by Narvik Municipality (50.01%), Troms Kraft (33.33%) and Hålogaland Kraft (16.16%).
Nordkraft
All three wind farms are located in Northern Norway. The projects are owned and developed by the Nordkraft Group, with Vesterålskraft AS owning an approximately 9,5% minority share in the Ånstadblåheia project.
expected 2018
2006 and 2011
Fortum is a leading clean energy company which provides its customers with electricity, heating and cooling as well as smart solutions to improve resource efficiency. We want to engage our customers and society to join the change for a cleaner world. We employ some 8,000 professionals in the Nordic and the Baltic countries, Russia, Poland and India, and already 64% of our electricity generation is CO2 free. In 2015, our sales were EUR 3.5 billion.
05 January 2017, 13:35 EET
Installed capacity
ørfjord wind farms
expected 2019
Fortum announced the acquisition on 8 November 2016.
Fortum finalised the acquisition of wind power projects from Nordkraft | Fortum
Philippe Stohr, Vice President, Wind, Fortum, tel. +33 6 3039 8223
Commissioning
The transaction consists of the Nygårdsfjellet wind farm, which is already operational, as well as the fully-permitted Ånstadblåheia and Sørfjord projects. Fortum is preparing for the construction of the Ånstadblåheia and Sørfjord projects, expected to be commissioned in 2018 and 2019. When built the installed capacity of the three wind farms would total approximately 170 MW.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/03/fortum-completes-acquisition-polish-gas-and-electricity-sales-company-grupa-duon-sa
Izabela Van den Bossche, Vice President, Corporate Communications, tel. +48 692 209 428
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 7 MARCH 2016 AT 18.15 EET
”I am very happy with the result of the tender process. It enables us to move forward with our ambitious plan to grow our business and to offer new value for customers in Poland with our wide portfolio of innovative products and services,” he added.
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 7 MARCH 2016 AT 18.15 EET
Fortum completes acquisition of the Polish gas and electricity sales company Grupa DUON S.A. | Fortum
07 March 2016, 18:15 EET
Duon shares are currently listed on the Warsaw Stock Exchange and the company will publish its financial statements for 2015 on 15 March 2016. Duon will be reported in Fortum’s Heat and Electricity Sales and Solutions segment.
The acquisition is in line with Fortum's strategy to develop sustainable energy solutions for cities. Accordingly, Fortum seeks growth in electricity sales and related customer services in a wider market area. The transaction has no impact on Duon's customers whom the company will continue to serve as before.
Fortum has today completed the acquisition of 93.35% of shares in the Polish gas and electricity sales company Grupa DUON S.A. (Duon). The price offered per share was PLN 3.85, so Fortum paid altogether approximately EUR 100 million for the shares.
Duon sells electricity and natural gas. The company was founded in 2000, and it is currently one of the leading independent providers of electricity and natural gas in Poland. It is also a leading distributor and transporter of LNG. In 2014, its revenues were PLN 636 million (EUR 152 million) and EBITDA PLN 36 million (EUR 9 million). Currently it employs approximately 500 people. The company has been listed on the Warsaw Stock Exchange since 2007 (DUO:WSE).
Matti Saario
, Head of Electricity Sales at Fortum.
Duon was founded in 2000 and it is currently one of the leading independent providers of electricity and natural gas in Poland. It is also a major distributor and transporter of LNG. Duon's service offering, experience and know-how are a good match with Fortum in Poland.
“Duon is a well-managed company with very competent management and staff. Its position is strong especially in the small and medium-sized enterprise segment. Duon offers us a good growth platform in the large and fast developing electricity and gas end-user market in Poland,” says


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2015/04/ifrs-5-restatement-fortums-income-statement-and-cash-flow-2014-distribution-segment-treated-discontinued-operations
Q1/14
Fortum, total (old)*
Earnings per share discontinued operations*
* Includes impact from sales gains of the Finnish and Norwegian Distribution businesses amounting to EUR 2.10.
3,428
3,954
2014, Fortum’s sales totalled EUR 4.75 billion and comparable operating profit
356
416
2,281
Reclassification of discontinued operations does not impact the balance sheet. The Swedish distribution business’ assets and liabilities will be classified as assets held for sale in the balance sheet of 31 March 2015.
147
Operating profit
Discontinued operations
3,360
2.91
2,128
Q1-Q2/14
traded on the Nasdaq Helsinki.
662
After the divestment of the Swedish distribution business Fortum will not have any distribution operations, and therefore the Distribution segment will be treated in the first quarter 2015 interim financial statements as discontinued operations according to IFRS 5 "Non-current assets held for sale and Discontinued operations". The IFRS standard requires restatement of the 2014 comparative period information for the income statement and cash flow. The restatement is done to the income statement including other comprehensive income, cash flow statement and certain key ratios. In the segment information, the Distribution segment is reclassified as discontinued operations.
Fortum signed a binding agreement to sell its Swedish distribution business on 13 March 2015, which concludes Fortum’s divestment of its electricity distribution business. The divestment is expected to be completed during the second quarter of 2015.
For restated information for the interim periods of 2014, see the attachment.
1,232
Marja Mäkinen, Investor Relations (SRI) Manager, tel. +358 10 45 23338
Comparable operating profit
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 15 APRIL 2015 at 09:30 EEST
Earnings per share continuing operations
Q1-Q3/14
Fortum’s purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future
2.24
Fortum Media Desk, tel. +358 40 1982 843
1,457
1,673
266
(PDF, 169 KB)
Rauno Tiihonen, Investor Relations Manager , tel. +358 10 45 36150
4,088
0.35
Our operations focus on the Nordic and Baltic countries, Russia and Poland. In
2.53
774
Analysts and investors:
Earnings per share figures for 2014 of Fortum in total and of the continuing and the discontinued operations are as follows:
2.18
IFRS 5 restatement of Fortum's income statement and cash flow for 2014 – Distribution segment treated as discontinued operations | Fortum
Capital expenditure
0.57
Earnings per share total Fortum Group
626
was EUR 1.35 billion. We employ approximately 8,800 people. Fortum’s shares are
15 April 2015, 09:30 EEST
1,762
1.22
2.28
distribute and sell electricity and heat, and offer related expert services.
The 2014 key figures of Fortum in total, continuing operations and discontinued operations (Distribution segment) are as follows:
Sales
1,08
Profit before taxes
1,296
Comparable EBITDA
Continuing operations
2.33
EUR million
1,406
4,751
Net cash from operating activities
PDF
2,132
*previously reported information
1,873
2.81
tel. +358 10 45 20480,
1,351
generations. Catering to the versatile needs of our customers, we generate,
Helena Aatinen, Senior Vice President, Corporate Communications,
0.63
EBITDA


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2010/12/fortum-divest-heat-operations-outside-stockholm-sweden
Executive Vice President, Corporate Relations and Sustainability
Fortum to divest heat operations outside Stockholm in Sweden | Fortum
12 December 2010 at 15.00 EET
The divestment is pending on the approval of the Stockholm City Board and the Swedish Competition Authority. Fortum expects to finalise the divestment during the first quarter of 2011.
Fortum and Macquarie-managed funds have signed an agreement according to which Fortum will divest its district heat operations and heat production facilities outside the Stockholm area in Sweden. The sales price is approximately EUR 200 million. The major part of the divested operations is owned by Fortum's subsidiary Fortum Värme in which the city of Stockholm has a 50% economic interest. Fortum expects to recognise a sales gain with a minor effect on EPS in the first quarter 2011. The sales gain is presented in Heat Division.
"We are very pleased to find a world leading company in investment, ownership and management of infrastructure assets as the new owner for our heat operations outside Stockholm. Macquarie has the ability and opportunity to develop them further. In line with our strategy, we can now concentrate on combined heat and power production and on further developing district heating in the capital area," says Per Langer, Executive Vice president, Fortum.
12 December 2010, 15:02 EET
Jens Bjöörn, Head of Communications, Fortum Värme, tel. +46 702 98 41 25
Fortum Corporation
Stock exchange release
12 December 2010 at 15.00 EET
Fortum is divesting the operations in order to be better able to concentrate on combined power and heat production and on developing its district heat businesses in the Stockholm area. The transaction comprises 12 different heat operations including both municipal district heating and industrial partnerships. All the operations are located in the central parts of Sweden from east to west and three are co-owned with the local municipality. The heat sales in 2009 were 1.3 terawatt-hours. In 2009, the businesses' sales totaled EUR 72 million and EBITDA was EUR 28 million. Eighty-three employees will move over to the new owner after the transaction has been finalised.
Macquarie-managed funds have a strong track record in responsible investment in regulated utilities and infrastructure globally, including investments in Thames Water, the UK's largest water and sewerage company, and Thermal Chicago Corporation, the world's largest district cooling system. Macquarie-managed funds have also invested in infrastructure in Sweden including the Arlanda Express, the high-speed rail service linking Arlanda Airport to Stockholm's city centre.
Per Langer, Executive Vice President, Fortum
Anne Brunila


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2008/02/fortum-acquire-controlling-stake-russian-tgc-10
Fortum to acquire controlling stake in Russian TGC-10 | Fortum
Fortum will acquire a controlling stake in the Russian territorial generating   
company 10 (TGC-10). The acquisition is in line with Fortum's growth strategy   
and will make Fortum a significant player in one of the world's largest energy  
markets with high demand growth. If Fortum reaches a 100% holding in TGC-10, the
total value of the transaction will be around EUR 2.7 billion. Fortum will      
retain its financial flexibility and will continue its Nordic investment        
programme as planned.                                                           

Fortum participated in a share auction conducted on 28th February to acquire a  
controlling stake in the listed Russian TGC-10. Fortum will acquire a 29% stake 
of the company from RAO UES for EUR 0.8 billion. In addition, Fortum has        
committed to acquiring a further 34-47% stake (range depending on how minority  
shareholders will use their pre-emption rights) in TGG-10 through a share issue 
for EUR 0.9-1.3 billion. This capital increase of EUR 1.3 billion will remain in
TGC-10 and will be used to finance its committed capacity investment programme  
planned at EUR 2.2 billion.                                                     

In the first phase of the transaction, Fortum will receive 63-76% of the        
company's shares and voting rights. The closing of the first phase is expected  
in March 2008. Fortum will also make a mandatory offer to purchase the remaining
24-37% of the shares held by minority shareholders.                             

The total consideration, EUR 1.7-2.7 billion, is to be financed with long-term  
bank loans. Fortum's pro forma net debt/EBITDA will be around 2.8x at           
acquisition assuming Fortum will reach 100% ownership of TGC-10.                

“The acquisition of TGC-10 is a significant step in delivering on our strategy. 
This is a great opportunity to become a significant player in the world's 4th   
largest energy market. We will maintain our financial flexibility that allows us
to continue our Nordic capacity investment programme and finance potential      
future investments. We are very pleased to have successfully taken this         
strategically important step”, says Mikael Lilius, Fortum's President and CEO.  

TGC-10 is a territorial generating company operating in Urals region. Out of all
territorial generating companies, TGC-10 has the best capacity utilization rates
and it is the leading district heating supplier in its area. The total installed
capacity is 3,000 MW electricity and 15,800 MW heat with annual production of 18
TWh electricity and 27 TWh heat, to be compared with Fortum's current 10,900 MW 
electricity and 11 200 MW heat with production of 52 TWh electricity and 26 TWh 
heat. The company has an extensive investment plan to further increase its      
electricity production capacity with 2,300 MW by 2013. The generation assets are
located in an area with significant oil and gas industry. The number of         
employees is 6,100.                                                             

"In the on-going Russian energy sector reform, TGC-10 is an excellent entity for
Fortum. It operates in the heart of the fast growing Russian oil and gas        
producing regions. We know we can contribute to the Russian energy sector in    
many ways - by being a reliable energy partner and by bringing in leading       
technologies and best practices to improve efficiency and thus make a positive  
impact on the environment. We are very inspired by the work ahead of us", says  
Tapio Kuula, Senior Vice President of Fortum.                                   


Fortum Corporation                                                              
Maria Romantschuk                                                               
SVP, Corporate Communications	                                                  


Further information:                                                            
Mikael Lilius, President and CEO, Fortum Corporation, +358(0)10 45 29100        
Tapio Kuula, Senior Vice President, Fortum Corporation, +358(0)10 54 24112      


Press conference and conference call for analysts                               

A press conference (in Finnish) will be arranged at 12.30 Finnish time in the   
auditorium of Fortum's head office, Keilaniementie 1, Espoo. The press          
conference will be webcasted and available on our website.                      

You can also participate in an international teleconference for analysts and    
investors at 4.30 p.m. Finnish time on 29 February by dialing +44 (0)20 3023    
4410 (if calling from Europe) or +1 866 966 5335 (if calling from the US).      
Participant code for both numbers: Fortum Corporation.                          

If you are unable to participate, there will be a replay facility available for
one week after the teleconference. The number to dial is +44 (0)20 8196 1998
(if calling from Europe) or +1 8 665 831035, access code for both numbers:
592579#.  

A live audio webcast of the call will be available together with the slide
presentation 
on Fortum's website at: www.fortum.com/investors
29 February 2008, 10:30 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2008/04/terms-and-conditions-fortums-mandatory-offer-minority-shareholders-russian-tgc-10-published
Terms and conditions of Fortum's mandatory offer to the minority shareholders of
Russian TGC-10 published                                                        

Fortum Corporation's fully-owned subsidiary, Fortum Russia B.V., has today      
published the terms and conditions of a mandatory public tender offer for the   
entire share capital of the Russian Territorial Generating Company No. 10       
(TGC-10) to be made to TGC-10 minorities. As required by Russian law, the terms 
and conditions can be viewed at Fortum's website www.fortum.com. The offer      
acceptance period will last for 80 days starting from the date when Fortum      
Russia B.V. files the mandatory public tender offer with TGC-10. Fortum has     
already acquired a 76.49% share in TGC-10.                                      

The tender offer covers 23.51% of the share capital of TGC-10 (206,581,233      
shares) and will be launched at a price of 111.8 rubles (approximately 3 euros) 
per share to be fully paid in cash. The acquisition will be financed with       
long-term bank loans.                                                           

Founded in 2006 as part of the Russian power sector reform, TGC-10 is a         
territorial generating company operating in the Urals and Western Siberia       
regions. The total installed capacity of TGC-10 and its affiliates is 3,000 MW  
of electricity and 15,800 MW of heat with annual production of 18 TWh of        
electricity and 27 of TWh heat. The company has an extensive investment plan to 
further increase its electricity production capacity with 2,300 MW by 2013.     
                                                                                

Fortum Corporation                                                              
Maria Romantschuk                                                               
Senior Vice President, Communications                                           

Further information:                                                            
Kari Kautinen, Vice President, M&A, Fortum Corporation, +358 50 453 2174        

Distribution:                                                                   
OMX Nordic Exchange Helsinki                                                    
Key media                                                                       
www.fortum.com
28 April 2008, 15:10 EEST
Terms and conditions of Fortum's mandatory offer to the minority shareholders of Russian TGC-10 published | Fortum
Fortum Corporation                                                              
Stock exchange release                                                          
28 April 2008                                                                   
15:10 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/03/fortum-received-subscriptions-representing-9335-share-capital-tender-offer-grupa-duon-sa-poland
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 2 MARCH 2016 at 15.20 EET
The planned date of the settlement of the acquisition of shares is 7 March 2016.
+358 10 45 32552
Investors and analysts: Sophie Jolly, Vice President, Investor Relations, tel.
02 March 2016, 15:20 EET
Fortum received subscriptions representing 93.35% of the share capital in the tender offer of Grupa DUON S.A. in Poland | Fortum
Fortum received subscriptions representing 93.35% of the share capital in the tender offer of Grupa DUON S.A. in Poland
+48 692 209 428
Izabela Van den Bossche, Vice President, Corporate Communications, tel.
Fortum announced the tender offer for Grupa DUON S.A. on 8 January 2016. The acquisition is in line with Fortum's strategy to offer and grow in sustainable city solutions including electricity sales and related customer services.
Fortum received subscriptions from shareholders representing altogether 93.35% of shares in the public tender offer to purchase all shares in Grupa DUON S.A., an electricity and gas sales company listed on the Warsaw Stock Exchange. The subscription period ended on 26 February 2016 and the offered price was PLN 3.85 per share.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/01/fortum-initiates-wind-power-cooperation-russia-bank-gpb
For development of renewables in Russia, Fortum’s maximum equity commitment is RUB 15 billion.
(PDF, 724 KB)
Fortum is the largest player on the renewable energy market in Russia with a portfolio of approximately 3.4 GW of wind and solar power parks and development projects, either stand alone or together with its joint ventures with Bank GPB and RDIF. As of today the total capacity consists of wind and solar power plants and projects out of which 1.2 GW are operational, 0.3 GW under construction, and 1.9 GW under development. The investment decisions related to the wind and solar capacities are made on a case-by-case basis.
18 January 2022, 09:00 EET
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 18 JANUARY 2022 9:00 EET
Upon the transfer, the joint venture of Fortum-Rusnano Wind investment fund will be dissolved. Fortum holds the investment fund’s most recently (wind auction in September 2021) awarded 1.4 GW of wind capacity for new wind power generation to be commissioned during the years 2025–2027. Fortum and Rusnano continue to assess cooperation for joint future development of this project portfolio.
Fortum initiates wind power cooperation in Russia with Bank GPB | Fortum
Ingela Ulfves, Vice President, IR and Financial Communications
Fortum is initiating cooperation in wind power generation in Russia with Bank GPB. For this purpose, 1.3 GW portfolio of wind projects is being transferred from the Fortum-Rusnano Wind Investment fund (50/50 joint venture) to a joint venture recently established with Bank GPB.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2018/06/fortum-sell-its-10-ownership-hafslund-produksjon-svartisen
13 June 2018, 09:00 EEST
The sales price for the shares is approximately EUR 160 million and the transaction is expected to close in June 2018. Fortum expects to book a sales gain of approximately EUR 75 million in the Generation segment in the second quarter 2018 results.
Our minority share in Hafslund Produksjon has been a financial investment and is thus not a core asset for Fortum.
evaluate possibilities to optimise our asset portfolio," says
Fortum has agreed to sell its 10% ownership in Hafslund Produksjon Holding AS to Svartisen Holding AS, a Norwegian company owned by the Finnish energy companies Vantaan Energia Oy, Oy Turku Energia – Åbo Energi Ab and Oulun Seudun Sähkö.
As part of the restructuring of the Hafslund ownership in 2017, Fortum acquired the ownership in Hafslund Produksjon.
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 13 JUNE 2018 9:00 EEST
, CFO at Fortum.
will continue to
Fortum to sell its 10% ownership in Hafslund Produksjon to Svartisen | Fortum
We are focusing on cash flow generation and operational efficiency, and
Hafslund Produksjon is a hydropower production company operating in Southern Norway. In 2017, the company's production amounted to 3.2 TWh.
"


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2008/11/fortums-russian-subsidiary-tgc-10-be-de-listed-rts
Fortum's Russian subsidiary TGC-10 to be de-listed from the RTS | Fortum
27 November 2008, 14:47 EET
Fortum's Russian subsidiary TGC-10 to be de-listed from the RTS 

Following the rules and regulations of the RTS stock exchange, Fortum           
Corporation's Russian subsidiary, Territorial Generating Company No. 10 (TGC-10)
will be de-listed tomorrow 28 November 2008 because Fortum's ownership in the   
company has increased over the 90% threshold. Fortum owns approximately 93.4% of
TGC-10.                                                                         


Fortum Corporation                                                              
Maria Romantschuk                                                               
Senior Vice President, Communications                                           

Further information:                                                            
Kari Kautinen, Vice President, M&A, Fortum Corporation,                         
+358 50 453 2174                                                                

Distribution:                                                                   
NASDAQ OMX Helsinki                                                             
Key media                                                                       
www.fortum.com
Fortum Corporation                                                              
Stock exchange release                                                          
27.11.2008 at 14:45 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/06/fortum-sell-its-50-ownership-stockholm-exergi-investor-consortium-led-apg-approximately-eur-29-billion
“We believe Stockholm Exergi is an excellent business that exhibits all the financial and ESG characteristics we look for when investing in the infrastructure asset class. The experienced management team of Stockholm Exergi has made remarkable ESG accomplishments during the last couple of years and we are keen to support the Exergi in pursuing its ambitious goal of becoming climate-positive by 2025 and generating negative emissions”,
In 2020, Stockholm Exergi’s heating and cooling sales were 7.6 TWh and power sales 0.7 TWh. The EBITDA was SEK 2.8 billion. For Fortum, Stockholm Exergi is a joint venture and is accounted for using the equity method. In 2020, Fortum recorded EUR 46 million in ‘share of profits from associates and joint ventures’ from Stockholm Exergi, consequently there was no impact on Fortum’s EBITDA.
Carlo Maddalena
(PDF, 792 KB)
, CEO of Stockholm Exergi.
Stockholm Exergi is the owner and operator of the largest and most versatile district heating and cooling system in the Nordics. 24 hours a day, all year round, the company provides highly environmentally sustainable district heating, cooling and waste management services for both corporate and residential customers across seven municipalities in the Stockholm County. And critical electricity capacity to the Stockholm electricity grid.
“For the world to meet the climate change, both renewable energy and negative emissions are needed. Our goal is a climate-positive business in 2025 and to succeed in this, strong, committed and long-term owners are required who share our view of sustainability - properties such as the City of Stockholm, Fortum and the investor consortium led by APG all share. We want to thank Fortum for their important contribution as co-owners and look forward to the next chapter in our journey towards creating the world's first climate-positive capital, together with partners, customers and owners”, says
30 June 2021, 20:45 EEST
Johanna Strömsten
Release category: Inside information
, IR Manager, tel. +49 172 751 2480
“The investment in Stockholm Exergi represents a significant milestone of APG’s overall commitment to significantly reduce CO2 emissions worldwide. Stockholm Exergi has a fantastic track record of growth, leadership in ESG and delivering and developing customer centric solutions (like Carbon Capture and Storage), all of which are driving the long-term sustainable energy transition of Stockholm and the region. We intend to grow the Company by investing significant capital, targeting to enhance the environmental sustainability and efficiency of its heating plants and district heating networks. Alongside our partners, we are looking forward to working with Management to support them in their ambitious vision, and with the City of Stockholm to develop our future long term partnership”, says
Fortum to sell its 50% ownership in Stockholm Exergi to an investor consortium led by APG for approximately EUR 2.9 billion | Fortum
“We are very pleased to have found an excellent new owner for our 50% shareholding. Stockholm Exergi is a well-run and well-invested company, where the transition to low-carbon intensity has largely been done. This transaction now concludes our two-decade era of good collaboration with the City of Stockholm and I am proud of our contribution to the transformation of Stockholm Exergi. Now is the right time for a new owner to take over and continue to develop the company further in close cooperation with the city,” says
Fortum has today signed an agreement to sell its 50% ownership in the Swedish district heating and cooling company – Stockholm Exergi Holding AB (publ) – to a group of long-term European institutional investors with a strong commitment to the infrastructure sector. The consortium comprises APG, Alecta, PGGM, Keva and AXA. The total consideration is approximately SEK 29.5 billion (approximately EUR 2.9 billion based on current currency rate) based on a 100% enterprise value of SEK 71.9 billion (approximately EUR 7.1 billion based on current currency rate). Fortum expects to record a tax-exempt capital gain of approximately EUR 2.4 billion in the City Solutions segment’s results in connection with closing of the transaction. The transaction is subject to customary closing conditions. Fortum expects closing to take place before the end of 2021.
Anders Egelrud
, Portfolio Manager at Alecta continues.
Friberg
FORTUM CORPORATION INSIDE INFORMATION 30 JUNE 2021 AT 20:45 EEST
, Senior Portfolio Manager at APG,
A key part of Fortum’s strategy execution is to continuously review, optimise, and rotate businesses for value creation and to enable new growth. In particular, Fortum has a good track-record in transforming and decarbonising assets and businesses. Accordingly, in July 2020, Fortum announced it would begin the strategic evaluation of its 50% ownership in Stockholm Exergi. In 2020, Fortum divested the district heating businesses in Joensuu and Järvenpää, in Finland, and in March 2021, Fortum announced it had agreed to sell its district heating businesses in the Baltics. The strategic reviews of the heating and cooling businesses in Poland and the Consumer Solutions business are currently ongoing.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2011/03/fortums-divestment-heat-operations-outside-stockholm-sweden-completed
Fortum divests its district heat operations and heat production facilities with a gross sales price of approximately EUR 220 million. The major part of the divested operations was owned by Fortum's subsidiary Fortum Värme in which the city of Stockholm has a 50% economic interest. Fortum books a sales gain with a minor effect on EPS in the first quarter 2011. The sales gain is presented in Heat Division.
Fortum's divestment of heat operations outside Stockholm to Macquarie European Infrastructure Fund II (MEIFII) and Macquarie Power and Infrastructure Corporation (MPIC) was completed today. The Stockholm City Board and the Swedish Competition Authority have given their approval to the transaction.
Fortum's divestment of heat operations outside Stockholm in Sweden completed | Fortum
Fortum divested the operations in order to be better able to concentrate on combined power and heat production and on developing its district heat businesses in the Stockholm area. The transaction comprised 11 different heat operations including both municipal district heating and industrial partnerships. All the operations are located in the central parts of Sweden and three are co-owned with the local municipality. The divested businesses' heat sales in 2010 were 1.4 terawatt-hours. Sales totaled EUR 82 million and EBITDA was EUR 22 million. The businesses 84 employees will now move over to the new owner.
31 March 2011, 12:38 EEST


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2017/06/oslo-city-council-approves-hafslund-ownership-restructuring-between-fortum-and-city-oslo
Norway and the fulfilment of the customary closing conditions. The closing of
Måns Holmberg, Acting Head of Investor Relations and Financial Communications,
CO2 free. In 2016, our sales were EUR 3.6 billion. Fortum's share is listed on
The Oslo City Council (Bystyret) has approved the ownership restructuring of
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 15 June 2017 at 09:00 EEST
Stock exchange release 26 April 2017: Fortum and City of Oslo restructure
and June. The transactions are still subject to one regulatory approval in
Oslo City Council approves Hafslund ownership restructuring between Fortum and the City of Oslo | Fortum
15 June 2017, 09:00 EEST
Hafslund ASA between the City of Oslo and Fortum. The transactions received
the transactions is expected during the third quarter of 2017.
tel. +358 44 518 1518
approval from the Norwegian, Swedish and Finnish competition authorities in May
The ownership restructuring was originally published on 26 April 2017.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/08/fortum-concludes-sale-its-district-heating-business-jarvenpaa-finland
Fortum concludes the sale of its district heating business in Järvenpää, Finland | Fortum
Fortum has today concluded the sale of its district heating business in the Järvenpää-Tuusula area in Finland to a consortium consisting of Vantaa Energy Ltd, Infranode, and Keva, as announced on 3 July 2020.
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 19 AUGUST 2020 AT 17:00 EEST
19 August 2020, 17:00 EEST
(PDF, 24 KB)
The total consideration of the sale on a debt- and cash-free basis is approximately EUR 375 million. Fortum will record a tax exempt capital gain of approximately EUR 290 million in the City Solutions segment’s third-quarter 2020 results.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/05/fortum-concludes-sale-its-50-stake-fortum-oslo-varme
The total consideration of the sale amounts to approximately EUR 1 billion on a cash and debt free basis and as part of the transaction, Fortum will deconsolidate a related EUR 0.2 billion loan from the City of Oslo. The loan was recognised as liabilities related to assets held for sale in Fortum’s first quarter interim report of 2022. Fortum will record a tax-exempt capital gain of approximately EUR 0.6 billion in the City Solutions segment’s second-quarter 2022 results.
(PDF, 818 KB)
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 19 May 2022 AT 16.10 EEST
Over the past years, Fortum has divested several of its heating and cooling businesses. In 2020, Fortum divested its district heating businesses in Joensuu and Järvenpää in Finland, and in 2021, Fortum sold its district heating businesses in the Baltics and its 50% ownership in Stockholm Exergi in Sweden.
19 May 2022, 16:10 EEST
Nora Hallberg, Manager, Investor Relations, tel. +358 40 720 1775
Fortum has today concluded the sale of its 50% ownership in the district heating company Fortum Oslo Varme AS in Norway to a consortium of institutional investors of Hafslund Eco, Infranode and HitecVision. The signing of the transaction was announced on 22 March 2022.
Fortum concludes the sale of its 50 % stake in Fortum Oslo Varme AS | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/05/fortum-acquire-ekokem-nordic-circular-economy-company
Karri Kaitue
Markus Rauramo, Executive Vice President, City Solutions, Fortum
, Fortum's President and CEO.
News conference in Finnish
27 May 2016, 13:35 EEST
“The board of Ekokem initiated a review of the capital structure at the beginning of the year, with the target to secure sufficient resources to enable the fulfilment of the company’s strategy and continued growth. I believe this goal will be fulfilled as a part of Fortum, and that it secures the continued success of Ekokem. With Fortum’s network and resources, we will be able to expand Ekokem’s services more broadly internationally in the future. I believe Fortum’s circular economy strategy will be developed based on the Ekokem platform,” says
The four biggest shareholders of Ekokem are the Finnish State, the Association of Finnish Local and Regional Authorities, Ilmarinen Mutual Pension Insurance Company and the Helsinki Region Environmental Services Authority, HSY. The transaction will require competition authority clearances in Finland and in Sweden. Fortum estimates that it will conclude the transactions during the third quarter of 2016. Fortum will also make a tender offer to all remaining shareholders at the same price (EUR 165 per share). The completion of the offer will be subject to Fortum obtaining the competition clearances and reaching majority ownership in Ekokem. Having reached the necessary ownership thresholds, Fortum will proceed with a minority redemption process.
Ekokem is a leading Nordic circular economy company specialised in material and waste recycling, final disposal solutions, soil remediation and environmental construction. The company has a strong position especially in the treatment of hazardous waste. Ekokem serves both industrial and municipal customers from its facilities in Finland, Sweden and Denmark. The main revenue sources comprise of waste and environmental services, as well as revenues from the sales of power, recycled materials and heat.
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 27 MAY 2016 at 13:35 EEST
Fortum has signed an agreement with the four biggest owners of Ekokem Corporation, representing approximately 81% of the shares, to acquire their shareholding in the company for approximately EUR 470 million. This would correspond to debt and cash-free purchase price for 100% of the company of approximately EUR 700 million. Based on Fortum’s estimate for 2016, the purchase price would correspond to approximately 11 times EBITDA. The acquisition will generate a positive operative result and cash flow for Fortum from the beginning. The acquisition will diversify Fortum’s earnings structure as Ekokem generates most of its result from other sources than the Nordic power price.
Fortum to acquire Ekokem, a Nordic circular economy company | Fortum
A press conference (in Finnish) will be held today, 27 May 2016 at 16.00 EEST at the Scandic Simonkenttä hotel, Simonkatu 9, Helsinki, Finland. The press conference will be webcasted on Fortum’s Finnish website (www.fortum.com/fi) and media can also ask questions using the webcast’s chat function.
, Ekokem’s CEO.
Call-back requests: Pauliina Vuosio, Corporate Press Officer, tel.
Background information
Pekka Lundmark, President and CEO, Fortum
In 2015, Ekokem’s net sales totalled EUR 258 million and reported EBITDA EUR 55 million. Ekokem has approximately 630 employees.
Investors, analysts and financial media: Sophie Jolly, Vice President, Investor Relations and Financial Communications, tel.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2013/12/correction-corrected-key-figures-fortum-sells-its-electricity-distribution-business-finland-suomi-power-networks
LocalTapiola Pension and Pension Fennia have decided to merge and the merger will come into effect on 1 January 2014. The
United States and Europe, representing over C$10 billion of OMERS’ invested equity. www.borealis.ca
Net assets (at period-end)
157
Fortum's Finnish distribution companies' key figures are:
~903,000 in Sweden;  640,000 in Finland and ~102,000 in Norway. Electricity distribution is a nationally regulated
new business name of the merged companies is Elo Mutual Pension Insurance Company, and it will have close to €20bn of
financial institution in Australia and currently manages approximately €124 billion of investments globally. First State is
Distribution Oy, with grids in the city of Espoo and surrounding communities and the city of Joensuu, as well as Fortum
Fortum has agreed to sell its electricity distribution business in Finland to Suomi Power Networks Oy, which is owned by a consortium of Finnish pension funds Keva (12.5%) and LocalTapiola Pension (7.5%) together with international infrastructure investors First State Investments (40%) and Borealis Infrastructure (40%).
sectors in Australasia and Europe. www.firststateinvestments.com
it is one of the longest established managers of infrastructure assets on behalf of institutional investors and currently
business. At Fortum, the Distribution business area is part of the company’s Electricity Solutions and Distribution
process during the first quarter of 2014 subject to the necessary regulatory approvals as well as customary closing conditions. Fortum expects to book a one-time sales gain of EUR 1.8-1.9 billion corresponding to approximately EUR 2.0 per share in its Electricity Distribution and Sales Division's first quarter 2014 results. A total of 320 employees will transfer with the business at closing with existing terms of employment.
€34.4bn. www.keva.fi
Fortum’s largest division, Power, consists of Fortum’s power generation, power trading and power capacity development as
private markets, including infrastructure and has earmarked more than 20% of its portfolio to be allocated to
In 2012, Fortum’s sales totaled EUR 6.2 billion and comparable operating profit was EUR 1.7 billion. We employ
networks. Through their extensive experience, all members share a deep understanding of the social importance of
325
14.30 EET. The dial-in numbers:
solutions that fulfill the needs for low emissions, resource efficiency and energy security, and deliver excellent value to
Keva paid out approximately €3.8bn in municipal sector pensions in 2012. Keva is a long-term investor where investments are
hours of electricity to customers. Fortum's market share of the local electricity distribution in Finland is approximately
Gross investments
infrastructure investments. Borealis has sourced and currently manages over 20 infrastructure investments in Canada, the
(www.fortum.com/fi).
www.fortum.com/investors.
*The last 12 months ending at the end of the third quarter 2013.
Fortum's decision to divest its electricity distribution business has no effect as such on its approximately 640,000 distribution customers. Upon closing, the customers will transfer with the business with existing terms.
well as expert services for power producers. Fortum’s Heat Division consists of combined heat and power (CHP) generation,
Fortum's electricity distribution business in Finland includes two jointly managed grid companies: Fortum Espoo
Sähkönsiirto Oy, with several grid areas located mainly in southern and western Finland, but also in the north-western part
CORRECTION: Corrected key figures, Fortum sells its electricity distribution business in Finland to Suomi Power Networks
infrastructure assets and are committed to good cooperation with the stakeholders of their investment targets.
of the country. The combined network length of the companies is 79,000 kilometres delivering approximately 12.6 terawatt-
businesses. Our ambition is to grow in accordance with our strategy in low-carbon power generation, energy-efficient
The consortium team members have more than 40 years combined experience in the acquisition and management of electricity
approximately 10,400 people. Fortum’s shares are quoted on NASDAQ OMX Helsinki. Further information: www.fortum.com
CORRECTION: Corrected key figures, Fortum sells its electricity distribution business in Finland to Suomi Power Networks | Fortum
154
a leading manager of, and investor in, infrastructure assets. With nineteen years’ experience in infrastructure investment,
infrastructure investments on behalf of the Ontario Municipal Employees Retirement System (“OMERS”). OMERS, which was
$60bn and an AAA credit rating from Standard & Poor’s. OMERS was one of the first large Canadian pension plans to invest in
"We at Fortum can create the best value for our customers, shareholders and the society as a whole in our competed
The key figures table has been corrected below.
20%.
Fortum is the leading electricity distribution company in the Nordic countries with over 1.6 million network customers:
Finland, Sweden and Norway. Electricity sales is a competed business and there are altogether 350 electricity retailers in
Keva is responsible for funding the earnings-related pension cover of municipal sector employees in Finland serving 1.3
749
12 December 2013, 08:40 EET
Division that is also responsible for retail sales of electricity.
The total consideration is EUR 2.55 billion on a debt- and cash-free basis. Fortum expects to complete the divestment
The decision to divest Fortum's electricity distribution business in Finland is linked to the strategic assessment of the company's electricity distribution business' future alternatives. Fortum has published a stock exchange release on the completion of the assessment today, 12 December 2013. Fortum also prepares for a possible sale of the Swedish and Norwegian electricity distribution businesses. The decision to complete the process is dependent on market development and development of national regulation in both countries, among others.
321
An international teleconference conducted in English for analysts and investors will be held today, 12 December 2013 at
the Nordic countries.
First State Investments is the consolidated asset management division of Commonwealth Bank of Australia, the largest
its own standpoint. We are pleased to have found a buyer, who has a deep understanding of the social importance of
Baltic Rim. The Russia Division consists of power and heat generation and sales in Russia.
combined heat and power (CHP) production and sales as well as in innovative customer offerings," Tapio Kuula summarises.
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE, 12 December 2013 at 08.40 EET
insured approximately 260,000. LocalTapiola Pension’s investment assets amounted to €9.9bn as of 31 December 2012.
94
and CEO
142
clearly shows that Finland is an attractive country for investors with a long-term perspective," says Fortum's President
A live audio webcast of the call will be available together with the slide presentation on Fortum’s website at
"Our electricity distribution business is in very good shape and deserves to be developed further as a core business from
investment assets. www.lahitapiola.fi/elake
Fortum is the second largest electricity retail company in the Nordic countries with approximately 1.2 million customers in
Borealis Infrastructure Management Inc. Borealis has 15 years of experience originating, structuring and actively managing
district heating activities and business-to-business heating solutions in the Nordic countries and other parts of the
million insured persons and pension recipients. Keva´s contribution income in 2012 amounted to approximately €4.8bn and
established in 1962, is a large defined benefit Canadian pension plan with  429,000 members, net assets of more than CAD
our shareholders.
LTM*
infrastructure assets and is committed to develop reliable networks and services for the customers. This transaction also
Further information on Suomi Power Networks’ owners:
LocalTapiola Pension is the third largest provider of earnings-related pension insurance in Finland with the number of
manages in excess of €2.4 billion of equity invested across assets in the utility, transport and social infrastructure
office, Keilaniementie 1, Espoo, Finland. The press conference will be webcasted on Fortum’s Finnish website
726
Fortum’s purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future generations. We provide sustainable
targeted to support a stable level of pension contributions. On 31 December 2012, Keva's investments' market value was
A press conference (in Finnish) will be held today, 12 December 2013 at 11.00 EET in the auditorium of Fortum’s head


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2017/04/ekokem-now-fortum
Virpi Mäenanttila, Communications Manager, City Solutions Finland,
, phone +358 50 544 0787
Fortum's mission is to engage customers and society to drive the change towards a cleaner world, and environmental business operations will be playing a major role in achieving this vision. Fortum works to build smart and sustainable solutions for ensuring the circulation of valuable materials and the removal of harmful substances from the material cycle. With sustainable city solutions as Fortum's strategic priority, the company aims to use its expertise and experience to help cities and industrial customers solve challenges sustainably and to support building a circular economy.
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 3 April 2017
Fortum Recycling and Waste Solutions
Ekokem is now Fortum | Fortum
As part of Fortum Group the former Ekokem will form the Recycling and Waste Solutions unit. After the brand change, the unit's daily business will continue as usual.
virpi
Fortum and Ekokem teamed up in 2016 to form a major Nordic circular economy company. Following the successful integration of Ekokem's operations, Ekokem will now also become Fortum. Ekokem's brand will be changed to Fortum from 4 April 2017 onwards.
Further information and requests for Kalle Saarimaa's interviews:
03 April 2017, 09:00 EEST
maenanttila
, VP Recycling and Waste Solutions, comments: "Together as one Fortum we form a strong circular economy player. With our comprehensive waste management, recycling and environmental construction service portfolio, we can now serve our customers even better. We will continue to provide services to our customers as smoothly as before".
Fortum Recycling and Waste Solutions provides environmental management and material efficiency services in the Nordics. We improve our customers’ material and energy efficiency by providing them with recycling, reutilisation, and final disposal solutions, as well as soil remediation and environmental construction services.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2008/03/fortums-share-russian-tgc-10-approximately-76
14 March 2008, 10:55 EET
Fortum's share in Russian TGC-10 approximately 76% | Fortum
The Russian territorial generating company TGC-10 has today confirmed           
subscriptions in the company's share issue. The share issue was almost fully    
subscribed by Fortum at RUB 111.8 per share. Fortum announced that it will      
participate in the share issue on 29 February 2008, when it won the share       
auction over a 29% stake in TGC-10.                                             

The total value of Fortum's subscription, and that of the entire share issue,   
was approximately RUB 46.6 billion or approximately EUR 1.3 billion. With this  
subscription, Fortum's ownership in TGC-10 will increase to slightly over 76%   
shares and voting rights. The capital increase will remain in TGC-10 and will be
used to finance its committed capacity investment programme planned at EUR 2.2  
billion.                                                                        

Founded in 2006 as part of the Russian power sector reform, TGC-10 is a         
territorial generating company operating in Urals region. The company's total   
installed capacity is 3,000 MW electricity and 15,800 MW heat. TGC-10's         
committed investment programme is planned to further increase its electricity   
production capacity with 2,300 MW by 2013.                                      


Fortum Corporation                                                              
Maria Romantschuk                                                               
SVP, Corporate Communications                                                   


Further information:                                                            
Tapio Kuula, Senior Vice President, Fortum Corporation, +358 (0)10 45 24112     

Distribution:                                                                   
OMX Nordic Exchange Helsinki                                                    
Key media


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2015/06/fortum-completes-divestment-its-swedish-electricity-distribution-business
The new owner of the Swedish distribution business is a consortium comprising Swedish national pension funds Första AP-Fonden (AP 1) (12.5%), Tredje AP-Fonden (AP 3) (20.0%), Swedish mutual insurance and pension savings company Folksam (17.5%) and the international infrastructure investor, Borealis Infrastructure Management Inc. (50%). A total of approximately 400 employees will continue their work in the sold business. The electricity distribution to the approximately 908,000 customers will also continue without disruption upon closing.
Upon the closing of the transaction, Fortum completes the divestment process of its distribution businesses in Sweden, Norway and Finland. The divestment process started in December 2013, when Fortum concluded a strategic assessment of the future alternatives for the distribution business. After the distribution divestment, Fortum will focus in line with its strategy on CO2-free hydro and nuclear power production and efficient combined heat and power generations as well as electricity sales and the development of related services to its customers.
Fortum Media Desk, tel.  +358 40 198 2843
Senior Vice President, Corporate Communications, tel. +358 10 45 20480
Fortum has today completed the divestment of its Swedish electricity distribution business, which was announced on 13 March 2015. The transaction has all the necessary regulatory approvals and the customary closing conditions have been met.
http://www.fortum.com
Communications contact also:
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 01 JUNE 2015 at 13:30 EET
01 June 2015, 13:30 EEST
Fortum completes divestment of its Swedish electricity distribution business | Fortum
Fortum’s purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future generations. Fortum’s expertise is in CO2-free and efficient electricity and heat production. The company also offers energy-related products and expert services to private and industrial customers and energy producers. Fortum’s main areas of operation are the Nordic and the Baltic countries, Russia and Poland. In 2014, the annual sales (excluding the divested electricity distribution business) totalled EUR 4.1 billion, and comparable operating profit was EUR 1.1 billion. The company employs approximately 8,400 people. Fortum’s share is listed on Nasdaq Helsinki.
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 01 JUNE 2015 at 13:30 EET
The total consideration from the divestment is SEK 60.6 billion on a debt- and cash-free basis (corresponding to approximately EUR 6.5 billion). Fortum will book a one-time sales gain of approximately EUR 4.3 billion corresponding to close to EUR 5 per share. The final sales gain will be reported as part of the second quarter 2015 results of the discontinued operations. Distribution segment has been presented as discontinued operations since the first quarter of 2015.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/major-investments-and-divestments/all-news-regarding-fortum-and-uniper
19.49 EEST
14.35 EEST
11.15 EEST
All news regarding Fortum and Uniper
21.30 EEST
25.10.2022
20.9.2022
29.8.2022
17.20 EEST
14.9.2022
S&P Global Ratings affirms Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper’s long-term rating of BBB- with negative outlook following German government support
6.10.2022
Talks between German government, Fortum and Uniper over long-term solution for Uniper continue
14.11 EEST
All news regarding Fortum and Uniper | Fortum
Fortum publishes restated comparison figures to reflect the divestment of Uniper
Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper draws the KfW credit facility in full and requests an increase
64 results found
Negotiations between German government, Fortum and Uniper over a long-term solution for Uniper in final stages
Fortum to fully divest Uniper to the German State
29.7.2022
Inside information: Uniper informs of significantly negative earnings and that its equity has fallen below 50% of share capital – no additional impact on Fortum
08.40 EEST
21.9.2022


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/07/sp-global-ratings-affirms-fortums-subsidiary-unipers-long-term-rating-bbb-negative-outlook-following-german-government-support
Jouni Huttunen, VP, Treasury, tel. +358 50 452 4649
S&P Global Ratings (S&P) has resolved Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper’s Credit Watch Negative placement by affirming the BBB- long-term credit rating with a negative outlook. On 5 July 2022, S&P placed Fortum’s and Uniper’s credit rating on CreditWatch Negative. According to S&P, Uniper is now considered as a government-related entity with a high likelihood of support.
+49 172 751 2480
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS ON 29 JULY 2022 AT 21:30 EEST
29 July 2022, 21:30 EEST
S&P Global Ratings affirms Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper’s long-term rating of BBB- with negative outlook following German government support | Fortum
At the same time, S&P sees Uniper’s stand-alone credit quality to have weakened. The negative outlook reflects S&P’s view that Uniper will continue to operate under an uncertain environment, because of the high volatility surrounding gas flows delivered.
(PDF, 728 KB)
Fortum News Desk +358 40 198 2843
The confirmation of the investment grade rating of Uniper by S&P is one of the requirements of the stabilisation package. The agreement still requires all applicable regulatory approvals, in particular by the European Commission, as well as an approval by an Extraordinary General Meeting of Uniper.
Carlo Beck, IR Manager, tel.
The resolution on the rating by S&P follows the announcement made on 22 July 2022 that Fortum, Uniper and the German government have agreed on a comprehensive stabilisation package to provide financial relief to Uniper. As Germany’s largest importer of natural gas, Uniper has been hit hardest by the curtailments of Russian gas imports, and as a result is under extreme financial pressure.
For further details on the Uniper rating, please see Uniper’s press release as published today.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/09/fortum-fully-divest-uniper-german-state
“We made choices in the past that we were truly convinced of at the time, based on the available information, market environment and outlook. In hindsight, some of our strategic choices turned out to become liabilities. We now have to face and mitigate the impact of those decisions. While divesting Uniper will be a painful step for the company, its employees and investors, Fortum will be able to look to the future and will focus on its core Nordic business of CO
The Uniper-related loss for discontinued operations to be reported in Fortum’s third quarter 2022 interim report will include the net loss from Uniper for the first nine months of 2022 and the positive impact from the deconsolidation.
Fortum‘s approximately 293 million shares in Uniper for
The agreed transaction is subject to regulatory clearances and Uniper’s Extraordinary General Meeting. Completion is currently expected by year-end.
German State
Key figures of the Uniper segment:
-570
intends to buy all of Fortum‘s shares in Uniper for
Fortum, the German government and Uniper have signed a further agreement in principle for a long-term solution that will allow the German State
Financial effects of the Uniper divestment
Questions for the management can be presented by phone. To ask questions, join the teleconference by registering on the following link:
Following the deconsolidation of Uniper as of the third quarter 2022, Fortum’s EUR 4 billion shareholder loan to Uniper, which will be repaid upon completion, will be recorded as a receivable. The EUR 0.5 billion consideration for Fortum’s shares in Uniper will be recorded as a short-term receivable until completion of the share transaction.
-12,571
intends to underwrite a EUR 8 billion equity capital increase of Uniper SE at
As part of the agreement, Fortum’s EUR 4 billion loan to Uniper is to be repaid and Fortum is to be released from the EUR 4 billion parent company guarantee.
After the registration you will be provided with phone numbers and a conference ID to access the conference. To ask a question, press *5 on your telephone keypad to enter the queue.
105,992
(PDF, 806 KB)
Comparable net assets (at end of period)
In connection with the capital injection, the German State
77,971
Nordic power generation as its core business. It replaces the initial Uniper stabilisation agreement between the same parties, signed in July 2022.
Since July, the European energy crisis has escalated further and the severity of the situation has made it apparent that the previously agreed stabilisation measures are insufficient and difficult to implement. To date, Uniper has accumulated close to EUR 8.5 billion in gas-related losses and cannot continue to fulfil its role as a critical provider of security of supply as a privately-owned company. The newly found solution therefore involves German State control.
The completion of the agreed transaction remains subject to completion of definite agreements with the German State and Uniper as well as regulatory approvals in several geographies, including Merger Control and State Aid clearances from the European Commission. Completing the capital increase in Uniper by the German State also requires the approval by an Extraordinary General Meeting of Uniper. Completion of the agreed transaction is currently expected by the end of this year.
to take full control of Uniper to secure energy supply in Germany. Upon completion, the agreement enables Fortum to divest Uniper and refocus on clean
https://call.vsy.io/access-9913
683
with KfW providing further bridge financing as required to Uniper until the capital increase is implemented.
EUR 1.70 per share,
In previous quarters, Fortum has recorded significant accumulated losses mainly in the form of provisions and negative fair value adjustments from Uniper, mainly due to the Russian gas curtailment. Further Uniper losses in the third quarter and onwards will thus have no impact on Fortum group’s equity as these losses will be offset by the deconsolidation effect. Based on Fortum’s balance sheet as of 30 June 2022, the deconsolidation would strengthen Fortum group’s equity by approx. EUR 5 billion.
4,971
https://fortum.videosync.fi/2022-09-pressconference
The event can be followed live at
On the basis of the agreement, Fortum will deconsolidate Uniper as of the third quarter of 2022 which will have a positive impact on Fortum group’s equity.
Under the agreement, Uniper plans to issue 4.7 billion new ordinary registered shares, which the German State
The divestment will negatively impact the parent company Fortum Oyj’s equity, however, Fortum has assessed that the equity remains at a sufficient level and does not require additional capital injections.
plans to
EUR 1.70 per share, i.e. for a total of EUR 0.5 billion. At that point,
In connection with the deconsolidation of Uniper and reclassification to discontinued operations, Fortum will restate comparative quarterly information for the full year of 2021 and the first half of 2022. The restated information will be published prior to the publication of the group’s third quarter 2022 results on 10 November 2022.
At completion of the capital increase, the German State
-4,901
Since the stabilisation package for Uniper was agreed in July, Uniper’s situation has further deteriorated rapidly and significantly; as such, new measures to resolve the situation have been agreed.
1,173
21 September 2022, 08:40 EEST
A recording of the webcast as well as the transcript will be published on www.fortum.com/investors after the event.
-177
FORTUM CORPORATION INSIDE INFORMATION 21 SEPTEMBER 2022 AT 8:40 EEST
Upon completion of the capital injection and share purchase, the German State will own appr. 98.5% of Uniper.
1,789
change of control clause in the financing agreement will be triggered and
The parties have also agreed that Fortum will have a right of first offer in case Uniper intends to divest all or parts of its Swedish hydro and nuclear assets until the end of 2026.
I-II/2022
https://www.uniper.energy/
As a consequence of the agreement, Fortum will deconsolidate Uniper and report it as discontinued operations in the third quarter 2022 interim report. Fortum’s financials for the continuing operations will not include any impacts from Uniper’s operations.
Uniper shares are listed on the Frankfurt Stock Exchange. For further information:
232
A combined live webcast/teleconference for analysts, investors and media will be arranged online on 21 September 2022 at 10:00 EEST (9:00 CET). President and CEO Markus Rauramo will present the agreement and the plan to divest Uniper, followed by a Q&A session.
Presentation material
Completion of the agreement
buy all of
Fortum to fully divest Uniper to the German State | Fortum
the German State will provide the financing for the redemption of Fortum’s EUR 4 billion shareholder loan granted to Uniper and the release of the EUR 4 billion parent company guarantee.
subscribe at a nominal value of EUR 1.70 per share. The German state-owned KfW bank will provide Uniper with additional liquidity support as required until this EUR 8 billion capital increase is completed.
The completion of the transaction mitigates the risks related to the material uncertainty of Uniper’s liquidity and financial situation that also affects Fortum. The financial distress for Uniper or, ultimately, its insolvency, as a result of the failure of the agreed transaction, or otherwise, could be detrimental for Fortum and have serious consequences, not only for Fortum’s financial arrangements, but also for the Nordic and possibly European energy markets.
“Under the current circumstances in the European energy markets and recognising the severity of Uniper’s situation, the divestment of Uniper is the right step to take, not only for Uniper but also for Fortum. The role of gas in Europe has fundamentally changed since Russia attacked Ukraine, and so has the outlook for a gas-heavy portfolio. As a result, the business case for an integrated group is no longer viable,” says Markus Rauramo, CEO and President of Fortum.
News conference for analysts, investors and media
approximately EUR 0.5 billion in total.
-free electricity and heat as well as sustainable customer solutions,” Markus Rauramo says.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/09/talks-between-german-government-fortum-and-uniper-over-long-term-solution-uniper-continue
14 September 2022, 11:15 EEST
Since the stabilisation agreement was signed, the European energy crisis has escalated further as no Russian gas volumes are currently being supplied through Nord Stream 1 and both gas and power prices have been extremely high and volatile. Consequently, since July, Uniper’s financial losses due to the higher gas procurement cost and the uncertainty around the company’s future have rapidly and significantly increased. The deteriorating operating environment and Uniper’s financial situation have to be taken into account while Fortum, the German government and Uniper continue their discussions on a long-term solution for Uniper.
FORTUM CORPORATION INSIDE INFORMATION 14 SEPTEMBER 2022 AT 11:15 EEST
(PDF, 723 KB)
The German government, Fortum and Uniper agreed in July on a stabilisation package for Uniper. Since then, the parties’ joint priority has been the implementation of the stabilisation measures and a long-term solution for Uniper. Due to the increased uncertainties in the operating environment, the parties are also looking into alternative solutions. No decisions beyond what was agreed in the stabilisation package in July have been made.
Fortum will update the market as and if necessary.
Talks between German government, Fortum and Uniper over long-term solution for Uniper continue | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/08/fortums-subsidiary-uniper-draws-kfw-credit-facility-full-and-requests-increase
29 August 2022, 14:11 EEST
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 29 AUGUST 2022 AT 14:11 EEST
Carlo Beck, IR Manager, tel. +49 172 751 2480
Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper draws the KfW credit facility in full and requests an increase | Fortum
Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper has today announced (‘ad-hoc’) that the company’s liquidity position has further deteriorated due to ongoing gas curtailments and rapidly increasing energy prices. This has again increased Uniper’s liquidity and margining requirements over the last days.
Today’s release published by Uniper can be found on Uniper’s website.
Uniper today drew down EUR 2 billion under its existing credit facility with the German state-owned KfW Bank, thereby utilising the EUR 9 billion facility in full. Furthermore, Uniper has requested an extension of the KfW credit facility by additional EUR 4 billion as the discussions with the German government and Fortum on the implementation of the company’s stabilisation package are still ongoing. As agreed by the parties of the stabilisation package, Fortum will not provide any further financing to Uniper.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/10/fortum-publishes-restated-comparison-figures-reflect-divestment-uniper
-10,876
PUBLISHED
Key figures
31 Dec 2021
operations
4,970
-0.53
In 2021, Fortum’s Scope 1, 2 and 3 greenhouse gas emissions for continuing operations totalled 31.7 million CO
06 October 2022, 14:35 EEST
1.19
4.02
-eq tonnes originated from Russia. Scope 1 greenhouse gas emissions from discontinued operations totalled 51.2 million CO
1.0
0.44
0.40
The closing of the agreed transaction remains subject to completion of definite agreements with the German State and Uniper as well as regulatory approvals in several geographies, including clearances from the European Commission, and eventually the approval by an Extraordinary General Meeting of Uniper. Completion of the agreed transaction is currently expected by the end of this year.
-eq tonnes.
1,000
I-II//2021
0.94
The consolidated balance sheet is not restated and the restated figures do not include the impact from Uniper deconsolidation that will be recorded in the third quarter interim report. Based on Fortum’s balance sheet as of 30 June 2022, the deconsolidation effect would have amounted to approximately EUR 5 billion, partly reversing Uniper’s accumulated losses from the previous quarters. Further losses from Uniper will not have an impact on Fortum’s total consolidated income statement due to the offsetting deconsolidation effect in the Net profit from discontinued operations.
2,353
/kWh. Specific emissions for discontinued operations (Uniper) were 428 gCO
-2.48
0.50
Earnings per share continuing
-4,220
-eq tonnes. Scope 1 greenhouse gas emissions for continuing operations totalled 17.9 million CO
2.00
-4.13
-0.12
(PDF, 844 KB)
0.52
Financial net debt (at period-end), EUR million
0.42
(XLSX, 21 KB)
980
-eq tonnes originated from operations in Russia. Greenhouse gas emissions from discontinued operations totalled 158.5 million CO
2,171
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 6 OCTOBER 2022 AT 14:35 EEST
emissions from total energy production for continuing operations were 175 gCO
706
Fortum total
For further information see the following attached excel file:
-12,164
Reported
-4,913
-588
-2.50
-10.05
0.71
Financial and adjusted net debt for illustrative purposes
3,227
105,978
Earnings per share total Fortum
3,916
81,860
30 Jun 2022
6,422
4,913
4,188
Following the agreement, Fortum deconsolidates Uniper and reports it as discontinued operations in the third quarter 2022 interim financial statements.
-0.31
Release category: Other information disclosed according to the rules of the exchange
Fortum restated comparison figures 06102022
1,119
-1,254
1,801
Fortum publishes restated comparison figures to reflect the divestment of Uniper | Fortum
0.77
-164
789
On 21 September 2022, Fortum, the German government and Uniper signed an agreement in principle for a long-term solution for Uniper according to which Fortum fully divests shares in Uniper SE to the German State for EUR 0.5 billion. As part of the agreement, Fortum’s EUR 4 billion loan to Uniper will be repaid and Uniper will release the EUR 4 billion parent company guarantee.
I/2021
1.15
The restated key figures for Fortum in total, continuing operations and discontinued operations (Uniper segment) are as follows:
-eq tonnes, out of which 15.7 million CO
ILLUSTRATIVE
Financial and adjusted net debt
1,288
2,135
Earnings per share discontinued operations
Additional information for illustrative purposes
I-III/2021
-2,254
/kWh.
-0.11
/kWh. Fortum’s specific emissions, excluding Uniper and the Russia segment, were 39 gCO
77,944
Financial net debt/comparable EBITDA, continuing operations (LTM)
Comparable
-0.07
0.2
693
Adjusted net debt (at period-end), EUR million
1.03
0.82
For illustrative purposes, additional information regarding Fortum’s Financial net debt and Adjusted net debt as well as Financial net debt to Comparable EBITDA is presented based on 30 June 2022 balance sheet to show the impact of the deconsolidation of Uniper. The figures have been adjusted with the EUR 4 billion shareholder loan receivable that will be repaid upon completion of the transaction. The EUR 0.5 billion consideration for Fortum’s shares in Uniper is not included below as it will be recorded in the third quarter 2022.
I/2022
3,851
The total loss from the Uniper investment in the legal Fortum entity owning the Uniper shares will be slightly below EUR 6 billion which is the net effect from the investments in Uniper shares of approximately EUR 7.2 billion, the sales proceeds of EUR 0.5 billion to be received and dividends of approximately EUR 0.9 billion received during the Uniper ownership. The divestment will negatively impact the parent company Fortum Oyj’s equity, however, Fortum has assessed that the equity remains at a sufficient level and does not require additional capital injections.
-12,570
1.23
(XLSX, 288 KB)
-eq tonnes. Out of this 20.5 million CO
1,107
4,325
1,429
-0.02
1,013
4.49
Financial net debt/comparable EBITDA (LTM)
-8.90
0.8
Fortum illustrative financial net debt 06102022
816
-11,557
-3.65
In 2021, correspondingly, specific CO
0.76
/kWh, of which emissions from the Russia segment were 342 gCO
2,016


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/09/negotiations-between-german-government-fortum-and-uniper-over-long-term-solution-uniper-final-stages
FORTUM CORPORATION INSIDE INFORMATION 20 SEPTEMBER 2022 AT 17:20 EEST
20 September 2022, 17:20 EEST
Trading with Fortum’s share on Nasdaq Helsinki has been suspended.
As Fortum announced on 14 September 2022, negotiations are ongoing regarding an alternative solution to the July stabilization package for Uniper. With reference to information published today on Bloomberg, Fortum confirms that the negotiations are in the final stages and that the elements of the agreement under negotiation include a sale of Fortum’s Uniper shares to the German State, return of the financing Fortum granted to Uniper as well as a planned capital injection by the German State to Uniper. No final agreement is in place yet. Fortum will update the market once an agreement has been finalised and signed.
Negotiations between German government, Fortum and Uniper over a long-term solution for Uniper in final stages | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/10/inside-information-uniper-informs-significantly-negative-earnings-and-its-equity-has-fallen-below-50-share-capital-no-additional-impact-fortum
Inside information: Uniper informs of significantly negative earnings and that its equity has fallen below 50% of share capital – no additional impact on Fortum | Fortum
the German government and Uniper had signed an agreement in principle for a long-term solution according to which Fortum fully divests Uniper to the German State. The closing of the agreed transaction remains subject to various regulatory approvals and eventually the approval by an Extraordinary General Meeting of Uniper, currently planned to take place in the second half of December 2022.
25 October 2022, 19:49 EEST
FORTUM CORPORATION INSIDE INFORMATION 25 OCTOBER 2022 AT 19:49 EET
According to Uniper, the earnings development has also impacted Uniper SE’s German GAAP equity which has fallen below 50% of Uniper SE’s registered share capital.
Following the agreement, Fortum deconsolidates Uniper and reports it as discontinued operations in the third quarter 2022 interim report. In previous quarters, Fortum has recorded significant accumulated losses mainly in the form of provisions and negative fair value adjustments from Uniper, majority of which relate to the Russian gas curtailment. Further losses from Uniper during 2022 will not have an impact on Fortum’s total consolidated income statement.
On 21 September 2022, Fortum announced that the company,
Uniper SE has today published a stock exchange release (‘ad-hoc’) on the significantly negative earnings of the company’s earnings for the first nine months. Uniper’s financial position has been negatively impacted by Russian gas curtailments and corresponding replacement costs for gas.
Stock exchange on the restated comparison figures was published on 6 October 2022.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/07/fortum-concludes-sale-its-district-heating-business-baltics
“Over the past one and a half years we have determinedly executed our strategic transformation and sold mainly district heating assets and businesses worth approximately EUR 5.2 billion. With these successful divestments we have yet again demonstrated that we are constantly creating value for our shareholders and that we deliver on our strategy and our priority of maintaining a financially strong Group,” says President and CEO
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 2 JULY 2021 AT 18:00 EEST
02 July 2021, 18:00 EEST
Fortum continuously reviews and optimises its business and asset portfolio to create value and enable new growth. At the same time Fortum wants to secure a strong balance sheet and the Group’s credit rating of at least BBB. Most recently, earlier this week, Fortum announced it will divest its 50% ownership in Stockholm Exergi.
Fortum concludes the sale of its district heating business in the Baltics | Fortum
Following the fulfilment of customary closing conditions, Fortum has today concluded the sale of its district heating business in the Baltics to Partners Group, as announced on 12 March 2021.
At the time of signing, the 100% enterprise value was EUR 800 million. At the time of closing the total consideration of the sale amounted to approximately EUR 710 million following pre-agreed adjustments of minorities of some EUR 50 million and other closing items. Fortum will record a tax-exempt capital gain of approximately EUR 250 million in the City Solutions segment’s third-quarter 2021 results.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/12/fortum-and-uniper-windsolar-team-launches-its-first-project-pjelax-bole-and-kristinestad-norr-wind-parks-be-built-cooperation-helen
cooperation areas for Fortum and Uniper. The aim of strategic cooperation is to ensure focused and effective implementation of the Group strategy, to create more value and to optimise exploration of growth opportunities. The wind and solar organisation is under the leadership of Uniper, and its aim is to build between 1.5 and 2 gigawatt of new capacity in the most attractive European markets by 2025. Fortum’s and Uniper’s two other strategic cooperation areas are Nordic hydro and physical trading optimisation and hydrogen development.
Frank Possmeier
“This is our first joint renewables project with Fortum and it marks a major milestone. With a scale of 380 MW, an annual production of approximately 1.1 terawatt hours and in combination with a long-term
Fortum and Uniper Wind&Solar team launches its first project − Pjelax-Böle and Kristinestad Norr wind parks to be built in cooperation with Helen | Fortum
Petri Haataja, SVP Renewables, Wind Development, tel +358 403 589 130
electricity sales agreement
Kristinestad, Finland in partnership with the Finnish energy company Helen Ltd.
About Fortum and Uniper
The joint team of Fortum and Uniper for wind and solar businesses in Europe is launching its first project. Fortum has made an investment decision to start the construction of the 380-megawatt Pjelax-Böle and Kristinestad Norr wind parks in Närpes and in
Fortum and Uniper form a European energy group committed to enabling a successful transition to carbon neutrality for everyone. Our 50 gigawatts of power generating capacity, substantial gas import and storage operations, and our global energy trading business enable us to provide Europe and other regions with a reliable supply of low-carbon energy. We are already Europe’s third largest producer of CO2-free electricity, and our growth businesses focus on clean power, low-carbon energy, and the infrastructure for tomorrow’s hydrogen economy. In addition, we design solutions that help companies and cities reduce their environmental footprint. Our 20,000 professionals and operations in 40 countries give us the skills, resources, and reach to empower energy evolution toward a cleaner world.
Nora Hallberg, IR and Financial Communications, tel. +358 40 720 1775
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 22 DECEMBER AT 16:30 EET
Helen Ltd helps to make everyday life a little easier for over 600,000 customers in Finland. In addition to heat, cooling and electricity, we offer solutions for regional and renewable energy, smart buildings and electric transport. We are developing a smarter, carbon-neutral energy system that enables everyone to produce, use and save energy with respect for the environment. We aim to achieve 100% carbon neutrality in our energy production by 2030. Let’s join forces and turn the opportunities of a new energy era into reality.
Fortum's and Uniper’s business model for wind and solar consists of development, construction, asset management as well as partnerships and other forms of co-operation.
“We are extremely pleased to announce our partnership with Helen and our first joint wind park project with Uniper. This is an important step in implementing our Nordic wind strategy and we will continue to build on our long-standing expertise to grow in carbon free power generation,” says
(PDF, 108 KB)
22 December 2021, 16:30 EET
, Executive Vice President of Fortum’s Generation division.
with a very good partner, this project is a lighthouse for the future of our joint renewables ambition. Together, Fortum and Uniper can leverage our joint expertise to accelerate our decarbonisation,” says
The project consists of 56 wind turbines with an annual power generation of approximately 1.1 terawatt hours. Construction with civil works will start in January 2022 and the wind parks are expected to be fully operational at the latest in the second quarter of 2024. Fortum will retain a 60% majority and Helen a 40% minority ownership in the project and the investment will be consolidated on Fortum’s balance sheet. The total capital expenditure of the projects is approximately EUR 360 million, of which Fortum’s share is EUR 216 million.
, Executive Vice President of Fortum’s and Uniper’s joint wind and solar businesses.
Juha-Pekka Weckström
As announced in December 2020, onshore wind and solar is one of the three strategic
Fortum and Helen have also signed a long-term electricity sales agreement (PPA, power purchase agreement) according to which Helen is to purchase approximately half of the power generation from the Pjelax-Böle and Kristinestad Norr wind parks.
“It’s great to be involved in investing in another wind farm project in Finland. This investment will triple Helen’s wind power production. Helen’s target is carbon-neutral energy production in 2030. Wind power is one of a number of means of achieving the carbon neutrality target in a profitable way,” says Helen’s CEO


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2015/03/fortum-concludes-divestment-its-electricity-distribution-business-selling-swedish-business-approx-eur-66-billion
The consortium: Over 20 years of experience and strong presence in Sweden
Teleconference for investors and analysts on Monday, 16 March, 2015
AP1 is one of five buffer funds in the Swedish national income pension system. The capital reserves in the AP funds are used to cover the deficit when disbursements from the pension system exceed contributions to the system. The AP Funds strive to manage the fund capital so as to deliver attractive long-term investment returns while maintaining an appropriate level of risk for current and future pensioners.
Borealis Infrastructure has 16 years of experience originating, structuring and actively managing infrastructure investments on behalf of the Ontario Municipal Employees Retirement System (“OMERS”), a large defined benefit Canadian pension plan with over 450,000 members, with C$72.0 billion (SEK487 billion) of net assets (as at 31 December 2014) and a AAA credit rating from Standard & Poor’s. OMERS was one of the first large Canadian pension plans to invest in private markets, including infrastructure and has earmarked more than 20% of its portfolio to be allocated to infrastructure investments. Borealis has sourced and currently manages over 20 infrastructure investments in Canada, Europe and the United States, representing over C$12.7 billion (SEK86 billion) of OMERS’s invested equity.
Fortum expects to book a one-time sales gain of approximately EUR 4.4 billion corresponding to approximately EUR 5 per share in its second quarter 2015 results. In the first quarter 2015 Interim Report the Distribution Segment will be presented as discontinued operations.
Press conference on Saturday, 14 March, 2015
Key figures in 2014 for Fortum's Distribution business in Sweden:
www.fortum.com/investors
Fortum's purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future generations. The company provides sustainable solutions for society and delivers excellent value to its shareholders. The company’s strategy is based on building strong Nordic core, creating solid earnings growth in Russia, and building a platform for future growth. At the core of Fortum's strategy is its strong competence in CO2-free hydro and nuclear power, efficient combined heat and power (CHP) production and in operating in the energy markets.
Fortum and a consortium comprising Swedish national pension funds Första AP-Fonden (AP 1) (12.5%) and Tredje AP-Fonden (AP 3) (20.0%), Swedish mutual insurance and pension savings company Folksam (17.5%)  and the international infrastructure investor, Borealis Infrastructure Management Inc. (50%), have today signed a binding agreement for the sale and purchase of Fortum Distribution AB, which operates and owns Fortum's electricity distribution business in Sweden.
- Net assets (at period-end) EUR 2,615 million
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 13 March 2015 at 17.30 EET
- Sales EUR 634 million
"After the divestment of its distribution businesses Fortum will concentrate on the growth and development of our core businesses, based on our competences: CO2-free hydro and nuclear power generation and efficient combined heat and power (CHP) production. We will also continue to develop electricity sales and related customer solutions to our 1.3 million electricity retail customers," says Timo Karttinen. "We continue to have a strong presence in Sweden, and remain committed to develop our business in the Nordic countries while looking for growth opportunities in line with our strategy."
An international teleconference in English for analysts and investors will be held on Monday, 16 March 2015 at 16.00 CET. The dial-in numbers are: European callers: +44(0)20 3427 1907, US callers: +1212 444 0896, Swedish callers: +46(0)8 5352 6408, Finnish callers: +358(0)9 6937 9543. Confirmation code: 3608999.
AP1 has assets under management of SEK284 billion (at 31 December 2014) in a global portfolio consisting of equities, fixed income securities and alternative investments that include real estate, private equity funds and hedge funds. AP1’s strategic allocation focus is around 50% of the fund capital invested in equities, 30% in fixed income securities and around 20% in alternative investments. The allocation to alternatives, and in particular infrastructure, is targeted to grow further as AP1 seeks to further enhance its risk factor diversification.
Communications contacts:
www.folksam.se
Fortum's focus on power generation and electricity sales
Fortum's electricity distribution business in Sweden owns and operates approximately 71,000 km of electricity distribution and regional networks and distributes electricity to some 906,000 customers. The transaction as such has no immediate effect on the customers. The volume of distributed electricity in distribution network was 13.7 TWh in 2014. Fortum's market share of the local electricity distribution in Sweden is approximately 17%.
There will be a replay facility available for one week after the teleconference: European callers: +44(0)20 3427 0598, US callers: +1 347 366 9565, Swedish callers: +46(0)8 5051 3897, Finnish callers: +358(0)9 2310 1650.  Confirmation code: 3608999. A live audio webcast of the call will be available together with the slide presentation on Fortum’s website at
- Comparable EBITDA EUR 365 million
Helena Aatinen Senior Vice President, Corporate Communications
13 March 2015, 17:30 EET
Electricity distribution business in Sweden
The consortium members have over 20 years of combined experience in the acquisition and management of infrastructure assets. The Consortium has a strong Swedish presence with AP 1, AP 3 and Folksam owning 50% of the shares. The Consortium is committed to a long-term, stable and supportive ownership of the Distribution business.
). In the press conference in Stockholm, please show your press card and photo ID.
Further information on the consortium members:
AP3 is one of the five buffer funds in the national income pension system in Sweden and manages a diversified global portfolio of listed equities, fixed income assets and alternative investments. Alternative investments consist of real estate, private equity, timberland and infrastructure assets. The value of the portfolio stood at approximately SEK288 billion on 31 December 2014.
The transaction concludes the divestment of Fortum's distribution business activities. The total consideration from divestments in Finland, Sweden and Norway will be approximately EUR 9.3 billion on a debt- and cash-free basis with approximately EUR 6.3 billion sales gain booked during 2014 and 2015. The strategic assessment of the future alternatives of Fortum's electricity distribution business was originally made in 2013.
The total consideration is approximately SEK 60.6 billion on a debt- and cash-free basis (corresponding to approximately EUR 6.6 billion). Fortum expects to complete the divestment process during the second quarter of 2015 subject to the necessary regulatory approvals as well as customary closing conditions.
Timo Karttinen, Interim President and CEO, tel. +358 10 45 36555
Fortum concludes the divestment of its electricity distribution business by selling the Swedish business for approx. EUR 6.6 billion | Fortum
- Comparable operating profit EUR 235 million
A press conference in English will be held on Saturday, 14 March 2015 at 12.00 CET in Nordic Light Hotel, Vasaplan 7, Stockholm. The press conference will be webcasted on Fortum’s Corporate website (
+358 10 45 20480,
Folksam is a Swedish mutual insurance and pension savings company and has approximately SEK350 billion of assets under management (as at 31 December 2014) and with a strong market position in both life and non-life insurance. Folksam has today more than 4 million customers, or almost every second person in Sweden.
Fortum’s purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future generations. Catering to the versatile needs of our customers, we generate, distribute and sell electricity and heat, and offer related expert services. Our operations focus on the Nordic and Baltic countries, Russia and Poland. In 2014, Fortum’s sales totalled EUR 4.75 billion and comparable operating profit was EUR 1.35 billion. We employ approximately 8,800 people. Fortum’s shares are traded on the Nasdaq Helsinki.
"A competent and experienced buyer with a long-term commitment to infrastructure and customer service is a very good solution for our 906,000 distribution customers in Sweden. At the same time, this is very good for our some 390 distribution employees, who will transfer with the business at closing with the existing terms of employment. The business is financially and operationally in a very good shape. It will now have a new owner that will develop the business as a core business," says Timo Karttinen, Fortum's Interim President and CEO.
- Capital expenditure EUR 134 million


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2011/01/fortum-finnish-state-and-ilmarinen-preliminary-agreement-over-sale-fortums-fingrid-shares
26 January 2011, 14:03 EET
Timo Karttinen
Fortum, the Finnish State and Ilmarinen into preliminary agreement over the sale of Fortum's Fingrid shares | Fortum
at Fortum.
Timo Karttinen, Executive Vice President, Electricity Solutions and Distribution, tel. +358 10 453 6555
Fortum, the Finnish State and Ilmarinen Mutual Pension Insurance Company have come to a preliminary agreement according to which Fortum will sell its 25%-shareholding in the Finnish transmission system operator Fingrid Oyj. The State will buy approximately 81% and Ilmarinen approximately 19% of Fortum's Fingrid shares. The transaction is subject to a final agreement between the parties and to necessary approvals by their decision-making bodies. Furthermore, the completion of the transaction requires the approval of the Finnish Competition Authority.
The sales price for the total amount of shares is EUR 325 million and consequently, Fortum expects book a gain of roughly EUR 200 million, corresponding to approximately EUR 0.22 per share once the transaction has been completed. Fortum estimates that the divestment will be finalised during the first half of 2011. The proceeds will be used on general corporate purposes.
"We are very pleased to have reached this preliminary agreement with the Finnish State and Ilmarinen. With this divestment, we are also contributing to the development of a single, liberalised European energy market," says Executive Vice President
Fortum is selling its holding in Fingrid as a result of the EU's third energy market package that calls for the separation of high voltage transmission and power generation. The package entered into force in September 2009 and, according to it, Fortum will have to divest its entire ownership in the Finnish transmission system operator Fingrid by early 2012.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2017/04/fortum-and-rusnano-establish-investment-partnership-create-possibility-capture-csa-wind-opportunity-russia
is commissioning 35 MW of wind capacity in Russia, receiving CSA payments for a
(currently approximately EUR 240 million). The amount is invested over time
capacity in Russia. The goal supports Fortum's strategy to increase the share
Fortum and RUSNANO establish investment partnership to create possibility to capture CSA wind opportunity in Russia | Fortum
such as the Russian prerequisite for domestic production of wind power
guaranteed period of 15 years.
possibility of a Russian Capacity Supply Agreement (CSA) wind portfolio in
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 27 APRIL 2017 08:45 EEST
of CO2-free generation capacity and is in line with the company's overall
agreed to sign a 50/50 investment partnership in order to secure the
target of creating a gigawatt-scale wind and solar portfolio. In 2017, Fortum
Investor Relations & Financial Communications, Sophie Jolly, tel. +358 10 453
invested to the joint venture and local non-recourse debt.
Fortum’s equity stake in the joint venture totals a maximum of RUB 15 billion
Fortum's long-term ambition is to have approximately 500 megawatts (MW) of wind
Fortum and RUSNANO, a Russian state-owned development company, have today
decisions. Separate investment decisions will be made on a case-by-case basis
2552, Rauno Tiihonen, tel. +358 10 453 6150, Måns Holmberg, tel. +358 44 518
27 April 2017, 08:45 EEST
(within approximately 5 years) as it is subject to positive investment
Russia. Further progress in the matter is still dependent on several factors
for each possible investment. The projects will be financed with the equity
1518, Pirjo Lifländer +358 40 643 3317, and
Fortum and RUSNANO establish investment partnership to create possibility to capture CSA wind opportunity in Russia
generating components as well as auction outcome.
As earlier communicated at Fortum’s Capital Markets Day held in November 2016,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2008/02/fortum-participated-share-auction-russian-tgc-10
FORTUM PARTICIPATED IN SHARE AUCTION OF RUSSIAN TGC-10
28 February 2008, 18:08 EET
Fortum has participated in a share auction of the listed Russian Territorial
Generating Company TGC-10 operating in Urals region. The auction was conducted
today, 28 February. Fortum will disclose more information as soon as it has
received an official confirmation on the auction result from the selling party,
RAO UES. The confirmation is expected tomorrow, 29 February. 


Fortum Corporation
Maria Romantschuk
Senior Vice President, Corporate Communications


Distribution:
OMX Nordic Exchange Helsinki
Key media
www.fortum.com
FORTUM PARTICIPATED IN SHARE AUCTION OF RUSSIAN TGC-10 | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2019/12/fortum-expands-shareholder-base-its-nordic-wind-portfolio
Together with its associated companies Fortum has a total portfolio of approximately 3,000 MW of solar and wind capacities in the Nordics, Russia, and India, of which 713 MW is operational and the remainder is under construction or development.
Joonas Rauramo, VP, Wind, tel. +358 40 354 3732
The total consideration of the divestment of the 80% stake on a debt and cash free basis is expected to be approximately EUR 250 million, of which EUR 170 million is related to the first quarter of 2020. The transaction is subject to regulatory approvals in the EU and is expected to close in the first quarter of 2020.
The sale will have a minor positive effect on the Generation segment’s first-quarter 2020 comparable operating profit.
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 20 DECEMBER 2019 16:45 EET
"We are strongly committed to our wind parks and developing wind power in the Nordics. Credit Suisse Energy Infrastructure Partners is a strong and experienced investor in wind power, especially in the Nordics. The transaction is in line with Fortum’s business model for capital recycling and it releases capital and enables us to continue to utilise Fortum’s key competencies to develop, construct, and operate wind power plants in the Nordics," says Joonas Rauramo, Vice President, Wind at Fortum.
Fortum expands the shareholder base of its Nordic wind portfolio | Fortum
The portfolio consists of the operational Nygårdsfjellet (32 MW, Norway), Ånstadblåheia (50 MW, Norway), and Solberg (76 MW, Sweden) wind parks as well as the Kalax (90 MW, Finland) wind park, which is under construction. The parties have also agreed that funds advised by CSEIP will invest in an 80% share of the Sørfjord (97 MW, Norway) wind park, once it is fully commissioned. The Sørfjord wind park is still under construction. Part of the capacities are already operational and the remaining part is expected to be commissioned by the end of the third quarter of 2020. In addition, Fortum and CSEIP have agreed on further cooperation and signed an exclusivity on a new project in Sävar, Sweden (154 MW) with the ambition to build it at a later stage. This would increase the jointly owned capacity to approximately 500 MW.
20 December 2019, 16:45 EET
Investment funds advised by Credit Suisse Energy Infrastructure Partners AG (CSEIP) specialize in long-term investments in the energy sector. The funds hold on behalf of 150 pension funds and insurance companies various energy assets, including hydro, power transmission and distribution, gas transport as well as on- and offshore wind parks. CSEIP is one of the major investors in Nordic onshore wind assets with now more than 2 GW of installed capacity.
Credit Suisse Energy Infrastructure Partners
Fortum and Credit Suisse Energy Infrastructure Partners (CSEIP) have today signed an agreement whereby funds advised by CSEIP will acquire an 80% stake in Fortum’s Nordic wind portfolio. Fortum will retain a 20% minority ownership in this wind power portfolio, continue to manage the construction, and serve as long-term asset manager for the wind portfolio.
"To invest in wind power alongside a strong and dedicated industrial partner like Fortum is a great opportunity for us. We are delighted to start the co-operation with Fortum, who already demonstrated significant expertise and commitment in building and operating several wind parks in the Nordics," says Tim Marahrens, Transaction Lead, Credit Suisse Energy Infrastructure Partners.
Fortum will continue to develop other Nordic wind power projects that are still at earlier development phases.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/12/fortum-continues-its-investments-circular-economy-acquiring-turebergs-recycling-ab-sweden
business in ash treatment.
Fortum continues its investments in circular economy by acquiring Turebergs Recycling AB in Sweden | Fortum
tel. +358 50 3833 497
full, including metal separation, is in line with our vision ‘For a cleaner
world’ as it helps save natural resources and reduce carbon dioxide emissions.
within treatment and recycling of incinerated bottom ash. The circular economy
generation is CO2 free. In 2015, our sales were EUR 3.5 billion. (NASDAQ
Fortum is a leading clean energy company which provides its customers with
is here to stay and we look forward to follow the company’s continued success”.
the new owner of our subsidiary Turebergs Recycling, which has long experience
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 21 December 2016
important part of the business is separation of metals for reuse.
acquisition of Ekokem in August 2016 has strong competences and existing
Fortum has today finalized an acquisition of Turebergs Recycling AB from
excess of SEK 100 million with strong profitability. The company will be
Acquisition of Ekokem was our first big step entering into circular economy
waste-to-energy plants. The company has long-term contracts with its customers,
HELSINKI: FUM1V). www.fortum.com
Turebergs Recycling operates mostly in Stockholm area and has annual revenue in
environmental construction, recycling and processing of bottom ash from
a cleaner world. We employ some 8,000 professionals in the Nordic and the
entry into materials recycling business. Utilisation of incineration waste in
Baltic countries, Russia, Poland and India, and already 64% of our electricity
about the acquisition of Turebergs Recycling, which reinforces our determined
Daniel Bergholtz, owner of Turebergs Åkeri AB comments: “We welcome Fortum as
Markus Rauramo, head of City Solutions division comments: “We are very pleased
Turebergs Åkeri AB with an enterprise value of up to approximately EUR 11
and utilizes the cleansed material as infrastructure construction material. An
million (SEK 108 million). The main business of Turebergs Recycling is
21 December 2016, 15:00 EET
business and we expect to continue our growth when attractive opportunities
arise both in our existing home markets as well as in new geographies.”
integrated as a part of Fortum’s City Solutions division, which through the
based on which Turebergs Recycling receives combustion residues, treats them
Antti Kaartokallio, Head of Environmental Construction, Fortum, City Solutions,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/05/fortum-has-made-indicative-non-binding-offer-acquire-ekokem
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 13 May 2016 at 9:15 EEST
Fortum does not estimate the timetable or the outcome.
13 May 2016, 09:15 EEST
Sophie Jolly, Vice President, Investor Relations and Financial Communications tel.
Fortum has made an indicative, non-binding offer to acquire Ekokem | Fortum
Ekokem is a Nordic circular economy company that would fit well with Fortum's clean energy strategy, which is focusing on providing sustainable solutions to, for example, energy and waste issues of cities and urban areas.
Fortum has made an indicative, non-binding offer to the four biggest shareholders in Ekokem to acquire their shareholding in the company. The biggest shareholders are Finnish State (Government ownership steering department), Association of Finnish Local and Regional Authorities, Ilmarinen Mutual Pension Insurance Company and Helsinki Region Environmental Services Authority HSY, representing more than 80% of the shares.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/04/fortum-has-obtained-100-shares-electricity-and-gas-sales-company-grupa-duon-sa-poland
The acquisition is in line with Fortum's strategy to offer and grow in sustainable city solutions.
Izabela Van den Bossche, Vice President, Communications, tel. +48 692 209 428
Fortum announced a tender offer for Grupa DUON S.A. on 8 January 2016. During the subscription period that ended on 26 February 2016 Fortum received subscriptions from shareholders representing altogether 93.35% shares in the company at the offered price PLN 3.85 per share. The remaining shares were purchased from shareholders under the mandatory squeeze-out procedure at the same price per share.
08 April 2016, 14:45 EEST
Duon
Fortum has obtained 100% of shares in the electricity and gas sales company Grupa DUON S.A. in Poland | Fortum
On 8 April 2016, Fortum has obtained 100% of shares in Grupa DUON S.A., an electricity and gas sales company listed on the Warsaw Stock Exchange.
Duon sells electricity and natural gas. The company was founded in 2000, and it is currently one of the leading independent providers of electricity and natural gas in Poland. It is also a leading distributor and transporter of LNG. In 2015, its revenues were PLN 861 million (EUR 206 million) and EBITDA PLN 42 million (EUR 10 million). Currently it employs approximately 500 people. The company has been listed on the Warsaw Stock Exchange since 2007 (DUO: WSE).
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 8 APRIL 2016 at 14.45 EEST


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/03/fortum-sell-its-50-ownership-fortum-oslo-varme-norwegian-investor-consortium-approximately-eur-1-billion
751
2480
Carlo Beck, IR Manager, tel. +49
Hafslund Eco:
453
Martin S. Lundby, Deputy CEO and EVP growth and investments, tel. +47 416 14 448, or e-mail:
Fortum to sell its 50% ownership in Fortum Oslo Varme AS to a Norwegian investor consortium for approximately EUR 1 billion | Fortum
FORTUM CORPORATION INSIDE INFORMATION 22 MARCH 2022 AT 9:00 EET
Infranode is a long-term infrastructure investor with a special focus on the Nordic countries. It invests in energy, energy distribution, renewable energy, digital infrastructure, transport, and social infrastructure. Infranode has about EUR 1.7 billion in committed capital from long-term institutional investors, including Folksam, the Swedish municipal pension fund KPA Pension, Finland’s largest pension provider KEVA, and Norway’s largest asset manager Storebrand.
About Infranode
6150
172
We have had a strong partnership with the City of Oslo, combining competencies to drive innovation for a greener Oslo. Fortum Oslo Varme has ambitious plans for its Klemetsrud waste-to-energy plant to implement carbon capture and storage (CCS) as one important technology to combat climate change. Fortum Oslo Varme is a well-run business so after the Hafslund Eco led consortium approached us, we considered our options carefully. Our conclusion is that it is of best interest of Fortum Oslo Varme to continue its good development under the new ownership known for its sustainable hydropower and long-term investments in infrastructure in Northern Europe,
"Fortum Oslo Varme is an innovative and successful company, and its heating and cooling operations fit very well with Hafslund Eco's renewable generation and infrastructure portfolio. We believe that combining the great competences of Fortum Oslo Varme with Hafslund Eco’s competence and experience within renewable energy and the Nordic power market will create exciting opportunities for sustainable growth,” says Finn Bjørn Ruyter, CEO of Hafslund Eco.
hafslundeco
HitecVision is a Norwegian private equity fund manager and serial entrepreneur. With EUR 7 billion in capital under management, the firm is a leading investor in the European energy sector.  Over the past 25 years, HitecVision has established or contributed to the development and growth of more than 200 companies. In recent years HitecVision has focused on opportunities in the energy transition, where collaboration with established industrial players is an integral part of the company's business model.
Ingela Ulfves, VP, IR and Financial Communications, tel. +358
Rauno Tiihonen, IR Manager, tel. +358
Fortum Oslo Varme is jointly owned (50/50) by Fortum and the City of Oslo. Fortum Oslo Varme is the largest supplier of district heating in Norway and supplied 36% of district heating generated in Norway in 2021. It sold 1.8 TWh of district heating and generated 0.1 TWh of electricity with a comparable EBITDA of EUR 88 million, with very marginal impact on EPS. Fortum Oslo Varme's waste-to-energy plant at Klemetsrud, Oslo is Norway's largest with a capacity to end-treat 315,000 tonnes of waste per year. The company employs approximately 200 people. In 2017, Fortum became the owner of Fortum Oslo Varme in the Hafslund transaction.
About Hafslund Eco
Martin
5151
Over the past years, Fortum has divested several of its heating and cooling businesses. In 2020, Fortum divested its district heating businesses in Joensuu and Järvenpää in Finland, and in 2021, Fortum sold its district heating businesses in the Baltics and its 50% ownership in Stockholm Exergi in Sweden. In the case of Fortum Oslo Varme, Fortum was approached by the buyer. Following a thorough internal assessment, a decision was taken to divest the 50% ownership.
Lundby
531
Fortum has today signed an agreement to sell its 50% ownership in the district heating company Fortum Oslo Varme AS in Norway to an investor consortium comprising Hafslund Eco, Infranode and HitecVision. The total consideration for Fortum’s share is approximately NOK 10 billion on a cash and debt free basis (approximately EUR 1 billion based on current currency rate) and as part of the transaction, Fortum will deconsolidate a related  NOK 2 billion loan from the City of Oslo. The consideration is based on a 100% enterprise value of NOK 20 billion (approximately EUR 2 billion). Fortum expects to record a tax-exempt capital gain of approximately EUR 0.6 billion in the City Solutions segment’s results in connection with closing of the transaction. The transaction is subject to approval by the Oslo City Council (Bystyret), necessary regulatory approvals and fulfilment of the customary closing conditions. The closing of the transactions is expected during the second quarter of 2022.
About HitecVision
Hafslund Eco is Norway's second largest power generator. It owns 80 hydropower plants in the Southern part of Norway, and operates a production of 21 TWh, sufficient to supply over 2.6 million inhabitants with clean, renewable hydropower. The company also owns 50 percent of Eidsiva Energi, and through it a half of Elvia, Norway's largest grid company with about 900,000 customers, as well as companies in broadband and district heating. Offshore wind is one of Hafslund Eco's strategic focus areas.
says Markus Rauramo, President and CEO of Fortum
22 March 2022, 09:00 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2008/07/fortums-mandatory-public-tender-offer-tgc-10-minorities-has-ended
22 July 2008, 09:00 EEST
Fortum's mandatory public tender offer to TGC-10 minorities has ended           

The acceptance period for Fortum's mandatory public tender offer (MTO) for the  
entire share capital of the Russian Territorial Generating Company No. 10       
(TGC-10) to TGC-10 minorities expired on 18 July 2008. According to preliminary 
information, minorities holding more than 14% of TGC-10 shares have indicated   
that they accept the offer. In March 2008, Fortum acquired 76.49% of TGC-10.    

In the application for the sale of TGC-10 shares, the minorities were given the 
option to inform Fortum of their willingness to divest all of their shares.     
Furthermore, the shareholders of TGC-10 who have accepted the offer now have two
months (until 16 September 2008) to transfer their shares to the depositary     
account of Fortum Russia B.V. It is expected that the settlement will be        
completed by the end of September. Therefore, the final results of the MTO i.e. 
the number of transferred shares will be known and published only in the        
beginning of October 2008.                                                      

In the event that Fortum's shareholding in TGC-10 exceeds 95% as a result of the
MTO Fortum may elect, in accordance with Russian law, to do a compulsory        
purchase of the remaining shares in TGC-10.                                     

Fortum Corporation                                                              
Maria Romantschuk                                                               
Senior Vice President, Communications                                           

Further information:                                                            
Kari Kautinen, Vice President, M&A, Fortum Corporation,                         
+358 50 453 2174                                                                

Distribution:                                                                   
OMX Nordic Exchange Helsinki                                                    
Key media                                                                       
www.fortum.com
Fortum's mandatory public tender offer to TGC-10 minorities has ended | Fortum
Fortum Corporation                                                              
Stock exchange release                                                          
22 July 2008 9:00 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2014/04/fortum-sells-its-norwegian-electricity-distribution-and-heat-businesses
Fortum's heat business consists of heat production and sales as well as district heat and cooling activities in Norway. Heat production capacity consists mainly of heat pumps and business-to-business heat plants with a combined capacity of 210 megawatts. In 2013, Fortum’s Norwegian heat business delivered 215 gigawatt-hours (GWh) of district heat and 63 GWhs of district cooling to its customers, who are mainly in the greater Oslo and Akershus areas. The delivery of heat and cooling to customers will continue without disruption following the transaction and all 14 current employees will continue their work in the business
Fortum sells its Norwegian electricity distribution and heat businesses | Fortum
Fortum's approximately 34%-shareholding in Hafslund ASA is not included in the arrangement. Furthermore, Fortum will continue to sell electricity and to develop and offer related services to its electricity retail customers in Norway as before.
Fortum's Norwegian electricity distribution grids are located in the Østfold area in southeastern Norway delivering approximately 2.6 terawatt-hours of electricity to approximately 103 000 customers. The electricity distribution to customers will continue without disruption and a total of 96 employees will continue their work in the business following the transaction.
Fortum’s purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future generations. Catering to the versatile needs of our customers, we generate, distribute and sell electricity and heat, and offer related expert services. Our operations focus on the Nordic and Baltic countries, Russia and Poland. In 2013, Fortum’s sales totalled EUR 6.1 billion and comparable operating profit was EUR 1.6 billion. We employ approximately 9,500 people. Fortum’s shares are traded on the NASDAQ OMX Helsinki.
09 April 2014, 09:00 EEST
The total consideration is EUR 340 million on a debt- and cash-free basis. Fortum expects to complete the divestments during the second quarter of 2014 after the necessary regulatory approvals as well as customary closing conditions have been met. Fortum expects to book a one-time sales gain totalling approximately EUR 70 million and corresponding to approximately EUR 0.08 per share in the second quarter 2014 results. The sales gain will be booked in Fortum's Distribution segment and Heat and Electricity Sales and Solutions segment.
The combined sales of the Norwegian electricity distribution and heat businesses amounted to EUR 105 million in 2013. The combined comparable operating profit of the businesses was EUR 24 million and comparable EBITDA was EUR 39 million. Combined net assets at the end of 2013 were EUR 247 million.
Timo Karttinen, CFO, tel. +358 10 453 6555
Fortum has agreed to sell its Norwegian electricity distribution to the Hafslund Group, listed on the Oslo Stock Exchange, and its heat businesses in Norway to iCON Infrastructure Partners II, L.P. fund. The decision to divest the electricity distribution business in Norway is linked to the strategic assessment of the company's electricity distribution business' future alternatives in 2013. In heat business, Fortum focuses on larger urban centres with potential for combined heat and power (CHP) development. In addition, Fortum has agreed to sell its shareholding in Fredrikstad Energi AS (49%) and Fredrikstad Energi Nett AS (35%) to the Hafslund Group.
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 9 April 2014 at 9.00 EEST


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2014/05/fortum-completes-divestment-its-norwegian-electricity-distribution-business
, who is also responsible for Fortum's Distribution business.
Fortum has today completed the divestment of its Norwegian electricity distribution business to the Hafslund Group, listed on the Oslo Stock Exchange. The transaction has all the necessary regulatory approvals and the customary closing conditions have been met.
The decision to divest Fortum's Norwegian electricity distribution business is linked to the strategic assessment of the company's electricity distribution business' future alternatives last year. In its heat business, Fortum will focus on bigger urban areas providing the possibilities to develop combined heat and power (CHP) production.
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 30 May 2014 at 14.00 EEST
The total consideration including both deals is EUR 340 million on a debt- and cash-free basis of which approximately EUR 200 million relates to electricity distribution transactions, which was completed with Hafslund today. As announced 8th of April, Fortum expects to book a one-time sales gain totalling approximately EUR 70 million from all Norwegian transactions, corresponding to approximately EUR 0.08 per share, in its second quarter 2014 results. The final sales gain will be reported in Fortum's Distribution segment as well as in Heat, Electricity Sales and Solutions segment.
A total of 84 employees will continue their work in the sold business. The electricity distribution of the business' approximately 103,000 customers will also continue without disruption upon closing. Fortum will continue to sell electricity and to develop and offer related services to its electricity retail customers in Norway as before.
Fortum completes divestment of its Norwegian electricity distribution business | Fortum
"We are pleased to close this deal. Warm thanks to our electricity distribution customers and our Distribution employees in Norway for the shared years," says Fortum's CFO
In April, Fortum also announced the divestment of its heat businesses in Norway to iCON Infrastructure Partners II, L.P. fund. The transaction is estimated to be completed by the end of June 2014.
30 May 2014, 14:00 EEST


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/01/fortum-concludes-sale-its-district-heating-business-joensuu-finland
The total consideration of the sale on a debt- and cash-free basis is approximately EUR 530 million. Fortum will record a tax exempt capital gain of approximately EUR 430 million in the City Solutions segment’s first-quarter 2020 results.
Fortum concludes the sale of its district heating business in Joensuu, Finland | Fortum
10 January 2020, 14:35 EET
Fortum has today concluded the sale of its district heating business in Joensuu, Finland to Savon Voima Oyj, as announced on 20 December 2019.
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 10 JANUARY 2020 AT 14:35 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/02/fortum-secures-least-51-shares-electricity-and-gas-sales-company-grupa-duon-sa-poland
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 25 FEBRUARY 2016 at 19.20 EET
Fortum announced the tender offer for Grupa DUON on 8 January 2016. The acquisition is in line with Fortum's strategy to offer and grow in sustainable city solutions including electricity sales and related customer services.
Sophie Jolly, Vice President, Investor Relations, tel.
25 February 2016, 19:20 EET
Fortum secures at least 51% of shares in the electricity and gas sales company Grupa DUON S.A. in Poland | Fortum
Fortum has received sell commitments from shareholders representing at least 51% of shares in the public tender offer to purchase all shares in Grupa DUON S.A., an electricity and gas sales company listed on the Warsaw Stock Exchange. Fortum will, thereby, carry out the acquisition and buy the shares subscribed by the end of the offer period that will close on Friday 26 February 2016 at 17.00 CET. The offered price is PLN 3.85 per share.
Izabela Van den Bossche, Vice President, Corporate Communications, tel. +48692209428


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2011/04/fortum-finnish-state-and-ilmarinen-final-agreement-over-sale-fingrid-shares
Fortum, the Finnish State and Ilmarinen into a final agreement over sale of Fingrid shares | Fortum
Further information on Fingrid is available at
Fortum is selling its holding in the Finnish transmission system operator Fingrid as a result of the EU's third energy market package that calls for the separation of high voltage transmission and power generation. The package entered into force in September 2009 and, according to it, Fortum will have to divest its entire ownership in Fingrid by early 2012.
Tel. +358 10 453 6555
19 April 2011, 08:24 EEST
The sales price is EUR 325 million. Consequently, Fortum expects to book a gain of roughly EUR 200 million in its second-quarter 2011 financial results including Fortum's share of Fingrid's first quarter 2011 profit, corresponding to approximately EUR 0.22 per share. The proceeds will be used on general corporate purposes.
Fortum, the Finnish State and Ilmarinen Mutual Pension Insurance Company have today signed a share purchase agreement according to which Fortum sells its 25%-shareholding in the Finnish transmission system operator Fingrid Oyj. The shares sold are Fingrid's series A shares. The State (with Ministry of Employment and the Economy and the National Emergency Supply Agency as the shareholders) will buy approximately 81% and Ilmarinen approximately 19% of Fortum's Fingrid shares. The transaction has all the necessary approvals and will be completed later today when the sales price has been fully paid in cash and the ownership has been transferred to the new owners.
https://www.fingrid.fi/en/
Timo Karttinen, Executive Vice President, Electricity Solutions and Distribution,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2014/03/fortum-completes-divestment-its-finnish-electricity-distribution-business
Fortum Corporate Communications: Helena Aatinen, Senior Vice President, +358 10 45 20480,
The total consideration is EUR 2.55 billion on a debt- and cash-free basis. Fortum will book a one-time sales gain of approximately EUR 1.8-1.9 billion corresponding to approximately EUR 2.0 per share. The final sales gain will be reported in Fortum's Distribution Segment in the first quarter of 2014.
A total of 340 employees will continue their work in the sold business. The electricity distribution of the business' approximately 640,000 customers will also continue without disruption upon closing. Fortum will continue to sell electricity and to develop and offer related services to its  electricity retail customers as before.
Fortum completes divestment of its Finnish electricity distribution business | Fortum
24 March 2014, 15:05 EET
Distribution communications: Marina Stenfors, Communications Manager, +358 50 364 4909
Fortum has today completed the divestment of its Finnish electricity distribution business to Suomi Power Networks Oy, owned by a consortium of Finnish and international investors. The transaction has all the necessary regulatory approvals and the customary closing conditions have been met.
The decision to divest Fortum's electricity distribution business in Finland is linked to the strategic assessment of the company's electricity distribution business' future alternatives last year. Fortum originally announced the completion of the assessment and the sale of the business on 12 December 2013.
Stock exchange release 24 March 2014 at 15.05 EET
Further information on the sold business:
"We are pleased to close this deal. Warm thanks to our electricity distribution customers and our Distribution employees in Finland for the shared years," says Fortum's CFO
Fortum Investor Relations: Sophie Jolly, Vice President, tel. +358 10 45 32552
The company continuing Fortum's Finnish electricity distribution business will be the largest electricity distributor in Finland. It is responsible for supplying electricity to 640,000 residential and business customers in South, Southwest and Western Finland as well as Joensuu, Koillismaa and Satakunta. The company employs 340 people directly and up to 1,500 people indirectly all over Finland. It has a strong commitment to building a weatherproof network and expects to invest EUR 100 million annually in developing the grids. The company is owned by Suomi Power Networks Oy, which is owned by a consortium of Finnish pension funds Keva (12.5%) and Elo (7.5%) and international infrastructure investors First State Investments (40%) and Borealis Infrastructure (40%).
Fortum’s purpose is to create energy that improves life for present and future generations. Catering to the versatile needs of our customers, we generate, distribute and sell electricity and heat, and offer related expert services. Our operations focus on the Nordic and Baltic countries, Russia and Poland. In 2013, Fortum’s sales totalled EUR 6.1 billion and comparable operating profit was EUR 1.6 billion. We employ approximately 9,600 people. Fortum’s shares are traded on the NASDAQ OMX Helsinki. www.fortum.com


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/financial-outlook
The reported hedge ratios are based on the hedges and power generation forecasts of the Generation segment.
The reported hedge ratios may vary significantly, depending on Fortum’s actions on the electricity derivatives markets. Hedges are mainly financial contracts, most of which are electricity derivatives quoted on Nasdaq Commodities and traded either on Nasdaq Commodities or with bilateral counterparties. As an additional liquidity risk mitigation measure, Fortum has reduced its exposure on the Nasdaq Commodities exchange and increased the share of bilateral agreements.
Q3 2022 Interim Report
Fortum updated its guidance on capital expenditure for 2022. The company currently expects its annual capital expenditure, including maintenance but excluding acquistions, for its continuing operations to be approximately EUR 550 million in 2022. In the January−June 2022 interim report, Fortum cancelled its guidance on capital expenditure for 2022 due to the general market uncertainty mainly related to Uniper. The maintenance capital expenditure in 2022 is estimated to be approximately EUR 300 million, well below the level of depreciation.
At the end of September 2022, approximately 80% of the Generation segment’s estimated Nordic power sales volume was hedged at EUR 49 per MWh for the remainder of 2022, approximately 65% at EUR 49 per MWh for 2023 (hedges at the end of the second quarter of 2022: 60% at EUR 37 per MWh), and approximately 40% at EUR 38 per MWh for 2024.
Income taxation
In the Russia segment, the financial effect of the CSAs is expected to be negative in 2022 compared to 2021, due to the impact of the expiry of the CSA period of the Nyagan 1 generation unit, partly offset by a higher bond yield.
Hedging
The Generation segment’s achieved Nordic power price typically depends on factors such as hedge ratios, hedge prices, spot prices, availability and utilisation of Fortum’s flexible generation portfolio, as well as currency fluctuations. Excluding the potential effects from changes in the power generation mix (currently approximately 45 TWh), a EUR 1 per MWh change in the Generation segment’s achieved Nordic power price will result in an approximately EUR 45 million change in the segment’s annual comparable operating profit. The achieved power price also includes the results of optimisation of Fortum’s hydro and nuclear generation, as well as operations in the physical and financial commodity markets.
In 2022, the comparable effective income tax rate (excluding items affecting comparability) for Fortum’s continuing operations is estimated to be in the range of 21−23%. In 2023, the comparable effective income tax rate (excluding items affecting comparability) for Fortum is estimated to be in the range of 20−23%. Following the deconsolidation of Uniper, the weight of the profit in different jurisdictions has resulted in a downward trend in the lower end of the range of the tax rate guidance currently driven by the standard nominal tax rates in Fortum’s major operating countries.
Financial outlook | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/financial-performance
-333
4,008
168
3,580
-37
104
Net profit (after non-controlling interests)
0.19
1,930
6,068
Share of profit/loss of associates and joint ventures
1,583
In context with financial reporting, Fortum publishes the financial figures in Excel format. The tables are available in Reports and presentations archive. You can find the interactive financial performance analysis tool below the Key Figures table.
2,892
1.50
108
1,333
4,251
1,091
Inter­active financial perfor­mance tool
2,214
III/2022
1,126
243
421
The financial performance tool is for searching and presenting Fortum's annual and quarterly financial information.
1,619
2,036
2,478
3,568
3.26
Financial performance and performance analysis tool
1,032
38
I-III/2022
Key figures Q3 2002, continuing operations
42
-312
III/2021
3,778
171
917
1,646
2,152
909
561
730
600
1,496
1,541
601
1,343
0.31
8,239
Interactive financial performance tool
1,623
Financial performance and performance analysis tool | Fortum
Net profit
1.82
Go to reports and presentations archive
2,050
2.29
497
276
Earnings per share, EUR
3,985
386
1,694
restated
2,888
LTM
1.91


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/reports-and-presentations



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/fortums-financial-targets
Fortum's financial targets | Fortum
In addition, Fortum uses the GRI Sustainability Reporting Standards disclosures to measure compliance with human rights principles, labour standards, the environment, and anti-corruption.
Financial net debt/comparable EBITDA below 2x (2021: 0,2x)
Fortum updated its financial targets and dividend policy in December 2020. The long-term financial targets are:
Fortum's dividend policy is to pay a stable, sustainable, and over time increasing dividend (for 2021: EUR 1.14; for 2020 EUR 1.12)
How to reach the targets
Fortum's financial targets
Financial targets give guidance on Fortum's view of the company's long-term value creation potential, its growth strategy and business activities
Fortum is well-positioned to capture opportunities resulting from the energy transition, aimed at curbing climate change. To be successful, the energy transition must balance sustainability, affordability, and security of supply. The energy transition requires not only renewables, but also increasingly clean gas, energy storage, and other flexible solutions to provide security of supply and to decarbonise also industry, transportation, heating, and cooling. Building on our strengths, our future growth will be driven by CO2-free power generation and clean gas, sustainably transforming our own operations to become carbon neutral and engaging customers and society to decarbonise.
Fortum's financial net debt/comparable EBITDA
Dividend payment history 2011-2020
Fortum is committed to maintaining a rating of at least BBB.
In December 2020, Fortum updated the strategy for the whole Fortum Group to drive the clean energy transition and deliver sustainable financial performance. Aligned with the goals of the Paris Agreement, Fortum targets carbon neutrality latest by 2050 with ambitious mid-term targets.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/operating-environment
The government has a strong focus on incentivising the newbuild of nuclear. It proposes EUR 40 billion in state credit guarantees to lower nuclear financing costs. The state guarantees are intended to compensate for any future political decisions on premature closure, and the government suggests investigating a possible restart of the Ringhals 1 and 2 reactors. The Environmental Act will be amended to allow for the newbuild of nuclear at new sites. The government has set new instructions to SSM (the Swedish radiation authority) to cut permission lead times for nuclear and to enable a faster and easier licensing process.
According to preliminary statistics, the Russian power consumption was 252 (248) TWh during the third quarter of 2022. The corresponding figure for the first price zone was 191 (191) TWh. The 1.5% increase in consumption was caused by growth in oil production, the warmer weather and the growth of aluminium production. In January−September 2022, the Russian power consumption was 808 (792) TWh. The corresponding figure for the first price zone was 612 (603) TWh.
The REPowerEU plan aiming at reducing dependency on Russian fossil energy was presented in May and the financing options of the plan have since been discussed. The European Commission proposed using EUR 20 billion worth of emission allowances from the market stability reserve (MSR) of the EU ETS for this financing.
Margining crisis and revision of EMIR legislation
As the geopolitical situation continued to further escalate, the EU decided on further sanctions against Russia. During the third quarter, the EU agreed on two additional sets of sanctions.
In early November 2022, the Nordic system electricity forward price on Nasdaq Commodities for the remainder of 2022 was around EUR 130 per MWh and for 2023 around EUR 120 per MWh. The Nordic water reservoirs were at 96 TWh, which is about 5 TWh below the long-term average and 3 TWh higher than one year earlier. The German electricity forward price for the remainder of 2022 was around EUR 215 per MWh and for 2023 around EUR 340 per MWh.
The forward quotation for coal (ICE Rotterdam) for 2023 increased from USD 252 per tonne at the beginning of the quarter to USD 287 per tonne at the end of the quarter, which is USD 176 per tonne above the price one year earlier.
Russian power market
Operating environment and market position | Fortum
Regulatory environment
Regarding hydropower, the ongoing re-permitting process will be paused until a proper impact assessment has been carried out. A new framework for the re-permitting process will be developed including the electricity production interest as a priority. Subsidised grid connection fees for offshore wind will be stopped and cost-based grid fees should apply for all technologies.
The proposed measures are intended to serve as short-term measures for a specified period of time. The implementation of the revenue cap, in particular, leaves significant flexibilities for the Member States. The national implementation in Finland and Sweden has not yet started. Several Member States consider the agreed emergency measures as insufficient and urge further interventions, notably to address high gas price.
Operating and regulatory environment Q3 2022
Information about Fortum's operating environment on ​​quarterly basis and market position
Fortum has opposed any direct interventions to the ETS in order to finance REPowerEU.
In Central Western Europe (Germany, France, Austria, Switzerland, Belgium, and the Netherlands), power consumption in the third quarter of 2022 was 305 (307) TWh, according to preliminary statistics. During January−September 2022, power consumption in Central Western Europe was 985 (1000) TWh. Power demand in Continental Europe was below the five-year average, here again likely affected by demand response due to the high electricity prices.
The government further proposes a long-term electricity security of supply target with a subsequent mandate to the TSO Svenska Kraftnät as well as new instructions to purchase firm and dispatchable capacity and to secure system adequacy. A new inquiry on market design will also be started to secure long-term security of supply with a premium for firm and dispatchable technology.
The Russian market is divided into two price zones. Fortum’s Russia segment operates in the first price zone (European and Urals part of Russia).
At the end of August, when energy prices reached unprecedentedly high levels, several European energy companies experienced various stages of liquidity crisis due to the increase in cash collaterals as required under EU’s strict EMIR (European Market Infrastructure Regulation) legislation. This resulted in the Finnish and Swedish governments providing national liquidity support packages (EUR 10 billion and EUR 25 billion, respectively) to ensure sufficient liquidity for utilities. Fortum has raised its concerns over the systemic risks resulting from the EMIR regulatory framework and is calling for an immediate revision of the EMIR collateral requirements to be more suitable for the power commodity market.
The thermal power plants are entitled to clearly higher CSA payments starting approximately six years after commissioning. In 2022, there is a decrease in CSA payments for four units of Fortum’s Russia segment’s generation fleet. After the CSA period ends, the units can receive CCS payments from CCS auctions.
Operating environment and market position
Fortum’s Russia segment operates thermal power plants mainly in the Tyumen and Khanty-Mansiysk area of western Siberia, where industrial production is dominated by the oil and gas industries, and in the Chelyabinsk area of the Urals, which is dominated by the metal industry.
Strong push for new nuclear from the new Swedish government
The new Swedish right-wing government coalition consists of Moderates, Liberals and Christian Democrats with the active support from Sweden Democrats. The government has presented a new far-reaching energy and climate agreement and has set a new political target of 100% fossil-free electricity production by 2040 instead of 100% renewable energy.
According to preliminary statistics, power consumption in the Nordic countries was 81 (83) TWh during the third quarter of 2022. Power demand was somewhat below the five-year average. In September, demand was particularly low, well below the five-year average, despite lower than normal temperatures. This is most likely due to demand response on the back of the very high spot prices in August and September. During January−September 2022, power consumption in the Nordic countries was 282 (293) TWh.
The Russian Government increased the gas price by 5% in July 2022.
Following Russia’s attack on Ukraine, the global economy and commodity and raw material prices have been significantly affected by various sanctions and counter-measures. Specifically, the Russian pipeline gas flow to Europe has decreased by more than 80% from previous years’ levels, causing all-time high gas and power prices. The full impact of the energy crises has been experienced in Continental Europe, and the low level of nuclear power generation and low hydro power generation have further elevated very high energy prices. The impact has been tangible in many Nordic price areas as well. With the strong interconnectors to the high-priced Continent and UK and the full stop of Russian electricity imports to Finland, the Nordic system price made its fifth consecutive quarterly record.
Both the EU Parliament and the Council have proposed a market-neutral approach without a direct intervention to the ETS. According to the general approach of the Council, the funds would be raised from the Innovation Fund and by frontloading a portion of allowances from the auctions in 2027-2030. The Council does not support raising of any revenues by auctioning allowances from the MSR. The Parliament’s final position is still pending, but there seems to be support for the frontloading of auctions. The negotiations are expected to be finalised by the end of 2022.
In the EUA (EU Allowance) markets, the price decreased from EUR 90 per tonne at the beginning of the third quarter of 2022 to EUR 67 per tonne at the end of the quarter, which is EUR 5 per tonne higher than one year earlier.
Fortum is the second largest power generator and the largest electricity retailer in the Nordic countries. Globally, we are one of the leading heat producers. Our investment in Uniper increased the CO2-free power generation by approximately 60%, making us the third largest CO2-free generator in Europe. The consolidation of Uniper increased Fortum’s power generation capacity by 36.2 GW and heat and steam production capacity by 4.9 GW. Uniper has power generation mainly in Germany, Russia, the United Kingdom, Sweden, and the Netherlands, as well as heat and steam production mainly in Germany, the Netherlands, and Russia.
In late September following the illegal annexation of the four Ukrainian regions to Russia, the 8th package of sanction was negotiated and was published on 6 October. The package contains further trade restrictions and import bans on Russian products. In addition to the previous sanctions against Russian seaborne crude oil imports, the EU decided to join the G7 and place a price cap on Russian oil imports to third countries. Details of the oil price cap are still to be defined. The price cap is planned to become effective in December 2022.
In Russia, capacity payments based on Capacity Supply Agreements (CSA) are a key driver of earnings, as CSA payments are considerably higher than for capacities selected in Competitive Capacity Selection (CCS) auctions. Currently, Fortum’s Russia segment’s CSA capacity amounts to 1,472 MW, including 70 MW of solar and wind capacity. These capacities do not include those related to the joint ventures.
EU imposes further sanctions against Russia and agrees with G7 on oil price cap
In the long term, electricity is expected to continue to gain a significantly higher share of total energy consumption. The electricity demand growth rate will largely be determined by classic drivers, such as macroeconomic and demographic development, but also increasingly by decarbonisation of the industrial, transport and heating sectors through direct electrification and green hydrogen. In the near term, however, demand response to counter high electricity prices is likely to impact power demand.
In the third quarter of 2022, the average electricity spot price, excluding capacity prices, decreased by 1.5% to RUB 1,518 (1,541) per MWh in the first price zone. The spot price in the Urals hub increased by 7% and was RUB 1,396 (1,304) per MWh. In January−September 2022, the average electricity spot price, excluding capacity prices, was RUB 1,440 (1,405) per MWh in the first price zone and RUB 1,305 (1,206) per MWh in the Urals hub.
The EU energy ministers agreed on emergency interventions for the electricity markets
European commodity markets
In the third quarter of 2022, power prices again reached new record-high levels. The average system spot price in Nord Pool was EUR 176 (68) per MWh. The average area price in Finland was EUR 220 (79) per MWh, and in the SE3 area in Sweden (Stockholm) EUR 168 (71) per MWh. In the SE2 area in Sweden (Sundsvall), the average area price was at a lower level at EUR 55 (55) per MWh due to stronger power balance and higher installed wind capacity. In Germany, the average spot price in the third quarter of 2022 was EUR 376 (97) per MWh.
On 18 October, the EU Commission presented some limited and temporary emergency measures (such as the use of non-collateralised bank guarantees as collateral) to address the issue, however, not providing sufficiently efficient measures to alleviate the liquidity pressure on energy companies nor solving the root cause of the liquidity crisis. The Commission will launch a wider structural reform of EMIR in December.
REPowerEU financing likely without direct intervention to the EU ETS
In January−September 2022, the average system spot price in Nord Pool was EUR 136 (51) per MWh. The average area price in Finland was EUR 144 (58) per MWh, in the SE3 area in Sweden (Stockholm) EUR 123 (52) per MWh, and in the SE2 area in Sweden (Sundsvall) EUR 44 (42) per MWh. In Germany, the average spot price during January−September 2022 was EUR 250 (69) per MWh.
In early November 2022, the TTF forward price for gas for the remainder of 2022 was EUR 100 per MWh. The forward quotation for EUAs for 2022 was at the level of EUR 76 per tonne. The forward price for coal (ICE Rotterdam) for the remainder of 2022 was USD 200 per tonne.
With the proposed measures, the new government aims to promote nuclear investments to enable a doubling of Swedish power demand in line with the electrification target in order to meet the national net-zero climate target (net-zero by 2045), while increasing security of supply.
In the third quarter of 2022, gas demand in Central Western Europe was 264 (300) TWh and 1,326 (1,547) TWh in January–September 2022. The Central Western European gas storage levels increased significantly: from 354 TWh at the beginning of the quarter to 564 TWh at the end of the quarter, which is 136 TWh higher than one year ago and 40 TWh higher than the five-year average (2017–2021).
At the end of September, as another response to the energy crisis, European leaders agreed on a set of temporary measures for electricity market interventions, as proposed by the European Commission. The approved measures include electricity demand reduction measures (10% voluntary reduction on a monthly basis, 5% mandatory at peak hours), a revenue cap on inframarginal technologies set at EUR 180 per MWh and a solidarity contribution for fossil fuel companies.
European power markets
Fortum’s Russia segment’s generation capacity not receiving CSA payments, a total of 3,199.7 MW, is allowed to participate in the annual CCS auctions. The next CCS auction, for the year 2027, is expected to be held in November 2023.
On 5 August, Russia published the Executive Order on the application of specific economic measures in the financial, fuel and energy sectors in connection with the “unfriendly actions by some countries and organisations”. However, the list of companies that fall under the Executive Order has not yet been published. Under the Executive Order, certain transactions, such as divestment of ownership by Russian legal entities, are prohibited. Prohibited transactions may be carried out under special decision by the President of Russia.
The steep reduction in the Russian pipeline gas flows to Europe has pushed European gas prices to unprecedented levels amid high volatility. The average gas front-month price (TTF) in the third quarter of 2022 was EUR 205 (49) per MWh. The 2023 forward price increased from EUR 107 per MWh at the beginning of the quarter to EUR 183 per MWh at the end of the quarter, which is EUR 151 per MWh higher than one year earlier. At the highest, the 2023 forward price traded at EUR 312 per MWh on 26 August.
Market position
At the beginning of the third quarter of 2022, the Nordic water reservoirs were at 82 TWh, which is 2 TWh below the long-term average and 11 TWh lower than in the previous year. Inflows have been below normal, while hydro generation was at a normal level. At the end of the third quarter of 2022, the reservoir levels were at 89 TWh, which is 12 TWh below the long-term average and 25 TWh lower than in the previous year.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/risks-and-sensitivities
Financial risk management at Fortum
Effect on equity
In the Nordics and central European countries, market prices and, consequently, the amount of profitable production exhibit significant variation, for instance due to weather conditions, outage patterns in production and transmission lines, CO2 allowance prices, fuel prices, as well as the amount of electricity demand. Electricity price risks in the Nordics and central European markets are mainly hedged by entering electricity derivatives contracts on exchanges such as the Nasdaq Commodities or the European Energy Exchange, as well as directly with counterparties active in the energy markets. The ability to efficiently implement hedging strategies is dependent on a well-functioning and liquid derivatives market. There is a risk of decreasing liquidity of especially Nordic electricity derivatives on the Nasdaq Commodities, and decreasing the price variance and difference in the liquidity in various price areas. Alternatives, including the use of OTC derivative contracts and correlated products traded on other exchanges, are used to mitigate this risk. The Generation segment and the Uniper segment have separate hedging strategies covering several years in the short- to medium-term. Hedging strategies are continuously evaluated as electricity and other commodity market prices, the hydrological balance and other relevant parameters change. Hedging of the Generation segment’s power sales is performed in EUR on a Nordic level, covering both Finland and Sweden; and the currency component of these hedges in the Swedish entity is currently not hedged. Uniper segment’s Nordic power hedging is performed only in Sweden, and the currency component of these hedges in the Swedish entity is hedged.
Electricity price exposure is partly mitigated through regulated fixed-price bilateral agreements, but the majority of electricity sales is exposed to spot price risk. In the short-term, electricity prices and volumes are mainly impacted by changes in industrial demand, gas prices and weather-driven demand changes.
The exposure to fuel price risk is mitigated through fixed-price physical delivery contracts, or derivative contracts. The main fuel source for heat and power generation in Russia is natural gas, which is partially regulated, limiting the price risk exposure. Long-term gas supply contracts are concluded with gas suppliers to ensure gas availability for power plants.
57
Fortum’s financial results are exposed to a number of financial, operational, strategic, and sustainability-related risks. Fortum is exposed to these risks both directly and indirectly through its subsidiaries, associated companies, and joint ventures.
Fortum is exposed to counterparty risk whenever there is a contractual arrangement with an external counterparty including customers, suppliers, partners, banks, clearing houses and trading counterparties. Following increasing geopolitical tensions, counterparties of the Fortum Group could become subject to sanctions, which may impact current or future business relations. Fortum actively monitors the situation in order to ensure continued compliance with prevailing rules and applicable sanctions laws.
Financial Statements 2021
Fortum’s financial results are exposed to a number of financial, operational, strategic and sustainability-related risks. Fortum is exposed to these risks both directly and indirectly through its subsidiaries, associated companies and joint ventures. The principal associated companies and joint ventures are Teollisuuden Voima Oyj, Forsmarks Kraftgrupp AB, OKG AB, Kemijoki Oy and TGC-1. For more information, please see Fortum’s annual report.
Effect
+/-
Sensitivity analysis shows the sensitivity arising from financial commodity derivatives as defined in IFRS 7. Sensitivities are presented with most descriptive measure about the risk management and usage of derivatives in Uniper segment and Fortum’s other segments.
Emission and environmental value risks
Credit risk exposures-related hedging and trading arise through the use of physical delivery contracts, and to financial derivative instruments. The credit risk exposures are volatile and include both the replacement risk and the settlement risk. Exchange-traded derivatives are cleared through central clearing parties (CCPs) or through clearing banks, while OTC derivative contracts are concluded directly with a number of different counterparties, including energy wholesalers and retailers, utilities, trading companies, industrial end-users and financial institutions active in the financial and energy markets.
Risks and sensitivities | Fortum
Fortum, excluding Uniper
Russia’s attack on Ukraine on 24 February 2022 has severely impacted Fortum’s current and future businesses. The likelihood of a number of existing geopolitical risks that could negatively impact Fortum’s current business has increased, and in some cases, such as Uniper, risks have fully or partly realised. Russia’s counter sanctions on the EU have significantly affected the energy market, especially through the gas curtailments. A further widening of sanctions against Russia, and possible countermeasures, may impact current or future business relations. Continued curtailment on the physical supply of gas, coal, oil and other fuels from Russia could have follow-on implications, e.g. on the availability of Fortum's power plants.
Electricity price and volume risks
In Russia, electricity and capacity prices are the main source of market risk. Capacity from newer units is sold under capacity supply agreements where the price is set by the Russian Federation to ensure the return on investments. Capacity from old units has been sold until 2025 via capacity supply auctions which have already been conducted.
The main factors influencing the prices of CO2 emission allowances and other environmental values are political decisions, and the supply and demand balance. Fortum hedges its exposure to these prices and volumes through the use of CO2 derivatives and environmental certificates.
Key drivers and risks Q3 2022
The total loss from the Uniper divestment in the legal Fortum entity owning the Uniper shares will be slightly below EUR 6 billion, which is the net effect from the investments in Uniper SE shares of approximately EUR 7.2 billion, the sales proceeds of EUR 0.5 billion to be received and dividends of approximately EUR 0.9 billion received during the Uniper ownership. The divestment will negatively impact the parent company Fortum Oyj’s equity; however, Fortum has assessed that the equity remains at a sufficient level and does not require additional capital injections.
Since Russia’s invasion of Ukraine, owning and operating a profitable power and heat generation business in Russia has become challenging. For Fortum’s Russian businesses, the key drivers are economic growth, the rouble exchange rate, interest rates (which also impact capacity payments), and the regulation of the power and heat business. The current key challenges in the Russian businesses are related to the foreign suppliers’ lack of interest to supply spare parts. Risks relating to these drivers are all partly being realised, driven by the deterioration of the overall economic and business environment including GDP growth and rising interest rates. The profitability of Fortum’s Russian businesses in euro terms has not been negatively impacted by the current geopolitical situation. However, there is an increasing risk of countermeasures aimed at enabling nationalisation of foreign-owned assets in Russia in retaliation for Western sanctions. Such countermeasures could result in loss of control or a risk of delay in divestment of the Russian business, or it may negatively impact the value of the Russian business in the sales process or, in the extreme case, expropriation of Fortum’s Russian assets. Fortum is preparing for such a scenario by ensuring the Russian businesses are able to operate independently and in compliance with applicable laws, regulations and sanctions.
Fortum is targeting to maintain at least its current rating, and to strengthen its financial profile and to improve its business risk profile. Fortum and Uniper maintain an active dialogue with credit rating agencies to ensure understanding of Fortum and Uniper’s aligned strategy and planned measures which target to achieve a financial and business profile that supports the current rating.
Fortum’s business is exposed to fluctuations in prices and availability of commodities used in the production, transmission and sale of energy products. The main exposure is toward electricity and gas prices and volumes, prices and volumes of emission allowances, and prices and availability of fuels. Fortum hedges its exposure to commodity market risks in order to reduce volatility in cash flow, and to increase the predictability of future results.
Commodity price risks in Uniper segment are measured based on a value-at-risk approach with 95% confidence interval and take into account the amount of open position as well as the prices, their volatility and the liquidity on the respective markets. Value-at-risk figures are supplemented by stop-loss and volume based indicators. When necessary, additional portfolio-specific restrictions are set.
Fortum Corporation is currently rated BBB with a stable outlook by both Fitch and S&P Global Ratings rating agencies. The key risk factors which could lead to a weakening credit metrics and potentially trigger rating downgrade include a persistent decline in European and Russian power prices, lower-than-expected amounts received from planned divestments, increase in leverage, deterioration of the geopolitical situation or high market volatility. A lowering of credit ratings, in particular to below investment grade level (BB+ or below) could affect access to the capital markets and increase the cost of new financing.
One of the key factors influencing Fortum’s business performance is the Nordic electricity wholesale price. In the Nordics, power prices exhibit significant short- and long-term variations on the back of several factors, including but not limited to weather conditions, outage patterns in production and transmission lines, CO2 emission allowance prices, commodity prices, and the supply-demand balance. The Russian invasion of the Ukraine drove commodity prices to new record levels and further increased price volatility. As a consequence, the EU is taking action with temporary market interventions (e.g. price caps and windfall taxation). These market interventions may pose a risk for business performance, if becoming permanent. The value of the Fortum outright power generation portfolio has increased in January−September 2022, which is generally positive for future earnings. However, the higher value combined with increased price volatility has led to an increase in the commodity price risk. An economic downturn or wet hydrology could lead to significantly lower Nordic power prices, which would negatively impact earnings from Fortum’s outright power production. Fortum hedges its exposure to commodity market prices and reports on the hedging levels and hedged prices of its outright power on a quarterly basis. For more information, please see ‘Outlook’ in this interim report.
Uniper, a separate listed company operating under German laws and regulations, is currently also rated BBB with a stable outlook by S&P Global Ratings. The stable outlook on Uniper’s rating reflects the outlook on the BBB rating of Fortum, which serves as a cap for Uniper’s rating. A downgrade of Fortum’s rating could lead to a corresponding downgrade of Uniper’s rating. A downgrade from the current BBB investment grade rating to BBB- or below could negatively affect Uniper’s liquidity as it would trigger counterparties’, particularly in the trading business, right to demand additional collateral which would need to be provided via liquid assets or bank guarantees. The related risk is measured, monitored and managed against a given limit.
Fortum’s debt portfolio consists of interest-bearing liabilities and derivatives on a fixed- and floating-rate basis with differing maturity profiles. Fortum is exposed to cash flow risk from changes in interest rates mainly from interest-bearing liabilities and derivatives on a fixed- and floating rate basis. Additionally changes in general interest rate levels may have an impact on discount rates of various provisions like pension provisions and asset retirement obligations causing changes in the amount of interest-bearing debt and financial costs, but without a cash flow impact. Fortum manages the interest rate exposure through a duration mandate of the loan portfolio excluding leasing liabilities and provisions, and cash flow at risk limit. Fortum uses different types of financing contracts and interest rate derivative contracts to manage the interest rate exposure and evaluates and develops the strategies in order to find an optimal balance between risk and financing cost.
The EU and the United Kingdom have emissions trading schemes to reduce the amount of CO2 emissions. In addition to the emissions trading schemes, there are other trading schemes in environmental values in place in Sweden, Norway and Poland. Part of Fortum’s power and heat generation is subject to requirements of these schemes. There is currently no trading scheme in Russia for emissions or other environmental values. However, Russia has announced intentions to comply with the Paris Agreement, but there is uncertainty related to how and when a possible carbon market could be implemented.
Transaction exposure arises mainly from physical and financial trading of commodities, existing and new investments, external and internal financing and shareholder loans within the Group. Fortum hedges major transaction exposures on a local level in the reporting currency of each legal entity in order to avoid exchange differences in the profit and loss statement. An exception is the Generation segment’s hedging of power sales in Sweden where the currency component is currently not hedged.
The unpredictable nature of sanctions and possible countermeasures by Russia continue to pose a significant risk for Fortum. The EU, US and UK have already implemented several sanctions towards Russia, targeting, for example, the financial and energy sectors. The sanctions imposed so far restrict the possibility to make cross-border payments from Fortum’s Russian units, which may affect repatriation of future dividends from the Russian operations, Fortum internal loan repayments and interest rate payments. Fortum has announced that no further investments will be made in Russia and that existing contracts will not be renewed when they expire. The company is also pursuing a controlled exit from the Russian market with a divestment of its Russian operations as the preferred path. This process will take its time and is subject to approvals by both the Russian Government Commission and the Russian President.
Fortum’s business activities include energy generation, storage, distribution, and control of operations, as well as the construction, modernisation, maintenance and decommissioning of power plants or other energy industry facilities. Any unwanted operational event (which could be caused by e.g. technical failure, human or process error, natural disaster, sabotage, failure of key suppliers, or terrorist attack) can endanger personal safety or lead to environmental or physical damage, business interruptions, project delays and possible third-party liability. The associated costs can be high, especially in Fortum’s largest units and projects.
The closing of the agreed transaction remains subject to various regulatory approvals and eventually approval by an Extraordinary General Meeting of Uniper, currently planned to take place in the second half of December 2022. However, there is always a risk that the transaction is delayed or will not be completed due to political, regulatory or legal reasons. For more information on the agreement, please see ‘Uniper divestment‘ in this interim report.
Fortum has cash flows, assets and liabilities in currencies other than EUR and is therefore exposed to fluctuations in exchange rates. Currency exposures are divided into transaction exposures (foreign exchange exposures relating to contracted cash flows and balance sheet items where changes in exchange rates will have an impact on earnings and cash flows) and translation exposure (foreign exchange exposure that arises when profits and balance sheets in foreign entities are consolidated at the Group level).
The main translation exposure is toward EUR/Russian Rouble (RUB), EUR/Swedish Krona (SEK) and EUR/British Pound Sterling (GBP), arising from Fortum's extensive operations in Russia, Sweden and the United Kingdom. Fluctuations of the RUB, SEK and the GBP against the EUR could have an adverse effect on future results and equity when consolidating and translating results and net assets in Russian, Swedish and UK affiliates into euros. Translation exposures in the Fortum Group are generally not hedged as the majority of these assets are considered to be long-term strategic holdings.
At the beginning of August 2022, both the S&P Global Ratings and Fitch rating agencies affirmed Fortum’s BBB rating on Negative Outlook. Following the announcement in September that Fortum will fully divest Uniper to the German State, the rating agencies have commented that the divestment of the Uniper stake was regarded as credit positive for Fortum as it will improve the company’s financial and risk profile. However, the rating agencies concluded that it is premature to determine the full effect of the Uniper divestment on Fortum’s rating. The rating agencies are expected to update their ratings after the completion of the transaction and once Fortum publishes its new strategy. A lowering of the credit ratings, in particular to below investment-grade level (BB+ or below), would trigger counterparties’ rights to demand additional cash or non-cash collateral. In addition, a downgrade could negatively affect access to the capital markets and increase the cost of new financing. Fortum targets to have a solid investment grade-rating of at least BBB. Fortum continues to constantly monitor all rating-related developments and to regularly exchange information with the rating agencies.
Centralised treasury functions in Uniper and the Fortum Corporation separately coordinate currency risk management and execute external hedges consisting of currency derivative contracts, which are matched against the underlying future cash flow according to maturity. Derivatives are used exclusively to hedge existing foreign exchange risks, not for proprietary trading.
In Fortum, excluding Uniper, derivatives are used for hedging purposes with hedge accounting applied to most hedging strategies. Sensitivities in the table below are calculated based on the electricity position as of 31 December. Positions are actively managed in the day-to-day business operations and therefore the sensitivities vary from time to time. Sensitivity analysis includes only the market risks arising from derivatives i.e. the underlying physical electricity sales and purchases are not included. Sensitivity is calculated with the assumption that electricity forward and futures quotations would change 1 EUR/MWh for the period Fortum, excluding Uniper, has derivatives.
Counterparty and credit risks
A deterioration in the economic situation or upheavals in the market for LNG could lead to a lower than planned utilisation of the long-term capacity booked in the regasification plants in Uniper’s LNG business, and make it necessary to set up provisions for onerous contracts over the entire remaining booking period. Uniper strives to further increase the utilisation of this booked capacity, and thus improve the revenue situation.
58
+/- 1 EUR/MWh change in electricity forward quotations, EUR million
Based on the current Uniper portfolio, as of December 2021, the calendar year based weighted value-at-risk, which takes market liquidities into account and ignores correlations between years, was EUR 1,422 million (2020: 463) for financial and physical commodity contracts covering next three years.
Effect on profit before income tax
Fortum has routines and processes to identify, assess and control exposure. Credit checks are performed before entering or renewing commercial obligations and exposure limits are set for larger individual counterparties as well as for counterparty groups. Creditworthiness is monitored through the use of internal and external sources so that mitigating actions can be taken when needed. Mitigating actions include demanding collateral, such as guarantees, managing contract terms and contract length, and the use of netting agreements.
Fortum is exposed to electricity market price movements and volume changes mainly through its power and heat generation.
Commodity market and fuel risks
Fortum's business is exposed to liquidity and refinancing risks primarily through the need to finance the Group’s business operations, including margining and collaterals issued for trading and hedging activities. Higher commodity prices increase the net margining payments which are mainly settled in cash. Fortum maintains a diversified financing structure in terms of debt maturity profile, debt instruments and geographical markets. Liquidity and refinancing risks are managed through a combination of cash positions and committed credit facility agreements. The credit risk of cash positions has been mitigated by diversifying the deposits to high-credit quality financial institutions and issuers of corporate debt.
More detailed information about Fortum's financial risks and risk management is described in the company's
Long-term gas supply contracts of Uniper generally include the possibility for the customer and the supplier to adapt contractual terms to changed market conditions. This entails the major risk for Uniper that suppliers will impose conditions that are detrimental. In order to limit the risk, negotiations are conducted by the most experienced employees utilising all available internal and external expertise.
Fuel and gas prices and volume risks
Sensitivity according to IFRS 7
Due to the financing needs and management of liquidity, Fortum has counterparty credit exposure toward a number of banks and financial institutions. The majority of the exposure is toward Fortum's key relationship banks, which are highly creditworthy institutions. Fortum also has exposure to the Russian financial sector in terms of deposits with financial institutions as well as to banks that provide guarantees for suppliers and contracting parties. Deposits in Russia have been concentrated to the most creditworthy state-owned or controlled banks as well as affiliates of the key relationship banks.
Credit risk exposures relating to customers and suppliers are spread across a wide range of industrial counterparties, energy companies, government and municipal entities, utilities, small businesses, housing associations and private individuals over a range of geographic regions. The risk of credit losses in the electricity and heat sales business in Russia is deemed higher than in Fortum’s other operating countries.
Currency and interest rate risks
In Uniper segment, derivatives are used mainly for hedging, but also for proprietary trading purposes.
Power and heat generation requires use of fuels that are purchased on global or local markets. The main fuels used by Fortum are natural gas, uranium, coal, various biomass-based fuels and waste. The main risk factor for fuels that are traded on global markets, such as coal and natural gas, is the uncertainty in price. Prices are largely affected by demand and supply imbalances that can be caused by, e.g., increased demand growth in developing countries, natural disasters or supply constraints in countries experiencing political or social unrest. For fuels that are sourced on local or regional markets, such as biofuels, the volume risk in terms of availability of the raw material of appropriate quality is more significant as there may be a limited number of suppliers. Due to the current sanctions, there are also risks related to imported fuels from Russia. The increasing geopolitical tensions and further escalation could, e.g., lead to curtailments of physical gas deliveries to Uniper, which may require Uniper to source gas in the market at higher prices. Both Fortum and Uniper continue to monitor the situation closely and prepare constantly adapted mitigation measures to minimise the impact of an escalation to Fortum Group.
Liquidity and refinancing risks
On 21 September 2022, Fortum announced that the company, the German Government and Uniper had signed an agreement in principle for a long-term solution according to which Fortum will fully divest Uniper to the German State.
Fortum is exposed to liquidity and refinancing risks primarily through the need to finance the Group’s business operations, including margining and collaterals issued for commercial activities. Following the elevated prices, increased volatility and the EU EMIR (European Market Infrastructure Regulation), the margining requirements from Fortum’s hedges concluded via exchanges increased in the third quarter of 2022. In order to mitigate this risk, Fortum agreed on a bridge financing arrangement with its majority owner, the Finnish State, in the third quarter of 2022. With the arrangement, the company aims to ensure access to sufficient liquidity resources if power prices − and, with it, collateral requirements − continue to rise significantly in particular on the Nordic commodities exchange Nasdaq. For more information on the agreement, please see ‘Solidium's bridge financing loan to Fortum and directed share issue without payment to Solidium‘ in this interim report.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/credit-facilities
EMTN programme of EUR 8 billion as at 30 September 2022
Floating rate
32.2
18.6
Amount
Fitch Ratings
Notes
314
997
92
Rating/Listing
Total amount
18,170
9.2
Funds from operations/interest-bearing net debt, %
Rating agency
June 2025***
7.8
* With an extension option of one year by Fortum
4.1
Liquid funds
September 2023
Floating
-9.4
Commercial Paper Programmes
December 2022*
804
Luxembourg Stock Exchange
ROCE, %
-12.7
8,750
Syndicated Credit Facility, EUR 2,400 million
Loan portfolio and average interest rate on 30 September 2022
XS1956037664
Average interest for Fortum Group loan portfolio including derivatives hedging financial net was 2.3 % (2021: 1.3%).
30,885
Long-term
Interest bearing net-debt
Credit facilities and rating
** With 6+6 months extension options by Fortum
8.7
of which in Russia
Committed Credit Lines
2,996
Fortum's credit rating history
Total Liquid Funds and Committed Financing, excluding Russia
XS1956027947
Capital employed
Available
Interest coverage
0
The older credit rating reports are available in
6/2023
XS1956028168
Fortum's business is capital intensive and the Group has a regular need to raise financing. Fortum has a diversified loan portfolio mainly consisting of long-term financing in EUR and SEK currencies. Long-term financing is primarily raised by issuing bonds under Fortum’s Euro Medium Term Note programme as well as through bilateral and syndicated loan facilities from a variety of different financial institutions. Financing is primarily raised on parent company level and distributed internally through various internal financing arrangements.
Carrying amount
2,400
No/No
Total
MSEK
Breakdown of loans on 30 September 2022
June 2023**
83.9
N/A
Maturity
728
23 June 2022
XS0939100524
26.8
Liquid Funds and Committed Credit Lines
18,172
0,875 %
Interest rate
8.0
Credit facilities and rating | Fortum
27.3
Bilateral Overdraft Facilities, EUR 100 million
2,555
2,393
5,509
reports and presentations archive
3 August 2022
26,239
107
4.6
3,500 %
2,500
Finnish State bridge financing, EUR 2,350 million
2,000
1 000
Comparable net debt/EBITDA
1,625 %
Total loans EUR 12,864 million
Valid until further notice
18,649
6/2043
MEUR
Fortum Oyj's bonds or credit facilities do not include any financial covenants such as restrictions on the amount of debt or limits on ratios relating to interest cover or capitalisation. The notes listed above have not been and will not be registered under the U.S. Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and may not be offered or sold in the United States or to or for the account or benefit of U.S. persons except pursuant to an exception from such registration.
2,125 %
Gearing, %
EUR million or as indicated
2/2029
Interest coverage including capitalised borrowing costs
Credit rating
Rating valid  from
Finnish CP Programme, EUR 2,500 million
Terms and conditions for these bonds issued under the EMTN programme can be found on the
EUR 2 630 million
5,260
2/2023
S&P Global Ratings
1,575
Average interest for EUR loans 1,8% (2021: 0.6%).
-1,503.4
Key ratios 2016-2021
Fixed rate
2.9
Outstanding
2,100
717
45
*** With 1+1 year extension options by the lenders
(29 September 2022)
-48
993
3,100
(28 September 2022)
Yes/Yes
BBB/Outlook Negative
6,650
97
Short-term financing, EUR million
3,417
XS0945849577
Short-term
621
19,929
Swedish CP Programme, SEK 10,000 million
10.0
750
2/2026
2,350
3,638
Liquidity on 30 September 2022
603
4.0
Syndicated Credit Facility, EUR 3,100 million
5,470
No/Yes
988
Fortum's current credit rating
Bilateral Credit Facility, EUR 800 million


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/why-invest-fortum/ceos-review
These past few months have been the most intense and challenging ever in Fortum’s history. I want to express my warm thanks to everyone at Fortum for their important contribution and hard work. However, as there is no resolution in sight for the war in Ukraine, and the economic outlook looks bleaker, our customers and societies may face even more harsh times as we enter the winter season. Thus, we will continue our determined work to ensure that our fleet is running steadily and reliably, providing energy and security of supply that is now needed more than ever.”
To tackle the impacts of the energy crisis on societies, EU countries have agreed on a set of emergency actions. While crisis measures that help customers deal with soaring energy prices are undoubtedly necessary, it is crucial to implement them in a manner that does not lead to exclusion of capacity from the market and thereby even rationing of electricity. It is also very important that these interventions are temporary and separate from the long-term structural reform of the power market design, which is about to start in the EU. Price and revenue caps and windfall taxes must not become permanent, as they would erode the energy industry’s possibilities to invest in the energy transition in the longer term. For these investments to happen, companies need clarity and predictability, and in this regard, carefully prepared and well formulated regulation. The overall visibility and reliability of the regulatory environment is key.
The major event of the quarter for Fortum was our decision to fully divest Uniper to the German State as part of a German State-led rescue of Germany’s biggest gas importer. This was a defining moment in our company’s history. The stabilisation package agreed in July with the German Government and Uniper simply did not work. Faced with a complete cut-off of Russian gas, the package was difficult to implement and insufficient to save Uniper, as by September Uniper had already accumulated significant losses of billions of euros. In the new solution, the German State takes full control of Uniper and will inject several billion of euros as equity capital. The German State also buys all of Fortum‘s shares in Uniper for a total of approximately EUR 0.5 billion. After this, Fortum’s EUR 4 billion shareholder loan to Uniper will be repaid and the EUR 4 billion parent company guarantee will be released. The transaction is subject to customary regulatory clearances and an approval by Uniper’s Extraordinary General Meeting. At the moment, we expect closing of the deal by year-end.
January-September 2022 Interim Report
This was not an easy decision for Fortum. Five years ago, we embarked on a journey to invest in Uniper and then worked together as a pan-European electricity and gas powerhouse. The outcome clearly is not what we wanted or worked for over the past years, but it does give us a chance for a fresh start. The total loss from the Uniper investment will be slightly below EUR 6 billion, consisting of the investments in Uniper shares, the dividends received from Uniper and the sales proceeds from the divestment. The divestment will negatively impact the parent company Fortum Oyj’s equity. However, we have assessed that the equity remains at a sufficient level and does not require additional capital injections. Following the agreement, Uniper has been deconsolidated and is now reported as discontinued operations. Fortum’s financials for the continuing operations will no longer include any impact from Uniper operations. The deconsolidation of Uniper strengthens Fortum Group’s equity by approximately EUR 5 billion.
Going forward, our immediate priorities are completing the Uniper transaction, finalising a controlled exit from Russia as well as maintaining adequate liquidity buffers ahead of a possibly turbulent winter. In addition, and most importantly, we are reviewing our strategy to outline our future direction. Our core business is in clean Nordic power generation. In pursuit of a carbon-neutral Europe, Fortum’s CO2-free generation assets are highly relevant.
President and CEO Markus Rauramo:
President and CEO Markus Rauramo: | Fortum
The ongoing energy crisis affects our Nordic home market as well. The dramatically increased spot and futures power prices resulted in record-high collateral requirements on the Nordic commodities exchange Nasdaq. To ensure that Fortum can manage the great uncertainty and volatility in the markets and the possible need to rapidly commit significant amounts of working capital for collateral requirements, we agreed with our majority owner, the Finnish State, on a EUR 2.35 billion bridge financing arrangement. A first tranche of EUR 350 million was drawn down at the end of September to keep the facility in place. This triggered the convening of a Fortum Extraordinary General meeting to approve the directed share issue without payment to Solidium (1%), a condition of the loan agreement. Currently, our liquidity situation is stable, and we have sufficient financial buffers.
“The third quarter continued to be dominated by the brutal war Russia is waging in Ukraine and the effects from the consequent European energy crisis. Russian gas flows to Europe through Nord Stream 1 were cut off completely resulting in all-time high gas and power prices across Europe and massive losses for German gas importers that had to procure gas at significantly higher prices and were not able to pass on the increased procurement costs to customers.
Considering the extremely challenging business environment, I would like to highlight that all segments of Fortum’s continuing operations improved their results in the third quarter. Results of the Generation segment, in particular, were driven by a record-high achieved power price and physical optimisation, higher spot prices and a higher hedge price.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/why-invest-fortum/markets
Sustainability and CO
​Changing markets
Markets | Fortum
Fortum's energy production and production capacities
Energy-related links
-free power generation have been part of Fortum’s strategy for several decades. We believe that the energy system needs to transform into a system with substantially lower emissions, higher resource efficiency, and a higher share of power generation based on renewables. The transformation will not happen overnight, and we must provide customers with a secure energy supply at a competitive price during the transition towards lower emissions. Fortum strives to contribute to a more sustainable world.
Fortum's Energy Review
Electricity market prices
Fortum also has power generation based on fossil fuels, mainly gas, but also coal-fired power generation. In Europe, Fortum has a clear path to exit the use of coal in power generation and has committed to be carbon neutral in European generation by 2035 at the latest (Scope 1 and 2 emissions). Fortum is committed to reduce the indirect greenhouse gas emissions of its up and downstream business − Scope 3 GHG emissions − by 35% by 2035 at the latest. Fortum is also committed to carbon neutrality in all operations by 2050 at the latest (Scope 1, 2, and 3 emissions), in line with the goals of the Paris agreement.
Fortum is the third-largest CO2-free power generator in Europe and the second-largest power generator and the largest electricity retailer in the Nordic countries. Globally, we are one of the leading heat producers. Our investment in Uniper increased the CO2-free power generation by approximately 60%, making us the third-largest CO2-free generator in Europe.
Fortum generates electricity and heat in an environmentally benign manner using different energy sources. The company has energy production in the Nordic countries, Russia, Poland and Great Britain. Uniper has power generation mainly in Germany, Russia, the United Kingdom, Sweden, and the Netherlands, as well as heat and steam production mainly in Germany, the Netherlands, and Russia.
Fortum has increased annual CO2-free power generation from around 15 TWh in 1990 to 44 TWh in 2019, 64 TWh in 2020, and 75 TWh in 2021.  The development has not always been linear, as it includes organic growth, investments, and divestments and variations in hydropower generation also impact the annual figures. With approximately 20% of Uniper’s power generation capacity being hydro and nuclear power, Fortum’s CO2-free power generation increased by approximately 60% through the Uniper investment.
Our Energy Review series highlights the key trends and topicalities in the energy sector
Collection of links to energy related sites
Market areas and energy production
How we produce energy
Read more in Fortum CEO's Business Review 2021


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/why-invest-fortum/markets/energy-related-links
Swedish Energy Agency
Other Nordic data/links
Swedenergy is a non-profit industry organisation representing companies involved in the production, distribution and trading of electricity in Sweden.
Energy related links | Fortum
– Finnish nuclear authority
An industry association for associations and groups of energy companies in Denmark.
IAEA, International Atomic Energy Agency
Posiva
International associations
WEC, World Energy Council
IEA, International Energy Agency
IEC,The International Electrotechnical Commission (IEC)
World Nuclear Association, WNA
Norwegian Electricity Industry Association
– A multinational exchange for trading electric power
European Atomic Forum FORATOM
The Nordic power exchange
Read about markets
Finnish ministry responsible on energy issues
Trade organisation for about 99 % of the power production generators, suppliers, distributors and contractors in Norway.
VTT - Technical Research Centre of Finland
POWER-GEN Europe
– Nordic research on Nordic power markets
(publications)
SKB
Swedish Energy
Finnish Energy Industries
The European Nuclear Society ENS
– Nord Pool Spot runs the leading power market in Europe, offering both day-ahead and intraday markets to its customers.
Nordic Market Data
Danish Energy Association
Finnish Energy Industries publications that you can print. Finnish energy industries (ET), is one of the most valued branch organisations in national and international policymaking and in the public debate.
Finnish nuclear waste management
Nuclear Energy Agency (NEA)
Nord Pool Spot
– Source of energy analysis and projections
Entso-e
STUK
– The body for co-operation between transmission system operators in the Nordic countries.
VTT is an impartial expert organisation. Its objective is to develop new technologies, create new innovations and value added thus increasing customer's competitiveness. VTT's knowledge of energy systems and markets as well as climate change mitigation, combined with a toolkit of models and methodological expertise, forms a strong knowledge base to evaluate research.
- Swedish radioactive waste
Energy related links


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/corporate-governance/executive-management
Fortum shareholding on 31 Dec 2021: 806
More about Per
Member of the Board of Directors of Sampo plc and East Office of Finnish Industries Oy
Member of Executive Management and
employed by Fortum since 1 February 2021
More about Eveliina
Born 1969, nationality: Swedish
Senior Vice President, People and Procurement since 1 May 2021
Up to date information about managers' shareholding
Mikael Rönnblad
Key positions of trust:
Born 1973, nationality: Finnish
M.Sc. (Econ.)
Born 1978, nationality: Finnish
Member of Executive Management since 2021
Born 1969, nationality: Finnish
Master of economics and PhD (Econ.), St. Gallen
The Fortum Executive Management assists the President and CEO in implementing the strategic and sustainability targets within the framework approved by the Board of Directors, preparing the Group’s business plans, and deciding on investments, mergers, acquisitions and divestments within its authorisation. Financial and sustainability results are reviewed in the monthly reporting by the Fortum Executive Management. Quarterly Performance Review meetings with the management are embedded in the Fortum Performance Management process.
Member of the Executive Management since 2012
In addition to Corporate Affairs, Safety and Sustainability, the SVP’s responsibilities include Group Communications, Public Affairs, and Brand
Fortum shareholding 31 Dec 2021: 16,454
Fortum shareholding on 31 Dec 2021: 48,971
Executive Management | Fortum
CFO of Fortum Corporation 2017-2020 and 2012–2014 and acting CEO in 2013, Executive Vice President, City Solutions -division of Fortum Corporation 2014–2017; CFO of Stora Enso Oyj 2008–2012; SVP, Group Treasurer of Stora Enso International 2004–2008; VP, Strategy and Investments at Stora Enso Oyj 2001–2004; VP Head of Funding of Stora Enso Financial Services 1999–2001; several financial tasks at Enso Oyj 1993–1999
Born 1968, nationality: Finnish
Executive Vice President, Consumer Solutions since 2017
More about Simon-Erik
Go to transactions page
CFO and CHRO of innogy SE 2019 - 2020 and CFO 2016 - 2019; CFO of RWE AG 2013 - 2016 and Member of the Executive Board 2012 - 2016; Managing Director and Chief Financial Officer of RWE Supply & Trading GmbH 2008 - 2012; Managing Director and Chief Financial Officer of RWE Trading GmbH 2007 - 2008; Managing Director and Chief Financial Officer of RWE Gas Midstream GmbH 2007 - 2008; Vice President Group Controlling of RWE AG 2005 - 2006; Vice President Corporate Planning and Controlling of RWE Power AG 2001 - 2005; Head of Department Group Controlling of RWE AG 1999 - 2001; Management Consultant at McKinsey & Company 1993 - 1998
The President and CEO is in charge of the day-to-day management of the Group. The CEO supervises the company’s Strategy and M&A activities as well as Fortum’s Business Technology function
Employed by Fortum since 2009
Each member of the Fortum Executive Management is responsible for the day-to-day operations and the implementation of operational decisions in their respective organisations.
More about Mikael
Employed by Fortum since 2011
Member of the Board of Exeger Sweden AB
Member of the Executive Management since 1 May 2021
Member of the Executive Management since 2017
M.Sc. (Eng.)
Chair of the Board of Directors of Kemijoki Oy; Member of the Board of Directors of Finnish Energy, Chair of industry and climate committee of Finland Chambers of Commerce
M.Soc.Sc. (Econ. and Pol. Hist.)
Fortum shareholding on 31 Dec 2021: 99,308
Managers' shareholding and transactions
Executive Vice President Generation since 29 March 2021
Member of the Legal Affairs Committee of Confederation of Finnish Industries
Born 1983, nationality: Finnish
Senior Vice President, Technology and New Ventures of Fortum Corporation 2016–2017; Executive Vice President, Hydro Power and Technology of Fortum Corporation 2014–2016; Executive Vice President, Heat Division of Fortum Power and Heat Oy 2009–2014; President of Heat of Fortum Power and Heat Oy 2007–2009; President of Portfolio Management and Trading of Fortum Power and Heat Oy 2004–2007; managerial positions at Fortum Oyj 1997–2004(incl. Gullspång Kraft 1997–1999)
Senior Vice President & General Manager of New Digital Services Businesses and Consumer Customers Executive Board Member of Elisa Corporation 2009–2017; Vice President, Corporate Strategy and M&A of Elisa Corporation 2004–2009; Director and Global Head of Nordic Sector of ABN AMRO Global Equities 2000–2004; General Manager and Head of Department at Telenor Hungary 1999–2000; Manager, Corporate Venturing and International Mobile Operations at Sonera Corporation 1997–2000; Project Director and Assistant Professor (acting) at Hanken Swedish School of Economics 1995–1997; Junior Strategy Consultant at Vectia Ltd 1994–1995; In-house Consultant, Major Accounts Sales at Nokia Corporation 1991–1993
Previous positions
Executive Vice President, City Solutions since 2017
Fortum shareholding 31 Dec 2021: 0
Member of the Supervisory Boards of Nederlandse Spoorwegen (Dutch railways) and NKT Denmark, member of the Advisory Board of Topvrouwen.nl
LLM, Helsinki University, Finland and Master of European Law, College of Europe, Bruges, Belgium
Employed by Fortum since 2012
More about Bernhard
Executive management
In addition to Corporate Legal, the General Counsel’s responsibilities include Corporate Governance, Ethics and Compliance, Internal Controls and Data Privacy
Fortum shareholding on 31 Dec 2021: 374
Born 1967, nationality: German
More about Nebahat
Chief Financial Officer since 1 February 2021
Member of Executive Management since 1 May 2021
Fortum shareholding on 31 Dec 2021: 3,854
President and CEO since 1 July 2020
Employed by Fortum since 2017
Senior Vice President Corporate Affairs, Safety and Sustainability since 1 June 2021
Employed by Fortum since 2006
Member of the Supervisory Board of Thyssenkrupp AG
Member of the Executive Management and employed by Fortum since 1 June 2021
Fortum Oyj: Vice President, Generation Legal 2019−2021, Head of Generation Legal 2015−2019, Legal Counsel/Senior Legal Counsel 2011−2015; Market Court Helsinki, Finland, Judge 2009−2011; Hannes Snellman Attorneys Ltd, Senior Associate 2005−2009; Van Bael & Bellis, Belgium, Associate Lawyer 2001−2005; Environment and Business Lawyers Ltd, Helsinki, Finland, Associate Lawyer 1998−2000
Member of the Executive Management since 2009
Previous positions:
: Fortum Corporation: Vice President, People, City Solutions division & People Service 2018−2021, Business People Partner, TNV & eNext 2016−2018, Development Manager, Corporate Strategy 2009−2016, Procurement Manager 2007−2009, Purchasing Analyst 2007
Born 1968, nationality: Dutch, Turkish
Employed by Fortum since 1997
More about Markus
More about Nora
Vice President, Trading and Asset Optimisation, Fortum Generation Division 2016-2021; Chief Economist & Vice President, Industrial Intelligence and Investment Analysis, Fortum Corporate and Fortum Power Division 2013-2016; Chief Economist & Vice President, Industrial Intelligence and Trading IT, Trading and Industrial Intelligence 2011-2013; Various leadership positions in trading, industrial intelligence, strategy and R&D at 2009-2011; Advisor, East Office of Finnish Industries 2008-2009; Economist, Bank of Finland 2004-2008
Vice President, Ext. Relations, Integrated Gas & New Energies 2016 - 2021 and Vice President, External Communications & Relations, Global Upstream 2012 - 2016 of Royal Dutch Shell; MP, PvdA & Chair of the Foreign Affairs Committee and Spokesperson for European Affairs 2010 – 2012, and MP, PvdA & Spokesperson for Defense, Justice and Migration 1998 - 2007 at the House of Representatives of the Netherlands; State Secretary for Justice 2007 – 2010 at Ministry of Justice, the Netherlands; Policy Officer, Minorities Integration Policy Department 1995 – 1998 and Policy Officer, European and International Affairs 1993 - 1995 at the Ministry of Home Affairs and Kingdom Relations, the Netherlands
In addition to Corporate Finance, the CFO’s responsibilities cover Risk Management, Investor Relations & Financial Communications, as well as Investments and Portfolio Analysis
General Counsel of Fortum Corporation since 1 May 2021
Chairman of the Board of Nikus Oy Ab
LLM, International and European Law, University of Leiden, Netherlands
M.Soc.Sc. (Economics)


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/share-information/managers-shareholding
The table below shows the holdings of the management of Fortum Corporation. In accordance with the EU Market Abuse Regulation (MAR) N:o 596/2014, Fortum will also publish all its managers' transactions by a Stock Exchange Release as of 3 July 2016.
Share holdings of the management of Fortum Corporation
Instructions for managers' transactions
Managers' shareholding
By browsing the transaction history in the table below, you will find a list of the transactions. Fortum also publishes all its managers' transactions as a Stock Exchange Release.
Read more about instructions
Managers' shareholding | Fortum
At the end of 2021, the President and CEO and the other members of the Fortum Executive Management owned 224,369 shares representing approximately 0.03% of the total shares in the company.
To newsroom


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/corporate-governance/insider-administration/instructions-managers-transactions
and log in to the service and follow further instructions. You can either fill in a form or attach an xml file in the electronic service.
Kindly note that the use of the electronic services requires strong user identification. If you do not have a Finnish personal identity code, you will be requested to log in with a username and password. Holders of Czech, Estonian, German, Italian or Spanish tokens will be able to use the eIDAS login.
Sending the notification to Fortum Corporation
transactions
Instructions to send the notifications
Please also add your phone number to the email message you send to the Company so that you can be contacted if Fortum has questions about the notification. In case of any problems, please contact
https://asiointi.finanssivalvonta.fi/en/login
Insider administration in Fortum
Go to the address
Insider administration
Financial Supervisory Authority
Financial Supervisory Authority website
Fortum Corporation publishes the notification it has received, as a stock exchange release promptly after receipt of the notification. Further information on the regulation concerning the notifications of transactions of managers and persons closely associated with them is available at
Transactions are to be notified primarily via electronic services. Please log in to the electronic services of the
(If the form does not open directly from this link, save it on your computer by clicking on the right mouse button on top of the link and select “Save as”. After opening the form, you must enable JavaScript through the Options button if prompted to do so).
Instructions for managers' transactions | Fortum
Sending the notification to the Financial Supervisory Authority:
Fortum Corporation managers and their closely associated persons referred to in the Market Abuse Regulation ((EU) No 596/2014, ”MAR”) are requested to follow the below instructions for notifying transactions as of 3 July 2016. Such notifications shall be made to Fortum Corporation and the FIN-FSA promptly and no later than three (3) business days after the date of the transaction.
Copy the XML contents of the notification and the summary in the electronic service of the Financial Supervisory Authority, or alternatively, the same information as PDF file in the system, to be sent to the Company. Send the file as attachment to an email message to


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/corporate-governance/insider-administration
Related party transactions
Related party transactions are regulated by the Finnish Companies Act, the Finnish Securities Markets Act and the Corporate Governance Code 2020, as well as in the IAS 24 Related Party Disclosures. Fortum has a specific framework in place for identification, assessment, approval, monitoring and reporting of the company’s related party transactions. In accordance with the Finnish Companies Act, the Board of Directors is responsible for monitoring and assessment of the related party transactions. The Audit and Risk Committee of the Board of Directors assists the Board in its task by preparing the matters. As part of its duties, the Audit and Risk Committee monitors the related party transactions concluded by Fortum in accordance with the company’s established reporting practices.
The insider rules are made available to all Fortum employees and they are updated on a regular basis. Fortum arranges trainings on insider rules for the persons concerned. The coordination and control of the insider affairs are among the responsibilities of the General Counsel.
Any suspected violations against Fortum’s insider rules or the securities regulations, such as MAR and REMIT, can be reported directly to the General Counsel or the Group Compliance Officer, or by using the “SpeakUp” channel.
Fortum complies with the EU regulation No. 596/2014 on market abuse (MAR) and EU regulation No. 1227/2011 on wholesale Energy Market Integrity and Transparency (REMIT) and related regulation. In addition, Fortum complies also with the Guidelines for Insiders of Listed Companies issued by Nasdaq Helsinki, and has internal insider rules in place.
Fortum’s persons discharging managerial responsibilities and the persons closely associated with them may not trade in Fortum’s financial instruments on their own account or for the account of a third party, directly or indirectly for a closed period of 30 days prior to the publication of any interim reports and financial statements (Closed Window). Under the restriction, it is also not allowed to disclose the financial information, or to advise anyone in trading with Fortum’s financial instruments. The trading restriction also applies to certain other separately designated members of Fortum personnel who participate in the preparation, drawing-up and disclosure of Fortum’s interim reports and financial statements, or who in connection with their specific duties have regular access to sensitive unpublished financial information of Fortum. All of these persons have been personally informed about the trading restriction and the related obligations.
Persons discharging managerial responsibilities at Fortum and persons closely associated with them are under a duty to disclose their transactions made with Fortum’s financial instruments and emission allowances in accordance with MAR to the Finnish Financial Supervisory Authority and Fortum. The transactions have to be notified to the Finnish Financial Supervisory Authority within three business days from the conduct of the transaction in question. Fortum publishes these transactions through stock exchange releases. Fortum has defined the members of the Board of Directors and the Fortum Executive Management as persons discharging managerial responsibilities.
Insider administration | Fortum
Fortum discloses information regarding related party transactions on an annual basis as part of the notes to the company’s consolidated financial statements. In addition, as required by law, Fortum discloses the details of any related party transactions that are material to the shareholders by issuing a stock exchange release.
Event-based insider lists are established on a case-by-case basis separately for specific projects, and they are administered strictly in accordance with MAR. Any event-based insiders are under the trading restriction described above until termination of the project and/or disclosure of the inside information.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/corporate-governance/board-directors
Chairman of the Board of Glaston Corporation
President of Region Europe in 2015 and Member of the Group Executive Committee of ABB Group in 2006–2015, President of the Process Automation division in 2006–2014, Head of Business Area Process Automation in 2005; Manager of Automation Technologies Division at ABB China 2003–2004; Business Area Manager of ABB Drives & Power Electronics 2002; Manager at ABB Drives 1996–2002; CFO of ABB Industry Oy 1994–1996; various positions in paper and packaging companies in Finland before 1994
Fortum shareholding 31 Dec 2022: 1,446
Chief Executive Officer of Siemens Energy Management Division 2015−2019, Chief Executive Officer of Siemens Low and Medium Voltage 2011−2014, Chief Executive Officer of Siemens Power Distribution 2008−2011, Chief Executive Officer of Siemens High Voltage Business 2004−2008, Several positions in Automation & Drives and Corporate Strategy and Research 1989−1998; General Manager, Low Voltage Products & Systems of GE Industrial, Barcelona, Spain 2001−2004, General Manager of GE Procond Electronics, Belluno, Italy 1999−2001, General Manager, Global Development Function of GE Industrial, Barcelona 1998−1999
Main occupation:
Board meetings
Stora Enso Oyj, EVP, Head of Sustainability
Defining the dividend policy
Hainan Cihang Charity Foundation, Managing Director;  World Economic Forum, Managing Director & Member of the Managing Board 2014-2017;  Federal Ministry (Bundesministerium) of Economics and Technology, Deputy Federal Chancellor and Federal Minister 2011-2013;  Federal Ministry (Bundesministerium) of Health, Federal Minister of Health
Chair of the Nomination and Remuneration Committee
The President and CEO, the Chief Financial Officer, and the General Counsel as secretary to the Board of Directors, all attend the Board meetings on a regular basis. The other Fortum Executive Management members and senior executives attend as require.
Member of the Audit and risk Committee
Member of the Supervisory Board, the Board of Partners, and the Audit Committee of Freudenberg Group; Member of the Supervisory Board, Chair of the Audit, Risk and Compliance Committee, and Member of the Strategic Investment Committee of TenneT Holding B.V.; Independent Member of the Board of Directors and Member of the Audit Committee of Applus Services SA; Non-executive Independent Member of the Board of Directors and Chair of the Audit Committee of Iveco Group N.V.
The Annual General Meeting held on 28 March 2022 re-elected, in accordance with the proposal of the Shareholders’ Nomination Board, Veli-Matti Reinikkala as Chair, Anja McAlister as Deputy Chair, and Luisa Delgado, Essimari Kairisto, Teppo Paavola, Philipp Rösler, and Annette Stube as members. In addition, Ralf Christian and Kimmo Viertola were elected as new members.
Member of the Audit and Risk Committee
Fortum shareholding 31 Dec 2022: 985
: CEO and Board Member of Safilo SpA 2013–2018; Executive Board Member and Chief Human Resources Officer of SAP AG 2012–2013; Vice President, Nordic, Procter & Gamble GmbH 2007–2012; Vice President, Human Resources, Western Europe, Procter & Gamble GmbH 2006–2007; General Manager, Human Resources, Western Europe, Procter & Gamble GmbH 2003–2006; Head of Human Resources, Western Europe, Procter & Gamble GmbH 2000–2003; EMEA Human Resources Specialist, Organization Design, EU Labor, Diversity, Employee Communications 1997–1999; Division Human Resources Manager, UK Fabric/Home, Baby/Feminine and Food 1995–1997; Country Human Resources and Public Affairs & Communications Manager, Procter & Gamble Portugal 1993–1995; Recruitment, Training & Development, Plant Human Resources & Country Human Resources Manager, Procter & Gamble Portugal 1991–1993
The Chair, the Deputy Chair and the members of the Board of Directors are all independent of the Company and of the Company’s significant shareholders, with the exception of Kimmo Viertola, who is non-independent of the Company’s significant shareholder (the State of Finland). Four Board members are female and five of the members are male.
Head of Sustainability of A.P. Moller – Maersk 2008-2020; Director, Sustainability Programmes, Corporate Branding & Responsibility of Novo Nordisk 2007–2008, Advisor, Corporate Responsibility 1998–2007 and Human Resource Consultant, Health Care Business 1997–1998; Manager of a psychological crisis intervention team and for a Scandinavian team of 200 “flying” doctors and nurses, Supply chain Manager in Eastern Europe and Africa at SOS-International 1995–1997
Ensuring that the administration and operations of the company are properly organised
Independent member of Fortum's Board of Directors since 28 March 2022
M.Sc., Industrial Engineering & Computer Science (Dipl. Wirtsch.Ing./OR-Informatik)
Positions of trust:
Born 1964, nationality: German
Ensuring that the accounting, financial administration and the risk management are arranged appropriately
Independent member of Fortum's Board of Directors since 2021
Executive Master of Business Administration
Born 1961, Finnish citizen
Appointing the Chair and Deputy Chair as well as members of the Fortum Corporation Advisory Council
The main duties of the Board of Directors include:
Luisa Delgado
Governance Statement 2021
Ph.D., M.Med.
The Board of Directors convened 18 times during 2021, and the attendance rate was 99%. Detailed information on the attendance rate is available in the
Member of the Board of 3 Step IT Oy
Senior Ministerial Advisor, Financial Affairs of Finnish Ownership Steering Department at the Prime Minister’s Office Jan 2018−Oct 2018; Director at Finnish Industry Investment Ltd 1998−2017; Director at Price Waterhouse 1995–1998 , Manager at Skopbank Group 1978–1994
Born 1967, Finnish citizen
Financial matters of significance
Strategic development and steering of the company’s business and fields of activity
M.Sc.(Econ.), HSE; MBA, INSEAD
Deciding on major investments, divestments and business arrangements
. Fortum also publishes all its managers' transactions by a Stock Exchange Release.
Non-executive Director
Essimari Kairisto
Decisions having effect on the corporate organisation
Anja McAlister
Fortum shareholding on 31 Dec 2022: 7,029
The Annual General Meeting on 28 April 2021 re-elected Essimari Kairisto,  Anja McAlister (Deputy Chair), Teppo Paavola, Veli-Matti Reinikkala (Chair), Philipp Rösler, and Annette Stube as members of the Board. In addition, Luisa Delgado was elected as a new member of the Board of Directors.
The Board of Directors convenes according to a previously agreed schedule to discuss specified themes and issues on its charter. The Chair of the Board of Directors prepares the agenda for the Board of Directors meetings based on the proposal by the President and CEO. The members of the Board of Directors have the right to suggest specific matters and have them included in the agenda. More than a half of the members must be present at the meeting to constitute a quorum. Decisions of the Board of Directors shall be made by a simple majority.
Philipp Rösler
Ralf Christian
Independent consultant
Appointing and dismissing the President and CEO; deciding on his/her remuneration
Independent member of Fortum's Board of Directors since 2017
Independent member of Fortum's Board of Directors since  2020
Member of the Nomination and Remuneration Committee
Independent of the Company but non-independent of the company’s significant shareholder, member since 28 March 2022
Supervision and oversight
As part of its duties, the Board of Directors conducts an annual self-assessment in order to further develop its work. In accordance with the Finnish Corporate Governance Code 2020, the Board of Directors also annually evaluates which of the directors are independent of the company and which are independent of its significant shareholders.
Chair
Confirming the Group’s business plan on an annual basis
Deciding on donations to charities
Annette Stube
Veli-Matti Reinikkala
The Chair, the Deputy Chair and the members of the Board of Directors are independent of the company and of the company's significant shareholders.
Working order
During 2021, the main focus of the board work was on the Uniper investment, consolidation of the same, and development and deepening of co-operation between both companies as well. In addition, the Board focused on the reorganisation of Fortum’s Executive Management Team and on overall transformation of the business via strategic reviews, investments and divestments. The Board also focused on climate change related matters, including follow-up of the regulatory development.
Adjunct Professor at Copenhagen Business School
Chair of the Audit and Risk Committee
Born 1960, nationality: Finnish and USA
Board professional
Teppo Paavola
Board of Directors in 2021
In December 2021, the Board of Directors decided to establish a temporary committee on liquidity for the purpose of monitoring and overseeing the liquidity situation in the Fortum Group, including Uniper. The members of the committee on liquidity were Veli-Matti Reinikkala (Chair), Essimari Kairisto, and Teppo Paavola. The committee met twice, and the attendance rate was 83%. Due to the COVID-19 pandemic related market challenges, the Board closely monitored the impact on the Group and evaluated various short and long term risk scenarios throughout the year. The Board also conducted the annual self-assessment, including the committee work, to further enhance the efficiency of its work.
Setting and following up the annual performance targets, including sustainability and climate-related targets, for the company and its management
Born 1966, Finnish and German citizen
Chair of the Shareholders’ Nomination Board of Neste Corporation; Member of the Nomination Committee of SSAB AB (Publ.)
Kimmo Viertola
Fortum shareholding on 31 Dec 2022: 985
Primary work experience:
Reviewing the interim reports and approving the consolidated financial statements, the parent company financial statements and the operating and financial review
Master’s degree in psychology, specialized in organisational development (Copenhagen University); Executive Board Education (Copenhagen Business School)
Director General, Finnish Ownership Steering Department at the Prime Minister’s Office
Born 1973, nationality: German
M.Sc., Energy technology, MBA
BBVA Group, Chief Development Officer, General Manager of New Digital Businesses 2014–2018; Paypal, VP, Head of Global Business Development, M&A and Developer Relations 2012–2014; Nokia Corporation, General Manager at Mobile Financial Services 2009–2012, Head of Corporate Business Development 2008–2009, Head of Strategy and Business Development at Nokia Research Center 2004–2007; Oplayo, CEO 2002–2004; Printing Network Of Europe, CEO/Founder 2000–2002; General Electric/GE Capital, Managing Director of Equipment Finance 1998–1999, and M&A and Business Development Manager 1996–1997
Self assessment
Independent member of Fortum's Board of Directors since 2020
Convening the Annual General Meeting and the Extraordinary General Meeting, when necessary
Born 1957, nationality: Finnish
The Chair of the Board of Directors prepares the agenda for the Board of Directors meetings based on the proposal by the President and CEO. The members of the Board of Directors have the right to suggest specific matters and have them included in the agenda. More than a half of the members must be present at the meeting to constitute a quorum. Decisions of the Board of Directors shall be made by a simple majority. The Board of Directors has approved a written charter for its work, the main content of which is disclosed herein, including the duties of the Board of Directors.
Born 1967, Danish citizen
Corporate values, policies
Confirming the Group’s organisational structure at the top management level, and appointing and dismissing the members of the Fortum Executive Management
Member of the Executive Board/CFO in 2013-2016 at Hochtief Solutions AG; General Manager Finance/CFO of Sasol O&S Group International 2008-2013; Managing Director and CFO of Sasol Germany GmbH 2007-2013;  Managing Director/CFO of Lahmeyer International GmbH 2004-2007; Head of Special Purpose Controlling of RWE Solutions AG 2003-2004; Head of Commercial Services Infrastructure Management of RWE Solutions AG & RWE Industrie-Lösungen GmbH 2002-2003; several management positions in Germany, Norway and US at Schlumberger 1995-2001
Deputy Chair
M.Sc. Business; International Marketing
Board of Directors | Fortum
M.Sc. Law, King’s College, University of London, UK; B.Sc. Law, University of Geneva, Switzerland
Board of Directors in 2022
Changes in managers' shareholdings and transaction history are available
Confirming the Group’s Code of Conduct, operating principles and Group policies, including sustainability, and overseeing their implementation
The Board of Directors is responsible for the company’s strategic development and for supervising and steering the company’s business and management. Further, in line with the company’s Articles of Association and the Companies Act, the Board of Directors represents the company and is responsible for defining the company’s purpose, and also for proper arrangement of the control of the company’s accounts and finances. The Board of Directors comprises five to ten members elected at the Annual General Meeting for a one-year term of office expiring at the end of the first Annual General Meeting following the election. The Annual General Meeting also elects the Chair and the Deputy Chair of the Board of Directors.
Independent member of Fortum's Board of Directors since 2016
Adecco Group, Chief Digital Officer
Consessor AG, CEO
Chair of the Board of Directors of Swarovski SIH AG; Member of the Board of Directors of Barclays Bank (Suisse), Ingka Holding BV (IKEA), Telia AB, Grupo Dia and Breitling AG
Additional information
Born 1966, nationality: Portuguese and Swiss
Member of the Supervisory Board of Siemens Healthineers, Jacobs University Bremen gGmbH, and Brainloop AG; Member of the Board of trustees of Bertelsmann Stiftung; Independent Director of the Board of the Loc Troi Group; Vice-Chairman of the Board of Directors of Long Anh Province Energy Company; Independent Director at Special Purpose Acquisition Company
Executive Vice President, Head of Strategy, Transformation, and HR of Pöyry PLC in 2017 and President of Energy Business Group in 2015–2017; Vice President at Pöyry Management Consulting Oy 2014–2015; Managing Director of Renewa Oy 2013; Senior Vice president, Head of Energy Business at UPM Group 2004–2013; Senior Vice President, Head of the Management Consulting Northern Europe of Electrowatt-Ekono Oy (part of the Pöyry Group) 2000–2004; Industrial Counsellor, Head of Energy Policy and Analyses team of Ministry of Trade and Industry, Finland 1998–2000; Operations Manager and Managing Director  of Kymppivoima Oy 1995–1998; Senior Consultant at Energia-Ekono Oy 1993–1995; Technical Manager at Sheffield Heat and Power Ltd., UK 1990–1993; Operations Manager of MW biomass CHP plant of City of Kuopio, Finland 1984–1989
Diploma in Business Administration (Germany)
Independent member of Fortum's Board of Directors since 2019
Primary working experience:
Primary working experience
Independent member of Fortum's Board of Directors since 2018


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/09/notice-extraordinary-general-meeting-shareholders-fortum-corporation
” or the “
Pursuant to Chapter 5, Section 25 of the Finnish Companies Act, a shareholder who is present at the General Meeting has the right to request information with respect to the matters to be considered at the meeting.
Submission of the proxy document to Euroclear Finland Oy before the end of the registration and advance voting period constitutes due registration for the General Meeting, provided that they contain the information required for the registration described in Section C.1.
In Espoo, 26 September 2022
1. Opening of the meeting
yhtiokokous
The shareholder, their proxy representative, legal representative or assistant, if any, shall be able to prove their identity and/or right of representation at the General Meeting.
Information on General Meetings laid down in the Finnish Companies Act and the Securities Markets Act is available on the Company’s website at www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/corporate-governance/general-meeting.
For natural persons, electronic advance voting requires secure strong electronic authentication, and a shareholder may register and vote by logging in using their personal Finnish online banking credentials or a mobile certificate.
are also available on the Company’s website at www.fortum.com/egm.
5. Other instructions and information
The following matters will be considered at the General Meeting:
26 September 2022, 09:00 EEST
euroclear
on 3 October 2022 at the latest
Each shareholder, who on the record date of the General Meeting,
”) are invited to the Extraordinary General Meeting (the “
B. Documents of the General Meeting
Nasdaq Helsinki Ltd
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 26 SEPTEMBER 2022 AT 9:00 EEST
A shareholder who has voted in advance may request information under the Finnish Companies Act, request a vote at the General Meeting or vote on a possible counterproposal, if they are present at the General Meeting.
For shareholders that are legal entities, electronic registration does not require strong electronic authentication. However, the shareholder shall provide the number of its Finnish book entry account and other required information. If a shareholder that is a legal entity uses the electronic Suomi.fi authorisation service further described below, the registration requires strong electronic authentication, which works with personal Finnish online banking credentials or a mobile certificate.
A holder of nominee-registered shares has the right to participate in the General Meeting by virtue of such shares, based on which they would be entitled to be registered in the shareholders' register of the Company held by Euroclear Finland Oy on the record date of the General Meeting,
Solidium
by phone + 358 20 770 6905 (on working days from 9:00 a.m. to 4:00 p.m. EET/EEST)
e terms related to the electronic advance voting
eu
by email or by regular mail
7.
by regular mail addressed to Euroclear Finland Oy, Yhtiökokous / Fortum Corporation, P.O. Box 1110, FI-00101 Helsinki
; or
For shareholders that are legal entities, electronic advance voting does not require strong electronic authentication. However, the shareholder shall provide the number of its Finnish book entry account and other information required. If a shareholder that is a legal entity uses the electronic Suomi.fi authorisation service further described below, the registration requires strong electronic authentication, which works with personal online Finnish banking credentials or a mobile certificate.
In connection with the registration, a shareholder must state their name, personal identification number or business identity code, address, telephone number and the name of a proxy representative, legal representative or assistant, if any, and the personal identification number of the proxy representative, legal representative or assistant, as applicable. Any personal data provided to Fortum or Euroclear Finland Oy by a shareholder will only be used for the purposes of the General Meeting and for the processing of related registrations.
, or by regular mail addressed to Euroclear Finland Oy, Yhtiökokous / Fortum Corporation, P.O. Box 1110, FI-00101 Helsinki.
”) (the “
by e-mail addressed to
The minutes of the General Meeting will be available at www.fortum.com/egm on 7 December 2022 at the latest.
A shareholder may participate in the General Meeting and exercise their rights at the meeting also by way of third-party proxy representation. A proxy representative shall provide a dated proxy document or otherwise in a reliable manner demonstrate their right to represent the shareholder at the General Meeting. If a shareholder participates in the General Meeting by means of several proxy representatives representing the shareholder with shares in different securities accounts, the shares with which each proxy representative represents the shareholder shall be identified in connection with the registration for the General Meeting.
The Board of Directors proposes that the General Meeting resolve on a directed share issue without payment to Solidium Oy (“
1. Shareholders registered in the shareholders’ register
Notice to the Extraordinary General Meeting of Shareholders of Fortum Corporation | Fortum
3. Holders of nominee-registered shares
Nora Steiner-Forsberg, General Counsel, for contact:
by which time the proxy documents must have been received by Euroclear Finland Oy.
”). The maximum number of the new shares to be issued in the Directed Share Issue would be 8,970,000, which corresponds to approximately 1.01 per cent of the current number of shares in the Company, and which corresponds to approximately 1.00 per cent of all shares in the Company upon completion of the Directed Share Issue.
Shareholders are kindly asked to take into account that the parking space available at the General Meeting venue and its vicinity is limited. Therefore, Fortum encourages the shareholders who wish to attend the General Meeting at the venue to arrive with public transport, or alternatively make use of the advance voting and webcast.
The Board of Directors
(PDF, 824 KB)
Pursuant to the bridge financing arrangement, a directed share issue without payment, which entitles Solidium to subscribe up to 8,970,000 new ordinary registered shares in Fortum, was a condition subsequent for the drawdown of the liquidity facility. As a consequence, the shares under control of the Finnish state would increase to 51.26 per cent from the current 50.76 per cent, correspondingly diluting the ownership of the other shareholders.
Finnish: Helsingin Kulttuuritalo
www.fortum.com/egm
Closing of the meeting
2022. In addition, the right to participate in the General Meeting requires that the shareholder, on the basis of such shares, has been temporarily registered into the shareholders’ register held by Euroclear Finland Oy by 10:00 a.m. (EET) on
Release category: Notice to convene general meeting
. In addition, the Company’s January–September 2022 interim report will be published on 10 November 2022, and will thereafter be available at
Instructions regarding the advance voting, and th
If a shareholder participates in the General Meeting by submitting the votes in advance to Euroclear Finland Oy, submission of the votes before the end of the registration and advance voting period constitutes due registration for the General Meeting, provided that they contain the above-mentioned information required for the registration.
Shareholders with a Finnish book-entry account or equity savings account may vote in advance on the agenda matter 6 of the General Meeting during the period from 3 October 2022 at 10:00 a.m. (EEST) until 16
The proxy documents, if any, should be notified in connection with registration, and they should be submitted to Euroclear Finland Oy by email addressed to
Shareholders that are legal entities can also use the electronic Suomi.fi authorisation service in Euroclear Finland’s general meeting service for authorising their proxies instead of using the traditional proxy authorisation. In this case, the shareholder that is a legal entity authorises a representative appointed by it in the Suomi.fi service at www.suomi.fi/e-authorizations (using the authorisation topic “Representation at the General Meeting”). When registering, the representative must identify themselves with strong electronic authentication in Euroclear Finland’s general meeting service, after which the electronic mandate is automatically checked. The strong electronic authentication works with personal banking codes or a mobile certificate. For more information, see www.suomi.fi/e-authorizations.
On the date of this notice to the General Meeting, the total number of shares in Fortum Corporation and votes represented by such shares is 888,294,465.
Any changes in the ownership of shares that have occurred after the record date of the General Meeting do not affect the right to participate in the General Meeting nor the number of votes of the shareholder at the General Meeting.
2022 at 4:00 p.m. (EET).
16 November
Advance voting can be done in the following ways:
2. Proxy representatives and powers of attorney
A holder of nominee-registered shares is advised to request well in advance the necessary instructions regarding the temporary registration in the shareholders' register of the Company, the issuing of proxy documents and registration for the General Meeting from their custodian bank. The account management organisation of the custodian bank shall temporarily register the holder of the nominee-registered shares who wishes to participate in the General Meeting into the shareholders' register of the Company by the time stated above at the latest. For the sake of clarity, it is noted that holders of nominee-registered shares cannot directly register for the General Meeting on the Company’s website, but must register via their custodian bank instead.
18 November
before the General Meeting. Shareholders are asked to take into account that following the meeting via webcast is not considered participating in the General Meeting, and that it is not possible for the shareholders to exercise their shareholder rights in the General Meeting through the webcast. Shareholders that wish to follow the webcast can exercise their voting rights by voting on the matter on the agenda in advance in accordance with the instructions provided above.
A shareholder who is registered in the shareholders’ register of the Company and wishes to participate in the General Meeting, shall register for the meeting no later than on
The Company has on 6 September 2022 agreed on a bridge financing arrangement with its majority owner, the Finnish State. With the arrangement, the Company aims to ensure access to sufficient liquidity resources if power prices and, with it, collateral requirements rose significantly in particular on the Nordic commodities exchange Nasdaq. Fortum published a separate stock exchange release on the arrangement on 6 September 2022. The loan facility, the amount of which is at maximum EUR 2.35 billion within the framework of the financing agreement, is provided by the Finnish state-owned holding company Solidium. The financing was put in place in with the schedule and terms set by the Finnish state. The key terms and conditions of the facility have been described in the above mentioned stock exchange release.
), address Sturenkatu 4, Helsinki, Finland. The reception of the shareholders who have registered for the meeting will commence at 10:30 a.m. (EET). No refreshments will be served in connection with the General Meeting.
on the Fortum website at
5. Recording the attendance at the meeting and adoption of the list of votes
The first tranche of a minimum of EUR 350 million must be drawn on 30 September 2022 at the latest in order for the financing arrangement to remain effective after the end of September 2022. The Company announced on 26 September 2022 that it had decided to draw down the aforementioned EUR 350 million tranche. Fortum may draw the remaining EUR 2 billion of the facility by 31 March 2023. The term of the liquidity facility is one year and it matures in September 2023.
The shareholders of Fortum Corporation (“
4. Recording the legality of the meeting
4. The registration can be done in the following ways:
General Meeting
”) of the Company to be held on Wednesday 23 November 2022, starting at 12:00 a.m. (EET) at the Helsinki House of Culture (
A shareholder may submit the advance voting form available on the Company’s website or corresponding information to Euroclear Finland Oy by email addressed to
2. Calling the meeting to order
A. Matters on the agenda
The shareholders have the opportunity to exercise their voting rights also by voting in advance. In addition, the shareholders can follow the General Meeting online via webcast on the Company’s website at
The proposal for the decision on the matter on the agenda listed above, the Company’s financial statements and operating and financial review for 2021, the report of the Board of Directors and the auditor’s report, the Company’s half-year financial report January–June 2022, and the statement by the Board of Directors on the events after the preparation of the half-year financial report with a material effect on the Company, decisions regarding the distribution of funds by Fortum after the latest financial period, as well as this notice will be available on Fortum’s website at
egm
2022, is registered in the shareholders’ register of the Company held by Euroclear Finland Oy, has the right to participate in the General Meeting. A shareholder whose shares are registered on their personal Finnish book-entry account or equity savings account, is automatically registered in the shareholders’ register of the Company. The use of proxies is described below.
3. Election of persons to scrutinise the minutes and to supervise the counting of votes
On the date of this notice, the Company has sufficient liquid funds to meet the current collateral requirements. The Nordic power prices have declined during the recent weeks from the record levels at the end of August 2022 and the market has been less volatile. However, the Company must remain prepared for continued market turbulence, and drawing the first tranche already in September ensures that Fortum has access to the liquidity facility should the collateral requirements increase again during the winter. Consequently, there is an especially weighty financial reason for the Company, also taking into account the interests of all the Company's shareholders, as referred to in Chapter 9, Section 4, Subsection 1 of the Finnish Companies Act, to deviate from the pre-emptive subscription rights of the shareholders.
Directed Share Issue
Russia’s attack on Ukraine and the war Russia started has caused an energy crisis in Europe with significant impacts on Fortum and other energy market participants. Trading volumes on the Nordic power commodities exchange have decreased significantly and the Company needs to be prepared for great uncertainty on the markets and for a possible need to rapidly commit significant amounts of working capital for collateral requirements required by the EMIR regulatory framework. Alternative financing for the equivalent amount and with more favourable terms than the bridge financing arrangement was not available before the end of September due to the Company's unresolved strategic matters.
, or by regular mail addressed to Euroclear Finland Oy, Yhtiökokous / Fortum Corporation, P.O. Box 1110, FI-00101 Helsinki, no later than by the end of the registration period,
6. Resolution on a directed share issue without payment
For natural persons, electronic registration requires secure strong electronic authentication, and a shareholder may register by logging in using their personal Finnish online banking credentials or a mobile certificate.
2022 at 4:00 p.m. (EET) by giving a prior notice of participation. The notice must be received by the Company (or Euroclear Finland Oy) before the end of the above-mentioned registration period. Registration for the General Meeting and the advance voting will commence on 3 October 2022 at 10:00 a.m. (EEST). Further information and instructions on the advance voting
11 November
4. Advance voting
are described below in Section C.
C. Instructions for the participants of the General Meeting
2022 at the latest. For the nominee-registered shares, this constitutes due registration for the General Meeting.
The Company will arrange an opportunity to follow the meeting online via a webcast. Detailed instructions on following the webcast will be available on the Company’s website


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/investors/annual-general-meeting



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/media/media-room/subscribe-press-and-stock-exchange-releases



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/reports-and-presentations/fortum-annual-review-2021
Fortum's annual reporting entity in 2021 includes CEO's Business Review, Financials (including the Financial Statements and Operating and Financial Review), Governance, Remuneration, Tax Footprint and Sustainability.
over
CEO's Business Review
Fortum Annual Review 2021 | Fortum
ESEF Financial Statements (zip)
(2020: 2.05)
cooperation
Financial performance 2021
Leverage ratio 0.2
total consideration from divestments
EUR 0.83
Financial Statements and Operating and Financial Review
Highlights 2021
clearly below
stepped up
Financial net debt/comparable EBITDA
Watch video
"In the turbulent operating environment in 2021, we kept our strategic priorities clear and held our course. We successfully continued the implementation of our strategy with active portfolio rotation and accelerated decarbonisation, and produced another great set of operative results. 2021 was also the year in which Fortum and Uniper grew closer together." Read more in
Strengthening the balance sheet:
(2020: 1,344)
(2020: 2.9)
EUR 4 billion
Fortum Annual Review 2021
EUR 2,536 million
Download the reports
Financials 2021
Read more in
the target of <2 times


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild/remaint-nuclear
ReMaint® Nuclear Criticality Classification is delivered as a service where we together with NPP organization classify plant equipment with our classification methodology. Criticality criteria applied in classification is derived from NPP organization’s needs and priorities.
Load factor of LO1 in 2019
Maintenance Key Performance Indicators (KPIs) are the drivers for improving maintenance effectiveness and efficiency. It is important to select the correct set of KPIs to be able to monitor that the maintenance optimization takes the nuclear power plant performance to the right direction and to facilitate continuous improvement of maintenance performance
ReMaint® Nuclear Outage is a management model and toolset for optimizing outage activities. We first perform a pre-study using ReMaint®Outage concept as one reference point to identify areas with the highest improvement potential to increase NPP performance. The pre-study would also reveal possible constraints for adopting elements of the ReMaint® Nuclear Outage. Based on the pre-study, we propose the most beneficial ReMaint® Outage delivery scope.
Outage
Criticality classification
Outage optimization
93,0%
ReMaint® Nuclear - Optimize Nuclear Power Plant Performance | Fortum
Maintenance optimization on a nuclear power plant is based on data. Collecting the right data and managing it properly are critical enablers for maintenance optimization and continuous improvement of maintenance programs. Enterprise Asset Management Software (EAMS) is the "must" tool for managing nuclear power plant maintenance and accumulating the data for maintenance optimization.
Advanced methodologies define maintenance strategies and support resource allocation to achieve proactive and optimised maintenance.
ReMaint® Nuclear is a modular maintenance optimisation toolkit for improving the performance of nuclear power plants.
aRCM
RCM-analysis produces optimized maintenance programs which give the highest improvement on plant performance with acceptable risk level. Traditional RCM-analysis can be a laborious exercise. To save our customer’s time and money, ReMaint Nuclear aRCM uses three different methods in RCM-analysis : Lite RCM, Streamlined RCM and Full-scope RCM
With ReMaint® Nuclear Outage tool we optimize outage activities by identification of areas with the highest improvement potential to increase NPP performance.
Maintenance optimization is based on criticality classification. Fortum's proprietary ReMaint® Nuclear Criticality Classification methodology (patent pending) classifies nuclear power plant systems, structures, and components (SSCs) according to their impact on plant performance and enables selection of the most profitable maintenance strategy for each SSC. It optimizes the "big picture" of nuclear power plant maintenance by re-allocating maintenance resources from non-critical SSCs to those having the biggest impact on plant performance.
Concept supports to fulfil constantly tightening demands to ensure reliable, safe and profitable operation of a nuclear power plant.
Equipment reliability management
91,8%
KPI
Removing preventive maintenance tasks from “run-to-failure” class equipment can shorten outages
nuclear
Logical steps to improved maintenance and availability
14,9
Load factor of LO2 in 2019
Resource allocation
Management Model
Shortest annual outage in days at the Loviisa NPP
Our core operation and mainte­nance capability areas:
EAMS
Optimization of nuclear power plant maintenance can lead to huge improvements in plant performance. By using ReMaint® Nuclear Loviisa NPP has achieved world-class performance in terms of load factor, maintenance costs and outage duration.
Maintenance management data system (CMMS)
Benefits:
Maintenance management optimization
ReMaint® Nuclear consist of a set of easy-to-adopt tools each having a unique contribution to nuclear plant performance.
See how the ReMaint® concepts can help with optimizing maintenance and outages
ReMaint® Nuclear
NPP unavailability during operation decreases by identifying equipment whose failures cause production losses and by creating & implementing maintenance programs to prevent the failures (especially "Single Point of Vulnerability" equipment get optimized mitigation plans).


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/supplier-registration
New suppliers need an invitation from Fortum for registration. Registration is free of charge.
Supplier registration | Fortum
We use SAP Ariba to qualify our suppliers and to facilitate tender projects. SAP Ariba provides an online portal through which purchasers and suppliers can collaborate and exchange information related to the qualification process and tender participation. Suppliers get an invitation to participate in Ariba tender unless it's a public contract notice. Supplier registration to Ariba Network is required.
Instructions for how to register as a supplier in SAP Ariba
If you have challenges registering, please contact
Online tendering
To participate in our eSourcing tenders, you need to register your company to SAP Ariba Network.
SAP Ariba Supplier Support
Instructions for how to respond to RFP/RFI in SAP Ariba


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/18861
fortum_s-general-terms-and-conditions-july-2020.pdf
Fortum's general terms and conditions for procurement of products and services | Fortum
25 June 2018, 14:06


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/26888
fortumsgeneral_ehs_requirements | Fortum
app_1_general_ehs_requirements_for_contractors.pdf
04 March 2021, 13:55


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/invoice-us
e-invoice
Invoice us | Fortum
e-invoicing requirements
Invoicing addresses for our companies
Norway +46 8 671 80 00
If you have any questions please contact our Financial and Operational Procurement Services
Company No.
129 results found
By phone
We require electronic invoices from our suppliers. An electronic invoice ("e-invoices") needs to have the same contents as a paper invoice. It consists of invoice data fields in an XML file and invoice image, e.g. in a PDF file. An e-invoice can be received directly to our purchase invoice handling system in electronic format, which ensures a cost-efficient invoice handling process, accurate and timely payments for suppliers, and a smaller carbon footprint.
9849
Sweden +46 8 671 80 00
Our operator (Basware)
Contact Basware
887
342
By e-mail
9830
Our options to you how to send e-invoices to us
Switzerland
How to get started with e-invoicing?
Borgvik Vindkraft AB
Our companies prefer e-invoices. Please ensure that you have an order number and/or buyer reference in your e-invoice data otherwise, we cannot accept your invoice. All attachments need to be sent with the invoice.
Finland +358 10 45 593 00
e-invoices
Denmark +46 8 671 80 00
Brändskogen Vindkraft Ab Oy
9774


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/invoice-us/fortum-vindkraft-sverige-1-ab
559313-7440
Purchase invoices (9830)
Business ID
Borgvik Vindkraft AB | Fortum
e-Invoice operator
e-Invoice address
SE559313744001
PDF invoices
Fortum.SE9830
107 76 Stockholm
E-invoices
Paper invoices
000755931374409830
GLN number
bscs.basware.com
VAT number
BAWCFI22
5593137440
FE 293


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/invoice-us/blasjon-nat-ab
Fortum.SE887
Purchase invoices (887)
Blåsjön Nät AB | Fortum
0007556061917201887
5560619172
FE 202
556061-9172
SE556061917201


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/invoice-us/how-get-started-e-invoicing
for testing purposes, by typing “TEST” somewhere to the invoice free text fields
STEP 5. Start sending e-invoices
Delivery date and time of the invoice
After reviewing the information about your first test e-invoice, we are ensuring that all required data required has been received for the automatic handling of the invoice. You will receive a confirmation by e-mail in 2-4 days
Once the test invoices have been approved by us, you can start sending production invoices.
STEP 1. Contact your e-invoicing service provider
Total amount of the invoice
e-Invoice address of the recipient
STEP 2. Create a test invoice
Contract number
Fortum companies want to ensure the e-invoice quality. The following instructions are for sending e-invoices with a service providing partner (operator)
Order number
Reference person (email address if possible)
Generate a test invoice according to the content requirements explained in e-invoicing requirements
The message should include the following information:
Name of the sender
STEP 3. Submit the test invoice
Invoice number
. In order to automate invoice handling, it is important that you include on your test invoice all the fields that have been marked as mandatory. It is highly recommended that you mention in both header and line level data that the invoice is just
First e-invoice to us | Fortum
Name of the recipient
https://www.basware.com/en-en/solutions/basware-network/network-interoperability/
If you are already cooperating with an e-invoicing service provider, please contact the service provider and ask them to ensure that they are connected to Basware.
https://www.fortum.com/e-invoicing-requirements
STEP 4. Receive the  feedback
. Add also text “TEST” to invoice image if possible.
Send the test invoice to your e-invoicing service provider, and request them to forward it to Basware. Basware’s Business Transactions service verifies and converts the invoice according to the Fortum’s requirements, and forwards it to Fortum. Right after you have sent the test invoice, please send email with below information to


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers-are-important-part-our-successful-business/invoice-us/e-invoicing-requirements
//
cac:InvoiceLine
/INVOICE/HEADER/NOTE_NUMBER
cac:OrderReference /cbc:ID
VAT registration number
DeliveryNoteIdentifier
Invoice/
com:BuyerParty
Mandatory fields are marked with asterisk (*)
Taxation information
cac:OrderReference/cbc:ID
AdditionalDocumentReference
As regards to work performed in Sweden, mandatory to provide the foreign supplier’s/company’s tax identification number (F-tax by the Swedish Tax Agency). If no number is provided, 30% preliminary tax on the invoice amount that relates to work is withhold. More information is found from
Our delivery address
com:Note
INVOICE/RECEIVER/CUSTOMER_INFORMATION/CONTACT_INFORMATION/CONTACT_PERSON
–
com:BuyersOrderID
Supplier organization number *
Invoice number *
Invoice cash discount due date
Payment term
e-invoicing requirements | Fortum
cac:
TEAPPS
Supplier address *
OrderIdentifier
[@
Invoice amount excluding VAT *
cac:Contact
(often starting with MX, PX or PM)
Finvoice
cac:DocumentReference
VAT amount *
/Invoice/
INVOICE/HEADER/ORDER_INFORMATION/ORDER_NUMBER
//cac:AccountingCustomerParty/cac:Party/cac:Contact/cbc:Name
Fortum reference person´s email*
For Suppliers - Invoice us
EHF
cac:ContractDocumentReference/cbc:ID
Fields
Organization number, Y-tunnus, Business ID
Fortum Purchase Order number
Mandatory if we have provided Contract number
cac:Party
Supplier name *
cac:DespatchLineReference
com:SellersOrderID
Order number *
cac:BuyerParty
Supplier e-mail address
AccountingCustomerParty/cac:Party/cac:Contact/cbc:Name
Supplier e-invoicing address *
TEAPPS /
Comments
/
identificationSchemeID
According to payment term agreed in contract
Delivery note
AgreementIdentifier
Invoice date *
cbc:Name
com:Name
Invoice cash discount amount
OIOXML
com:ReferencedOrder
Supplier bank account number *
="ORDER"]
Download the e-invoicing requirements here
Currency
Svefaktura
com:BuyerContact
Our entity´s name *
OIOUBL
Delivery Note
BuyerContactPersonName
Our invoicing address *
DeliveryDetails
InvoiceDetails
Supplier VAT registration number *
Invoice due date *
INVOICE/HEADER/CONTRACT_INFORMATION/CONTRACT_NUMBER
Invoice amount including VAT *
For EU purchases, invoice should contain a statement of VAT compliance - reverse charge. For domestic purchases there has to be stated why the invoice is not subject to VAT.
cac:ID
Supplier bank name *
The table below shows the data fields which must be included in your e-invoices (in both XML data and invoice image)
Reference person
e-invoice XML Standards


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/invoice-us/brandskogen-vindkraft-ab-oy
PL 9855
Fortum.FI9774
Purchase invoices (9774)
3179274-1
00026 BASWARE
Brändskogen Vindkraft Ab Oy | Fortum
0037317927419774
FI31792741


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers-are-important-part-our-successful-business/invoice-us/our-options-you-how-send-e-invoices-us
The user-friendly Basware Portal is a good alternative for issuing, sending and following-up of invoices. You can send e-invoices to all other companies which provide this tool for their suppliers. You can search the sent invoices and save or print the invoice image in Basware Portal. More information about portal:
Integrated solution by Basware
https://portal.basware.com/info/spmigration
Options to send e-invoices | Fortum
If you send more than 500 invoices per month, option for you is to send the invoices directly from your invoicing system. It is possible with the help of Basware e-invoicing solution or any other e-invoice service provider. The same solution can be used for sending e-invoices to all other customers which can receive e-i
You already have an agreement with an e-invoice operator. Ask your operator to route the e-invoices to us through Basware e-invoice service (Basware's operator ID is BAWCFI22). Basware has agreements with several e-invoice operators:
nvoices
Using XML or corresponding e-invoice file formats (e.g. TEAPPS, FINVOICE, SVEFAKTURA, OIO XML) provides fastest way to build up connection straight from invoicing system.
If you send less than a 100 invoices per year we are providing you the free solution to send e-invoices through a Basware Portal. You can start sending e-invoices to our companies/units by registering in the Basware Portal.
https://www.basware.com/en-us/solutions/basware-network/basware-partner-networks/
https://portal.basware.com
Send e-invoices through an operator or a bank
e-invoices through Basware Portal
and Online instructions from


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/invoice-us/ekopartnerit-turku-oy
FI15686017
PL 930
1568601-7
003715686017342
Fortum.FI342
Ekopartnerit Turku Oy | Fortum
Purchase invoices (342)


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/suppliers/invoice-us/barry-danmark-aps
DK38998099
+++70725+++
Purchase invoices (9849)
Fortum.DK9849
38998099
Barry Danmark ApS | Fortum
7996 Fakturaservice
DK389980999849


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/research-and-innovations
Digitalization in Nuclear
Research and innovations for a cleaner world | Fortum
World's oldest and newest energy storage side by side
Fortum is partnering with research institutions and companies from other sectors to investigate utilization of Power2X, were large scale electrolysis can be used to produce clean hydrogen for multi-sector use.
Read more about NURES
NURES
NURES is an innovation used to clean radioactive liquids and in this way to minimize the amount of radioactive waste. NURES was first developed to be used in Fortum's Loviisa nuclear power plant. So far NURES products have had some 50 to 60 customers worldwide, mostly nuclear power plants. We continue to develop the product further.
We want to drive the transformation towards a low-emissions energy system and optimal resource efficiency. Our mission is to engage our customers and society to drive the change towards a cleaner world. Our role is to accelerate this change by reshaping the energy system improving resource efficiency and providing smart solutions. This way we can deliver excellent shareholder value.
In 2017 the Nordic countries' biggest lithium-ion battery storage was installed in conjunction with Fortum's biomass-fired biopower plant in Järvenpää. Electricity production forms that are condition-dependent, such as wind and solar energy, will require more flexibility from the electricity grid in the future. In addition to hydropower, also electricity storage brings flexible regulating power to the electricity system. The flexibility brought by a battery storage enables growth in the use of renewable energy sources.
Power2X
Read more about Power2X
Rapid development of digitalization boosts efficiency of power plant maintenance, engineering and personnel training. Our goal is to better utilize the opportunities, new technologies and internal innovations presented by digitalization. The rapid development of digitalization also enables improvement to power plant operating and maintenance processes.
Together with our partners, Fortum Bio2X is transforming biomass, particularly bamboo and straw, into sustainable high-value products that can replace fossil-based and other environmentally harmful materials in numerous end products.
Read more about Bio2X
Read more about digitalization in Nuclear
Research and innovations
ForEnergy blog:
The purpose of our research and development (R&D) is to improve Fortum's competitiveness and to create a basis for a new profitable business. Each new development activity is assessed against the criteria of emission reduction and resource efficiency. Fortum's main research and innovation activities cover technologies for the current energy system as well as technologies and solutions required for the future solar economy.  The ultimate goal is to produce energy in the most efficient way and bring environmentally friendly solutions for our end customers.
Energy storage
Bio2X


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/biobased-solutions/bio2x
Close collaboration with industry players, technology providers and research institutes has already proven the usability of our raw materials in several applications.
Bio2X: high-value products from biomass
In comparison to conventional material options, these biobased raw materials can significantly improve the sustainability of the end applications.
The impacts of 2G biorefining reach beyond producing new materials to the markets. Switching to lignocellulosic feedstock brings possibilities to improve environmental sustainability and local livelihoods at different steps of the value chain.
The biorefinery concept has been proven on a pilot scale at the Chempolis pilot plant in Finland. The pilot plant provides samples for customer testing in different target applications.
Get to know how our biorefineries can create positive impacts across the value chains.
Read more about our products
Bio2X: high-value products from biomass | Fortum
The purpose of Bio2X is to support this transition. We have developed a new kind of biorefinery concept where underutilized biomasses are given a second life as high-value raw materials for a wide range of industries.
Bio2X – High-value products from biomass
With our strong R&D network, we are capable of meeting both current and emerging demands for innovative applications.
Materials from biomass – the bioeconomy offers solutions for the global sustainability problem
We are currently moving towards a commercial scale with two biorefinery projects, one in India and one in Europe.
12 results found
What makes us unique
Biobased Solutions
Raw materials
What are our impacts
The core of the Bio2X biorefinery concept is the formico® organosolv fractionation technology developed by Chempolis.
heli
Our innovative product portfolio consists of raw materials valorized from lignocellulosic biomass: cellulose pulp, lignin, and biochemicals.
The lignocellulosic biomass is sourced locally near the biorefineries from sustainably available sources including residual straws and bamboo.
Technology
We want to become the leading producer of non-wood bio-based raw materials. Our approach is unique due to the combination of non-wood feedstock, organosolv fractionation technology, and highly collaborative ways of working with industries and R&D institutes.
Biorefinery projects and facilities
Deeper collaboration of Chempolis and Fortum Bio2X aims for commercialisation
Today, industrial production is in a significant transition. Industries everywhere are shifting away from fossil-based, linear production towards renewable materials and circular economy. The leading product manufacturers are reinventing their businesses, looking for sustainable alternatives that are based on renewable feedstocks.
What we do
Vice President, Biobased Solutions
Straw-based textile fibre by Fortum Bio2X debuts in an international fashion event
Lignin, cellulose and hemicellulose are separated with high yield and purity, enabling their usage for various applications.
With organosolv fractionation technology, the biomass is converted into high-quality biomaterials with high material efficiency and low environmental footprint.
Fortum and Metsä Group to launch a joint EUR 50 million R&D programme in circular bioeconomy
Our impacts
Fortum Bio2X and LigniOx consortium aim to commercialize concrete superplasticizers based on lignin
Read more about our facilities
See our case example
antila
The second generation (2G) biorefineries utilize lignocellulosic feedstocks as raw material. The 2G biorefineries of Bio2X enable the conversion of non-wood lignocellulosic feedstocks – straw and bamboo – into novel, high-value raw materials for a wide range of industries.
A new collection using Bio2™Textile fibre showcases more sustainable textile dyeing


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/biobased-solutions/bio2x/collaboration
Collaboration between Bio2X, technology providers, industrial manufacturers and customers has already proven the usability of Bio2X raw materials in multiple applications. The raw materials can be used in established manufacturing processes, sometimes even as drop-in solutions.
At the same time, novel innovative applications and emerging technologies are constantly being studied and developed to fulfil the growing demand for biomaterials. Our active collaboration with development laboratories, universities and research institutes helps in commercializing the best ideas faster.
Stronger together | Fortum
ExpandFibre
Learn more about ExpandFibre
Bio2X works closely with its partner network. As bio-based value chains are long, cross-disciplinary skills and capabilities are of high importance. Finding the winning overall concept requires finding the right partners to turn ideas into reality.
Currently our biggest R&D project is ExpandFibre – an R&D collaboration, led by Fortum and Metsä Group, with a vibrant ecosystem of industrial and academic members.
Stronger together


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/06/new-collection-using-bio2textile-fibre-showcases-more-sustainable-textile-dyeing
Finland is a forerunner for many new materials and is home to several fibre innovations that help the global textile industry become more sustainable. With the Bio2X project, Fortum aims to use agricultural residues to develop high-value and material-efficient products that can replace fossil and otherwise environmentally harmful raw materials.
premiering earlier this year
”Finland ́s nature and countryside are full of magic during midsummer. Finnish pagan beliefs were strongly related to nature and farming, there were simple and practical solutions for everything. I believe that many of the answers for our current problems are right in front of our eyes, in the nature that surrounds us”, says Ekroth. “Bio2™Textile is very easy to dye and it needs less chemicals and water in the dyeing process than normal viscose and cotton fabrics.“
FORTUM OYJ
Heli Antila, Vice President Biobased Solutions, Fortum Bio2X,
Bio2™Textile
COMMUNICATIONS
After
For the SS22 collection, Rolf Ekroth was inspired by Juhannus, the Finnish Midsummer and the traditions and magic surrounding it. He also continues to study Nordic farming culture and the iconic photographer, Leo Montonen, who’s images of the Finnish countryside during the 1920’s and 1930’s will be a prominent feature in the upcoming video for the new collection, launched at Pitti Uomo 100.
The raw material used in Bio2™Textile is straw - an agro-residue that is typically discarded or even burned. Replacing fossil-based raw materials with this residue reduces land degradation and deforestation. Bio2™ applies a unique Chempolis technology that achieves material efficiency of up to 90%, minimizing the amount of waste and the environmental impact from CO² emissions, water consumption and use of chemicals.
, an award-winning Finnish designer. The fashion collection will be presented during 30 June - 2 July in Pitti Uomo 100, one of the most significant fashion weeks for men. Bio2™Textile is one of the key elements in Ekroth’s collection.
The production and use of conventional textile fibres, such as polyester and cotton, is unsustainable in terms of water and chemical use, as well as emissions. Bio2™Textile fiber combines agro-residue-based raw material with environmentally friendly fiber technology and offers a sustainable, high quality, renewable and recyclable textile fiber that has never been seen before. The fiber for this collection is created using Infinited Fiber Company’s technology.
Rolf Ekroth, who studied social work and became a professional poker player before finding an interest in fashion in his late 20s, was one of the finalists at Hyeres Festival in 2016. Prior to this, he won the 2015 Designer’s Nest Award, which showcases and supports innovative Nordic fashion graduates. Ekroth started his own label in 2019.
Rolf Ekroth
Photo courtesy of Visual Tales
, Bio2™Textile, the straw-based textile fibre developed by Fortum Bio2X, will be demonstrated again in the new collection by
A new collection using Bio2™Textile fibre showcases more sustainable textile dyeing | Fortum
FORTUM OYJ ONLINE NEWS 24.6.2021


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/02/straw-based-textile-fibre-fortum-bio2x-debuts-international-fashion-event
Finland is a forerunner for many new materials and is home to several fibre innovations that help the global textile industry become more sustainable. With this pilot project, Fortum aims to use agricultural residues to develop high-value and material-efficient products that can replace fossil and otherwise environmentally harmful raw materials. The fibre was made by applying the fractionation technology developed by Chempolis and the resulting fabric feels much like cotton.
The raw material used in Bio2™Textile fibre is straw – an agro-residue that is typically discarded or even burned. Replacing fossil-based raw materials with straw residue reduces land degradation and deforestation. Cellulose for the textile fibres is extracted applying a unique technology that achieves material efficiency of up to 90%, minimizing the amount of waste and the environmental impact from CO² emissions, water consumption and use of chemicals. Bio2™Textile fibre combines agro-residue-based raw material with environmentally friendly fibre technology and offers a sustainable, high quality, renewable and recyclable textile fibre that has never been seen before.
A fashion collection made of Bio2™Textile, the straw-based textile fibre developed by Fortum Bio2X, will premiere in the online event of one of the most significant fashion weeks for men, Pitti Uomo. The collection was designed by an award-winning Finnish designer
“The fabric made of Bio2™Textile is amazing, it looks good and feels comfortable. It is an honor to be the first designer in the world to use it,” says Ekroth. “Finnish fibre innovations will contribute to the fashion industry becoming more responsible and environmentally friendly.”
The collection will be presented in the online event Pitti Uomo Connect on Monday, 1 March, 2021.
Straw-based textile fibre by Fortum Bio2X debuts in an international fashion event | Fortum
Ekroth's new AW21 collection is inspired by 80's horror films, Finnish agricultural traditions and the related old customs and beliefs. Straw and farming traditions are present in the collection in several ways. Ekroth has used Bio2™Textile for example in T-shirts, hoodies, skirts and capes. The straw theme is also apparent in the collection’s camouflage prints that are based on Finnish field landscapes and straw mobiles (‘himmeli’) made by local pagans.
Watch the video here


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/biobased-solutions/bio2x/products-and-solutions
Tissue
Acetic acid
Straw-based paper grade pulp fits especially for:
Resins, polymers
Read more about biochemicals
Cellulose pulp
Read more about cellulose pulp
Straw-based dissolving pulp fits especially for:
Lignin
Bio2X lignin is an ideal substitute for fossil-based raw materials, such as phenol or polyols in resins and adhesives. It can also be used as an additive in polymers.
Bioethanol
Paper grade pulp
Cellulose derivatives
Dissolving pulp
Solvents
Paints and coatings
With the planned biorefinery in Central Europe, Bio2X will be the world's first straw-based dissolving pulp producer on a commercial scale. The organosolv cooking method yields highly pure dissolving pulp, the properties of which can be adjusted depending on the customer needs.
Specialty fibers
Biochemicals
Molded fiber products
Agrochemicals
Fine and specialty chemicals
Man-made cellulosic fibers, e.g., textiles and nonwovens
Read more about lignin
Furfural
Board
The hemicellulose fraction is processed further into furfural. This process also produces acetic acid. Ethanol is produced from the cellulose fraction in the Indian biorefinery.
Furfural is a biochemical with a bright future as a replacement for many chemicals that are currently fossil-based. Furfural and its derivatives, such as furfuryl alcohol, can be used in a variety of industrial and fine chemical applications:
Acetic acid has applications as a base chemical in the food, pharmaceutical, chemical, homecare, cosmetics and textile industry.
Specialty papers
Flavoring agents
Bioethanol is the main product in the Indian biorefinery. The cellulose fraction of bamboo feedstock is processed into ethanol, serving the sustainability targets for fuels in India.
The Bio2X product portfolio consists of non-wood cellulose pulp (paper grade, dissolving grade), sulfur-free organosolv lignin, and biochemicals (furfural, acetic acid, ethanol).
Composites
Bio2X straw-based lignin is of high purity, non-toxic and essentially free of smell, thanks to the organosolv production process where no sulfur is used. The mild conditions of the organosolv process yield lignin that retains many of its natural biopolymer properties. A reduced particle size and an adjustable pH value ensure advanced processability and enable further end-use applications.
The organosolv cooking method separates cellulose from other fractions into high-quality pulp that is further modified into paper-grade and dissolving pulp. The low environmental impact combined with its agricultural origin makes straw pulp an ideal product to highlight sustainability and to improve brand image.
Bio2X’s bleached paper grade pulp is easy to refine and has attractive brightness. Thanks to the organosolv cooking method, our pulp has a short fiber length. The bleaching method is Totally Chlorine Free (TCF).
Products and solutions | Fortum
Products and solutions


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/06/fortum-and-metsa-group-launch-joint-eur-50-million-rd-programme-circular-bioeconomy
For further information, please contact:
18 June 2020, 13:00 EEST
Niklas von Weymarn
Sourcing and fractionation of straw
“We are excited to enter into this innovative partnership through ExpandFibre and are looking forward to mutually rewarding cooperation within the whole ecosystem. With this setup, Fortum will continue building on its pioneering bioproducts vision: bringing residual straw raw material into industrial processing and further into environmentally friendly materials and chemicals. Our aim is to develop high-value end-products from all the main components of straw – cellulose, hemicellulose and lignin,” explains
, Head of Bio2X Development at Fortum.
Packaging materials
is a forerunner in a sustainable bioeconomy utilising renewable wood from sustainably managed northern forests. Metsä Group focuses on wood supply and forest services, wood products, pulp, fresh fibre paperboards and tissue and greaseproof papers. In 2019, Metsä Group’s sales totalled EUR 5.5 billion, and it employs approximately 9,300 people. Metsäliitto Cooperative is the parent company of Metsä Group and is owned by approximately 103,000 Finnish forest owners. www.metsagroup.com
Already today, Finland is a leader in the circular bioeconomy. In addition to production and export of physical bioproducts, such as pulp, paper, board, and solid wood products, Finland is also known for having one of the highest standards in terms of biomass management, for its technology suppliers, and its education curriculum, as well as for its engineering and R&D services. ExpandFibre builds on this profound knowledge platform with a mission to provide selected markets with new, high-volume bioproducts that have a significantly lower carbon footprint compared to similar (but fossil-based) products available today.
“Metsä Group is firmly rooted in the sustainably managed Finnish forests. Finding new, added-value applications for pulp fibre obtained from our Northern wood is a key R&D target for the group. We are thrilled to partner up with Business Finland and Fortum in the ExpandFibre programme and we are very much looking forward to co-creating new technologies and concepts within the partnership and as part of the larger innovation ecosystem,” says
Risto Sormunen
Fortum and Metsä Group join forces with Business Finland to create a world-class R&D programme with pulp fibre from renewable and sustainable sources as its node. The 4-year joint R&D programme, called ExpandFibre, aims to develop ground-breaking technologies and smart business concepts that are required to convert straw and wood pulp fibre into novel bioproducts, such as textile fibres. The R&D programme has been granted EUR 20 million from Business Finland.
Find more information here:
The value chains of interest to the ExpandFibre programme are all based on renewable and sustainable raw materials, namely straw and Northern wood. Importantly, ExpandFibre is challenging other actors of related value chains to accelerate their efforts in building a world-leading innovation ecosystem together and, subsequently, enabling new bioproducts and green businesses to reach commercial maturity.
ExpandFibre is a unique collaboration scheme to be launched during the summer of 2020 and extending until August 2024. The programme focuses on seven research themes:
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 18 June 2020
is the Finnish government organization for innovation funding and trade, travel and investment promotion. Business Finland’s 600 experts work in 40 offices globally and in 16 regional offices around Finland. Business Finland is part of the Team Finland network. www.businessfinland.com
Biocomposites
Business Finland
ExpandFibre’s webpage
Risto Sormunen, Head of Bio2X Development, Fortum, tel. +358 50 453 4615
Niklas von Weymarn, CEO, Metsä Spring, tel. +358 40 547 6977
Metsä Group
Textiles
Hemicellulose
Juha Laine, SVP, Communications, Metsä Group, tel. +358 10 465 4541
, CEO of Metsä Group’s innovation company Metsä Spring.
Fortum and Metsä Group to launch a joint EUR 50 million R&D programme in circular bioeconomy | Fortum
Other new fibre products
ExpandFibre will be part of a global innovation ecosystem. The ExpandFibre partners Fortum and Metsä Group want to encourage the members of the ecosystem to significantly accelerate their efforts within the circular bioeconomy. Members of the ecosystem can apply for financing from Business Finland or from the EU.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/06/fortum-bio2x-and-ligniox-consortium-aim-commercialize-concrete-superplasticizers-based-lignin
https://ligniox.eu/
Hanne Wikberg
Fortum has provided straw-based lignin for the LigniOx project’s process development and application testing, which has demonstrated positive results. The consortium consists of several companies, ANDRITZ Oy, Dow, CIMV, Metsä Fibre, St1 and Vertech Group, as well as the research organizations VTT Technical Research Centre of Finland and VITO.
“Concrete is the most common material used in the construction industry. Plasticizers are needed to improve the workability of concrete. The current high-performance plasticizers on the market are mainly fossil-based, and there is a growing demand for new, sustainable alternatives that are also cost-competitive”, says
Watch the LigniOx video
, Development Manager of Fortum Bio2X.
https://www.bbi-europe.eu/projects/ligniox
Hanne Wikberg, Development Manager, Fortum Bio2X
As part of the LigniOx project consortium, Fortum Bio2X has committed to developing new, sustainable concrete superplasticizers that will be based on lignin. Lignin, the second most abundant biopolymer on earth, is currently under-utilized in commercial applications.
Fortum Bio2X and LigniOx consortium aim to commercialize concrete superplasticizers based on lignin | Fortum
The new biobased concrete plasticizers have already shown positive performance at laboratory scale. Product performance will also be demonstrated in industrial conditions by field tests. The goal is to verify that they can reach product requirements that are acceptable in the market and fulfil the construction industry’s needs. Commercialization for the technology is expected to start soon after October 2021 when the project ends. The LigniOx technology used in the project is based on VTT’s patent, and the project is funded by Bio-Based Industries Joint Undertaking and the EU.
Fortum’s Bio2X programme is part of Fortum’s strategy to build options for new businesses that improve resource efficiency. Bio2X focuses on fractionating non-edible agro biomass to high-quality cellulose, hemicellulose and lignin fractions that can replace current fossil-based and other unsustainable materials in various bioproducts.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/materials-biomass-bioeconomy-offers-solutions-global-sustainability-problem
The text has been adapted from the original
VP, Biobased Solutions
Cotton, in turn, is produced in a very unsustainable way, as it requires huge amounts of water and pesticides. Additionally, the production of oil-based textile fibres is on the rise, both in absolute and relative terms, and already today covers about two-thirds of all the textile fibres.
All biomass components must be used as resource efficiently as possible.
The drivers of today's bioeconomy are sustainability and a significantly higher degree of processing of not just wood, but a wide range of various biomasses. The bioeconomy has an important role in the journey towards carbon neutrality and reducing the need to use non-renewable resources.
Read more about the project on ExpandFibre’s website.
Fortum Bio2X
Biomass – whether wood, straw, grass or flowers – consists of three main components: cellulose, hemicellulose and lignin. Cellulose gives biomass its strength: the strength is evident when trying to pull apart a blade of grass lengthwise; it takes a surprising amount of force to do it. Hemicellulose gives biomass its flexibility: trees bend in the wind, but it takes a stronger storm to snap them. Lignin is the glue that holds everything together. Each of these components has its own role in the journey towards carbon neutrality.
Materials from biomass – the bioeconomy offers solutions for the global sustainability problem | Fortum
The production and consumption of renewable resources has a long tradition in Finland. Industrial use of wood marked the first steps of the bioeconomy some 500 years ago. Since then, the mechanical and chemical forest industry and the utilisation of wood raw material, e.g. for construction, consumer goods and heating, have been significant for the entire national economy.
The common thread in ExpandFibre is the textile value chain. The sector’s global sustainability challenges are known, and Finnish players have concrete solutions for them. There are multiple sustainable textile technologies and projects under development in Finland to broaden the raw material base from wood to agribiomass and recycled fibre.
What is biomass and what can be made from it?
Even though cellulose has been used for decades to manufacture paper, cardboard and hygiene products, significant new application areas have been found, e.g. in textiles, composites and in the pharmaceutical industry. In addition, the traditional areas of application are being further developed. Typical to all this is the replacement of fossil raw materials with renewables.
blog published on Business Finland’s website in Finnish on 13.7.2020
focuses primarily on grass-based raw materials, such as straw.
Hemicellulose is a rather new application area in the food, cosmetics, plastics and chemical industries, for example. Hemicellulose can be used to replace either fossil raw materials or food chain raw materials in hundreds or even thousands of applications.
Finland – a global trendsetter for a sustainable textile industry
23 September 2020, 11:11
Bioeconomy – a systemic solution to global problems
There is plenty of potential in the textile industry to disrupt the textile value chain, but, as usual, change isn’t likely to come from within the industry. In the ExpandFibre programmes, Metsä Group and Fortum are humbly building the future and inviting all companies, research facilities, universities and other actors to join forces to make the world more sustainable.
Metsä Group and Fortum have established collaboration programmes, called ExpandFibre, to develop the bioeconomy to the level it deserves in partnership with many other companies and research institutes. The primary raw materials are forest and straw biomasses. The programmes cover all fractions and the approach they follow in replacing nonrenewable, fossil and other unsustainable or food production raw materials is similar to eating an elephant: we can make the world more sustainable one bite at a time.
Today the bioeconomy covers much more. Its drivers are sustainability and a significantly higher degree of processing of various biomasses – not just wood. The bioeconomy, together with the circular economy, has an important role in the journey towards carbon neutrality and reducing the need to use non-renewable resources.
Biomass consists of three main components: cellulose, hemicellulose and lignine. They can be processed to new, bio-based end products.
+358 40 571 7188
Lignin has long been considered the most difficult component to utilise, however, the first commercial applications are already on the market and new ones are under development. There may be areas of application in the construction industry, asphalt or even batteries, in which it is replacing fossil raw materials.
At the moment, we squander tremendous amounts of biomasses. For example, in the Delhi region 50 million tonnes of paddy straw and other agricultural waste is burnt annually. Refining just this amount into textile fibre could replace over half of the global cotton production. The smoke emissions from the burning of agricultural waste every October-November has a health impact equivalent to a daily dose of smoking a couple packs of cigarettes.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/biobased-solutions/bio2x/impacts
Bamboo farmers:
will deliver the bamboo chips to the biorefinery at Numaligarh, Assam.
Bamboo supply chain to support local economic development in Assam, India
The bamboo supply chain is designed to benefit its stakeholders in direct and transparent manner, without the use of any intermediaries. This is enabled by a digital solution accessible with a smartphone application. Every bamboo delivery is carried out and recorded through this application, and accordingly, the payments are transferred directly to the supplier’s bank account.
The bamboo biorefinery in Assam will not only produce renewable ethanol for the Indian biofuel market, but also support socio-economic development in the region.
Local-level entrepreneurs
The bamboo will be sourced directly from ca. 20 000 small farmers, according to the demand schedule operated on the smartphone application.
The Assam biorefinery will utilize 300 dry kilotons of bamboo per year. The bamboo supply chain will be based on the activity of local small farmers and entrepreneurs. In total, the biorefinery has potential to provide sustainable livelihood for more than 25 000 rural households in the region of Northeastern India.
Harvesting and transporting
will run chipping units converting the bamboo stems into chips.
Read more about Assam biorefinery
Impacts
Bamboo supply chain to support local economic development in Assam, India | Fortum
will provide additional income for rural farmers and other households in the region. After harvesting, the bamboo is transported to the designated local-level entrepreneurs.
Transporters
Bamboo is a very fast growing plant and abundantly available in the region. It is a grass that grows profusely in many types of environments. After cutting a bamboo stem, it grows again with multiple new stems.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/06/deeper-collaboration-chempolis-and-fortum-bio2x-aims-commercialisation
risto
Risto Sormunen, Head of Bio2X Development, Fortum,
Fortum and
"Collaboration with Chempolis is key to the progress of Fortum's Bio2X development project. Our goal is to develop and bring to the markets with partners the most environmentally friendly products as possible using straw as a raw material. Chempolis' technology and know-how play a very important role in the efficient processing of straws", says
The long-term goal of the collaboration is to build several Fortum-owned biorefineries that are based on Chempolis's patented fractionation technology. With the agreement, extending until 2023, Chempolis will increase the sample production capacity at the Oulu plant by up to 20-fold.
, Head of Fortum's Bio2X Development.
, a technology company specialized in fractionation of biomass, have signed a collaboration agreement to perform test runs of straw-based cellulose, hemicellulose and lignin samples at Chempolis's test facility in Oulu, Finland. In addition, the agreement covers engineering work for commercial biorefinery projects.
"The collaboration agreement is one significant step in Chempolis' growth. In addition, the collaboration with a global EPC contractor, that began at the end of 2019, will enable Chempolis' technology-based biorefineries to be delivered to our customers on a turnkey basis. With strong growth, we are making significant investments, operational development and recruitment in all our operations", says
Tomi Honkala
Chempolis
, tel. +358 50 45 34 615
Deeper collaboration of Chempolis and Fortum Bio2X aims for commercialisation | Fortum
, CEO of Chempolis.
The previously announced collaboration to build the world's first biorefinery using bamboo as a raw material in Assam, Northeast India, continues as planned. The main equipment purchases of the biorefinery, built in the city of Numaligarh, have been made. Production is expected to start in 2022.
sormunen


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/biobased-solutions/bio2x/technology
Learn more about formico®
High feedstock flexibility with a focus on straw and bamboo
Low-temperature fractionation and high selectivity, enabling superior product quality
Fractionation technology
High material efficiency. Biomass is converted with superior yield into raw materials for chemical and material industries
Closed-loop process: the process chemicals are recovered and returned back to the production
The main benefits of formico®
The core of the Bio2X biorefinery concept is the formico® organosolv fractionation technology developed by Chempolis. Formico® is an enabling technology for valorizing agricultural residues. However, it also offers flexibility in utilizing many types of feedstock. Lignin, cellulose and hemicellulose are separated with high yield and purity, enabling their usage for various applications.
Fractionation technology | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/biobased-solutions/bio2x/biomass
Each fraction has a significant potential to replace fossil-based or otherwise unsustainable materials and products. Currently, only cellulose is widely utilized for higher value applications, while hemicellulose and lignin are typically burned for energy.
Today, consumers are increasingly aware of sustainability issues and industries are under pressure to improve their sustainability performance. There is a strong pull in the market for straw-based applications, which are still extremely rare. Bio2X’s biorefinery project Triticum, converting locally sourced straw into cellulose, lignin and biochemicals, will open the doors for straw-based applications.
Lignocellulosic biomass consists of three main fractions: cellulose, hemicellulose and lignin. Locally sourced straw and bamboo provide sustainable lignocellulosic feedstocks for Bio2X biorefineries.
Bamboo is an ideal feedstock for advanced bioethanol production due to its natural abundance in certain geographical locations, very rapid and perennial growth and low management requirements. Compared to other feedstocks, bamboo has a high cellulose and low lignin content, as well as low ash and moisture content, that enable a good conversion into ethanol.
Biomass as raw material
Agricultural straw – such as wheat, rye or rice straw – is abundantly available around the globe. After harvesting, straw is typically discarded or even burned. With biorefining, straw can instead be converted into high-value materials and chemicals with low environmental impact. The use of straw does not compete with food production, require additional land use or cause strain on biodiversity. It can also have a significant positive impact on air quality in areas where straw is currently mostly burned. Depending on the application, straw-based materials can be recyclable at their end of life.
Bamboo is extensively available in Northeastern India, the location of our
Cellulose brings strength to the plants, whereas hemicellulose creates flexibility for the plant to bend without breaking. Lignin works like a glue that provides structural support.
Fortum Bio2X applies an organosolv fractionation technology that can extract not only cellulose but also hemicellulose and lignin for high-value products.
first biorefinery
Bamboo is ideally suited for bioethanol production
Straw – a residue with enormous potential
Biomass as raw material | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2019/02/fortums-biorefinery-project-india-aims-convert-bamboo-biofuel
A global joint venture of Fortum, Indian state-owned oil refinery company Numaligarh Refinery Limited (NRL) and Chempolis, a Finnish biorefining technology company, had performed the ground-breaking ceremony for building and operating a bamboo based biorefinery in Assam, India.
As part of this venture, Fortum and Chempolis will invest in 50% equity stake, while Numaligarh Refinery Limited (NRL) holds majority 50%. The first of its kind biorefinery will be based on formico-technology developed by Chempolis. The key raw material of the biorefinery is bamboo. The main product bio-ethanol will be sold to NRL who will blend it to petrol. In addition, biorefinery produces other biochemical and biocoal. Biocoal will be used in CHP plant to produce heat and power to the biorefinery. Excess power will be sold to NRL's oil refinery where it will replace fossil electricity production.
Fortum's biorefinery project in India aims to convert bamboo into biofuel | Fortum
Fortum's biorefinery project in India aims to convert bamboo into biofuel
11 February 2019, 15:37 EET
investigates new business opportunities with fractioning-based technologies and end-products of the process. Fortum is currently testing several different fractioning methods. The company has also co-operation projects with different companies to test the end products of different methods. Refinery project is part of Fortum’s Bio2X research and development program.
Fortum’s Bio2X programme
FORTUM CORPORATION ONLINE NEWS 11 February 2019
The foundation stone for this ceremony was laid by the Prime Minister Shri Narendra Modi on Saturday, February 9, 2019. This ceremony validates Fortum’s long term commitment to support India’s sustainable goals. The construction of the refinery is expected to be completed by June 2021.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/biobased-solutions/bio2x/biorefinery-projects-and-facilities
A new biorefinery in Assam, India, is expected to start its production in 2023. This 2G biorefinery will utilize 300 kilotons of bamboo per year, producing bioethanol to Indian fuel markets, as well as furfural, acetic acid and biocoal. The bamboo is harvested locally, supported by a digitalized sourcing system that ensures direct and transparent payments to local farmers, chippers and transporters.
Our biorefinery projects and facilities
The biorefinery is a
joint venture
Our biorefinery projects and facilities | Fortum
The next step – a biorefinery in Europe
Our next step is to set up a 2G biorefinery in Europe that uses agricultural residue, namely straw, as feedstock. Straw will be converted into high-quality raw materials with the formico® biorefinery technology of Chempolis. The biorefinery will produce cellulose fibers, sulfur-free lignin, furfural and acetic acid on a kiloton scale. To enable material efficiency at its fullest, we also aim to valorize the various side streams from these conversion processes.
The first step
Chempolis pilot plant
The pilot-scale testing and development are done at Chempolis’ premises in Oulu, Finland. The operations of the pilot plant include feedstock pre-treatment and handling, as well as fractionation process piloting and optimization with different feedstocks. The downstream material development focuses on meeting the needs of specific target industries and their applications. The pilot plant allows scale-up up to hundreds and thousands of kilograms of output.
of the Indian oil refinery company Numaligarh Refinery Limited (NRL), Chempolis and Fortum. Being the first-of-a-kind commercial plant based on the Chempolis biorefining technology, it will prove the process capabilities at an industrial scale. This will pave the way towards optimized utilization of biomass for high-value materials and chemicals.
– a joint venture biorefinery in India


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/worlds-oldest-and-newest-energy-storage-side-side-hydropower-and-batteries
But what is this battery mania really about? Does Finland really need a cargo container full of cell phone batteries to be connected to the electricity network? And what will they actually be used for?
Hydropower is agile, but agility comes with a price. Fast changes at hydropower plants wear their mechanical parts, shortening their expected life-time. Big maintenance projects have had to be done at hydropower plants years earlier than expected due to the wear on the bearings and seals of the Kaplan turbine blades.
So then, why are batteries needed?
So do we need batteries for this? Yes and no.
Hydropower is agile, but agility comes with a price. This is where lithium-ion batteries come into the picture.
The big interest in energy storage, i.e. battery hype, has prevailed in energy markets for a long time. And there’s a really good reason for this hype: with the increase in the number of rooftop solar panels and windmills spinning in windy weather, the aim is to be able to store that renewable energy for later use when the sun is not shining and the wind is not blowing.
Hydropower also happens to be our best energy storage. Hydropower can solve both energy storage problems: water can be stored in lakes for hours, and, on the other hand, hydropower plants can quickly increase or decrease production, in under a minute. Despite its old age, hydropower can tranquilly store energy and, at the same time, can react very fast to the needed changes.
In the Nordic countries, lithium-ion batteries can give hydropower a break. By having batteries (instead of hydropower) perform the fast adjustment, the premature wear of the machinery is prevented, and hydropower’s flexibility is used for longer-term energy storage.
Hydropower is often the forgotten renewable energy form in the media hype, perhaps because of its long history – hydropower is one of the oldest energy production forms – and therefore it may be slightly boring alongside the media-sexy solar and wind power.
The Batcave, the biggest battery storage in the Nordic countries, will be taken into use on Wednesday, 1 March 2017, at Fortum’s Järvenpää power plant. The fast-reacting 2MW/1MWh lithium-ion battery will offer the electricity network fast, second- and minute-level flexibility in frequency regulation. The Batcave project was launched in April 2016 after a bidding round and was ready for deployment in February 2017.
Of the battery technologies, lithium-ion batteries have developed enough for commercial use: the price of lithium-ion batteries has dropped quickly in recent years, and it is believed that the price will continue to decrease as demand increases. Lithium-ion batteries can react in seconds, making them ideal for fast energy storages to support the growth of solar and wind energy in energy production.
World’s oldest and newest energy storage side by side: hydropower and batteries
The basics on the battery hype
Fortum Batcave PDF
There is a big hype on lithium-ion batteries; they are enjoying the media spotlight alongside other cool ideas, such as demand response and electric vehicles. Fortum too has joined in the Nordic battery game: Batcave, the biggest lithium-ion battery in the Nordic countries, will be taken into use on Wednesday, 1 March, at Fortum’s Järvenpää power plant.
The Batcave battery will be used alongside hydropower. The battery’s primary role is to provide fast adjustment; when its output capacity is reached, hydropower will be engaged to support it. The best end result will be achieved by optimising the use of the battery and hydropower together.
In addition to energy storages that store energy for hours, energy storages that are fast, reacting at the second- and minute-level, are also needed. Every day, the electricity network experiences sudden, unpredictable peaks in electricity consumption and production; at worst, these peaks can cause power outages and disruptions. The future may bring more potential electricity peaks and thus, even more, need for fast-reacting energy storages. When the sun suddenly emerges through cloud cover, a solar panel’s production shoots from zero to 100 per cent, and when hundreds of electric vehicles connect to charging stations at the same time, the balance between electricity production and consumption can sway dramatically in the electricity network.
27 February 2017, 12:44
So could Finnish know-how in the optimal use of batteries be exported to other parts of the world? A good way to start capturing global markets is to start learning. The Batcave battery is, above all, a learning project towards the future energy market and new opportunities.
This is where lithium-ion batteries come into the picture.
Batcave battery and future outlook
Hydropower: the wallflower of renewables
Roosa Nieminen
In terms of energy storage, things here in Finland are already relatively good: we have a lot of hydropower.
Fortum is also thinking beyond the Järvenpää Batcave. Growth in use of solar and wind energy in the energy markets is not limited only to Finland: batteries will be needed elsewhere in the world, too, especially in places where hydropower is not available.
Project Manager for Batcave
World’s oldest and newest energy storage side by side: hydropower and batteries | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/research-and-innovations/power2x
Large scale hydrogen production through electrolysis promises new possibilities for seasonal energy storage as well as easily utilized energy demand when intermittent energy production like solar and wind produce more power than is demanded. Excess production can, on a large scale, be utilizes in Power2X.
Fortum is partnering up with research institutions and other sectors to investigate utilization of Power2X, meaning using large scale electrolysis to produce clean hydrogen for multi-sector use. Hydrogen produced through Power2X technologies have the potential to become enablers for large scale flexibility and also work as a link between industrial sectors:
Hydrogen as an enabler for decarbonization of other sectors, like mining, energy intensive transport etc.
Depending on chosen technology the end product can be pure hydrogen, synthetic gas or liquid hydrogen based fuels, all with different potential use.
Combining hydrogen with carbon dioxide CO2 to produce petrochemical products.
Possibilities to provide demand response flexibility in the electricity system and other grid services
New storage possibilities to complement traditional storage technologies like pumped hydro, seasonal reservoirs, batteries and heat storages.
Evaluate business concepts on electrolysis, energy market improvements and new services for other sectors.
Fortum’s interest in Power2X technologies are multifold. Among the aspects we are exploring:
Power2X | Fortum
electricity, gas, transportation, heating, mining, steel, refineries and food tech/production.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/news-and-publications/press-kits/fortum-and-coal
At year-end 2021, Fortum Group’s (including Uniper) coal volume purchased via direct contract from Bettercoal suppliers was 67%.
Fortum and coal | Fortum
In Poland, coal is used at the Czestochowa combined heat and power plant and the heat only boiler plants, as well as at the new Zabrze combined heat and power plant and the heat only boiler plants. The Czestochowa plant also uses biofuels, and the new Zabrze plant uses refuse-derived fuel (RDF) and coal.
If a coal supplier committed to Bettercoal violates its commitments and fails to implement corrective measures within a reasonable time, Bettercoal can initiate measures to disassociate the supplier. In such case, the supplier forfeits its Bettercoal supplier status.
Bettercoal member companies, like Fortum are required to annually report on the use of coal and on how the Bettercoal supplier assessment process has been integrated in their coal procurements. Every member company must also annually define commitments to advance the Bettercoal principles and processes.
The majority of our energy production in Russia is based on natural gas, and the development focus is on boosting energy efficiency. In 2021, Fortum sold its coal-fired Argayash CHP plant. Following the decision to transition from coal to gas at the Chelyabinsk CHP-2 plant, the transaction will allow the Russia division to discontinue its use of coal by the end of 2022. On 12 May 2022, Fortum announced that we are preparing a controlled exit from the Russian market, with potential divestments of its Russian operations as the preferred path.
We take the environmental impacts of coal seriously. In addition to carbon emissions, the use of fuels also produces, e.g., sulphur dioxide, nitrogen oxide and particle emissions that impair air quality, and cause acidification of soil and water systems. Flue-gas emissions can be reduced effectively with various technology solutions and flue-gas cleaning technologies. All our power plants operate in compliance with environmental permit conditions.
Our strategy to drive the change for a cleaner world
Fortum’s coal use in Poland
In Inkoo, Finland, Fortum has dismantled the biggest coal-fired power plant in the Nordic countries
Bettercoal’s requirements are based on the Bettercoal Code, which covers good governance, human rights, social responsibility, and environmental issues, among other things. Bettercoal’s assessment programme includes the coal supplier’s Letter of Commitment, self assessment, and an independent assessment of mining operations.
Fortum’s coal use in Finland
Fortum will discontinue the use of coal at the Suomenoja CHP plant in Espoo in 2025. Fortum and the City of Espoo have together committed to developing Espoo’s district heating to be carbon-neutral in the 2020s in the
In Finland, Fortum is discontinuing the use of coal in Espoo-Kirkkonummi district heating area by 2025
In Finland, coal is used at the Suomenoja combined heat and power (CHP) plant and Meri-Pori power plant, and at Fortum’s co-owned Naantali CHP plant.
Fortum’s Russia division is announced to discontinue its use of coal by the end of 2022
Fortum uses hard coal and lignite in Russia, Poland, and Finland. In 2021, coal accounts for about 13% of our combined power generation, and it will decrease rapidly in the upcoming years. Coal use in Europe is gradually being phased out within the framework of national schedules.
The use of coal in energy production needs to be discontinued and we are working towards that. In sites where we still use coal, we do so efficiently and responsibly.
Respon­sible fuel procurement
Fortum’s power generation is mainly based on natural gas-fired generation, and carbon dioxide-free hydro and nuclear power. Fortum targets to reduce the share of coal use in power generation rapidly. Fortum is the third largest producer of carbon dioxide-free electricity in Europe.
Fortum’s coal use in Russia
Based on the assessment, a Continuous Improvement Plan (CIP) is made for suppliers; the realisation of the plan is monitored by Bettercoal regularly. A new assessment is done every five years. Additionally, the realisation of the improvement plan is monitored by country-specific working groups.
Further information about fuel use by country is available on
Fortum’s most significant coal suppliers in 2021 were SUEK, Maikuben-Komir, AB Energo, Polska Grupa Górnicza, and Węglokoks Kraj. Following Russia’s attack and the war in Ukraine, Fortum ceased coal purchases from Russia and looked for alternative sources.
Fortum requires that suppliers commit to a responsible way of operating. We use the Bettercoal initiative’s Code and tools in assessing the responsibility of the coal supply chain. Bettercoal is an independent organisation with the goal of continuous improvement of the coal supply chain.
project.
Reducing environmental impacts
Examples of the coal phase-out
Coal suppliers
Sustainability 2021 Report
Bettercoal has Russia and Colombia working groups, and Fortum participates in both of them. The working groups’ reports are published on the Bettercoal website. Bettercoal suspended the engagement with Russian coal suppliers and the Russia working group due to the Russian attack and war in Ukraine. The particular focus in Colombia is on strengthening the trust between the various stakeholders in coal-mining regions to support the peace process of the civil war that ended in the early 2000s, and to support the diversification of local livelihoods in a situation where the demand for coal is decreasing. The agenda of the working group also includes issues related to access to clean water for local communities.
We will gradually phase out coal in Europe


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/our-strategy-drive-change-cleaner-world
Nonetheless, I am very optimistic about our future. We are in an excellent position to capture the opportunities presented by the energy transition. The next five to ten years will be crucial – for the energy transition, for a cleaner world – and for Fortum. I look forward to working together with our customers, partners and the societies around us. But most of all, I am excited to work with all our employees across Fortum Group, in all our countries, to make this a success story.
Fit for the future
More about this topic
When I look back at everything we at Fortum have achieved during this extraordinary year, I can only be proud of our team. We have welcomed Uniper to the Fortum Group, as a strategic subsidiary and our fifth business segment. Together, we are now the third largest CO2-free power producer in Europe and a major gas company that will play a significant role in shaping the energy transition. And today
Fortum's President and CEO
This year has been one of great changes in the societies around us. The pandemic has profoundly impacted the way we run our everyday lives, how we work and interact with each other. What hasn’t changed, however, is our shared awareness of the need for a fast energy transition to mitigate climate change.
03 December 2020, 09:54
With the great range of expertise, experience and the work ethic we have among our colleagues at Fortum and at Uniper, we have a good starting point for the execution of our strategy. But being a driver of and a true leader in the energy transition in an increasingly uncertain world won’t be a walk in the park. There will be some tough choices and stiff competition at some point. We will all need to work hard to achieve our goals, and all need to be committed to the journey that lies ahead of us.
In line with the Paris Agreement, we are committed to becoming carbon neutral by 2050 at the latest – not an easy task, but something we all need to work hard towards. To measure our progress, we have decided to halve the carbon emissions in our European generation by 2030 and to transform these activities to carbon neutral latest by 2035. I am personally totally committed to these goals.
As we have said for years, coal-fired generation does not have a place in our portfolio in the long-term, and we are set to reduce the Group’s coal-fired generation capacity by more than 50% over the next five years. In Russia, we will also gradually transform our asset portfolio towards renewables, while over time reducing our fossil exposure.
Alongside the investments, we will also see some divestments. Active business portfolio management has been an integral part of both Fortum and Uniper in the past. It helps us to finance new investments in line with our strategy and to become more focused and stronger as a result of these changes.
Our strategy builds on our re-defined and sharpened purpose: We want to drive the change for a cleaner world. We are securing a fast and reliable transition to a carbon-neutral economy by providing customers and societies with clean energy and sustainable solutions. I see this as a critical role for Fortum to play. It comes with a lot of responsibility, helping to deliver a sustainable, reliable and affordable transition to carbon neutrality. At the same time, we want to remain an excellent employer for all colleagues and a good investment for our owners.
Read the stock exchange release
Determined steps forward
With our strategy laid out, it is now time roll up our sleeves and get to work. We will have a phased approach to the execution; securing our financial strength and performance while gradually increasing our growth investments, primarily in renewables and clean gas. Using the expertise of both companies, we aim to have a “one team approach” in strategic areas such as Nordic hydro and physical trading optimisation, solar and wind project development, and hydrogen.
Our core business areas will continue to be CO2-free power – hydro, nuclear, wind and solar - and gas. We will continue to strengthen our CO2-free power generation, and focus our growth on wind and solar power. By 2025, we plan to build up to 2 GW of new onshore wind and solar power generation capacity primarily in Europe. This is exciting news and in my view a very important step in expanding our renewables portfolio.
laid out our joint strategic roadmap for the coming years.
If anything, I believe the pandemic has brought us closer together and strengthened people’s determination to live more sustainably. National governments and the EU are targeting tighter emission reductions, recovery efforts are geared to support clean growth and advances in technology give further reason for optimism.
Working towards carbon neutrality in 2050
Priorities for success
Our strategy to drive the change for a cleaner world | Fortum
As Europe transitions away from coal, our leading gas business provides much-needed flexibility and stability to the power system, enabling fast growth in solar and wind power. Our role is also to provide reliable supplies of natural gas for heating, power and industrial processes across Europe, from individual households to large modern factories, who depend on these supplies every day of the year.
I am very excited to announce this new strategy. We have been working intensively with Uniper to align our strategies and detail cooperation opportunities, and I believe we are in an excellent position to push development further. I am especially pleased that as a major international energy group, we have now formalized our commitment to the Paris Agreement, by setting ambitious targets towards transforming our own operations to carbon neutral latest in 2050.
We also know that gas has to become clean overtime with significantly less, or no carbon emissions compared to today. That’s why we are placing so much emphasis in our strategy on contributing to the development of a hydrogen economy. Currently, in terms of energy, Europe uses roughly 70% more gas than electricity. For the society to become carbon neutral, most of the gas we use today will have to be replaced with hydrogen or other clean gases. This will not be an easy task for Europe. We are ready to contribute and will build on Uniper’s first-mover position in hydrogen.
Stock exchange release: Fortum's strategy update
I had the opportunity recently to virtually tour and meet with the team at Uniper’s Falkenhagen hydrogen plant in Germany. It offered a glimpse of our future with hydrogen that is really inspiring. Currently, we have over 500 MW of project prospects across Europe and want to be among the leaders in commercial clean gas applications, serving especially industrial and infrastructure customers with whom we have long-term relationships. We have plenty of expertise to offer them, not only in hydrogen but also with other sustainable solutions. By partnering with these customers, we can help them to reduce their environmental and carbon footprints.
, we have


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/12/fortum-cmd-strategy-update-new-financial-and-climate-targets-clear-path-carbon-neutrality-and-growing-dividend
FORTUM CORPORATION STOCK EXCHANGE RELEASE 3 DECEMBER 2020 AT 9.00 EET
Carbon neutral in European generation by 2035 at the latest (scope 1 and 2)
-free power generator, our long-term customer relationships, as well as our strong expertise in engineering, trading, risk management, and gas storage to develop and capture the opportunities in hydrogen as they become commercially available. We aim to have one dedicated team in hydrogen.
-free power generator and a large player in gas. As such, Fortum is now well-positioned to capture opportunities resulting from the energy transition, aimed at curbing climate change. To be successful, the energy transition must balance sustainability, affordability, and security of supply. It requires not only renewables, but also increasingly clean gas, energy storage, and other flexible solutions to provide security of supply and to decarbonise also industry, transportation, heating, and cooling.
emissions (scope 1 and 2) in European generation by at least 50% by 2030 (base year 2019)
Partner with industrial and infrastructure customers
With this strategy update, we are now laying out the path and targets for the whole Fortum Group, including Uniper as one of our segments. Since I took office as CEO this summer, we have worked closely with Uniper on the Group strategy and leveraging the unique cooperation opportunities. Building on the strengths of both companies, our future growth will be driven by CO
-free power generation growth includes target to build 1.5-2 GW of new onshore wind and solar power generation capacity by 2025.
2021 capital expenditure for the whole Fortum Group is estimated to be approximately EUR 1,400 million, including maintenance and excluding acquisitions.
Fortum has updated its financial targets and dividend policy. Fortum continues to be committed to maintaining a rating of at least BBB. The long-term financial targets are:
Fortum has today decided to initiate a strategic review, including possible divestment, of its Consumer Solutions’ business.
On Tuesday this week, Uniper announced the end of commercial operations at the 0.9-GW Heyden power plant already at the end of 2020, 5 years earlier than previously announced. This is a significant step in the execution of Uniper’s ambitious coal-exit plans and it alone corresponds to an 8% reduction in the Fortum Group’s coal-fired capacity.
The link to the live webcast for the event is published on Fortum's CMD 2020 website at:
Transform own operations to carbon neutral
In line with its strategy and continued review of the business portfolio, Fortum has decided to assess strategic options, including possible divestment, of its Consumer Solutions business. Based on initial assessments, this business has been identified as operations that could provide higher growth and value potential with an alternative ownership structure.
Capital Markets Day
Carbon neutral, in line with the goals of the Paris Agreement, by 2050 at the latest (scope 1, 2, and 3 emissions)
Transforming our own operations to carbon neutrality is a long-standing priority for Fortum. To accelerate the development, we have committed to the following ambitious climate and environmental targets:
-free power generation
Leverage strong position in gas to enable the energy transition
Gas plays a vital role in many areas outside the power market, and we will also continue to focus on the reliable supply of gas for heating and industrial processes. Our aim is to continue to optimise our gas supply and storage and grow our share of contracted sales to wholesale and industrial customers. In the longer term, natural gas usage will transition towards clean hydrogen and synthetic gases. Our strong position in the gas value chain and CO
“
Through Uniper, Fortum is now also a major player in gas with its benchmark gas-fired power generation and gas midstream business, which provides gas for heating and various industrial needs. As Europe transitions away from coal, our gas assets provide much-needed flexibility to the power system, enabling fast growth in solar and wind power. Our aim is to decarbonise our gas-fired power generation through conversion to clean gases over time.
In parallel with the strategy alignment, Fortum and Uniper have together identified cooperation benefits with a positive cash impact on a consolidated Group basis of approximately EUR 100 million annually. More than EUR 50 million of these annual benefits are estimated to be achieved by the end of 2023, with a full effect of approximately EUR 100 million annually in 2025. Through this cooperation, we will be able to create value for both companies and their shareholders.
-free power generation creates good pre-requisites for us to succeed in providing clean hydrogen solutions in the future.
-free power generation and clean gas, sustainably transforming our own operations to become carbon neutral and engaging customers and society to decarbonise,
During 2021, Fortum will develop a target for the reduction of scope 3 emissions addressing the indirect emissions from our fuel sales business (category 11).
”
Germany +49 (0) 30 3001 90612
When prompted by the moderator, please reference this event name: “Fortum Group Strategy Update – Media Call”
Fortum CMD: strategy update – new financial and climate targets with a clear path to carbon neutrality and a growing dividend | Fortum
Cooperation benefits
In 2019, Fortum’s Consumer Solutions sold a total of 30.6 TWh of power and 4.1 TWh of gas with a comparable EBITDA of EUR 141 million. The segment employs approximately 1,100 people.
Fortum has updated the strategy for the whole Fortum Group to drive the clean energy transition and deliver sustainable financial performance.
Fortum's dividend policy has been revised and ‘is to pay a stable, sustainable, and over time increasing dividend’. Fortum’s Board of Directors aims to propose a dividend of EUR 1.12 per share for the year 2020 with the target to increase the dividend going forward.
With our strategy, we want to d
International access & UK +44(0)203 003 2666
The development of the hydrogen economy will play a key role in decarbonising Europe. The ambition levels of the EU and several member states are very high. Fortum aims to build on Uniper’s first-mover position in hydrogen, the Group’s position as Europe’s third-largest CO
rive the clean energy transition and at the same time deliver sustainable financial performance
The strategy builds on four priorities:
Finland +358 9 2319 5437
Media conference
Significant cooperation benefits with Uniper identified; estimated to deliver annually more than EUR 50 million by the end of 2023 and approximately EUR 100 million in 2025.
The updated dividend policy targets an over time increasing dividend; the Board of Directors aims at a dividend of EUR 1.12 per share for the year 2020.
Fortum arranges a virtual Capital Markets Day as a webcast for institutional investors and analysts today, 3 December 2020, at 13.00–16.30 EET.
” says Rauramo.
Aligned with the goals of the Paris Agreement, Fortum targets carbon neutrality by 2050 with ambitious mid-term targets.
Strategic review of Consumer Solutions
Fortum CMD: strategy update – new financial and climate targets with a clear path to carbon neutrality and a growing dividend
,” Rauramo continues. “
will reduce our coal-fired generation capacity to less than half by the end of 2025 and cut CO
the Paris Agreement by setting ambitious climate targets and a commitment to reduce our carbon footprint. We target carbon neutrality in all our operations by 2050 at the latest and in our European generation already in 2035 at the latest. As intermediate steps, we
Fortum has updated its financial targets: Financial net debt/comparable EBITDA below 2x and climate-dependent hurdle rates for new investments.
In our Russian operations, we will gradually transform our asset portfolio towards renewables, while over time reducing our fossil exposure.
www.fortum.com/cmd
Fortum’s coal-fired generation capacity will be reduced by more than 50% by the end of 2025, to approximately 5 GW. Measures for the reduction include coal-fired plant closures in Germany announced by Uniper earlier this year (updated this week): 0.9 GW at the end of 2020, 1.5 GW by end of 2022, and a further 0.5 GW by the end of 2025. The reduction also includes the closure of Uniper’s 2 GW in the UK by the end of 2025 and Fortum’s previously announced commitment to discontinue the use of coal in Espoo by 2025.
Number of major voluntary measures enhancing biodiversity ≥12 in 2021
Consumer Solutions is responsible for Fortum’s electricity and gas retail business in the Nordics, Poland, and Spain, including the customer service, and invoicing business. Fortum is the largest electricity retail business in the Nordics, with approximately 2.4 million customers across different brands in Finland, Sweden, Norway, Poland, and Spain. The business provides electricity as well as related value-added and digital services.
Fortum Group Strategy Update – Media Call on Dec 3, 17:00 EET (16:00 CET)
Access numbers
Fortum has transformed itself, having invested about EUR 11 billion over the past six years to become Europe’s third-largest CO
Following the CMD presentations, we will offer all members of the media an opportunity to ask questions to Fortum’s Senior Management during a dedicated media call at 17:00 EET (16:00 CET). Markus Rauramo, CEO of Fortum, and Andreas Schierenbeck, CEO of Uniper, will both be available to answer your questions at that time. To participate in the media call, please use the following telephone dial-in details:
No decisions have been taken yet on concrete measures described hereon as these need to be further elaborated and assessed by Fortum and Uniper. Any final decision will be taken separately in the best interest of Fortum and Uniper, respectively, and all their shareholders. All business cooperation between Fortum and Uniper is subject to the arms-length principle. The updated strategy announced by Fortum in December 2020 is based on assessments made independently by both Fortum and Uniper. Fortum and Uniper have committed to the Group strategy in the best interest of the respective company and all their shareholders.
Strengthen and grow in CO
Please note that this media call is being offered to both national and international media and will therefore be held in English.
“I am especially pleased that as a major international energy group, we have now formalised our commitment to
As part of the strategy update, Fortum’s purpose (replacing the previous vision and mission statements) has been defined as:
Rauramo continues.
” says
A successful implementation of our updated strategy will create value for the benefit of both Fortum and Uniper and all our stakeholders. For us, it is important to be able to pay an overtime increasing dividend while we transition to carbon neutrality,
Fortum’s investment in Uniper was a step-change, increasing the Group’s CO
We will also focus on growing a sizeable portfolio of onshore wind and solar-based power generation primarily in Europe to make it a meaningful EBITDA contributor. The target is to build 1.5-2 GW of new capacity by 2025. This capacity will partly be built on our own balance sheet and partly using the ‘build-operate-transfer’ business model.
In implementing the strategy, we will initially prioritise ensuring our financial strength and gradually increase the investments in clean power and gas as well as solutions for industrial and infrastructure customers.
Purpose statement and strategic priorities
emissions in our European generation by more than 50% by 2030 compared to 2019,”
-free power generation by 60% and making us the third-largest CO
Financial targets, dividend policy, and 2021 guidance for capital expenditure
-free power generator in Europe. We continue to focus on optimising and maintaining our benchmark operations in hydro and nuclear.
The updated strategy will be presented in more detail this afternoon at Fortum’s Capital Markets Day.
03 December 2020, 09:00 EET
To ensure focused and effective implementation, we aim to have a one-team approach for Fortum’s and Uniper’s Nordic hydro and physical trading optimisation as well as for solar and wind development in Europe.
In line with its purpose, Fortum wants to engage with customers and societies to help decrease their environmental footprints. Accordingly, we aim to provide industrial and infrastructure customers with decarbonisation and environmental solutions, such as grid stability, waste-to-energy, and low-carbon industrial solutions.
(PDF, 61 KB)
The estimated annual capital expenditure for the whole Fortum Group, including Uniper, for 2021 is approximately EUR 1,400 million, including maintenance and excluding acquisitions, of which the share for maintenance is estimated to be EUR 700 million


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/newsroom/press-kits/wind-and-solar-russia
Salynskaya and Tselinskaya wind farms in Kalmykia region, southern Russia
Fortum has three solar power plants in Russia with a total capacity of 35 MW. One 116-MW project, investment of which has been made in joint venture, is under construction.
Download images here
Read CEO Markus Rauramo's statement
Solar power:
Wind power:
Images of our wind and solar parks in Russia
Fortum has approximately 1.2 GW of renewable energy capacity in operation in Russia. The power plants have been built during the ongoing renewable energy development programme in Russia and a guaranteed price (Capacity Supply Agreement, CSA) is paid for the energy they produce.
Investments in wind and solar power have been made in joint ventures, and each investment decision has been made on a case-by-case basis. Fortum's maximum equity commitment for the development of renewables in Russia is 15 billion rubles.
Fortum’s and its joint ventures’ portfolio of operational wind power projects currently consists of 14 wind farms with a total capacity of 1,113 MW. Our portfolio also includes approximately 254 MW of wind power projects under construction.
Wind and solar in Russia | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/newsroom/press-kits/fortum-clean-energy-architect-data-centres
scale
Fortum –  A Clean Energy Architect for Data Centres
managing energy with, e.g., demand response services, and recycling various materials
Head of Strategy and R&D
we can help in finding a suitable location
recycling process for lithium
District heat is the predominant form of heating in the major Nordic cities. Excess heat from data centres is ideal for district heat networks. By utilising excess heat, households in urban areas can be warmed with the clean heat produced by data centres, and the data centres can cut their energy costs by selling the excess heat to the local district heat network. In addition to district heating, waste heat can also be utilised in operations that are heat energy-intensive, like greenhouses.
Generation Division, Fortum
Placing a data centre in the Nordic countries is a climate action due to clean energy. The Nordic countries operate in a common electricity market where already 80% of the electricity is carbon dioxide-free.
Contact:
batteries
Read more >>
Data centres make the digital world possible. Without data centres, there would be no Internet, no online mobile services, no streaming movies or online games. Because of the fast pace of digitalisation in the world, a lot of new data centres are needed. The Nordic countries are attracting data centre investments valued at an estimated two to four billion euros every year until 2025.
A partner throughout the data centre life cycle
Tel. +358 50 453 6308
Fortum wants to be a partner with data centre operators in these issues – to be a clean energy architect.
acquiring or producing clean electricity
Fortum - A Clean Energy Architect for Data Centers
As an energy architect and partner of data centres, we are creating the prerequisites to have data centres located in Finland, Sweden and Norway.
The Nordic countries are an ideal location for data centres for many different reasons. Our cool climate reduces the cooling need, so energy costs and emissions are inherently lower than in warmer countries.  The share of CO2-free electricity is over 80% in the Nordics. Fortum already has a 7.6 gigawatt capacity of CO2-free electricity generation and we are developing a gigawatt-scale wind portfolio in the Nordics.
It takes a lot of electricity to operate a data centre. Climate change mitigation means that data centre operators must design their entire energy chain more meticulously: the electricity must be carbon dioxide-free, the operation must be energy-efficient, and the excess heat that is generated should be recycled whenever possible. Also material recycling calls for new considerations.
utilising excess heat
We are developing new ways to recycle materials
that will lift the recycling rate of batteries to over 80
New investments ensure that a sufficient supply of clean electricity will be available also in the future.
Fortum – A Clean Energy Architect for Data Centres | Fortum
In addition to recycling energy, we are also continuously developing new ways to recycle materials. We have recently launched an industrial
%.
Stable, safe and highly skilled societies that are geographically located near areas with excellent data connections provide a good growth platform for large-scale data centre operations. The Nordic countries are among the digital world’s forerunners in the development of 5G, for example. In advanced technology societies, data centres also attract other players in the sector, and digital expertise ecosystems are often formed around the data centres.
-ion
Almost the whole electricity supply is CO2-free
We want to be a partner throughout the life cycle:
Excess heat can be utilized in district heating network
Fortum – an energy architect for data centres


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/how-can-carbon-removal-help-companies-become-carbon-neutral
From industrial processes that can scale
carbon neutral with carbon removal
Calculate your carbon footprint
elba
At the moment, CORCs are issued for three CO2 removal methods, to help organizations become carbon neutral:
, meaning that you remove from the atmosphere the same amount of CO2 that you emit.
Neutralizing your emissions with carbon removal is possible today. Start your journey by learning more about
After reducing emissions the organization must remove the carbon it emits by investing in negative emissions technologies or carbon-net-negative offsets. It is important that they are measurable, verified and long term. For example, CO2 Removal Certificates or CORCs, confirm 1 tonne of CO2 has been absorbed and stored away from the atmosphere for the long-term in a carbon net-negative product, so to become a carbon net-zero company you should acquire the number of CORCs that match your emitted tonnes.
horta
Being a carbon neutral company has many benefits besides climate impact. It makes you a sustainable business, creates positive publicity and goodwill, and may lower financing costs.  The assignment of CORCs to emissions from operations, events, business flights and other activities can be included in sustainability reporting and in your corporate communications.
How can carbon removal help companies become carbon neutral?
Responsible companies are doing their part. Many purchase carbon offsets from reforestation projects which restore natural carbon sinks. But it's inevitable, companies continue to create carbon emissions, while trees take many years to sequester CO2.
means achieving a net balance in the carbon emissions of a company. Until recently it was achieved by buying traditional emission reduction offsets where the company pays and outsources for reductions elsewhere. However, this is no longer enough. The new goal is to become
Lifetime of 12 months from the issuance date – no vintage
Characteristics of CORCs
Long-term storage of CO2 guaranteed (min 50 years, at least until 2070)
We are in a hurry to mitigate climate change. According to the IPCC, in order to halt temperature increase the top priorities are reducing emissions and removing carbon dioxide from the atmosphere. In fact, by 2050, emissions need to reach carbon net-zero, meaning that the carbon we emit is balanced out with carbon we remove and store.
CORCs are the missing piece in your carbon neutrality strategy
Carbon net-zero is the new goal
For further impact, bundle CORCs with products and services to make them carbon neutral too. By making your products and services carbon neutral, you can differentiate from your competitors and increase sales with premium carbon neutral options.
Factual removal - CORCs are issued retrospectively after production
Carbonated Building Elements
Reduce your carbon emissions
Carbon neutrality
What are CO2 Removal Certificates or CORCs?
Puro.earth website
already
Science-based carbon net-negative offset
The blog post is based on an article published on the
The benefits of becoming a carbon neutral company
CO2 Removal Certificates
Biochar
14 February 2020, 13:25
The steps to becoming a carbon neutral company with carbon removal
- a very stable, solid form of carbon that can endure in soil for thousands of years, making it an ideal technology for scalable carbon removal. It has multiple commercial uses at potentially industrial volumes, for example, as greenhouse additive, in soil regeneration and in wastewater treatment. It is produced from biomass or biowaste, through pyrolysis (heated in the absence of oxygen).
available that can remove carbon at an industrial scale and store it for the long term. Carbon net-negative means less, or even better, than carbon neutral.
Wooden Building Elements
How can carbon removal help companies become carbon neutral? | Fortum
CO2 Removal Certificates are digital tradable carbon assets that confirm 1 tonne of CO2 has been absorbed and stored in a carbon net-negative product. CORCs are issued for only the extra carbon absorbed after a third party verification of the product has proven that it is carbon net-negative from cradle-to-gate.
- Manufactured concrete-like building elements from steel slag (waste material from steel industry) instead of traditional cement. Basically, it’s CO2 negative concrete that removes more CO2 than its production emits. During the hardening phase CO2 is chemically bound and mineralized permanently into the building element.
Fortunately, there are carbon net-negative technologies
carbon net-zero
At Puro.earth we have created a new kind of carbon offset, the CO2 Removal Certificate or CORC, based on carbon net-negative products. The carbon sequestration happens faster and we can measure it reliably.
contacting us
, i.e.
There are many ways to do it, from average carbon footprint calculators to full-fledged environmental consulting services.  Emissions calculations should include electricity and heating consumption, business travel, company waste, as well as manufacturing and supply chain emissions.
A good practice is to create a company-wide emissions reduction program that engages all employees and departments, and reduces the amount of environmental impact your company has. Easy reductions include switching to renewable energy, reducing waste and encouraging telecommuting. Another good practice is to charge an internal carbon tax based on business division carbon emissions, and use the funds to pay for sustainability improvements.
Create a carbon removal portfolio
A carbon net-negative product absorbs more CO2 than it emits in its manufacturing, with the net effect of removing carbon from the atmosphere.
- Growing trees capture carbon but the carbon may go back to circulation if the trees are cut, decompose or are used for paper or energy. Carbon removal is considered long term when it’s stored in wooden building elements. In Europe, buildings are regulated to have a minimum lifetime of 50 years, and in real life the CO2 storage is likely to be longer. By storing CO2 for a minimum of 50 years, wooden building elements present an opportunity for companies to invest in carbon capture and storage, and take proactive steps towards carbon neutrality.
or by
Companies play a big part in emitting carbon dioxide into the atmosphere and using up the planet’s resources. Good news is that becoming carbon neutral with carbon removal is nowadays on many companies’ agenda. At Fortum’s start-up Puro.earth, our experts have outlined the strategy to becoming carbon net-zero.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-newbuild-and-upgrades-services/nuclear-consulting-newbuilds-and-upgrades
Nuclear Consulting for Newbuilds and Upgrades
Studies and preparation for New Build nuclear projects
Mechanical engineering support. 2016 – 2018
We provide high quality safety assessments and analyses
Support for writing PSAR chapters
Main activities
Engineering and Design management
Plant and functional architecture level documentation of safety systems, licensing documentation (based on ADLAS®). 2015 –
Support in layout design, 2016 -
V&V activities
Nuclear Consulting for New Builds and Upgrades | Fortum
Evaluation of tenders
Control room design and validations
Safety evaluations and analysis
Fortum's nuclear experts are ready to support your nuclear new build and upgrade projects
Design, Expert and Engineering Services
Preparation or review of technical specifications and other tender invitation and contract documents
Planning of site studies
Review of safety analyses. Hazard review. Support in evaluating seismic design basis. 2016
Test strategy elaboration incl. qualification
Our experts can provide system design consulting
Engineering simulator (based on Apros®). 2014 -
Support in licensing process
Implementation planning
Safety Engineering
Modernization of safety and safety-related I&C systems
Requirement management incl. Cyber security and HFE requirements
Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA)
Design of interim storage of spent fuel and compilation of Preliminary Safety Analysis Report and Construction License Application documents for it. 2016-2017
Modernization of I&C systems
Conceptual Design
Support in I&C architecture level documentation (applying ADLAS®). 2017 -
Owner’s engineering
Examples of delivered consulting services
Consulting for Newbuilds and Upgrades
Longstanding expertise in several technical disciplines for supporting new builds and upgrades
Fortum provides a wide variety of consulting services for new build and upgrade projects. We have experience in both supporting owners of new nuclear power plants as well as working alongside established nuclear utilities. By implementing our accumulated know-how from running the Loviisa NPPs as well as supporting multiple projects both in Finland and abroad, we will ensure that your project will succeed.
Support for O&M planning 2017-
Feasibility studies and evaluation of different alternatives for spent fuel interim storage. 2015-2016


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/smart-energy-solutions/solar-solutions
More about Solar power
We have solar power plants in Russia and India. We have also jointly owned solar power plants in India.
Affordable and renewable
Cost of solar power has decreased rapidly during last years and solar power can offer affordable renewable electricity from large scale installations and rooftop solutions. We offer competitive and sustainable consumer and B2B solar solutions in Nordic markets.
Solar solutions | Fortum
In less than 2 hours the Earth receives from the Sun the amount of energy, we consume annually.  We aim to have a proactive role in developing solar power and growth in solar power is one of our strategic development areas. We seek to invest in the range of EUR 200–400 million in solar projects in India.
Solar power is the key to a clean energy future. Every day, the sun gives off far more energy than we need to power everything on earth
Solar panels
More about Solar plants
Investing in solar power
Interested in producing your own solar energy? Fortum offers solutions to private and business customers.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/01/fortum-and-danish-fjernvarme-fyn-launch-feasibility-study-co2-capture-recycling
In a circular economy, as much of the waste streams as possible have to be recycled, recovered or reused. On their journey towards carbon neutrality, various industry sectors can utilize captured CO₂ combined with hydrogen to form essential building blocks for a wide range of products.
Fortum drives the change towards a cleaner world. The Group’s strategic subsidiary Uniper is a hydrogen pioneer active worldwide along the entire hydrogen value chain that together with the other business in Fortum Group, leads the change towards a low-emission energy system and the optimal use of resources.
The feasibility study is expected to be completed before the end of 2022 and will clarify whether it is realistic to proceed on a large scale. At that time, a decision can be made whether to proceed with the process. The target is to capture 480,000 tonnes of CO₂ by 2030, however the long-term potential is up to 900,000 tonnes.
19 January 2022, 16:52 EET
Fjenvarme Fyn provides district heating for the city of Odense. Fortum’s plant in Nyborg treats hazardous waste from many industrial companies in the area as well as supply district heating for Nyborg. The feasibility study will aim to discover whether large scale capture of CO₂ from the Odense and Nyborg plants is feasible. Together with hydrogen the captured carbon can be recycled into products such as plastics or sustainable fuels for industry, transport or shipping.
Fortum and Danish Fjernvarme Fyn launch feasibility study on CO₂ capture for recycling
Fortum and Danish Fjernvarme Fyn launch feasibility study on CO₂ capture for recycling | Fortum
Fortum and Danish district heating operator Fjernvarme Fyn will do a feasibility study together to assess the possibilities of capturing and recycling CO₂.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/newsroom/images-and-logos
Images and logos to be downloaded for media use | Fortum
Logos
For more information, please contact us:
Fortum management
Download images
Download logos
Here you can find images for media use. Click on the links to download the images.  Please note that the images are for journalistic purposes only, commercial use is prohibited. Please display Fortum Corporation as the source.
General Fortum images
Images and logos
Production plants


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/newsroom/all-news-and-releases



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/05/fortums-january-march-2022-interim-report-operating-results-down-fortum-prepares-controlled-exit-russia-and-takes-action-provide-security-supply-europe
Operating profit was EUR -2,416 (1,345) million, mainly impacted by changes in fair values of non-hedge-accounted derivatives and impairments
2,235
2,234
UK: +44 333 300 0804
January–September 10 November 2022 at approximately 9.00 EET
More information, including detailed quarterly information, is available at
This release is a summary of Fortum’s January–March 2022 Interim Report. The complete report is attached to this release as a PDF file. It is also available on the company's website at
2,610
-114
Fortum is managing this extreme market volatility and increased uncertainties on the commodity markets by focusing on cash flow optimisation and securing of sufficient liquidity headroom. At the end of the first quarter, we had almost EUR 6 billion of undrawn committed short-term and long-term financing. We will continue to strive for a solid investment-grade rating of at least BBB to preserve financial flexibility. In March, S&P Global Ratings placed Fortum and Uniper on Negative Credit Watch while Fitch reaffirmed our long-term rating BBB with a stable outlook.
-2,575
Comparable operating profit was EUR -438 (1,171) million due to the negative Uniper result
Financial net debt (at period-end)
1,345
These examples demonstrate that a lot is being done by Europe’s sector leaders, all of whom want to help address Europe’s current energy crisis and support a more independent energy system for Europe. But none of us can do it on our own. These unprecedented times call for an unprecedented level of cooperation – between country governments, between governments and companies. The energy sector needs transparency, guidance and visibility from political bodies on the desired way forward. Clarity is paramount for the sector to make the substantial investments required and to focus on the most promising solutions. While some challenges are being resolved for the short-term at lightning speed, as outlined above, others will take more time and can’t be rushed.
-1,529
-2,416
In the first quarter, our comparable operating profit turned into a loss of EUR 438 million. The result was mainly weighed down by a phasing effect in the Uniper segment’s gas midstream business due to gas storage optimisation that shifted approximately EUR 750 million of profits into coming quarters of the year. However, despite the first quarter loss, Uniper reiterated its full-year 2022 guidance. This quarter’s highlight was the Generation segment’s good performance that was mainly driven by higher achieved power price following very successful physical optimisation and higher spot prices. City Solutions’ result decreased on higher fuel and CO
Webcast/teleconference
-4,349
On 22 March, Fortum signed an agreement to sell its 50% ownership in Fortum Oslo Varme AS for approximately EUR 1 billion. Closing expected during the second quarter of 2022.
“After a year of extraordinary and volatile market conditions in 2021, developments in the early part of 2022 have been even more dramatic as a consequence of the Russia-Ukraine war. Together with its allies, the EU has responded in a coordinated and decisive manner to support Ukraine and to isolate Russia with broad sanctions, covering also energy. This has caused an upheaval in all commodity markets, with the European front-month gas prices spiking above 200 euro per megawatt hour over possible supply disruptions. Furthermore, high gas prices have clearly increased both demand and prices of other commodities; including oil, coal and power. With markets, political developments and additional sanctions continuously in flux, this has created unprecedented short term challenges for the entire sector in Europe since the war began, as well as far-reaching implications for the longer-term energy system and transition. The resulting industry crisis mode also significantly affects us at Fortum.
Adjusted net debt (at period-end)
I can’t stress enough that these times are very challenging for the European energy sector – and for Fortum. The urgency to accelerate the transition to CO
1,092
837
43,623
Financial Results January–September 2022 on 3 November 2022
emission allowance prices, lower heat volumes in Finland as well as on structural changes. Consumer Solutions was slightly down mainly due to a reduction in the number of customers and slightly higher cost. While production was running normally in Russia, the Russia segment’s result was impacted by weaker rouble and the ending of CSA payments for one unit while the previous year was positively affected by gains from the sale of a solar power project. In our first quarter results we recorded impairments of approximately EUR 2.1 billion related to the Group’s Russian assets.
Uniper will publish interim reports in 2022:
4,454
Fortum’s President and CEO Markus Rauramo:
January–June on 12 August 2022 at approximately 9.00 EEST
* As of the first quarter of 2022, Uniper has changed the reporting on its hedges. See Uniper’s quarterly statement Q1 2022 materials for further details.
-4,256
FORTUM CORPORATION JANUARY–MARCH 2022 INTERIM REPORT 12 MAY 2022 AT 9:00 EEST
Earnings per share were EUR -2.50 (1.23)
1,778
Fortum January-March 2022 interim report
Financial Results January–June 2022 on 2 August 2022
1,310
It is very clear that there is a need to decrease Europe’s dependency on Russian energy and move towards a more independent energy system in Europe. Especially Germany is currently highly dependent on the imports of natural gas and as the country’s government has repeatedly stated that withdrawing from Russian gas is not immediately possible. We are working on ways to reduce, replace or transform the use and supply of natural gas both in the short and mid-term. Uniper is in close consultation with the German government and has already taken a series of actions to secure alternative energy supplies. As one example, Uniper contracted additional capacity to land LNG at the Gate terminal in Rotterdam in The Netherlands. We have also agreed to build and operate a floating LNG import terminal in Wilhelmshaven in Germany for the German government. In Finland, the Finnish Fennovoima’s Board of Directors decided to terminate the EPC-contract with the Russian RAOS Project on the Fennovoima Hanhikivi 1 nuclear power project at the end of April due to severe delays and unability to deliver the project. Fortum is an indirect shareholder (6.6%) in the project.
Comparable earnings per share were EUR -0.11 (0.94)
Comparable EBITDA was EUR -104 (1,479) million due to the negative Uniper result
FI: +358 9 817 10310
US: +1 631 913 1422
1,479
Media: Fortum News Desk, tel.
-2,222
21,493
134,530
The Uniper segment’s Nordic generation hedges: approximately 75% at EUR 26 per MWh for the remainder of 2022, approximately 50% at EUR 31 per MWh for 2023 and approximately 25% at EUR 30 per MWh for 2024*
Capital expenditure, including maintenance but excluding acquisitions, is expected to be approximately EUR 1,500 million in 2022
(PDF, 2 MB)
-104
1,171
831
A combined live webcast/teleconference for media, investors, and analysts will be arranged 12 May 2022 at 11:00 EEST at
-2.90
Investor Relations and Financial Communications: Ingela Ulfves, tel. +358 40 515 1531, Rauno Tiihonen, tel. +358 10 453 6150, Carlo Beck, tel. +49 172 751 2480, Nora Hallberg, tel. +358 40 720 1775, Pirjo Lifländer, tel. +358 40 643 3317, and
-78
Summary of outlook
+358 040 198 2843
-free and clean energy is clearer than ever before. Our strategy is designed to secure a fast and reliable transition to a carbon neutral economy. We will therefore continue to push forward with this execution. In doing so, I want to thank all our employees for their resilience, unwavering commitment and hard work over the past few months.”
-438
January–March 2022
A recording of the webcast as well as the transcript will be published after the event at
Fortum’s January–March 2022 Interim Report: Operating results down – Fortum prepares for a controlled exit from Russia and takes action to provide security of supply in Europe | Fortum
Financial calendar in 2022
31 Mar 2022
739
The Generation segment’s Nordic generation hedges: approximately 80% at EUR 35 per MWh for the remainder of 2022, and approximately 55% at EUR 33 per MWh for 2023
12 May 2022, 09:00 EEST
-190
927
113
67
192
-2,833
Impairments of approximately EUR 2.1 billion recorded pre-tax related to the Group’s Russian operations including Nord Stream 2
To participate in the teleconference and Q&A, dial in using the numbers below:
Fortum’s January–March 2022 Interim Report: Operating results down – Fortum prepares for a controlled exit from Russia and takes action to provide security of supply in Europe
Espoo, 11 May 2022
Over the recent months, we have also worked hard to reduce the Group’s exposure to Russia and to support the European governments in securing and diversifying alternative energy supplies. In addition to the previously announced investment and financing freeze in our Russian subsidiaries, we have decided to pursue a controlled exit from the Russian market. As the preferred path, this decision includes a potential divestment of Fortum’s Russian operations. The divestment process for Uniper’s Russian subsidiary Unipro is also expected to be resumed as soon as possible. These processes may take some time to conclude and are subject to regulatory approvals. Irrespectively, we have decided to stop using the Fortum brand in Russia.
-99
Cash flow from operating activities totalled EUR -1,529 (831) million due to negative change in working capital in the Uniper segment
842
Fortum will publish interim reports in 2022:
PIN: 87118603#


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/03/fortum-subsidiary-uniper-writes-down-its-receivable-nord-stream-2-and-gives-further-details-its-russian-businesses
07 March 2022, 23:20 EET
40 198 2843
Fortum subsidiary Uniper writes down its receivable in Nord Stream 2 and gives further details on its Russian businesses | Fortum
In order to further diversify its portfolio, Uniper has resumed its plans of building an LNG terminal in Wilhelmshaven, Germany, as announced in Fortum’s investor news on 3 March 2022.
Uniper is preparing for a possible divestment of its Russian subsidiary Unipro
Uniper has today announced that it has decided to write down its full outstanding receivable related to the Swiss registered company Nord Stream 2 AG, which is the project company for the Nord Stream 2 project.
Uniper is a financing partner in the project company and has a loan receivable of EUR 987 million which comprises both loan and accrued interest. Following the impairment, Fortum will no longer record the related interest income of approximately EUR 100 million annually.
Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper has on 7 March 2022 disclosed additional information regarding its Russia business and related strategy execution. This information supplements Fortum’s statement on 3 March 2022 on the Group’s Russian business.
Diversification of fuel supplies; Not entering into new long-term supply contracts for Russian natural gas
Fortum News Desk +358
FORTUM CORPORATION INVESTOR NEWS 7 MARCH 2022 AT 23:20 EET
Uniper’s full corporate press release of 7 March 2022 can be read at their website.
Fortum writes down its receivable in the Nord Stream 2 project
Uniper also announced that it will not extend coal procurement contracts after they expire nor will it enter into new long term gas contracts with Russian suppliers. However, Uniper will continue with the existing, long-term gas import contracts from Russia as they play an important role in securing heating for German households and gas for industrial processes in Europe. Uniper has also taken measures to diversify its fuel supplies and to prepare for potential short-term interruptions of gas flows from Russia.
(PDF, 761 KB)
Furthermore, Uniper has announced that it will not make any new investments in Russia and will not transfer any funds to Unipro until further notice.
As part of Fortum Group’s strategy to reduce its thermal exposure in Russia, Uniper has been preparing a possible divestment of its separately listed Russian subsidiary Unipro (ownership 83.7%). Due to the current circumstances in Russia, the process has been put on hold for the time being.
The impairment will be recorded in Fortum’s first quarter 2022 results in other financial items -net, but will be adjusted and will not affect the comparable net profit.
Fortum’s statement on Group’s business in Russia of 3 March 2022 can be found at www.fortum.com/about-us/newsroom.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/07/stabilisation-package-fortums-subsidiary-uniper-agreed-german-government
The stabilisation package still requires all applicable regulatory approvals, in particular by the European Commission, the confirmation of the investment grade rating of Uniper by S&P Global Ratings as well as approval by a Uniper Extraordinary General Meeting.
The stabilisation package is subject to certain conditions, such as the withdrawal of the law suit by Uniper against The Netherlands under the Energy Charter Treaty (ECT), no dividend payments by Uniper and restrictions on the remuneration of Uniper’s Board of Management whilst the stabilisation measures are in place. In addition, the German government will have adequate representation on Uniper’s Supervisory Board.
-free power generator in Europe. In 2021, the Fortum Group achieved its most profitable year on record – with Uniper contributing half of the Group’s comparable operating profit.
However, the Russian war against Ukraine and the Russian government’s decision to use energy as a weapon has upended energy markets and resulted in Uniper only receiving a fraction of its contracted gas volumes from Gazprom since mid-June. To meet its obligations towards customers and to sustain European security of supply, Uniper was required to buy the gas at a significantly higher spot market price – with severe consequences for Uniper’s liquidity, earnings and capital.
-free power generation by 60%, the investment was a step-change making Fortum the third-largest CO
. “For us it is also important that the solution now reached doesn’t require additional capital from Fortum beyond the already provided eight billion euros of financial support.”
As a consequence of the above agreed measures, Fortum’s current  stake of approximately 80% in Uniper will be diluted to 56% on the initial equity injection, at which point Fortum will remain Uniper’s majority shareholder and will continue to consolidate Uniper as a subsidiary.
The German government informs that they intend to introduce a cost absorption mechanism that covers 90% of the losses resulting from higher costs for gas replacement volumes caused by Russian gas curtailments from 1 October. The German government stands ready to provide further support if Uniper’s accumulated net operating losses due to continuing gas curtailments exceed an agreed total amount of EUR 7 billion. Such support, if required, is intended to be implemented in a manner that avoids further economic dilution of Uniper’s shareholders.
Uniper, with the support of Fortum and the German government, will work on a long-term stable and shareholder value-preserving solution to reform the wholesale gas contract architecture. The parties intend to agree on the solution by the end of 2023.
Stabilisation package for Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper agreed with the German government | Fortum
continues: “New geopolitical realities have shaken the European energy system to the core, and this determines a new framework for European energy companies. Whilst we have now achieved immediate stabilisation of Uniper, further efforts will be required to create a long-term sustainable basis for the gas business. The agreed solution is a major step in ensuring that Uniper, and consequently also the Fortum Group, return to a stable footing.”
To ask questions by phone access the teleconference register on the link http://palvelu.flik.fi/teleconference/?id=1009663
financial
Uniper is among the largest importers of natural gas to Europe and plays an essential role in providing security of supply, especially in Germany. Uniper's gas midstream business comprises a portfolio of around 370 TWh of long-term gas supply contracts, of which approximately 200 TWh originate from Russia. In 2021, Germany imported just under 90 billion cubic metres (bcm) of natural gas, with approximately 55% coming from Russia.
performance. Increasing the Group’s CO
FORTUM CORPORATION INSIDE INFORMATION 22 JULY 2022 AT 12.45 EEST
A combined live webcast/teleconference for media, investors, and analysts will be arranged online today, 22 July at 14:00 EEST (13:00 CET). President and CEO Markus Rauramo will present the stabilisation package, followed by a Q&A session.
Fortum acquired Uniper to drive the clean energy transition across Europe and deliver sustainable
- The German state-owned
Questions for the management can be placed through the webcast question form or by phone.
Uniper also published a corporate release on the matter today, which can be found on Uniper’s website.
The stabilisation package includes three main components
After the registration to the teleconference you will be provided phone numbers and a conference ID to access the conference. If you wish to ask a question, please dial *5 on your telephone keypad to enter the queue.
- The German State will take a 30% equity stake in Uniper SE by subscribing approximately 157 million new ordinary registered shares at nominal value of EUR 1.70 per share against cash consideration of approximately EUR 267 million;
Distribution: Nasdaq Helsinki
“We are living through an unprecedented energy crisis that requires robust measures. After intensive but constructive negotiations, we found a solution that in an acceptable way met the interest of all parties involved. We were driven by urgency and the need to protect Europe’s security of supply in a time of war. In addition to thanking the German government and our colleagues at Uniper, I would also like to thank the Finnish government for their support in recent weeks,” says Fortum’s President and CEO
Earlier this year, Fortum granted significant financial support comprising shareholder loan and parent company guarantees of EUR 8 billion to Uniper. In consideration of its liquidity support, Fortum will now have the option to convert its existing loan of EUR 4 billion against a portion of maximum 70% of the mandatory convertible instruments subscribed by the German State. Fortum is consequently in a position to retain its position as the majority shareholder. Fortum’s parent company guarantee of EUR 4 billion will remain in place. In the sequence of repayment, the KfW loans rank senior to Fortum’s loan.
KfW bank will provide Uniper with an additional EUR 7 billion in liquidity support through an increase of its existing credit facility from the current EUR 2 billion to EUR 9 billion.
To follow webcast use the link on https://fortum.videosync.fi/press-conference
Fortum, its subsidiary Uniper and the German government have agreed on a comprehensive
while at the same time initiating measures to de-risk its gas business model and secure a credit rating to support a path to longer term viability.
- The German government has committed to make available further capital of up to EUR 7.7 billion against issuance of mandatory convertible instruments, as and if needed, to address potential losses;
22 July 2022, 12:45 EEST
Stabilisation package for Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper agreed with the German government
stabilisation package to provide financial relief to Uniper. As Germany’s largest importer of natural gas, Uniper has been hit hardest by the curtailments of Russian gas imports, and as a result is under extreme financial pressure.
Uniper’s gas trading activities are critical for Germany’s energy supply and play an important role for the European energy sector. It is therefore of utmost importance to stabilise Uniper by immediately addressing the company’s loss-making and substantial liquidity needs,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/investors/calendar-and-events/results-news-conferences
Transcript of the investor/media news conference
Results news conferences | Fortum
On this page you will find information about the latest news conference related to results publishing, including the published materials. Earlier materials for Fortum's published results are available in the archive.
Fortum's January−September 2022 Interim Report
To archive


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/legal/privacy/privacy-notice-job-applicants/retention-schedule-privacy-notice-job-applicants
Retention schedule: Privacy Notice – Job Applicants | Fortum
max 2 years
16/12/2019
Fortum deletes or de-identifies personal data when it is no longer necessary for the purposes it was collected for. Your personal data related to your application for a position will not be retained longer than set out in the table below, except if you are chosen for the position:
Retention schedule: Privacy Notice – Job Applicants
Personal data related to the application


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/contact-us/all-contacts/how-get-our-head-office-espoo-finland
Fortum’s headquarters is located in the southern part of the building facing the Länsiväylä motorway. We recommend taking public transportation or a taxi to get to the headquarters. The closest station on the metro line is Keilaniemi. The closest bus stops are located on the Länsiväylä motorway.
Fortum employees in the Helsinki metropolitan area are located at Keilalahdentie 2–4, 02150 Espoo. Along with Fortum, other tenants in the headquarters building include Tietoevry Oyj and Microsoft Oy.
How to get to our head office in Espoo, Finland | Fortum
By car
How to get to our head office in Espoo, Finland
Fortum headquarters Google maps
By public transport
If you arrive by car, there are a limited number of visitor parking spaces available in the shared parking area on Campus, but we can’t guarantee the availability.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/careers/life-fortum
hydrid work model
Our culture helps you succeed
Set your direction to grow
Open leadership is in the heart of our culture. It's a model that aims to provide our employees the tools and confidence needed to actively build the future of the energy sector. A central principle of this model is the supportive approach based on individual strengths. We think that by trusting and believing in people and taking care of their wellbeing, we can expect even better results from them. For us there are three pillars that crystallize this approach: we believe in each other, we want the best for each other, and we expect the best from each other.
Fortumers' stories
We provide our employees generous health & wellbeing benefits. Holistic approach to wellbeing is part of our culture and visible through our global Energise Your Day program. The target of the program is to increase the overall awareness of wellbeing and encourage all our employees to maintain and develop their own wellbeing.  Through our collaboration with Hintsa Performance, our employees have a wide offering of services available for them, including personal coaching, workshops, and mental & physical breaks.
Flexibility is here to stay
Life at Fortum | Fortum
We invest in your wellbeing
Our people are changemakers - taking an active role in driving change for a better future. We offer countless opportunities to develop your expertise locally, or globally. Our competencies in developing clean energy solutions are needed and what we do matters.
You will set the direction for your own development and we will support you on this journey. Our employees have dozens of online and in-person trainings available in different areas, such as hybrid leadership or 360 feedback development. We are testing and seeking new opportunities to use technology to build the learning experience even further for example through nano-learnings. Fortum Talks are open events for all employees who want to know more about current business topics, such as hydrogen or renewables. We actively promote job rotation and short term assignments as a way for professional growth and expanding our employees view of the business. Our leadership & coaching programs are targeted at different employee groups such as Navigator, which is our future leader development program.
We want to provide flexibility in our workplace. Combination of remote and office/onsite work is suitable for many of our employees working in a regular Fortum office environment. Our teams have the flexibility to find the most optimal solutions for them to secure high performance, professional development, and personal wellbeing. For us, it is important to make all our employees feel included, regardless of where they do their work. With the possibility for remote working and flexible working hours you will have more time to focus on yourself and people that matter the most.
Our curious changamakers
Get to know some of the current Fortumers
Diversity and inclusion inspire us to innovate and grow
People and values
Learn more about our
Read more about our people and values
How this approach makes us agile? Read more


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/open-leadership-enables-faster-ability-respond
At the start of the coronavirus crisis, the transition to working remotely was very smooth because we already had an underlying culture of trust in place, and there had been recent discussions between supervisors and employees about remote working practices. We had previously made the transition to a truly paperless office, and we had been using electronic tools like Microsoft Teams extensively and for a long time, so they were familiar.
We have invested significantly in a working environment and corporate culture that would help employees succeed. In exceptional circumstances, we have paid special attention to active communications internally, the use of tools for remote working, and diverse support for employee wellbeing.
Support for work wellbeing
An encouraging, trust-based and wellbeing-focused open leadership model helped Fortum to adapt well to changes caused by the coronavirus crisis.
Vice President, People and Well-being
One of the tools that proved to be popular was Break Pro, an app that reminds users of the need to take breaks and offers various exercise videos. To support staying engaged and a sense of community, we also tailored different coronavirus-appropriate challenges in the HeiaHeia service. And the Hintsa Performance wellbeing coaching was made into virtual programmes.
During spring, we achieved a number of internal communication successes: for example, at its best, more than 2,000 people simultaneously took part in internal Town Hall events arranged via Teams, and the opportunity to present questions anonymously or in your own name produced a lot of questions. Based on the personnel survey conducted in late spring, our employees were especially satisfied with the internal communications during the exceptional situation.
13 July 2020, 13:34
Open dialogue and feedback
Open leadership enables a faster ability to respond | Fortum
Many mechanisms to support work wellbeing were even surprisingly easily integrated with the virtual world. During the spring, we offered our employees things like remote training, shared breaks, and guidelines for ergonomic working at home.
backman
The coronavirus crisis also highlighted the fact that open remote management is very demanding on supervisors, and it isn’t necessarily a good fit for everyone. Challenges emerged, for example, in situations where we tried to find ways to offer support to individuals in various life situations.
We regularly track the realisation of open leadership through pulse surveys, which provide a quick and flexible way to promote dialogue and collect feedback. After moving to remote working, many supervisors started regularly asking their teams about issues like coping and adequacy of information flow in this new situation.
When the coronavirus crisis hit, leadership was put to the test. The role of supervisors and management was especially important in this situation, just as it always is in an exceptional situation. Our open leadership principles enabled us to adapt to rapid changes and the “new normal” over the past spring.
A couple of years ago Fortum rolled out a company-wide cultural change that is based on openness and trust between management and personnel. At the heart of our culture is the modern brain research-based notion that when people feel others believe in and trust them, they also believe in themselves and perform better. In fact, management at Fortum is based on the Open Leadership model and its three principles: we believe in each other, we want the best for each other, and we expect the best from each other.
+358 50 452 8340
Open leadership enables a faster ability to respond
Overall, I believe that one of the consequences of the pandemic is that working remotely will increase within Fortum. This situation has led many who were previously sceptical of working remotely to conclude that remote working has been even more successful than anticipated. I am especially glad about this because remote working impacts wellbeing by making it easier to gain better work-life balance.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog%20/fortum-flexibility-new-normal
During the autumn, we will hold trainings and workshops for our 800+ managers to practice the hybrid leadership. Workshops and seminars for all employees are also planned.
Continuous dialogue and feedback loops
Inclusive leadership and strong self-leadership are crucial skills in the hybrid model
For us, it is important to make all our employees feel included, regardless of where they do their work, and to create a sense of belonging. We believe that with a hybrid solution that secures dynamic collaboration and performance, and combines it with an optimal work-life balance, we can shape a better future workplace for everyone at Fortum.
We see that the office can nurture relationships, information sharing, unstructured collaboration, and unexpected encounters. Our offices and the physical meetings foster a strong company culture, and therefore we see physical presence in the offices as part of our new set-up.
During the pandemic, when 80% of our employees have been able to work remotely, we have regularly used surveys, workshops, and other feedback tools to gather the views and insights from our organisation. Together with our managers and employees, we have mapped the future needs to understand how to set up the work to enable the best performance and to ensure that we sustain our high levels of engagement and empowerment. These insights have helped us form the company-wide hybrid work model.
The core team consists of Ann Boije af Gennäs, Business Technology, Matti Kattainen, Generation, Päivi Urkola, People and Kristina Kinik, Group Communications. The core team has been working fully remotely during the pandemic and cooperating completely virtually.
Senior Vice President, People and Procurement
Leading yourself is about accountability and freedom
The pandemic has resulted in new ways of working, also at Fortum. We have developed new behaviours and methods for work and collaboration. As a company, we want to provide flexibility in our workplace, and we believe that a combination of remote and office work is suitable for many of our employees.
Eveliina Dahl, SVP People, and the Workforce 2.0 team
Read about our Open Leadership
To ensure a smooth implementation of the hybrid work model at Fortum, we have developed practical guidelines to help our people to navigate in this new setting. The handbook consists of the key principles of hybrid work at Fortum, tools, and checklists for optimising the work and collaboration, as well as important sections on wellbeing, safety and security, and other risks to be considered.
About Fortum Workforce 2.0
Blog:
As we gradually return to the offices, we will continue to use dialogue and feedback to develop our way of working and to address areas in need of development.
In a hybrid work setting, where employees can be working in the office as well as remotely, it is of utmost importance to treat everyone equally. In inclusive leadership, it is important to ensure that all team members are treated equally, feel valued, and get the support they need, regardless of a physical or virtual presence.
At Fortum, flexibility is the new normal | Fortum
Because we are not going back; we are going forward.
At Fortum, flexibility is the new normal
As a company, we see many benefits of meeting and working together in the office. It promotes collaboration and personal relationships for our company’s future success. It also breaks the isolation that many of our employees have faced during the past year when working remotely full time. This is one of the reasons why we recommend our employees to spend at least a couple of days in the office when returning.
Hybrid work also relies on our strong personal ability to lead ourselves and to support each other in the setup. Together with our teams and managers, we agree on the common framework, and then we can structure and control our own part. As colleagues, we are all responsible for our own actions, for our own work morale, for our collaboration with colleagues, and for bringing out the best in ourselves and others.
The global pandemic has not only impacted the human health situation, but also the corporate way of working. The strategic initiative “Workforce 2.0” was established to analyse what structured, long-term changes we need to implement at Fortum.
We believe in physical meetings and collaboration
If we all individually take responsibility for our own part, we become stronger as an entity. And by role modelling wellbeing, time management, and ways of working, our self-leadership capabilities grow.
Trainings and practical guidelines to support a smooth implementation
10 September 2021, 09:00
About Workforce 2.0: We are not going back; we are going forward
Ann Boije af Gennäs, Matti Kattainen, Päivi Urkola & Kristina Kinik
Read more about hybrid work and the new role of the office in our previous blog
At Fortum, we have decided to implement a hybrid work model throughout our company, with a mix of office work and remote work for our employees working in a regular Fortum office environment. In line with our Open Leadership principles, we believe in our leaders and employees and our collective ability to find the most optimal solutions for each team in the new hybrid setting. Therefore, we are giving the teams and leaders the flexibility to find the best solutions for them to secure high performance, professional development, and personal wellbeing.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/hybrid-work-true-win-win
Senior Vice President, Strategy, People and Performance
It is pretty clear, based on our experience so far and the available studies, that there is not just one future model of remote working, hence the word “hybrid”. The future models will be many, to fit the needs of different types of jobs and organisations. For some companies, it may mean that employees work a couple of days per week onsite and the rest of their time from home or somewhere else outside of the office. It can also mean that companies create designated times for everyone to be physically present. For some jobs, the two extremes may still be relevant, either with 100% onsite work or 100% remote working.
But is “back to the office” the only solution? My view is no, we should aim to think in more visionary terms. For example, the idea of pop-up offices is not new. In most European cities, there are office spaces to rent for a day or for a few hours. Instead of spending time commuting to the permanent office, it may sometimes be more effective for team members to gather in a short-term rented office to work on a common task for a few hours and then return home for the desk work. Solutions like this could help us to remain flexible, yet most effective, in meeting the needs for cooperation.
I believe it can be safely said that we all have been impacted by the Covid 19 pandemic during this tumultuous year of 2020. Despite the horrible impact on many people’s health and livelihoods, could something good come out of this challenging time?
A recent survey conducted by Boston Consulting Group shows that companies overall expect approximately 40% of employees to utilise a hybrid remote working model in the future, combining remote and onsite work.
There are obvious benefits of working remotely. Several global surveys indicate that the productivity of employees with optimised remote work models has increased by 15-40%, and the potential cost reduction in real estate is around 20%. (Sources: Forbes, Global Workplace Analytics, BCH analysis).
We are not going back, we are going forward
Time spent on commuting has been swapped with an increased number of Teams meetings, with fewer natural breaks. Spacious offices are mostly empty, with high costs for rent and maintenance. We also know that mental health issues have increased as a result of feelings of uncertainty and loneliness and the lack of social contact. However, many people also have expressed that working from home has improved their work-life balance and that the increased flexibility has helped them better combine their work with other interests and obligations in life, such as elderly parents, children, hobbies, and friends. Others have witnessed mental health issues, as social connections have decreased. Could we turn the experiences from this time into a win-win situation for everyone in the “new normal”?
So, productivity and work-life balance on one side and lack of innovation and social connection on the other. Is there a middle ground, a win-win situation for everyone?
How should we determine which model to use for different jobs? At Fortum, we will together with our managers and employees to map the future needs, to understand how to set up the work to enable the best performance, and to ensure that we sustain our high levels of engagement and empowerment. Each business, function and team has valuable insights and experiences from the past months. We should build on those. Which roles require onsite equipment or facilities? Has the innovation level decreased due to remote working?
Hybrid work – a true win-win? | Fortum
Read also:
For us at Fortum, this is our ambition.
Aligned with the changing work, also the role of the office is bound to change. Instead of being a place where we would do deskwork and deep work, the office will become increasingly a place for cooperation and co-creation. Architects and design firms are now looking into new ways of designing the office space to better suit the new demands, enabling desk space to be transformed into collaboration space. The office plays an important role in social connection, which also our internal surveys show. Modularity and flexibility of office space is likely to be very important so that the same space can be used to meet varying needs.
Another aspect of office and remote work is that not everyone has the space or the home environment allowing them to do their work properly. During lockdowns in many countries, people have struggled to accommodate both home-school and to find a proper place for one’s own work without interfering with the other family members also working or studying from home. Simply put, working from home is not for everybody.
At the same time, several companies say that innovation and creativity in the company has decreased during remote working, indicating that innovation requires physical interactions and human connection.
Tasks that we never imagined being performed remotely are already (e.g. customer service calls) or soon will be (e.g. safety walks) handled from home. During the pandemic, approximately 80% of our employees have been able to work remotely, and the vast majority say that they feel good about doing so. According to our surveys, around 90% are satisfied or at least “neutral” about remote work and only some 10% feel bad about it.
Read Arto Räty's post
Open leadership is taking us towards a cleaner future
The changing role of the office
Keeping performance and engagement on a high level are important for everyone, team members and companies alike. If we can create a hybrid solution that secures dynamic collaboration and innovation and combine it with an optimal work-life balance, it would be a win-win situation for everyone.
Towards a “hybrid model” of work?
How COVID-10 affects the corporate way of working


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/we-are-not-going-back-we-are-going-forward
Internal and external dialogue is key in getting a better understanding about the future. The voices of our employees and our leaders are important and help us to focus. Workshops, employee surveys and leadership polls are all feedback loops that determine the next steps in this work. With this instant feedback, we get an early understanding of what is cooking and which issues we need to handle first.
We are also discussing the future challenges and opportunities with other companies and organisations. By sharing valuable insights and ideas, we can learn from each other and adapt and develop more easily.
Leadership; what kind of leadership is needed in this new reality? How can we maintain high employee engagement when most of us are working remotely? And, in practical terms, what does self-leadership mean to us as individuals?
The way of doing work; how do we handle the maintenance work or take the proper safety measures when we are not physically present? Would pop-up office spaces be a complementary solution to traditional offices? And how do we secure productivity and innovation if cross-functional team-ups or workshops are not possible?
The global pandemic has not only impacted the human health situation, but also the corporate way of working. We want to build on the valuable insights and experiences we have gained during this time and create an even stronger and more agile organisation. By adapting to new situations in a fast way, we can remain competitive and keep a high level of internal engagement among our experts around the world.
The pandemic hit the world at the beginning of the year with a massive and devastating impact on people’s health, lives and daily routines. For us at Fortum, in many ways it has challenged our way of working; already now, we can see that there will be long lasting effects in our corporate way of working. We have therefore initiated a company-wide project, “Workforce 2.0”, to gather insights and to analyse what structured long-term changes we need to implement at Fortum.
In this work, we are looking at four different aspects of “the new normal” and identifying both short-term and long-term actions to be taken.
Digital transformation; how do we adapt our digital transformation to truly support the most relevant and beneficial processes in the future? Which tools will serve us the best when it comes to collaboration, business development, data security?
Because we are not going back, we are going forward.
Employment and employer branding; in the future, how flexible will the job market be when it comes to remote jobs, and how flexible will Fortum be? How can we create an equal job market, when there is no remote option for some roles? And how will the way in which we meet the upcoming needs and expectations of our employees either strengthen or weaken our employer brand internally?
We believe that we need to understand the ever-changing needs, both within the organisation as well as in society, to be able to develop our company. Insights, ideas and lessons learned – not only by us, but by other companies and industries – will help us adapt our way of working, our leadership and our practices to build a stronger company.
21 October 2020, 10:00
The Workforce 2.0 work at Fortum will continue until next autumn, but the long-term changes and scenarios will be mixed with short-term adaptations and actions. I am looking forward to the new ideas and solutions regarding ways of doing work, leadership, digitalisation and cooperation. Only by adapting to new situations in a fast way can we remain competitive, keep the internal engagement high and strengthen our company culture.
How COVID-19 pandemic affects the corporate way of working | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/open-leadership-taking-us-towards-cleaner-future
Open leadership is taking us towards a cleaner future | Fortum
Want the best: we want the best for each other
We want to build a working environment and company culture that helps our employees to succeed, and we have put a lot of effort towards reaching this goal. We encourage our employees to take care of their overall well-being and safety, and we encourage them to open discussion and feedback. We want our employees to listen to each other’s thoughts and challenge and support each other.
At Fortum, we encourage our employees to maintain their physical health through different exercise programs and accomplishments. We reward employees every year for the best wellbeing actions, and one example of how we invest in our employees is the recent launch of our cooperation with Hintsa Performance to provide personalised wellbeing coaching. During the exceptional circumstances caused by the coronavirus, we have continued our work to improve employees’ wellbeing by offering remote coaching, having breaks together and giving advice on good ergonomics at the home office.
Expect the best: we expect the best from each other
A central principle of the open leadership model is the supportive approach based on individual strengths. We think that by trusting and believing in people and taking care of their well-being, we can expect even better results from them.
We monitor the progress of the principles of open leadership regularly, and according to our employees, the leadership model has clearly improved. In November 2019, 78% of the respondents of the employee survey felt that we have made progress in open leadership. Our employees responded to the same survey now in May, and it will be interesting to see how the past weeks will affect the results, as most of our employees have been working from home. In these exceptional circumstances, we have invested in active and versatile internal communications, online trainings and in supporting the wellbeing of our employees. We will continue the work to promote our employees’ skills, abilities and wellbeing and to develop our leadership model, although, for the time being, we will be physically apart from each other.
29 May 2020, 15:16
Everything that we do supports our target of achieving better results as a company. The better we understand client needs and develop innovative solutions and the more flexible we are in adapting to change in our sector, the more successfully we will fulfil our mission of building a cleaner energy system.
Our leadership model seeks to promote our employees’ engagement to Fortum’s vision and strategy. When we reach better results through hard work, we want to share the success with our staff. One example of this is the forShares employee share savings programme launched in the autumn of 2019. During the annually commencing savings periods, the employees can save a proportion of their salaries each month and use it to purchase Fortum shares. As a gross reward, Fortum grants one matching share for each two purchased savings shares after three years from the beginning of the savings period. It is great to see that 40% of all the participating employees and over 50% of Finnish employees have seized the opportunity of investing in the first savings period that began on 1 January 2020.
In our work at Fortum, we get to have an impact on a central challenge facing humanity: slowing down climate change. It is a huge challenge and succeeding in this task also sets requirements for leadership. At Fortum, managing employees is based on the principles of open leadership. The principles form a framework for what we expect from Fortum employees – and what they can expect from Fortum as their employer. Open leadership is a leadership model based on positive psychology, aiming to provide our employees with the tools and confidence needed to actively follow and build the future of the energy sector.
The energy sector is going through a drastic change towards cleaner energy without compromising the security of supply. We are doing everything we can to reduce emissions to reach the goal of limiting global warming to 1.5 degrees, in accordance with the Paris agreement. The goal is clear, but the journey takes time, expertise and new innovations. Therefore, we want to have the best and most motivated employees in the industry – and the purpose of our leadership principles is to help our employees succeed in their work to the fullest extent.
Believe the best: believing in each other
Being open and offering challenges is a central part of our leadership model. Therefore, in recent years, we have engaged also our employees increasingly in the strategy process. Communicating about our strategy in an even more open and active manner is important to us so that our employees understand our business and the factors impacting it as profoundly as possible.
Together with our clients and society, our mission is to drive the change towards a cleaner world and energy production. But, to reach our destination, we also need to develop our company culture. That is why we have defined principles for our leadership model, forming a framework for what we expect from Fortum employees – and what they can expect from Fortum as their employer.
We believe in our people, which encourages them to believe in themselves and to grow and exceed expectations. We share responsibility, we involve each other and recognise efforts across organisational boundaries. We encourage cooperation and open discussion.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/leading-yourself-about-accountability-and-freedom
A continuous drive to learn and develop is also a key component in self-leadership. Curiosity is one of our core values at Fortum, and continuous learning is becoming part of our company culture.
But it is not only about attitude; companies need to establish smooth processes, common methods, and tools to support continuous improvement and learning. At Fortum, we have an ongoing effort to establish continuous improvement and learning, and to boost the sharing of best practices. The Operational Excellence program as well as the Must-Win-Battles are good examples of this.
By building on self-leadership and continuous learning, utilising the internal digital transformation alongside our strong company culture of openness and accountability, we can accelerate the future of work at Fortum.
Many companies and organisations see that the new normal will permanently change the way we are working. And the long period of remote working, with all its challenges and implications, has really been a catapult for leading yourself and your team in a different way. The balancing act between freedom and accountability is part of the new normal for our post-pandemic corporate way of working. We believe that self-leadership, for the individual and the manager, is here to stay.
Fortum Workforce 2.0 core team
At Fortum, we have seen leadership changing during the pandemic to focus more on coaching rather than managing in the new reality. During the past few years, we have implemented our company-wide Open Leadership principles, a solid foundation that we now can build on. Feedback from our leaders and employees last autumn showed a need for more concrete, operational-level support. How can we keep engagement up, even if we don’t meet physically? Are there proven methods on how I can help my team manage their tasks and time in an efficient way? How can I encourage my team to take care of each person’s wellbeing and support coping with stress and uncertainty?
Leading yourself and others
Leading yourself is about accountability and freedom | Fortum
We expect hybrid work, i.e. a combination of office/onsite and remote work in some form, to be the new standard for many of our employees, also once we are past the pandemic and can return to a more normal work-life. If we can create a hybrid solution that secures dynamic collaboration and innovation and combine it with an optimal work-life balance, we believe that it would be a win-win situation for everyone. At the moment, we are designing the future work model, which we will base on data and valuable insights from our managers and employees.
We are not going back; we are going forward.
The core team consists of Ann Boije af Gennäs, Business Technology, Matti Kattainen, Generation, and Kristina Kinik, Group Communications. The core team has been working fully remotely during the pandemic and cooperating completely virtually.
To meet these needs, we created a handbook with practical tips and tools on how to lead in the new reality of virtual teams. The handbook mainly targets managers, but it is available for all employees, as the tools presented are for everyone to use in their daily work. The ability to lead yourself and to continuously develop are essential parts of the new normal.
Today, with many of us working remotely, we have experienced an increased need for self-leadership. We all must decide on how and when to do our work, when we need input and support from others, and how to set sustainable targets for our own performance. Together with our teams and managers, we agree on the common framework, and then we can structure and control our own part. As colleagues, we are all responsible for our own actions, for our own work morale, for our collaboration with colleagues, and for bringing out the best in ourselves and others. Naturally, these have been true and important also prior to the pandemic and remote work. But the extended remote working period has really surfaced and highlighted the importance of such leadership practices in a unique way. If we all individually take responsibility for our own part, we become stronger as an entity. And by role modelling wellbeing, time management and ways of working, our self-leadership capabilities grow.
15 February 2021, 10:51
So, what is self-leadership, and what do we actually mean by it? For independent workers, freelancers and entrepreneurs, it is part of their way of delivering their services and building their businesses. But for companies and employees, it is often a way to modernise the way of working. By empowering people to take even more responsibility for their own work, development and wellbeing, research shows that engagement and productivity tend to increase. In the current era, characterized by a decreasing trend of productivity improvements in the labour productivity, this is very important indeed. For some reason, the significant investments into IT tools and systems are no longer raising the productivity as much as in the past. Therefore, the new ways of leaders ensuring appropriately clear direction, coupled with strong empowerment and effective self-leadership are so important.
Designing the future of work
&
The global pandemic has not only impacted the human health situation, but also the corporate way of working. The strategic initiative “Workforce 2.0” was established to analyse what structured, long-term changes we need to implement at Fortum. The long-term changes and scenarios will be mixed with short-term adaptations and actions.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/careers/opportunities-students
Questions about student collaboration?
Summer job
We enjoy the occasions to meet you! We collaborate with students and educational institutions. Feel free to contact us at
fortumcareers
Thesis and internships
See open positions
Internships and thesis are a great way of getting to know you while you are still a student. These also serve as excellent opportunities for you to learn about our business and culture. Because we think the company should fit you and not just the other way around. An internship with us will generally be a 1-6-month period, where you get the opportunity to be a part of a team and gain practical experience within your field of studies.
For students
Ready to kickstart your career at Fortum? We offer a wide range of exciting opportunities for students and graduates, from trainee jobs to thesis assignments, apprenticeships to graduate opportunities. We are eager to help you explore and develop your full potential with us.
could be a great start of your journey at Fortum.
Opportunities for students
Opportunities for students | Fortum
Energetic summer jobs
Explore jobs
"At Fortum, I have established connections, which are more personal than I expected and I genuinely enjoy meeting my team members at the office."
if you have any questions regarding student collaborations. The most common forms of collaboration are events and excursions, career fairs and visiting lecturers. But we are always open to new ideas.
Summer Traineeship in Data Services
Each summer we offer opportunities for around 150 students and recent graduates. You will get to work with interesting projects and assignments in your field to gain valuable experience and expand your network, in the heart of the energy industry. Most of our summer trainees work in our Espoo headquarters, in Loviisa power plant and in Recycling and Waste premises in Riihimäki.
Important information: Fortum does not provide or share any contractual documents, job offers, interview invites or request any kind of payment via social media channels.
Read more about Nam's journey with us!


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/tri-nam-junior-data-engineer
I also learned about the practice of a mindset with extreme ownership, which means that everyone should take responsibility in not only everything they work on but also the project work as a collective. This means that good work is recognized and if unexpected events occur, the focus is not to find a culprit but to handle them as a team. I stayed at Fortum after summer because I enjoy my work very much and I get paid well for doing it. I have established connections, which are more personal than I expected and I genuinely enjoy meeting my team members at the office.
Tri Nam, Junior Data Engineer
Tri Nam, Junior Data Engineer | Fortum
The first day was fun, our team went to have lunch together. I was introduced to my "buddy" who was very patient and dedicated to all of my questions, no matter how silly I thought they were. The assignments were hard at times, but there was enough time for me to breathe and no one was pressuring me to finish them quickly. Whenever I felt discouraged for not having progressed fast enough, I was comforted by other team members. The team was also trying out a new practice called pair-coding, which essentially means that two (or more) developers work on a piece of code or a debugging problem together, so ideas can be bounced off – this also helps with error-proofing the code. This was a new experience for me and I quite enjoyed it.
Changing careers felt challenging but I was surprised to see how well I could handle the technical questions and how well I got along with the team manager and other team members during the job interview. The summer traineeship was a steep learning curve for me. I had asked about the technology stack used in the team in advance to use it in my thesis, which helped with the onboarding. I was given a brand new laptop with an international English keyboard layout, which showed that Fortum cares about its employees and their work experience.
I was proud of how I managed to find connections between my degree and work, which helped me catch up to the team. Every day I left the office feeling more comfortable working with the tasks I received and confident that I would complete the next ones faster. Sometimes I would find it challenging to keep a good routine in order to and be consistent with my work. However, my team members were very understanding and helpful. I was reminded repeatedly that "work is a marathon, not a sprint" so I should maintain a balanced workload.
I came across the Fortum job advertisement for summer traineeship when I was looking for an internship as a Data Engineer. I had studied to become a Software Engineer but wanted to work in Data Science.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/careers/opportunities-students/summer-energy
What data / information should I include to my application?
22.11.2022 LUT & LAB DuuniDay
How do I know that I have successfully submitted an application?
10.11.2022 Aalto Talent Expo
Our recruiters / recruiting managers review each job applicant. They will reach out to those who appear to be a potential match with the position to agree about next steps. If you don’t hear from us right away - don’t worry - that might be because at times we are going through a lot of applications. If your profile and your experiences match with the requirements of the role, the next step is typically a short video interview or a personal interview. Video interviews are used in the first interview stage. They are flexible for you, as you can record the answers any time that suits you the best.
Make the most of your summer job
The greatest challenge of our time is here. Do you want to take an active role for a cleaner world and join us? We employ around 150 summer trainees every summer in Finland. With us, you can jump into the world of the circular economy, gain experience in hydropower, nuclear power or district heating or learn new things in innovation, HR or financial administration tasks. Summer employees work with us in versatile tasks, gaining valuable experience in working life, as well as expert guidance in the heart of the energy industry. For us, all kinds of backgrounds are valuable and we hire trainees in different stages of their studies.
Energetic Summer Jobs at Fortum | Fortum
Energetic Summer Jobs at Fortum
How to apply for a summer job at Fortum?
Our recruitment process
This depend on your role and tasks. Many of us Fortumers work in a hybrid model which is a combination of remote and office work.
Unfortunately, we are unable to respond personally to every application that we receive. But we will inform you by email if we don't move forward with your application. Good thing is that you can accept to be considered for other positions as well. In this case, we have your profile in the loop and can call you back, with a job that might be an even better fit for you.
The recruitment process for summer trainees begins with the review of applications. Our first contact is often an e-mail invitation to a video interview, after which the most suitable candidates for the position are invited to meet the recruiting manager at our premises. Below you can find a Q&A with questions and answers you might find helpful.
The salary of a trainee is determined by the nature and difficulty of the work assignment, prior experience and  educational background.
As a large company, we provide you as a student or recent graduate countless paths to build your career exactly the way you want. We offer opportunities for summer trainees to continue working part-time after the summer. We are flexible so that it would be easy for you to combine your work and studies. We also have dozens of thesis workers every year, so this is one way to continue your career with us. Read more about
After submitting your application, you will receive an automated email confirmation. You can also log in to your candidate profile and check which jobs you have applied for.
If you have any questions about a specific job, you can reach out to our recruiting manager. The contact details can be found from the job ad.
Is it possible to work remotely at Fortum?
Is it possible to continue working in the company after the summer traineeship?
What is the recruitment process like for summer jobs?
Come meet us
26.1.2023 Contact Forum, Helsinki
How do you define the salary for summer trainees?
31.1.2023 Tekniikan työnantajapäivät, Metropolia
Summer Energy
Summer Job Q&A
Summer Jobs at Fortum
27.10.2022 The Energy Event of Finland, Tampere
In 2023 the application period for summer jobs is from 9th of January until 2nd of February. You can find all open jobs from our job listing.  To find the relevant jobs easier you can narrow down the selection of jobs by choosing "Summer Energy" from the job category filter. When you find the right opportunity for you, simply click "apply" and continue to submit your application.
Click to browse open jobs
Is it possible to apply for several summer jobs?
In your CV, clearly state your educational background and experience by indicating why you are the ideal match for the job you are applying for. Do you have specific trainings, school projects you participated or hobbies that could be relevant? Then let us know. You can also submit a cover letter together with your CV to highlight your motivation. We recommend to use a PDF document.
Summer Jobs
Many of our trainees continue working after the summer. This could be for example hourly-work or thesis work combined with your studies.
24.1.2023 LUT Partner Day
How can I get additional information / answers to my questions?
It's likely that there can be several interesting job opportunities open. Just remember that there might be multiple recruiters and hiring managers reading through the applications so we encourage to tailor your applications for each individual job.
Summer jobs are open for applications
(in Finnish).


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/careers/frequently-asked-questions-contact
How do I find open jobs at Fortum?
Frequently asked questions & contact
Unfortunately, we are unable to respond personally to every application that we receive. But we will inform you by email if we don't move forward with your application.
You can find our job openings
Can I submit an open application?
Didn't find the answer you were looking for? Our team is happy to answer any questions you might have related to recruitments or
We don’t support open applications. If you don’t find a job that catches your attention, then just bookmark our job listing or follow us on LinkedIn. A job for you will come, sooner or later.
Do you have specific trainings, certificates, speak additional languages or not yet fulfilling all criteria but are eager to further develop in this role ? Then let us know.
Please note that we cannot accept any applications via e-mail.
For more information on how we collect and store data during recruitment process, please see our
Do I need to register to apply?
We offer a variety of positions for students to work with us as trainees, thesis workers or interns. We also offer entry level positions once you are ready to graduate. All our open jobs can be found
Can I send an email application?
In your CV, clearly state your educational background and experience by indicating why you are the ideal match for the team and this job you are applying for.
In which language should I write my application?
Use the filters to narrow down listed search results to a specific country or area of expertise. You can also use open search field.
For open Jobs at our Consumer Solutions business, please click here
Consumer Solutions Jobs
, please search for “Fortum”.
If you wish to hear more and meet some of our trainees, visit:
How can I be sure that my application has been received?
Please apply in the language the job ad is written in. Fortum is an international company and our employees might speak different languages. So there is a reason why a job ad for a position located in Finland or Germany is in English. Simply, the team language might be English.
Good thing is that you can accept to be considered for other positions aswell. In this case, we have your profile in the loop and can call you back, with a job that might be an even better fit for you.
student collaboration.
If your profile and your experiences match with the requirements of this role, we will take next steps with you together. Depending on the process, this might include a short video interview, a telephone call or a personal interview.
How to apply and start your career at Fortum
FAQ & contact
However, if you would like to make changes to your application prior to the end of application period, you would need to register a candidate account. Through the candidate account it's also possible to follow up the application process.
Frequently asked questions & contact | Fortum
You can contact us by sending an e-mail to
How does Fortum process my personal data?
Completing job applications can be challenging and time consuming by trying to figure out what information recruiter and hiring manager are looking for?
Privacy notice for Job applicants
To ensure equal treatment and legal compliance in our recruitment process, we do not accept any applications via e-mail.
For open jobs in Estonia, please visit
You might have already heard about or Summer Energy campaign, right?
Do you hire students or recent graduates?
What information and documents should be included in the application?
We delete or de-identify personal data that has been collected as part of the recruitment when it is no longer necessary for the purposes it was collected for. If Fortum hires you, your personal data may become part of your employee record.
Our recruiting managers review each job applicant. They will reach out to those who appear to be a potential match with the position to agree about next steps. If you don’t hear from us right away - don’t worry - that might be because at times we are going through a lot of applications.
Please make sure to use a .pdf document.
Can I edit my application after submitting it?
If you created a candidate profile you can log in and update your application within the application period.
You can simply apply without registering - even with your LinkedIn profile only.
. To make it even easy easier for you, we have implemented two filters you can use: “Summer Trainee” and “Students”.
We understand your struggle and offer you some guidelines when applying:
What happens after I have submitted my application?
Your CV has some gaps - is this a problem? Absolutely not. Just as every person is different, so is your CV. Maybe you have backpacked in New Zealand, worked as a volunteer or spent time with your family. Let us know as all those experiences have built the person you are.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/faces-of-transition
Read more about a career at Fortum
Read more about the topics
Meet the faces
Read more: Data centres
Tiina, Development manager
Meet our Faces of Transition | Fortum
Get to know Fortum’s and Uniper’s Faces of transition – a group of passionate people sharing their stories on how they all work towards the same goal; to create a cleaner world for us all. Stay tuned for more stories!
Fortum Battery Solutions
Nuclear power plays an important role in clean energy production. As a reliable, CO2-free energy source, it helps satisfy today’s increasing electricity needs while mitigating climate change. Over its lifecycle, nuclear power has a carbon footprint as low as wind, hydro and solar power.
Read more: Nuclear power
There’s a technology that could cut 15% of Oslo’s climate emissions overnight. Markus Sebastian, who works with the carbon capture project, tells us how.
Markus Sebastian, Public Affairs Manager
Data volumes are growing exponentially worldwide, and the use of cloud services is on the rise. This will quickly expand the need for powerful data centres. Finland has excellent opportunities to mitigate the climate impacts of digitalisation: we can offer data centres clean electricity and use the waste heat generated by the centres to replace coal-based heat production.
Read more: Hydro power
Martin, NURES Product Manager
Read more: Battery solutions
Meet our Faces of Transition
The Internet consumes a lot of electricity. But what if you could use that energy to heat our homes, offices and buildings, carbon-free? Tiina talks about how we can reuse the heat from data centres in district heating.
Bóas, Business Development Manager
Do you want to be one of the Faces of Transition?
Cleaner World
Fortum and Uniper are together already one of the largest CO2-free power producers in Europe. Our target is to be completely carbon-neutral in Europe by 2035 and globally by 2050. But what is the key ingredient to ensuring that our energy production is clean, reliable and sustainable? The answer: our people!
Nuclear power plays a very important role in our transition to renewable energy sources. But what about nuclear waste? Let’s hear Martin, who works as Product Manager for NURES, a technology that purifies radioactive liquids.
Are batteries powering up the climate battle? Yes, but it doesn’t come without a challenge. Bóas, working to build a culture of circularity at Fortum, talks about the need to revolutionize battery recycling and how far we have come.
Climate change is on everyone’s lips – and it should be! We have a massive challenge in front of us to make sure that we can live in a world where clean energy is available for all of us reliably and at a reasonable price. To do that, we need to change the energy system together.
Can a technology over 100 years old help us battle climate change? Hydropower might be old, but it’s still gold. Alessandro, responsible for making Fortum’s hydropower even better, explains why.
Meet Fortum’s Faces of transition!
How do data centres impact climate?
With us you can take an active role in driving the change for a cleaner world. We value your curiosity and will to make your personal impact visible where it matters – keeping societies running with clean energy and sustainable solutions.
The greatest challenge of our time awaits you!
Alessandro, Business Developer


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/news-and-publications/cleaner-world
In a circular economy recycled products are used to produce valuable raw materials
Reducing transportation emissions requires new kinds of solutions to replace fossil fuels. Electricity offers a solution for passenger cars, and hydrogen is expected to be a similar solution for the needs of heavy-duty transportation. What does the electric future of transportation look like? How can you be part of the future of transportation?
How will tomorrow's cities be heated and cooled?
We are over-using the earth’s natural resources earlier every year because the carbon footprint of people is constantly growing. We are consuming natural resources faster than the earth’s ability to regenerate them. That is why we need the circular economy – to keep raw materials in circulation. How is the circular economy realised in practice? How can you have an impact?
Nuclear - CO2-free for climate
Most climate change will be tackled in urban areas. Buildings use nearly 40 per cent of all the energy consumed in Finland, and they cause more than 30 per cent of the carbon emissions. District heating is a superb solution as we transition quickly and on a large scale towards emission-free heating. In the future, we will see more and more district heating that transfers waste heat from data centres and industry to buildings, as well as heating based on renewable electricity.
Electrification - the biggest climate action?
In the future, there will be a time of abundant renewable energy with reasonable or even low production costs. Looking at the past solar and wind production cost development and the current increasingly strong focus on hydrogen development, the path towards renewable energy is clear albeit rocky at times. The next step towards a cleaner world is to set the target on materials.
The world of energy is like a complex ecosystem. Many different players – energy producers, industrial clients, consumers, decision-makers, and various partners – contribute to creating a balanced, sustainable energy system. Now, in the midst of the energy transition towards carbon neutrality, it is all the more important that we work together to reach our shared climate goals.
The future of energy is flexible
Wind power production has developed rapidly in a very short time. As a clean, renewable source of energy, its role in electricity production is growing as the EU and other countries strive to reduce their CO2 emissions and dependence on fossil fuels. Electrification is an important step on the way to carbon-neutrality, but it means that our need for electricity will increase. Especially in the north, wind power is the dominating form of new renewable sources of energy.
These pages introduce and discuss phenomena and themes that are important for the future of the world from the perspective of energy and mitigating climate change. We need to move towards a cleaner world – fast. We can no longer build our wellbeing on the consumption of finite resources. To decarbonize entire societies and industries, the world needs much more clean energy than there is available today. Optimizing today’s energy production, making it as CO2-low and efficient as possible, is part of solving climate challenges. The 2020s will be the decade of electrification and turning waste into resources.
Decarbonisation is a joint effort
Natural gas, i.e. methane, is the cleanest of fossil fuels; its CO2 emissions are about half of that of coal and just one-third of brown coal emissions. Replacing coal with gas reduces total emissions by hundreds of millions of tonnes annually in Europe. In the long term, natural gas also must be replaced with clean gas to reduce emissions to zero. But what is clean gas? What role does clean gas play in the future energy system?
We have a huge challenge in front of us to make sure that we can live in a world where clean energy is available for all of us reliably and at a reasonable price. To do that, we need to change the energy system together. Get to know Fortum’s and Uniper’s Faces of transition – a group of passionate people sharing their stories on how they all work towards the same goal; to create a cleaner world for us all.
Why does Europe’s pathway to clean energy go through natural gas?
How material scarcity takes us towards a cleaner world
Nuclear power plays an important role in clean energy production. As a reliable, CO2-free energy source, it helps satisfy today’s increasing electricity needs while mitigating climate change. And unlike other CO2-free production methods, we can count on nuclear power because electricity is generated at a consistent rate regardless of weather conditions. Over its lifecycle, nuclear power has a carbon footprint as low as wind, hydro and solar power.
Wind power is a must for carbon neutrality to succeed
Climate change is forcing the world to decarbonise quickly. Yet, at the same time, energy consumption is increasing. The technology needed for a clean energy system is already available, but how do you find the right balance and ensure that there is always a sufficient supply of energy available at a reasonable cost? A key component is energy flexibility.
Fossil fuels must be phased out – in electricity production as well as in industry, heating and transportation. Above all, this is a battle against climate change. To stop global warming, energy must be produced and consumed in new, sustainable ways. It’s an enormous challenge, but it can be solved. When the production of clean electricity has been mainstreamed, the next step is to electrify everything that can be electrified. How is this possible? Is hydrogen the missing piece to the energy equation?
Cleaner World | Fortum
Future of transportation – electricity and hydrogen


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/how-will-tomorrows-cities-be-heated-and-cooled
One office building is a small heat source, but once we start thinking about operations that require large amounts of electricity, the number of possible heat sources becomes enormous. For example,
The recovery and transfer of waste heat for buildings through district networks is part of climate change mitigation and the European energy transition. Using recovered excess heat means there is less need for other energy sources such as natural gas and coal. Instead, industrial-scale heat pumps that use electricity very efficiently can be used to transfer heat.
European detached houses are primarily heated individually using an oil- or natural gas-fired boiler or electricity, i.e. radiators and heat pumps. Installing large-scale heat pumps for entire neighbourhoods or a city instead of adopting building-specific pumps can serve multiple users through a district heating network that can direct heat to where it is needed most.
cogeneration
Cooling buildings energy efficiently
The new generation of district heating is based on replacing fossil fuels with smart and flexible solutions that optimise the heat consumption of buildings, operate efficiently driven by artificial intelligence, and utilise multiple clean heat sources.
Even conventional water-cooling units often use considerable amounts of electricity for chilling water. A centralised solution for cooling, using renewable electricity, is an ecological and emission-free alternative.
is already the world’s ‘coolest’ way to improve the comfort level during the heat of the summer. It is a reliable way to reduce heat and humidity from buildings in urban areas. In a district cooling network, energy is redrawn to a district cooling water from the heated buildings.
of electricity and heat as a mid-term solution, and the recovery of waste heat from industry.
How will tomorrow’s cities be heated and cooled?
Recovery of waste heat – but how?
Energy in the network can then either be reclaimed to bring heat to the buildings and tap water in wintertime or be cooled down with for example environmentally friendly seawater in the summertime. District cooling generates 97% less carbon emissions than cooling that is produced with traditional water-cooling units.
Buildings owned by consumers, companies and communities can also become heat producers in a clean district heating network. In theory, any building that produces waste heat with clean energy could become a seller of district heat. Data centers, for instance, could cut their energy costs by selling their excess heat to the local district heating network.
are ideal heat sources as they consume lots of electricity and produce huge amount of heat in the process. They can sell their waste heat to a district heating network and, in doing so, reduce their operating costs. Only the district heating network is able to recycle and redistribute vast amounts of thermal energy that would otherwise be wasted.
We all want our homes to stay warm in the winter and comfortable also in the summer. If we want to curb climate change, however, we have to think about how we are heating and cooling our homes and other buildings. Climate change mitigation requires stronger link between the different energy sectors, such as buildings, transport and industry, to help them reduce carbon emissions. For instance, capturing excess heat generated by industry and data centers offers great opportunities for saving energy and cutting emissions at the same time.
With emissions and the related costs quickly reducing, district heating will be even more competitive for customers; for individual buildings, it will be the most reliable in terms of delivery, and, for society, the most sustainable way for heating in urban areas.
In Europe, natural gas is the primary energy source for space heating in cities. It typically relies on a collective boiler room that disperses the heat to apartments. The plus side of natural gas is that it is cheap and easy to store. However, like other fossil fuels, it is not very eco-friendly. In addition, these building-specific systems are not usually scaled for extremely low temperatures. Consequently, each apartment is supplemented with direct electric heating. This puts an added load on the electricity system.
Electrical air conditioning equipment has become more widely adopted in Europe in the recent decades. However, they require considerable amounts of energy, placing an additional load on the electricity system. Individual air cooling units are not the best solution in urban areas because, on top of all existing electricity consumption, electrical grid capacity has to be amped up considerably to meet the demands of these types of equipment.
For example, Fortum and the Finnish city of Espoo have
District heating is an ingenious space heating solution because it is not dependent on any single source of heat, and it does not even require combustion. Excess heat produced in industrial processes, in data centers and at wastewater treatment plants, for example, can be captured for emission-free heating to buildings. In advanced systems, excess heat is already recovered using heat pumps and injected into the district heating network.
District cooling
committed to carbon-neutral district heating
in the district heating network operating in the Espoo, Kauniainen and Kirkkonummi regions in the 2020s. An intermediate goal is to phase out coal in 2025. The project is called Espoo Clean Heat.
Invented in the Nordic countries, district heating is a unique and efficient way to heat urban real estate. From the perspective of residents, district heating is a convenient service: a heat consumer does not have to worry about investments, maintenance, or whether there is enough heat – even in freezing temperatures. Eco-friendly heated water circulates through underground pipelines and provides heat to buildings and their service water.
Do you want to know more?
District heating – the way of the future
A centralised heating system solves the problem of fluctuations in electricity consumption. Many European countries have used district heating systems for decades, but at the European level, they are overwhelmingly fired by coal or natural gas. Because district heating is not dependent on any single heat source, it would make sense to connect district heating networks to more climate-friendly heat sources.
How will tomorrow’s cities be heated and cooled? | Fortum
A district heating network is capable of transferring heat to buildings from virtually any heat source. Even though a considerable share of district heating in Europe is still produced with natural gas and coal, several emission-free or carbon-neutral sources can be used to transfer heat to district heating networks. These sources account for a continuously growing share of production. The most significant recent changes in district heating include the transition to distributed, renewable electricity-based production forms,
on a large scale. Just one big data centre operating on wind power electricity could cover 35 per cent of Espoo’s district heat production – without emissions.
Read about the journey towards a cleaner world
capture waste heat from data centers
data centers
Urban areas are in a central position in curbing climate change. In Europe, buildings use nearly half of the total energy consumed and cause approximately 40 per cent of carbon emissions. A quick and large scale move towards emission-free heating of buildings requires innovative ways to use existing technologies. A shining example of this is district heating, popular especially in the Nordic countries, as it can use waste heat from data centers and industry to heat buildings.
Luckily, about 40% of the European population live in cities where these efforts need to take place. As different sectors of industry and energy become interlinked in urban areas to minimise wasted energy, in the future buildings in rural areas can increasingly be heated with clean, renewable electricity without an excessive load on the grid or, for instance, with
Heating cities without burning
Where can district heating be adopted?
It has been suggested that district heating networks will play a considerable role in attaining the European Union’s targets of Secure, Clean, and Efficient Energy. However, district heating is not, at least yet, a viable option for areas with low population density. In order for the infrastructure to be efficient, it requires a high density of heat consuming buildings connected to the network.
Cleaner world
Challenges of space heating in Europe
Clean district heating is like a public transport
hydrogen instead of natural gas
For example, one goal is to
Articles about phenomena and themes that are important for the future of the world from the perspective of energy and mitigating climate change


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/recycling-energy-data-centres-helps-abolish-coal
Head of Strategy Deployment, Generation division
As ‘energy architects’, we at Fortum are working hard with our partners to improve opportunities to bring new data centres to Finland and the Helsinki metropolitan area. An important task in this work is finding and developing plots to accommodate the needs of data centres. If we succeed in creating favourable operating conditions – and then in successfully marketing them to relevant players – our homes and offices in the future will be increasingly heated with cost-effective and clean data heat.
Two important perspectives for the data centre discussion
Climate change mitigation is forcing us to rethink this process – and that’s a good thing.  We must abolish coal – and eventually all combustion. The carbon-free electrical energy produced in the Nordic countries, heat pumps and district heating networks will play a big role in these efforts.
With data centres, as with most other industrial sectors, economies of scale are applicable: efficiency can be improved by centralising operations into bigger entities. Economies of scale also work in energy. When companies and other players move their small servers to big, centralised data centres, energy efficiency fundamentally improves. In big data centres, also the small energy savings with individual servers or components become significant when there are a lot of components. Similarly, achieving better data security is fundamentally easier in big data centres. Data security is not directly related to energy, but it is definitely a significant factor behind the growth of the industry and cloud services.
We live in an increasingly digital society, and it’s easy to think that digitalisation lives in data centres. People in the cold Northern climate live in homes and work in offices that need to be heated for most of the year. Back in the olden days, heat was generated by burning logs and twigs in baking ovens and masonry heaters. That was eventually replaced with gas and coal, which have a higher energy content than wood and are combusted in big power plants. The heat that is generated is transmitted to homes through energy-efficient district heating networks.
What is the link between digitalisation and district heating, and why are energy companies so interested in data centres? The simple answer to this is clearly techno-economic: by combining these two things we can reduce the operating expenses of data centre players through the sale of waste heat and offer energy companies a competitive alternative for the replacement of fossil-based heat production. Recycling the electrical energy used by data centres by using it in district heating significantly improves the ecological aspect of both operations, and that makes for a particularly interesting equation in the fight against climate change.
Press kit
Like I noted in my February 2019 blog, the data centre sector is one of the fastest growing sectors in the Nordic countries. Now, in September 2019, this remains true, and data centre players continue to have a strong interest in the placement of new data centres in the Nordic countries. Over the course of the year we have been pleased to read news about new data centre projects in Sweden and Norway. But Finland has been missing from these news stories. The single biggest reason for this is Finland’s significantly higher electricity tax compared to our Nordic neighbours.
Finland, too, needs data centre investments
Data heat for tomorrow’s homes and offices
All major investments spark a debate, with people passionately for or against an issue. Having a discussion is good and necessary; without a discussion, it’s impossible to implement big projects in a democratic society. It is an indisputable fact that data centres are electricity-intensive. However, it makes sense to look at the issue from two other perspectives.
23 September 2019, 13:13
2. Data centres in the Nordic countries use clean electricity
Antti Rinne’s Government Programme (Inclusive and competent Finland – a socially, economically and ecologically sustainable society) contains several positive entries related to energy taxation. The programme rightly identifies, e.g., emissions-free electricity, and the central role of power and heat sector integration in the pursuit for a carbon-neutral society. Next it is important to ensure that the identified needs for change are implemented.
Collaboration between data centres and district heating networks is a win-win
The eco-friendliness of energy procurement and use has become the most important aspect in the decision-making criteria, alongside costs, in data centre investments. When a data centre player makes an investment decision on a new data centre, a long-term power purchase agreement with a requirement for carbon emission-free production is made in most cases in the same conjunction. Often the requirement is also that the electricity is produced in a new electricity production plant specifically made for the project; in the case of the Nordic countries today, this typically means wind power. Thus, ideally, one data centre investment simultaneously creates two investments that have national economic significance.
Recycling energy from data centres helps to abolish coal
1. Centralisation improves efficiency
Recycling energy from data centres helps to abolish coal | Fortum
Finland can’t afford to lose all the data centre investments to neighbouring countries. Coal combustion will end in Finland by May 2029 at the latest. On the other hand, the lead time from planning to implementation of replacement investments, like a new bioenergy plant, takes several years with license applications. Utilising a data centre’s waste heat with heat pumps and carbon dioxide-free electricity is one of the most effective ways to replace fossil heat production, cleanly and combustion-free.
What is the link between digitalisation and district heating, and why are energy companies so interested in data centres?


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/media/press-kits/fortum-clean-energy-architect-data-centres



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/heating-cities-without-burning
For example, data centres would be ideal heat sources, as they consume lots of electricity; they could actually sell the waste heat to the district heating network and in doing so could reduce their operating costs
Digitalisation enables better living conditions
Espoo Clean Heat project
By utilising customers’ demand flexibility, we could cut some of the system-level demand peaks, which are typically the most challenging to cover. This doesn’t mean that customers would have to live with cooler homes during cold periods – actually, the end user wouldn’t notice a thing.
Customer insight
Extensive electrification is seen as the best way to decarbonise society. In many cases, using waste heat as heat actually
Don’t waste heat – it can be recycled
digital tools and artificial intelligence
Heat storages are 100 times cheaper than electric batteries
. In most applications where electricity is being consumed, most of the electricity actually converts into heat. My laptop’s cooling fan is cycling on and off as I’m writing this post in order to move the heat produced by the processor and other components to the air outside the laptop’s casing. This heats up the office I’m sitting in and results in either a reduced need to heat up the office space or a need to even cool down the office. The warm air is typically cooled down by an air conditioner and the excess heat is blown outside the building.
. Only the district heating network is able to recycle and redistribute that amount of thermal energy. If (and when) heat recovery becomes mainstream, the heat production topology would change from a few large, centralised production units to smaller, geographically scattered units.
For a heating company like Fortum, the change described above is fundamental, as we need to change from a vendor of energy into a service provider who ensures that customers receive exactly what they need. We cannot make this change alone; we need to do it together with our customers, our partners and society.
, they will play a major role on the journey towards a fossil-free heating system. As in all energy-related issues, maintaining balance is key.
Digitalisation
Let’s start with
Development of different electricity storage technologies, especially lithium-ion, has been rapid, but these technologies are still not economically feasible for storing a large amount of energy. And there are many challenges related to the raw materials needed for these technologies.
Storing electricity as heat is actually 50 to 100 times more efficient than storing it in batteries. Basically, the water is heated and is stored in a hot water storage for a day, a week or even a season. Therefore, in the future energy system district heating networks and purpose-built heat storages can help the electricity system by storing excess electricity and using the stored heat to meet the heating demands of customers.
heating. The technological and economic development of wind and solar power generation has been extremely fast, and today they are the cheapest forms of electricity production. However, both solar and wind are intermittent production forms, as their production depends on weather conditions.
kulla
Heating the cities without burning
13 November 2019, 17:06
Many heat producers in the Nordics have stated that they will stop burning coal within the coming years; Fortum, for example, has a solid plan to close down all its coal burning capacity in Espoo in 2025. Before that, security of supply must be ensured. In the longer term, we can stop burning entirely. How are we going to do that? The plan consists of four major elements:
Carbon neutral district heating in Espoo in 2020s
In the longer term, we can stop burning in energy production entirely. Four major elements are needed to achieve that.
Heating and Cooling
Recovery of waste heat
All in all, it is possible to move from fossil-fired to fossil-free heat production, as evidenced by our
waste heat
The transition away from fossil-based fuels has started and the pace is increasing. Currently, wind and solar are already mainstream in electricity production, and heat is increasingly being produced with bio-fuels, waste-derived fuel and gas.
We have now gone from centralised to decentralised, connected heating to electricity and taken customer demand flexibility into use. After all this, the system becomes far too complex to manage manually. We need
Heating the cities without burning | Fortum
In advanced systems, excess heat is already recovered using heat pumps and injected into the district heating network. One office building is a small heat source, but if you start thinking about activities where large amounts of electricity are being consumed, the number of possible heat sources becomes enormous.
. The future system produces lots of data through different measurements at the customer end, in the heat network, etc. In order to manage this, heat producers need to develop their ability to manage enormous amounts of data and turn that data into meaningful operational decisions that are timed just right.
If smart sensors measuring temperature and humidity were installed in apartments or offices, the heating delivered would be just the right amount to maintain a consistent temperature and the quality of living would increase. And it would bring an energy savings, too!
Antti Kaikkonen on ForTheDoers blog
electrifies
Head of System Optimisation and Fuel Management
Electrification
customers
Speaking of
Viki Kaasinen on ForTheDoers blog
. All the tools needed to make the change are actually already available. Now is just a matter of hard work, dedication and commitment!


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/hydrogen-economy-coming-sooner-or-later
The cost of renewable-powered hydrogen production is decreasing all the time, as electrolysers become more common and the unit sizes grow. Currently, there is less than 200 megawatts of electrolyser capacity in use for hydrogen production globally, and the majority of electrolysers are smaller than one megawatt. However, there are plans for several 100-megawatt projects, so the production capacity will increase rapidly.
. In this case, the overall efficiency from electricity to hydrogen to energy can be as much as 60-80 per cent. Apart from producing power and heat, hydrogen will be used in the transport sector in the future.
Infobox: Hydrogen – the most common element in the universe
Hydrogen is the most common element in the universe, but the earth’s atmosphere contains very little of it; it always bonds with other elements like carbon in natural gas. Hydrogen is a good storage substance because its energy density is the highest of all the elements. It is also the lightest, but it takes a lot of space, so in practice it is usually pressurised when stored. A hydrogen atom is very small; it leaks easily and is also explosive, so hydrogen must be handled with care.
The most optimistic estimates project that, in the future, as much as one quarter of the global energy demand could be met with hydrogen-based production. This would require enormous growth in electrolysis capacity and also a significant decrease in electrolyser prices. The fact that the cost of solar and wind power has continued to decline will also lead to a lower production cost of hydrogen. Currently, the largest cost component of hydrogen produced by electrolysis is electricity.
In my work as a solar technology expert, I have studied
However, the efficiency can be improved by recovering the heat generated in electrolysis.
vartiainen
The waste heat recovered at combined heat and power plants can be used in district heating networks
PV prosumer
. It is clear that energy must be available also at times when it is not possible to produce enough wind and solar power. Hydrogen is one of the solutions that can offer a seasonal storage of energy and thus advance the energy transition. But how is it done technically, and what kinds of challenges are there on the way from hype to reality?
With electrolysis, however, the hydrogen production process can also be entirely emissions-free. In this process, electricity is used to break down the water molecules into oxygen and hydrogen, the latter of which is stored. Herein lies a key aspect of the future of hydrogen in power production: when the production of solar and wind power exceeds what the power grid needs, the “excess” electricity can be used to produce hydrogen. The hydrogen is stored and then taken into use when solar and wind power are not available.
The hydrogen economy can help to offset fluctuations in energy production and consumption, and it enables a rapid increase of solar and wind power, and, ultimately, the transition to a completely carbon-neutral energy system in the future.
The challenge of storage and transfer
Hydrogen has been a known energy source for more than two centuries, and the hydrogen economy is also one of the perceived cornerstones of the future energy system. As a flexible fuel, hydrogen can replace natural gas.
The hydrogen economy is coming – sooner or later | Fortum
Storage and transfer pose the biggest challenges with hydrogen due to its chemical nature. Underground salt caverns hold the most potential as hydrogen storage sites. Today only six of them are used for this purpose around the world, but thousands are used for storing natural gas. Hydrogen can also be stored in rock caverns or as ammonia, liquid hydrogen or liquid organic hydrogen carriers. Pressurised tanks are best suited for storing smaller amounts.
At Fortum, we believe that hydrogen will play a significant role for a utility of the future, and we have recently formed a Hydrogen Development team to take us into that space. Fortum has also joined Hydrogen Europe, the main industry & research association in Europe, which promotes the use of hydrogen in an emission-free society. Fortum’s subsidiary Uniper is also a member of the association and a pioneer among energy companies when it comes to hydrogen. Uniper has two hydrogen production plants, one in Hamburg and the other in Falkenhagen, Germany, where hydrogen produced with wind power can also be methanised or transferred directly into the natural gas network.
The best way to transfer large volumes of hydrogen, as well as natural gas, is through pipelines. The type of pipeline needed for the high-pressured transfer of large volumes of hydrogen is different than for the transfer of natural gas, but there are already thousands of kilometres of pipeline suitable for hydrogen transfer in the world. In the future, hydrogen pipelines will likely be made from composite plastics. Hydrogen can be transported also by ship or truck, but it is clearly more expensive than using pipelines.
Solar and wind power stored in the form of hydrogen
Hydrogen can be used to fuel special types of gas turbines that can turn it into electricity. Another method is to use hydrogen in fuel cells; at the moment, this is an expensive alternative. No emissions are generated when combusting pure hydrogen; the only end product besides electricity is water.
Fossil hydrogen: hydrogen produced with fossil fuels, like natural gas, and which creates CO2 emissions (known as grey hydrogen)
When producing hydrogen with electrolysis, the efficiency is currently 60-70 per cent, i.e. about one third of the electricity used goes to waste as heat. When hydrogen is used to produce electricity again, using a gas turbine or a fuel cell, the efficiency is 40-55 per cent. Thus the overall efficiency from electricity to hydrogen and back to electricity is 24-38 per cent.
Combined heat and power production improves efficiency
Hydrogen is an old invention, but still increasingly discussed today. In the future energy system, hydrogen can help to offset fluctuations in energy production and consumption, and it enables the increase of solar and wind power in the energy system.
Hydrogen has been a known energy source for more than two centuries; in fact, the first combustion engine developed in the early 1800s was hydrogen-fuelled. Today hydrogen is used mainly in the chemical industry to produce ammonia and methanol, and in oil refining. At the moment, more than 99 per cent of the hydrogen used is produced by reforming fossil fuels, which causes carbon dioxide emissions.
Hydrogen produced from fossil fuels with CO2 emissions abated using carbon capture and storage (known as blue hydrogen)
Fortum believes in the hydrogen economy
eero
Renewable hydrogen: hydrogen produced with renewable energy sources, like solar, wind or hydropower (known as green hydrogen)
An old energy source
Clean hydrogen: hydrogen produced without CO2 emissions, i.e. with renewables or nuclear power
Cost of electrolysis is decreasing
Today, hydrogen is used mainly in the chemical industry, to produce ammonia and methanol, and in oil refining. Over 99 per cent of the hydrogen used is produced by reforming fossil fuels, which causes around 2% of the global yearly carbon dioxide emissions.
Senior Solar Technology Manager
Solar and wind power can be used in electrolysis to split water molecules into oxygen and hydrogen. The hydrogen can be stored and used later in fuel cells or gas turbines to produce electricity and heat. No carbon emissions are generated when combusting hydrogen. The only by-product, besides energy, is water.
Hydrogen made by pyrolysis with carbon black as a by-product (known as turquoise hydrogen)
Fact box: Different sources of hydrogen
30 April 2020, 12:16
The hydrogen economy is coming – sooner or later
different kinds of energy storage methods
Hydrogen also plays a role in decarbonising industry, as it can enable carbon emissions-free refining and production of steel or chemicals, and a second route to carbon-free transportation.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/clean-your-plate-industry-too-recovering-waste-heat
By employing the properties of the refrigerants flowing in heat pumps, waste heat (e.g. at a temperature of 20–30 degrees) can be recovered and its temperature significantly increased (e.g. to 50–90 degrees). In order to do this successfully, heat pump needs a preferably steady heat source, like the heat from, say,  warm shower water and toilet wastewater from households, the heat generated by computers in data centres, or the heat generated in industrial processes.
Reducing the use of coal is also the aim of the Kilpilahti industrial area’s 700 – 1,000 million euro waste heat project in Porvoo, Finland. The amount of waste heat recovered in the industrial area could cover about one quarter of the heat demand in the entire district heating networks in the Helsinki metropolitan area, and there would still be enough heat for the cities of Kerava and Sipoo.
funded by the European Union, industrial processes in Finland annually generate more than 20 TWh of waste heat, which is equivalent to the energy amount of the coal used in Finland.
According to the Heat Roadmap Europe 2050
heikki
keskivali
The amount of waste heat from a big approx. 100-megawatt data centre could cover as much as 35 percent of the heat demand in Espoo’s district heating network in Finland. The potential emissions reduction is significant: heating in the Helsinki metropolitan area in 2018 generated more than two megatonnes of carbon emissions, i.e. more than three percent of all of Finland’s emissions.
Heat pump in Suomenoja is an important part of carbon neutral district heat production in Espoo
With heat pumps, 1 = 5: one unit of renewable electricity can produce up to five units of clean heat
study
We teach our kids to clean their plates because food shouldn’t be wasted. The climate discussion has further emphasised the need to reduce consumption on all fronts. A cost-effective place to start is “clean your plate” also in industry by recovering waste heat.
In terms of heat production efficiency, heat pumps are in a class of their own. When using one unit of electricity, they can produce 3–5 units of heat – and, often, cooling at the same time. So it clearly goes without saying that heat pumps are an excellent way to reduce emissions in the heating sector, cost-efficiently. The industrial-scale heat pump plants connected to a district heating network are especially efficient.
Manager, Strategic Projects
Using waste heat from data centres and industrial areas can significantly reduce emissions
Related topics
It is important for our industry’s competitiveness and for the shared climate that all potential waste heat is recovered and fed into the common district heating network. Without a district heating network, wide-scale utilisation of waste heat is not possible. As renewable electricity becomes cheaper and heat pump technologies develop, the future of waste heat recovery looks very promising.
Clean your plate in industry too – by recovering waste heat | Fortum
The most attractive sources of waste heat are the ever growing number of data centres around the world. At these data centres, thousands of computers process the data that drive social media, e-commerce, and business systems. Today, however, 99 percent of the waste heat generated at data centres goes to waste when it could be used in district heating networks as a replacement for fossil heat production.
District heating networks enable a breakthrough for waste heat
The era of irresponsible waste is over. So let’s clean our plates.
The era of irresponsible waste is over
20 March 2020, 15:07
However, it wouldn’t be possible to utilise the big sources of waste heat if the Helsinki area’s heating was generated only by building-specific heating solutions. The existing district heating network ensures the distribution of emissions-free waste heat also during freezing temperatures and without any significant extra investments in customer-specific equipment or in electricity distribution. At the same time, waste heat that reduces the use of fossil fuels is delivered to those who need it, when the network also serves a lot of consumers with constantly changing needs. Moreover, it’s a care-free solution: maintenance and heat supply are the responsibility of the district heating network operator and it isn’t as much dependent on the functionality of a single piece of equipment.
However, it wasn’t too long ago when using electric heating was considered a fundamentally bad solution because electric energy was considered a more valuable energy than thermal energy. Unlike electricity, heat has an unfortunate way of dissipating. But utilising this waste heat has become easier, thanks to recent development in heat pumps.
Data centres built in the Nordic countries operate mainly with new-build wind power, so the energy they require is, in principle, emissions-free. However, even more than 80 per cent of the wind power electricity used by data centres could be fed cost-efficiently into the existing district heating network. This thermal energy can replace fossil fuels, such as coal. So renewable energy recovered from data centres can be called “carbon negative”.
Clean your plate in industry too – by recovering waste heat


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/storage-key-towards-future-energy-system
Utility-scale PV plus storage LCOE for the years 2020 to 2050 for six European locations with 7% nominal weighted average cost of capital (WACC). Source: Vartiainen E, Masson G, Breyer C, Moser D, Román Medina E. Impact of weighted average cost of capital, capital expenditure, and other parameters on future utility‐scale PV levelised cost of electricity. Prog Photovolt Res Appl. 2019;1–15. https://doi.org/10.1002/pip.3189
Blog post June 2019: Solar power the cheapest way of generating electricity almost everywhere
blog
One major solution to the fluctuation problem is to use hydro power, which is a flexible, renewable source and abundantly available in the Nordic countries. Hydro electricity can be stored in water reservoirs for a long time, and, on the other hand, hydro power can react quite fast to the changes in electricity demand. If suitable water reservoirs are available, surplus solar or wind power can also be used to pump up water from lower to higher reservoir and then used as hydro power when there is shortage of wind or solar.
Battery storage has developed during recent years almost as fast as solar photovoltaic (PV) technology. During the past decade, the price of Lithium ion (Li-ion) batteries has decreased by more than 80%. It is estimated that it will further decrease by at least 80% by 2050. This means that Li-ion batteries will soon be a competitive technology for short-term electricity storage. This is already the case in Germany, where most residential solar power systems are currently sold with batteries. The fast increase in the number of electric vehicles is also the main driving force behind the battery cost reduction.
PV plus storage levelised cost of electricity (LCOE) in 2020 ranges from 36 €/MWh in Malaga to 64 €/MWh in Helsinki with 1 kWh/kWp storage and from 50 to 88 €/MWh with 2 kWh/kWp storage. PV with 2 kWh/kWp storage would already be competitive next year with average spot market electricity price in Rome and Malaga. PV with 1 kWh/kWp storage will become competitive within 4-6 years in Helsinki, London, Munich and Toulouse. It is clear that PV plus batteries are the cornerstones of the future energy system if we wish to tackle the climate crisis in a fast and cost-neutral way.
Figure 2
As the use of batteries increases, it is important to ensure responsible use of valuable metals in battery production and recycling. Fortum, too, is strengthening its expertise in the battery recycling by
Future of Li-ion battery is promising for short-term electricity storage
It is clear that the future energy system will be 100% renewable. The only question is how fast it will be here. In order to get there sooner and avoid the climate disaster, storage will play a key role in enabling solar and wind power to grow much bigger and faster than without storage.
stored as heat
Figure 1
Further information on PV and battery storage cost development:
Fortum is also testing battery storage solutions. Three years ago, Fortum built a Li-ion battery system with 1 MWh nominal capacity and 2 MW power in Järvenpää, Finland. It was the biggest battery storage in the Nordic countries at the time of its commissioning. In 2019, an even bigger battery system, with 6.2 MWh capacity and 5 MW power, started operating in Forshuvud, Sweden. Both of these systems are mainly used for short-term power fluctuations and grid frequency control.
Wind and solar will become the major form of electricity in the future. As variable energy sources they need several storage solutions that balance the energy system.
Power to X is the future solution for seasonal storage
Utility-scale PV LCOE in 2020 in Europe with 7% nominal ranges from 22 €/MWh in Malaga to 39 €/MWh in Helsinki. This is remarkable since the average electricity day-ahead market price in Finland was 44 €/MWh and in Spain 48 €/MWh in 2019. This means that PV is already cheaper than average spot market electricity all over Europe.
http://energywatchgroup.org/wp-content/uploads/EWG_LUT_100RE_All_Sectors_Global_Report_2019.pdf
As a conclusion, we have several options to store energy: hydro power and heating networks for both long-term storage and flexibility, Li-ion batteries for short-term storage and Power to X as a future solution for long-term storage. In the future, we will see even more alternatives like compressed air (CAES) for electricity storage or ground heat for solar heat storage, or demand response (DSM) for adjusting the imbalance between energy supply and demand.
https://onlinelibrary.wiley.com/doi/full/10.1002/pip.3189
acquiring Crisolteq
On a large scale it has been shown (see Figure 2) that solar power plus battery storage covering most hourly and daily generation fluctuation is already cheaper than spot market electricity in Spain and Italy. For most of the world population who live relatively close to the equator, solar plus battery storage is the ultimate solution because ample solar energy is available every day of the year and storage is needed only for short time periods. (Figure 2)
Water reservoirs and heating networks can offer storage
24 January 2020, 11:51
Further information on 100% renewable energy system:
Storage a key towards 100% renewable energy system
The technology for power to X is already available and the focus is turning to its competitiveness when used in larger volumes. In addition to hydrogen or gas, the “X” can denote other fuels, chemicals, ammonia, heat, liquids or even food. Especially important are liquid renewable fuels for the transport sector or in remote areas where electric or gas networks do not exist.
Storage a key towards the future energy system
People living in the northern latitudes also need a solution for seasonal storage. One answer to long-term electricity storage is conversion and storage, or power to X. For example, when surplus solar or wind power is available, water can be split by electrolysis to oxygen and hydrogen and the latter can be stored for later use. Hydrogen can be further used in fuel cells to generate electricity. Or, it can be methanised with CO2 to synthetic renewable gas and be used later for heating or in existing gas turbines. This way current use of natural gas can eventually be replaced by renewable and CO2-neutral gas.
. Water can be heated and then stored in hot-water storages for a day, a week or even a season. Stored heat can then be used to meet the people’s heating demands. Here the district heating networks and purpose-built heat storages will have an important future role in balancing the energy system. In small scale, many houses already have a hot water storage for domestic use.
Comparison of current PV (photovoltaic) levelised cost of electricity (LCOE) and average day-ahead spot market prices 2019 in six European locations. 2020 capital expenditure (CAPEX) assumption 0.43 €/Wp and operational expenditure (OPEX) 9 €/kWp/a, nominal weighted average cost of capital (WACC) 7%, annual inflation 2%.
Energy can also be
Both solar and wind are variable sources, meaning that they fluctuate over time. The good news is that these sources complement each other pretty well. The sun shines in daytime and better during the summer, whereas wind generation is relatively good at night-time and during the winter. But sometimes there isn’t direct availability of either of these sources – that’s when energy storage is needed.
Storage a key towards the future energy system | Fortum
, a specialist in recycling of valuable metals in lithium-ion batteries.
Let’s take a look at the role and developments of some key storage solutions, all of which will actually be needed when we are heading towards the future energy system that is increasingly based on variable energy sources.
In my last
I noted that solar power is already cheaper than spot market electricity in many countries (see Figure 1) and will become the cheapest way of electricity generation all over the world. Together with wind power, solar will become the major form of electricity in the future electricity system.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/solar-power-now-cheapest-way-generating-electricity-almost-everywhere
PV LCOE for large-scale ground-mounted installations is now about 4 c/kWh in southern Finland with a 7% nominal interest rate. Last year, the average spot market electricity price in Finland was 4.7 c/kWh.
Nominal power in solar PV installations is usually given in peak watts (Wp or Wdc), which equals the total maximum DC power of the PV modules in standard conditions. However, there are many kind of losses in the PV system, and, finally, the DC power has to be converted to AC power with an inverter, if the system is connected to the grid. Therefore, the inverter power is normally sized smaller than the module power.
In smaller residential solar installations, it is essential to size the system so that most of the generated electricity can be consumed on site. Self-generated and consumed solar electricity typically saves 10-15 c/kWh in a residential electricity bill in Finland, whereas surplus electricity sold to the grid is often valued only for the spot market price, i.e. about 5 c/kWh.
Link to ETIP PV LCOE factsheet:
Utility-scale PV cheaper than electricity market price
Industrial and commercial rooftop solar makes sense
Inverter maximum output power is given in AC watts (Wac). Some countries, like India, use Wac for statistics, whereas most countries, like Finland, use Wp. In large installations, the typical DC/AC ratio is 1.3-1.4. This means that the nominal power in Wp can be 30-40% higher than in Wac.
Example: A 1.3 MWp PV system in Finland has a 1.3 DC/AC ratio, which means the maximum grid power is 1.0 MWac. The annual yield for the system in southern Finland is about 1000 kWh/kWp or 1300 kWh/kWac. The system would thus generate 1300 MWh of grid electricity annually.
In India, where Fortum is constructing and operating large solar power plants, the costs are even lower. Fortum currently operates about 180 megawatts AC* (MWac) of solar power in India and is constructing a 250 MWac plant in Pavagada Solar Park, Karnataka. Fortum recently won another 250 MWac project in Rajasthan. In addition, Fortum has about 35 MWp solar capacity in operation and 110 MWp under development in Russia.
*)Watts, peak watts or AC watts?
14 June 2019, 15:16
The European Technology and Innovation Platform for Photovoltaics (ETIP PV) recently published its annual factsheet on the levelised cost of large-scale solar electricity (PV LCOE). According to the report, the prices of PV modules dropped again by 30% last year.
According to the ETIP PV, residential PV LCOE in southern Finland is now 7-10 c/kWh, depending on the investment cost and interest rate. Fortum sells turnkey solar rooftop systems in all installation sizes to residential customers in Finland. In addition to the savings in your bill, you get CO2-free electricity, you make a real climate action and you increase the value of your house. What could be a better combination?
In most industrial and commercial installations, all the generated solar electricity can be consumed on site and thus the full benefit is in the bill. Again in southern Finland, according to the ETIP PV report, the LCOE for large-scale rooftop solar is now 5-7 c/kWh. S Group, for example, has recently taken big steps towards a cleaner world when Fortum installed a total of 10 MWp on the rooftops of 40 supermarkets all over Finland. It was the largest commercial solar rooftop project in the Nordic countries.
https://etip-pv.eu/publications/fact-sheets/
Will the sun solve our electricity needs in the future?
Solar power now the cheapest way of generating electricity almost everywhere
How about the price development of solar power in different system sizes? Let's take a look at Finland specifically. Solar is becoming more and more profitable also here, although the Nordics might not be the first place that comes to mind when thinking about solar power. Note that southern Finland has a similar annual yield and PV LCOE as London!
On a smaller scale, the smartest way of generating electricity is to install a rooftop solar system and use it for your own consumption. That way, you can save energy, taxes and partly distribution costs in your electricity bill.
Solar power now the cheapest way of generating electricity almost everywhere | Fortum
Last year in a blog post I asked whether the sun would solve our electricity needs in the future. Another year has now passed and I am happy to note that the situation looks even better.
System sizing is essential in small rooftop systems
Since the beginning of this decade, the market price of solar photovoltaic modules has decreased by about 90% and turnkey prices of PV systems by about 80%. This means that LCOE is now below electricity market prices in most European countries. Moreover, for all sizes of rooftop systems, solar is now competitive with retail electricity prices all over Europe.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog/forenergy-blog/will-sun-solve-our-electricity-needs-future
The price drop in solar electricity is so steep that it is already the cheapest electricity generation form in southern Europe and areas closer to the equator.
Will the sun solve our electricity needs in the future? | Fortum
Solar electricity has continued its surge in recent years. The price of solar electricity has dropped dramatically and the installed capacity has grown rapidly.
The market price of solar PV modules has decreased by more than 90% during the past decade. PV module prices have followed the so-called learning curve, meaning that each time the global PV generation capacity doubles, the price of modules decreases by 25%.
In 2017 about 100 gigawatts of additional solar photovoltaic (PV) power capacity was installed around the world; this is the equivalent of Finland’s annual electricity consumption. The cumulative solar electricity capacity increased globally to about 400 gigawatts at the end of 2017. This is enough to cover more than half of India’s electricity consumption.
The huge seasonal variation in the Nordic countries makes it not feasible to build the electricity system solely on solar or wind power. In a large part of the world, however, the sun shines fairly evenly throughout the year, so the system requires only a small amount of short-term energy storage for night-time consumption. In the Nordic countries, short-term storage won’t suffice; seasonal storage also will be needed.
Solutions for storing solar electricity are needed
During the past six months, multiple record-low solar electricity Power Purchase Agreement (PPA) prices have been signed. The solar electricity price is already 20 €/MWh or lower in Mexico, Chile and Saudi Arabia, for example. This is enabled by low interest rates on the investments because of solar electricity’s low technology and environmental risk. In India, the current PPA price with no subsidies is a record low of 32 €/MWh and in Germany 43 €/MWh.
Solar electricity’s big role in a low-emissions future
Solar electricity is becoming the cheapest production form – almost everywhere
The blogger is Fortum’s Solar Technology Manager who represents Fortum and Finland in the Steering Committee of the European Technology and Innovation Platform Photovoltaics (ETIP PV). The committee is an expert group established by the European Commission and regularly produces reports about the solar electricity sector. For example, the now published PV LCOE factsheet is published once a year.
We estimate in the latest ETIP PV report that solar electricity prices will continue to decrease – by at least 40% until 2030 and by 60% until 2050.
My participation in the work of the European Technology and Innovation Platform Photovoltaics (ETIP PV) Steering Committee gives me a front-row seat to follow the development of solar electricity. The committee is tasked with producing up-to-date information about the sector and assisting decision-makers in solar electricity-related research and industrial policy issues. According to the committee’s most recent estimates, about 3,000 gigawatts of solar electricity will be installed by 2030. That number will climb to 10,000 by 2050 when solar electricity will already cover at least one-third of the global electricity consumption.
According to the International Energy Agency, 85% of the global energy consumption in 2017 was fossil fuel-based. That figure includes energy consumption by the transport sector. Even though solar electricity’s share has grown rapidly, it currently covers only about 2% of global electricity consumption.
Solar module prices are plummeting
Electricity storage prices – especially battery prices – are also continuing to decrease as manufacturing processes and materials improve. Future solutions for the seasonal storage of electricity also include power to gas or to other fuels through electrolysis. Additionally, the Nordic countries already have extensive seasonal storages in the form of water reservoirs. An advantage in the Nordic countries is, in fact, the abundance of renewable hydropower and biomass. A recent study by the Lappeenranta University of Technology showed that a 100% renewable energy-based system in Finland by 2050 is not only possible but also would be the cheapest solution.
16 May 2018, 13:28
Capacity has grown 50-fold in the past decade. With this growth, manufacturing processes have improved, the use of raw materials has lessened and module efficiency has increased.
From the perspective of an electricity system that requires a balance between production and consumption, the challenge with solar electricity is the same as with wind power: production varies a lot, depending on the time of day and the season. The more production variation in the system, the bigger the need for flexibility. Energy storage and demand-response can contribute to the solution.
There are plenty of challenges to overcome on solar electricity’s path of growth, including the seasonal nature of production. But it’s already clear that, globally, solar electricity will play a big role in transitioning from fossil fuels to carbon-free energy sources.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/will-sun-solve-our-electricity-needs-future



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/01/fortum-acquire-crisolteq-recycling-specialist-valuable-metals-batteries
Crisolteq employs 23 people and sales amounted to EUR 2.1 million during its last fiscal year. The parties have agreed not to disclose the acquisition price.
Fortum to acquire Crisolteq, a recycling specialist of valuable metals in batteries
Read more about battery recycling: www.fortum.com/batterysolutions
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 16 January 2020
, Vice President, Recycling and Waste, Fortum.
Crisolteq has developed a unique hydrometallurgical recycling process that enables a recycling rate of more than 80% for lithium-ion batteries compared to the current recycling rate of about 50%. In the hydrometallurgical process cobalt, manganese, and nickel are recovered from the batteries. The valuable metals are delivered to a battery manufacturer to be used to produce new batteries.
Crisolteq has an industrial-scale hydrometallurgical recycling facility in Harjavalta, Finland. Additionally, Crisolteq has a production plant in Tornio, and research and development activities in Raisio.
Fortum to acquire Crisolteq, a recycling specialist of valuable metals in batteries | Fortum
“The electrification of our society will significantly increase the demand for batteries in the future. We strongly believe in the hydrometallurgical process developed by Crisolteq. We see a very promising future for the technology and see it as an important part of our recycling business. The recycling of valuable metals decreases the environmental load of EV batteries by reducing the need to excavate valuable metals,” says
Kalle Saarimaa, Vice President, Recycling & Waste, Fortum, tel. +358 41 503 1337
Fortum is acquiring the entire shareholding in the Finnish growth company Crisolteq, a specialist in recycling of valuable metals in lithium-ion batteries. The investment strengthens Fortum’s position in the recycling of high value materials in Europe. The recycling of battery metals also supports Fortum’s existing battery business.
16 January 2020, 12:00 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/energy-production/combined-heat-and-power-chp
Most of our CHP plants are located in urban areas where there is a significant demand for district heating and most of the plants have an additional condenser that allows for increased electricity production in the summer when demand for heat is low.
We have CHP plants in the Nordic countries, Poland and Russia.
CHP and the environment
Combined heat and power - efficient power generation | Fortum
Making adjustments
Generating heat and power by adding carbon-neutral fuels to the mix dramatically reduces emissions. Unlike single source power and heat production with natural gas or coal, CHP with biomass and waste in the fuel mix reduces CO
Combined heat and power (CHP) maximises the energy efficiency by
CHP plants capture and utilise the heat that comes from the engine during electricity generation and provides both heat and electricity in one process. Additionally during the summer months the heat generated may be used to provide cooling for air conditioning.
The efficient CHP plants significantly reduce emissions, compared to separate production of electricity and heat.
Lower emissions
Where does Fortum use CHP?
Combined heat and power (CHP) - more efficient power generation
FAQ - Combined Heat and Power
In Oslo, Norway, the
The continuous improvement of resource and energy efficiency is important in terms of the sufficiency of natural resources and climate change mitigation. CHP production addresses both of those issues because over 90% of the fuel's primary energy is used to produce district heating and electricity.
producing electricity and heat from a versatile mix of fuels in one production facility.
CHP production is based on fuel combustion, so the main environmental impact is related to flue-gas emissions. To help mitigate this, flue gas cleaning technologies are used. Carbon-neutral fuels are added to the mix and advanced combustion techniques are used to reduce sulphur emissions and nitrogen oxides. CHP leaves behind ash, but up to 50% of the CHP ash in Europe is used by the construction materials industry for earthworks and to fill up mines.
Combined heat and power (CHP) production is the most efficient fuel-based energy production. By producing electricity and heat, you maximize the use of fuels, which is energy efficient. At the same time, you lower the amount of CO2 released into the atmosphere.
What is CHP?
emissions by up to 40%.
production of district heating is owned together with the city of Oslo under the brand Fortum Oslo Värme.
The CHP plants use various energy sources, e.g. biomass and waste.
Using CHP increases the efficiency of fuel use – up to 90 % of the fuels can be utilised.
New challenges
How does CHP work?
CHP balances the seasonality of electricity demand with intermittent production from renewables.
Using biomass and waste


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/circular-economy-valuable-raw-materials-recycled-products
At the end of a battery’s lifecycle, the materials contained in the battery are recovered and recycled. The recycled raw material is used to produce new batteries, which reduces an environmental load of battery production. With innovative technologies, we can now
A good example of a functional recycling system for plastic packaging is the way that bottle recycling works in many European countries. For instance, Denmark, Finland and Germany rank at the top in Europe in the recycling of plastic bottles. Some 60% of the plastic bottles in Europe are returned, and the recycled material they generate is used to manufacture new bottles and other products. Plastic bottle recycling is a collaborative effort on the part of producers and importers of beverages, stores, transportation companies, the return system administrators, the consumers returning their bottles, and industry utilising the recycled material.
, a secondary raw material suitable for a variety of new plastic products. This is how recycled plastic packaging can get a new life in the form of various products.
In fact, product manufacturers and the retail sector have work to do in developing plastic packaging products that are suitable for recycling and considering what kinds of products made from recycled plastic could be offered to consumers. When we see that new, useful products are being made from recycled plastic, recycling becomes more attractive.
Bio2X programme
aims to produce valuable end products from grass-based masses, in particular straw, end products that can be used to replace fossil-based and other environmentally taxing raw materials. Raw materials derived from biomass can be used in textiles, pharmaceutical applications, food, cosmetics, plastics, the construction industry, asphalt, and even as a raw material for batteries.
The bioeconomy has an important role in our journey towards a carbon-neutral society. The bioeconomy is based on the sustainable use of renewable natural resources and bio-based materials, which, together with the circular economy and clean energy production, help in combating climate change.
, which can be reused to produce new EV batteries.
recycle more than 80% of lithium-ion battery materials
The circular economy – valuable raw materials from recycled products
Over time, battery performance weakens, and batteries might not be used for their original intended purpose, e.g. in electric vehicles. However, batteries can be reused at solar power plants, for example, for storing energy at times when the sun is not shining.
In many countries across Europe, waste management functions reliably, and the sorting and separate collection of waste fractions is part of everyday life. For instance, Belgium, Denmark, the Netherlands and Germany have already reached the 2030 European Union target of recycling 70 per cent of packaging waste.
The electrifying society relies on lithium batteries and the development of battery technology. Lithium-ion batteries contain valuable metals, such as lithium, cobalt, manganese and nickel, the availability of which is scarce and the demand growing.
Of the waste received in 2019, 1590 kilotonnes were non-hazardous waste and 620 kilotonnes were hazardous waste. Of this waste, 820 kilotonnes (ashes, metals, plastics and others) were separated for recovery. 1440 kilotonnes of waste were recovered as energy. 410 kilotonnes of the waste ended up in final disposal.
Fortum’s
Read more about circular economy
Thinking about your own choices and actions is a key component in the circular economy, and consumers have a significant role in the big picture. Everybody must have the opportunity to recycle and to understand what happens to raw materials after they have been put in the recycle bin. When recycling and sorting waste, you also start thinking about your own buying habits and consumption. Do I really need to buy this, or can I buy it used? Is there a similar product that is made from recycled materials?
At the moment, we squander tremendous amounts of biomasses globally. For example, in the Delhi region of India, 50 million tonnes of paddy straw and other agricultural waste is burnt annually. Refining just this amount into textile fibre could replace over half of the global cotton production. The production of cotton consumes an unsustainable amount of water and pesticides.
Across the EU, about a quarter of municipal waste ends up in landfills, which is still quite far from the 10% target in 2035. However, countries such as Belgium, Germany, Finland and Sweden, among others, have succeeded in reducing the share of landfill disposal to less than three per cent of all municipal waste. In these countries, the waste that cannot be recycled or reused is recovered almost completely for waste-to-energy production. This also has the benefit of reducing the use of fossil fuels in electricity and heat production.
Electric vehicles are coming – what happens to used batteries?
While many European countries are already at a good level when it comes to sorting and recycling materials, there is still work to be done particularly in the smart use of materials and in increasing the use of recycled materials.
The circular economy – valuable raw materials from recycled products | Fortum
Of all the plastic produced in the world, about 40 per cent is used to make packaging. Plastic is a good packaging material when it is used and recycled responsibly. Tackling the problems related to plastic recycling did not start in earnest until recent years – globally and also at the European level: just 20 per cent of the world’s packaging plastic is recycled, and in Europe 7.2 million tonnes of household plastic ends up in landfills (Source: European Parliament: The environmental impacts of plastics and micro-plastics use, waste and pollution: EU and national measures). Therefore, the European Union has set a target to recycle 55 per cent of plastic packaging by 2030.
Boosting resource efficiency with circular economy
How is plastic recycled?
In Finland, separately collected post-consumer plastic waste is recycled and used to produce
Don’t waste the waste
Climate change, urbanisation, and scarcity of natural resources are phenomena of our time that also shape societies across Europe. These phenomena encourage us to boost the recycling of waste and the use of biomass, for example. The use of recycled materials reduces the need for virgin raw materials and thus saves natural resources.
There is a lot of talks these days about the circular economy, but what does it really mean? In essence, circularity is about eliminating the creation of waste. Utilising existing materials and products efficiently by recycling and reusing is part of the circular economy.
What is bioeconomy?


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/dont-waste-waste
+358415031337
With waste volumes growing globally and a lack of basic waste management systems in many places globally, there is still a need for a full portfolio of solutions – from high-quality recycling to Waste-to-Energy – to enable a circular economy. We need more doers, those who rethink their product lines into material cycles, and more initiatives like the one Adidas launched last year in which recovered plastics from the Pacific Ocean are used as raw material.
VP, Recycling and Waste
My role gives me the opportunity to make a difference at the system level, but my contribution as an individual is also important, and so is yours. We can both make choices to consume wisely and strive to give our things a second life through reuse or recycling, rather than turning them into waste. And that is something we can do already today to move the overshoot date forward.
For hundreds of years, since the days of the Industrial Revolution, we have been thinking about economics in linear terms – buy new, use, throw away. For decades we have exceeded the planet’s ability to renew the raw materials we use in a year. But this challenge has been recognized and we are seeing serious attempts to solve this imbalance. Instead of thinking linearly, we have slowly started to think in circular terms.
We are very proud to say that we are able to make high-quality recycled plastic raw material that can replace virgin plastic in most applications. Just ten years ago, this wasn’t possible. We can – and should – promote the change to a circular economy through regulatory changes. The upcoming shift in focus from collection to recycling in the EU directive is an important change that will affect the whole system back to product design.
The fact that we have a large-scale recycling capability ready when the market emerges is a showcase of how a circular economy is becoming the new norm. So while effective waste management solutions are still missing in many parts of the world, we are moving in the right direction.
The Finnish Innovation Fund Sitra released a report last year in which they concluded that a more circular economy could lead to deep emissions reductions from heavy industry: in an ambitious scenario, as much as 296 million tonnes CO2 per year in the EU by 2050 (out of 530 in total) and some 3.6 billion tonnes per year globally. The EU economy is accumulating large stocks of metals and plastics, and by 2050 could meet a large share of its need for these materials by recirculating what has already been produced: 75% of steel, 50% of aluminium, and 56% of plastics.
Plastic is a great example of a material that really holds its value. Born as a side stream of oil refining, plastic is in many ways a superior material: durable, light-weight, easily moulded into all shapes and available in every colour. After one use, plastic packaging and products can have a second or even up to ten new lives as new products and packaging.
Don’t waste the waste | Fortum
But recycling is also about scale. The method we use to recover as much as 80 per cent of the rare earth metals in the cathode of a Li-Ion battery not only has the capacity to handle the expected volumes of EV batteries on the European market for years to come, it can so at a competitive price, giving battery manufacturers the possibility to close the material loop.
Achieving a truly circular economy requires a new way of approaching challenges related to raw materials. Unlike in a linear economy, in a circular economy, we need always to consider the whole chain – starting from the virgin raw material to its first use, possible second use, recycling and new life. Making this a reality requires a new way of thinking from all of us, from individuals all the way up to big corporations. We need to start thinking about the whole value chain, not only our own narrow part of it.
Making products and packaging reusable and recyclable is something that must be considered already in the design phase; that, in fact, is when the recyclability is actually determined. What collection systems will be available, and for what kinds of treatment? Local conditions may vary and should also be taken into account. To promote circularity, raw materials from the most sustainable sources must be considered – and these include materials that are waste-based and bio-based.
29 July 2019, 11:23


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/sustainability/climate-and-resources/circular-economy
Reliable waste management and resource efficiency are important in a sustainable society.
Fortum’s aim is to promote resource efficiency, for example, through its recycling and waste business, and the transition towards a more extensive circular economy. By circular economy, we mean that materials are utilised as efficiently as possible and hazardous materials are removed from circulation. The aim is to make new raw material from waste whenever possible and to keep valuable materials in circulation.
Ash is a by-product generated in the incineration of solid fuels in power and heat production. Gypsum and other desulphurisation products are by-products of flue-gas desulphurisation. Ash and desulphurisation products together account for the majority share of the by-products and waste from our energy production. In 2021, 83% of our own energy production plants’ by-products and waste was recovered.
Waste received from customers
Waste and by-products from our energy production
Radioactive waste
In addition to the standard industrial waste also radioactive waste is generated at the nuclear power plants in Finland, Loviisa and Oskarshamn, Sweden, which we handle according to the local nuclear energy legislation requirements.
Sustainability: Circular economy for cleaner world| Fortum
We offer solutions to treat hazardous waste. We take hazardous waste out of circulation in a sustainable manner and we clean the hazardous substances from materials that end up in recycling. At the same time, we produce energy and ensure the safe final disposal of waste.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/sustainability/climate-and-resources
Sustainability for climate and resources | Fortum
climate targets
As the world is facing not only a climate crisis but also a global biodiversity crisis, we had a biodiversity target of conducting a minimum of 12 major voluntary measures that improve the living conditions of species and strengthen populations in 2021. A total of 13 major voluntary measures were implemented.
Read our CDP Climate change 2021 response
biodiversity
Read more on our
Carbon neutral globally (Scope 1, 2 and 3 GHG emissions), in line with the goals of the Paris Agreement, by 2050 at the latest
Carbon neutral (Scope 1 , 2 and 3 emissions) in European generation by 2035 at the latest
We support the UN Sustainable Development Goals
We are Europe’s third largest carbon dioxide free power generator and a large player in gas. With our strategy we drive the transition to clean energy. In our strategy we focus on reducing carbon dioxide  emissions in own operations and transforming our own operations carbon neutral.
Read more in the report
emissions (Scope 1 and 2) in European generation by at least 50% by 2030 (compared to base year 2019)
Our targets
We support the UN Sustainable Development Goals (SDG). Climate and resources related targets are clearly visible in the below chart:


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/sustainability-report-highlights/climate-and-resources/biodiversity
Our biodiversity action plan
We aim to improve biodiversity in connection with our operations, we carry out biodiversity-related projects, and we collaborate with our stakeholders in projects.
Article
Fortum to study a by-pass solution for the Seitenoikea hydropower plant to enable fish to migrate upstream
Our biodiversity manual
Biodiversity | Fortum
First trout have been transferred upstream over the Leppikoski hydropower plant in Finland – Leppikoski Fishheart inaugurated
River Vuoksi habitat restorations in the area upstream from Tainionkoski to improve trout breeding opportunities
Download the manual
Download the action plan
Updated Biodiversity Action Plan
Fishways, butterfly landscapes and meadow restorations: Fortum’s efforts in Finland and Sweden to improve biodiversity


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/10/first-trout-have-been-transferred-upstream-over-leppikoski-hydropower-plant-finland-leppikoski-fishheart-inaugurated
Susanna Hyrkäs
Fishheart has been used previously in a power plant environment at the Taivalkoski hydropower plant on the River Kemijoki and in Sweden. At Leppikoski, the Fishheart system will be tested until mid-October, and its use will continue next summer.
Susanna Hyrkäs, Environmental Manager, Fortum,
, tel. +358 40 158 1825
Leppikoski’s Fishheart is one of Fortum’s voluntary measures advancing biodiversity with the aim to improve habitats and strengthen populations.
More about biodiversity
Dam by-pass solution is one prerequisite for the natural life cycle of fish
susanna
The Fishheart fishway at the Leppikoski hydropower plant in Paltamo was inaugurated on 1.10.2021. Since the start of its test use in August at Leppikoski, Fishheart has been used to successfully transfer many 60+ centimetre mature lake trout. All in all, the Fishheart fishway has transferred about 2,000 fish upstream from the Leppikoski power plant dam. In addition to trout, Fishheart has registered other fish species, including perch, lamprey, bream, vendace, whitefish, and pike perch.
The inauguration of the Fishheart is part of a set of measures being implemented to strengthen the natural life cycle of lake trout. The tributaries upstream from the Leppikoski power plant provide potential habitats and breeding grounds essential for the life cycle of the trout population; this year there have been habitat restorations at Torvenkoski and Tolosenjoki. Moreover, we are annually stocking lake trout fry on the Hyrynsalmi route in an effort to strengthen the fish population that imprints to the river.
“At Fortum, we want to find effective solutions that both support the strengthening of fish stocks and enable the production of renewable and climate-friendly hydropower. Each river and hydropower plant is unique, and thus solutions vary by river and hydropower plant. To enable fish migration, a variety of different tools and measures are needed. I am proud of the Finnish Fishheart fishway, which is a good alternative for hydropower plants such as Leppikoski with a tightly built environment. Fish passage is implemented quickly and, at the same time, we determine the potential for the natural life cycle of fish,” says
01 October 2021, 10:00 EEST
The hydraulic Fishheart fishway is a Finnish innovation enabling fish to migrate past obstacles. Fishheart is a floating, mobile system installed in the power plant’s tailrace channel; the system has an attraction flow that guides fish into the opening. Fishheart uses artificial intelligence to detect fish that swim into the tube and then moves them over the dam.
hyrkas
Fortum’s goal is to strengthen the natural cycle of the threatened Oulujärvi lake trout in the vicinity of the Leppikoski hydropower plant in the Hyrynsalmi route. National Fish Way Strategy’s key sites in the Oulujoki river system for restoring fish migration are located in the Hyrynsalmi route which has breeding areas and habitats, a prerequisite for the natural life cycle of migrating fish.
“The Oulujärvi lake trout can now migrate to spawning areas upstream from the Leppikoski dam. This autumn will be the first season that we’ll test the Leppikoski Fishheart system’s optimal functioning and see the numbers and species of fish migrating upstream. Based on the initial experiences and results, we’ll develop the operation and research with Kalasydän Oy, the Paltamo Fishing right owners’ association, and the Fisheries Authority,” says Fortum’s Environmental Manager
First trout have been transferred upstream over the Leppikoski hydropower plant in Finland – Leppikoski Fishheart inaugurated | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/10/fortum-study-pass-solution-seitenoikea-hydropower-plant-enable-fish-migrate-upstream
13 October 2022, 12:01 EEST
Natural cycle with Fishheart, by-pass solution and habitat restorations
Fortum will study the implementation of a by-pass solution to enable fish to migrate upstream from the Seitenoikea hydropower plant, located on the border of the Ristijärvi and Hyrynsalmi municipalities. The aim of the by-pass solution is to strengthen the natural cycle of endangered lake trout on the Hyrynsalmi route, which is part of the Oulujoki river system.
The by-pass solution is part of a set of measures Fortum is implementing on the Hyrynsalmi route, which the National Fish Passage Strategy has identified as the only key site in the Oulujoki river system. The set of measures also includes, e.g., the hydraulic
“The by-pass solution will enable lake trout to migrate upstream from Lake Oulujärvi to the area upstream from Leppikoski power plant as well as upstream from Seitenoikea power plant. Located upstream from the Seitenoikea is a 40-hectare area with potential habitats and breeding grounds important for the life cycle of trout,”
The measures aiming to strengthen the life cycle of lake trout also include the planned habitat restorations and stocking of juvenile lake trout in the tributaries upstream from Seitenoikea. The stocking and the restorations aim to strengthen the fish population that imprints to the river.
Hämäläinen
Fishheart fishway
taken into use in 2021 at the Leppikoski hydropower plant downstream from Seitenoikea.
Fortum to study a by-pass solution for the Seitenoikea hydropower plant to enable fish to migrate upstream | Fortum
Fortum is committed to advancing biodiversity through voluntary measures. The long-term goal on the Hyrynsalmi route is the natural reproduction of lake trout.
Based on the feasibility study, the general planning of the by-pass solution will start, and then the permits needed for its construction will be applied for. The timetable for implementing the project will be clarified as the planning progresses.
“The preliminary planning for the project will start this autumn. In 2023 we will conduct a by-pass solution feasibility study in which we will assess all the by-pass solution alternatives and determine which of them would be best for the conditions at the Seitenoikea power plant. Participation by the local stakeholders is a key factor in the project,” says Fortum’s Environmental Manager


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/07/updated-biodiversity-action-plan
Fortum biodiversity action plan 2022
The Biodiversity Action Plan is updated annually. This year, the action plan includes Fortum’s and Uniper’s biodiversity-related voluntary projects in Sweden, Finland, Germany and the UK.
Updated Biodiversity Action Plan | Fortum
(PDF, 245 KB)
Read more about biodiversity


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/04/river-vuoksi-habitat-restorations-area-upstream-tainionkoski-improve-trout-breeding-opportunities
Our environmental projects: Kokkasaari, Salmonid habitat restoration on the River Vuoksi
Katri Hämäläinen, Environmental Manager, Fortum, tel. +358 40 162 3901
Fortum, the City of Imatra, and the Southeast Finland and Southwest Finland ELY Centres (Centres for Economic Development, Transport and the Environment) will carry out a joint habitat restoration project for trout in the River Vuoksi, upstream from the Tainionkoski hydropower plant, which is about 1.3 kilometres from Lake Saimaa. The goal of the restoration work is to improve the trout breeding opportunities in the area.
“We see this as an important joint project, as it aims to increase the amount of habitat suitable for trout breeding. The project is a good example of how the cooperation of different actors can result in practical measures to improve habitat and, at the same time, improve biodiversity in the area,” says Fortum’s Environmental Manager
The City of Imatra is the lead in the project. The restoration is based on Fortum’s habitat and flow model, on the basis of which the Southeast Finland ELY Centre drafted a restoration plan. The area to be restored is owned by Fortum and is about 1,000 m² in size.
About a kilometre upstream from the Tainionkoski power plant is a small rock islet that may have once been the site of some structures related to timber rafting. The islet will be reshaped to make it shallower to enable restoration of a new area suitable for trout breeding. Additionally, the aim is to direct the water flow to the shallow area that will be created to improve the suitability for trout breeding.
11 April 2022, 14:29 EEST
Fortum is committed to several climate and environmental targets that are part of the Group target to implement significant voluntary measures promoting biodiversity. The River Vuoksi habitat restoration is one of these voluntary measures promoting biodiversity.
River Vuoksi habitat restorations in the area upstream from Tainionkoski to improve trout breeding opportunities | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/11/fishways-butterfly-landscapes-and-meadow-restorations-fortums-efforts-finland-and-sweden-improve-biodiversity
Inventory of plants and insects at the Avesta power plant
Fishways, butterfly landscapes and meadow restorations: Fortum’s efforts in Finland and Sweden to improve biodiversity | Fortum
The project
The hydraulic Fishheart fishway is a Finnish innovation enabling fish to migrate past obstacles. The fishway is installed in the power plant’s tailrace channel, where an attraction flow is created to guide fish into the opening of the device.
In fact, improving biodiversity requires systematic and long-term efforts. Our annually updated
24 November 2022, 11:49 EET
During the construction of the power plant in 1970s, the area was used as the construction site’s landfill. After construction, the area was levelled and resurfaced, and it served as a storage field during the power plant’s operational phase. In conjunction with the demolition of the power plant, further use of the landfill area was determined to be problematic, due to the waste in the soil. With the permission of the Inkoo municipality, the area was left untouched. In 2021, the sandy field was transformed into a meadow suitable for insects and for butterflies, in particular. In 2022, the plan is to maintain and monitor the meadow growth and the presence of insects in the area. The guidelines for maintaining the meadow have been prepared by ProAgria.
Butterfly landscape in Kumla, Sweden
lists the actions we are already taking and the actions we are planning to take. The majority of the actions focus on our hydropower production in Finland and Sweden.
Habitat restorations upstream from the Tainionkoski power plant
More information on other projects
fishways at three power plants in the Älvdalen and Mora municipalities, tailored to the conditions of each power plant. A fishway enabling upstream migration uses a strong pump that creates an attraction flow towards the fishway, bypassing the power plant. For fish migrating downstream, an inclined fine grid in combination with a diverter will be built to enable fish to bypass the power plant.
Fortum, the City of Imatra, and the Southeast Finland and Southwest Finland ELY Centres will carry out joint habitat restorations in the area upstream from the Tainionkoski power plant located in the Vuoksi river system. The goal of the restoration work is to improve the trout breeding opportunities, e.g. by restoring areas suitable for trout spawning and by redirecting the water flow.
New, innovative fishway for the Väsa, Blyberg and Spjutmo power plants
was launched in 2021 with a controlled burn of the meadow in the power plant’s surroundings. The controlled burn benefited the flora and the availability of nutrients for the insects in the meadow. It also enabled more detailed studies of the flora and fauna species in the area. Several endangered plant species were found in the study area, like blue bugle and broad-leaved thyme, as well as dry soil plants like maiden pink. Additionally, many butterfly species, including the six-spot burnet and small blues, were also found near the power plant.
Aligned with the targets of the EU Climate Pact and the Paris Agreement, our goal is to be carbon neutral by 2050 at the latest, and to be carbon neutral in European production by 2035. Given the close link between climate change and biodiversity loss, promoting carbon neutrality also supports the strengthening of biodiversity. However, emissions-free energy production also impacts biodiversity in a way that isn’t taken into consideration when focusing solely on climate impacts.
Based on the biodiversity studies, we have continued the cooperation with Avesta municipality by setting a mutual maintenance plan. The plan involves measures such as cutting trees to create more sand areas, building fauna depots, and planting crucial plant species.
Biodiversity Action Plan
Fishheart was tested at the Leppikoski power plant for the first time in summer 2021. The fishway has been in use at the hydropower plant throughout the entire 2022 migration period, from June to mid-October. By the end of August, the Fishheart fishway had carried more than 12,500 fish over the power plant. The purpose of the Fishheart is to strengthen especially the natural cycle of endangered lake trout on the Hyrynsalmi route, which is part of the Oulujoki river system.
Landscaping the old Inkoo power plant, old landfill area/storage field
We are involved in a project coordinated by the Kumla municipality in Sweden to build a butterfly landscape near our waste treatment facility. The aim of the butterfly landscape project is to increase the biodiversity in the area and to restore former grasslands to benefit plants and insects – and butterflies, in particular. Additionally, the project includes a butterfly trail that can be used for educational purposes. Restoration measures made in 2020 included the creation of sandy habitats for solitary bees and the restoration of meadows. In 2021, the meadow areas were expanded and measures to support the ongoing maintenance of the areas were implemented.
is building
Read more on local biodiversity actions
In 2022, meadow flowers were planted on three hectares of the landfill and at the outer part of the Material Recycling Center. On top of the landfill we also placed sand beds as well as old oak and birch trunks and a small water pond to favour insects and bird life.
For 2021, we set a Group-wide biodiversity target of at least 12 major voluntary measures promoting biodiversity. We carried out 13 projects, many of which are still continuing. In 2022, we have been developing a science-based strategy to measure and improve the biodiversity-relevant impacts of the Group’s activities and new projects. Some local examples of our biodiversity work are included below:
The fishway enabling upstream migration will be completed in 2025 at the Blyberg and Väsa power plants, while the fishway for downstream migration will be commissioned at the same plants in 2023. The construction of the fishways is the biggest fishway investment in Swedish history.
View our Biodiverstity action plan
Fishheart fishway at the Leppikoski power plant
In recent years, the protection and restoration of biodiversity have increasingly become a spotlight topic alongside climate change mitigation. The reason for this is clear: more and more species and habitats are threatened by climate change and human activities. The topic will be given even more attention later in the year when the parties to the UN Convention on Biological Diversity meet in Montreal to discuss how to protect and restore biodiversity.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/battery-recycling/lithium-ion-battery-recycling-technology
80 %
Our low CO2 battery recycling process
Lithium-ion Battery Recycling Technology
We use a combination of mechanical and hydrometallurgical technologies to recycle the battery materials. Our industrial-scale, low-CO2 processes allow us to recover lithium, cobalt, manganese and nickel from the battery for reuse in the production of new batteries. Our optimised battery treatment processes are safe, sustainable, and efficient.
Mechanical processing
Hydrometallurgical processing
95 %
of a battery can be recycled with the combination of our mechanical and hydrometallurgical recycling processes.
We are building a new,state-of-the-art hydrometallurgical plant in Harjavalta, Finland. The new plant will enable us to expand our recycling capacity of lithium-ion batteries and the production of sustainable battery chemicals. The new Harjavalta facility will help to meet the rising demand for recycled battery materials and enable the sustainable recovery of lithium, nickel, cobalt, and manganese, all of which are essential in the manufacturing of new EV batteries.
The hydrometallurgical recycling process involves a chemical precipitation methodology that allows scarce minerals to be recovered from the black mass and delivered to battery manufacturers for reuse in the production of new batteries. We are continuously looking into different ways and processes to extract a higher yield and higher purity from the battery materials.
Watch the video what our Battery Recycling Solution is about
Lithium-ion Battery Recycling Technology | Fortum
We are renewing the value chain for electric vehicle and industrial use batteries by offering recycling and second-life solutions for lithium-ion batteries.
of the valuable metals from the battery's black mass can be recovered with our cutting-edge hydrometallurgical recycling process.
Our efficient and low-CO2 battery recycling processes combine mechanical and hydrometallurgical recycling technologies. The technology was developed by Fortum, and the battery treatment processes have been optimised for high safety, sustainability, and a high recovery rate.
The lithium-ion batteries are first disassembled and treated during a mechanical process at Fortum’s plant in Ikaalinen, Finland. The mechanical processing enables us to recover plastics, aluminium, copper, and black mass. The battery’s black mass, containing critical metals, is collected and then taken for hydrometallurgical processing at Fortum's plant in Harjavalta, Finland. Other recovered materials are recycled in separate processes.
Hydrometallurgical recycling facility
Recycling Technology


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/wind-power-must-carbon-neutrality-succeed
Due to its intermittent nature of production, other sources of CO2-free power generation are needed. Sufficient amounts of electricity must be provided to households and industries at all times, regardless of the weather conditions. Therefore, for example hydropower or nuclear power is used to balance renewables and ensure security of supply.
What kinds of challenges are there related to wind power?
hydropower
When a wind power project is initiated, an environmental impact assessment is carried out to determine how the installation would affect animal and plant life in the area. As part of the assessment, birds are counted during spring and autumn migrations. In areas that are on migration routes, very careful studies are needed. The movement patterns of birds are studied, including flight height in the area as well as the positions of resting and feeding areas in relation to the wind park.
For example in Finland, comprehensive monitoring of bird behaviour near wind power installations has been carried out. Studies have found that collisions are very rare, and no population level impacts have arisen from wind farms. NGOs have also carried out studies and concluded that climate change is a much more significant threat to birdlife than windfarms.
Sometimes, a so-called digital twin is created to test and model operations. It is a virtual copy of the turbine, identical to the actual physical machine. Using a digital twin prevents harm to the real turbine if a such a test proves unsuccessful.
a year – enough to power 13,000 households. Ten years ago, the output of one turbine was
In addition to Kalax, we operate three wind farms in Norway and one wind farm in Sweden. In Russia, with our partners, we are the largest producer of wind power with our eight wind farms. We are also actively developing new wind farms in all of these countries: some of these projects are in the permitting phase, and some are ready to start construction. In Fortum’s renewed strategy, wind power also plays a significant role. So no doubt you’ll hear more good wind power news from us soon!
Currently, approximately 13% of the EU’s carbon-neutral electricity production comes from wind power. The share of wind power varies by country. Of the Nordics countries, Sweden has a particularly strong wind power base, and many new wind parks have been built in recent years. Finland and Norway are catching up, and the market in Finland is currently quite attractive. In Europe, the majority of new electricity production investments are in wind or solar power – it has become mainstream.
nuclear power
Is wind power harmful to birds or to biodiversity in general?
Fortum’s newest wind farm Kalax was recently completed in Närpes, Finland. Construction started in spring 2019. The wind park comprises 21 units with a maximum output of 4.3 megawatts each. They represent cutting edge technology in wind power, with a 150-metre rotor diameter, engine room height at 155 metres and the rotor blades reaching to 233 metres at their highest point.
Wind power is a must for carbon neutrality to succeed | Fortum
How is digitalisation applied in wind power?
In wind power, digitalisation means more measuring instrumentation, sensors and automatic functions as well as self-diagnostics. This makes maintenance easier: instead of carrying out maintenance at scheduled intervals, the condition of the turbine can be monitored continuously and parts replaced when wear out or fault is detected. This can translate to savings in use and repair costs.
What kinds of wind power projects is Fortum currently engaged in?
19 GWh
New materials have also contributed to the development. For example, using carbon fibre in the turbine blades makes them stronger and lighter, which has made it possible to build longer blades.
A wind park requires a power line for feeding the electricity into the grid. This may entail cutting down forest to clear the path. This can be seen as an inconvenience by landowners.
Another significant factor in the development is the increased height of the wind turbines. Higher up, the winds are stronger, and therefore higher turbines are more productive. Earlier, wind parks were only built in places with ideal wind conditions, such as coastlines or fell tops, to reach sufficient output levels. Today, there are much more potential areas where wind power is feasible. Offshore wind farms are also a possibility, albeit a more expensive one than onshore installations.
Is your idea of a wind power turbine outdated?
Wind power has many benefits. The most important is that it is emission-free and renewable. In addition, it is available everywhere in the world. Conditions may be better in one place and less optimal in another, but wind is everywhere. In Finland and Sweden, it is also now the cheapest alternative when it comes to building new electricity production.
, so the increase is considerable.
8 GWh/year
, is used to ensure a sufficient electricity supply when wind power is not available
In the last decade or two, wind power has developed tremendously. Wind power plants produce much more electricity than before – as much as ten times more than the plants of the early 2000s. This is mainly because of the increased size of the individual wind turbines. Blades are longer and rotors larger than before, so the turbine swipes at a larger area as its turns, producing more energy. With bigger generators and gear systems, the output increases further. One modern wind turbine produces
Read more about wind power
For electricity production, the intermittency of wind power is a challenge. It is not always windy, and production is not very predictable. Therefore, a load-balancing electricity source, for example


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/electrification-biggest-climate-action
In the future, our energy will be sourced increasingly from the sun and wind. However, there will be situations when solar or wind power does not produce enough electricity, and the energy system needs to be balanced with
wind
Within the European Union, fossil fuels still account for 40% of the electricity consumed. Because we need to eliminate emissions and because electricity consumption is growing, there is an increasing need for
In Central Europe, the fluctuation is offset mainly with natural gas-fired plants. But natural gas emissions too must be eliminated. One of the most promising alternatives for this is to replace natural gas with hydrogen.
natural gas still has an important role
Read more about reliable and CO2-free nuclear power
hydro
. Renewable energy sources currently generate about a third of the electricity consumed in the EU, and their share of the total electricity consumption is growing rapidly.
Electrification – the biggest climate action?
solar power
Short-term storage is possible with, for instance, hydropower, but especially in the Northern Europe, seasonal storage of energy will be needed for months at a time in the future. One solution for this is Power2X, i.e. converting electricity to energy form ‘X’. Here’s an example of how the method works: when there is a surplus of solar or wind energy,
Electrification – the biggest climate action? | Fortum
Nuclear power has an important role in clean energy production. It produces
Hydrogen is also a competitive solution for many industrial processes in which the transition to zero emissions is inevitable yet difficult with electrification alone. Hydrogen can replace fossil fuels, for instance, in the chemical industry and in steel production.
electrolysis can be used to produce hydrogen
When energy consumption is high, the steady supply of electricity is critical. Unlike other CO2-free forms of production (solar and wind), nuclear power is predictable because electricity can be produced continuously – regardless of weather conditions. Half of Europe’s emission-free electricity currently comes from nuclear power. It will also be needed in the future to reduce climate emissions.
Hydrogen may also be a solution for the replacement of fossil fuels in heavy-duty transportation. The so-called e-fuels that are hydrogen-based are currently still too expensive to compete with fossil fuels. But, in the long term, they are expected to have an important role in road, air and marine transportation.
To offset this fluctuation, the Nordic countries use hydropower. Water can be stored in lakes for months on end, and production at hydropower plants can be ramped up or down in a matter of just one second. Hydropower’s flexibility not only keeps the existing electricity system in balance, but it also enables the quick addition of wind and solar power into the system. Hydropower is a significant factor in combating climate change, and it currently represents over a third of the EU’s renewable electricity consumption.
CO2-free electricity and is a reliable energy source
, which can then be stored for later use. Producing large amounts of hydrogen may also require constructing purpose-built wind and solar farms.
About two-thirds of all the emissions caused by people come from energy production and consumption. Particularly in the Nordic countries, emissions from electricity production have decreased quickly, and the electricity produced is 90 per cent carbon-free hydro, nuclear, wind or solar power. The situation in Central Europe is more challenging, due to the larger scale and the fact that hydropower is not available to the same extent.
Hydrogen is the most common element in the universe, but there is very little of it in the Earth’s atmosphere. It is the lightest of the elements, and it has the highest energy density. Hydrogen has been recognised as an energy source for more than two hundred years, but it has again emerged as a hot topic in energy and climate discussions. Why? Combusting clean hydrogen does not create any emissions – the only end product is steam, which can be used for electricity production.
Sudden, unpredictable consumption and production peaks occur in the electrical grid every day. At worst, they can cause power outages and interruptions. When the sun emerges from behind a cloud, the solar panels’ production shoots from zero to one hundred per cent, and when hundreds of electric vehicles connect to charging stations at the same time, the grid’s balance between electricity production and consumption can sway drastically. On the other hand, we need to be able to store renewable energy for the dark and windless hours as well.
Most of us are used to a steady supply of electricity coming from the outlet in our homes. There must be a constant balance between electricity production and consumption so that there is enough electricity available at all times for the needs of households and industry. At the same time, well-informed consumers are aware that the origin of the electricity consumed plays an important role in reducing your personal carbon footprint.
Read more about electrification
Why is nuclear power needed?
In the EU
Today,
energy storage
as an equaliser of energy production and consumption – especially in Central Europe. The role of natural gas is related to flexibility. More than two thirds of gas consumption is weather-dependent, with gas balancing shortages of wind and solar power. Storing gas is easy, and Europe has plenty of storage capacity. In the future, however, natural gas can be replaced with renewable, carbon-neutral gas produced from hydrogen.
Where can we get enough clean energy?
What is hydrogen and how can it solve energy challenges?
Read more about solar, wind, nuclear and hydropower
, most of the renewable energy in electricity production comes from wind turbines and hydropower plants. While the share of solar power is still marginal, it is constantly growing, and solar cell systems are widely available for households as well as for the needs of shopping centres or industrial facilities.
that helps to mitigate climate change. Nuclear power’s greenhouse gas emissions during its lifecycle are comparable to wind, solar or hydropower.
However, electricity accounts for only about a fifth of the energy we use in the EU, which is why making electricity production emission-free does not take us very far. What is needed is a system-level energy transition. At the heart of this is wide-scale electrification, which can help reduce emissions – especially in heating, transportation and industry. Electrification as such is not the answer for all sectors. Still, clean electricity can be used to produce clean and storable hydrogen, which is predicted to be one of the most important components of the future of energy.
Fossil fuels must be phased out – in electricity production as well as in industry, heating and transportation. Above all, we are battling against climate change. To stop global warming, energy must be produced and consumed in new, sustainable ways. This is an enormous challenge, but it can be solved. When the production of clean electricity has been mainstreamed, the next step is to electrify everything that can be electrified. How is this possible? Is hydrogen the missing piece of the energy puzzle?


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/gas-partner-electricity-carrier-carbon-free-energy
On a daily horizon, gas storages help the electricity system absorb more intermittent renewables by injecting more gas on windy days and vice versa. On a more seasonal horizon, gas ensures winters are matched with a corresponding increase in energy delivered – in the first quarter of the year gas consumption is on average some 800 TWh or 90 per cent higher than in a summer quarter. The same figure for electricity is 100 TWh or 15 per cent.
Flexibility in high demand
ahoniemi
Suddenly, gas becomes just another energy carrier, one that is particularly easy to store and move around and, as such, is able to complement electricity in the journey towards a decarbonised energy system.
Strategy Manager
Take the demand side. Since 2008, European power markets have seen a steadily increasing number of hours when the electricity price falls below zero. This means that the energy system is not able to find a use for all the renewable electricity being produced. Production of green gas via electrolysis can provide a flexible source of demand and allow even more renewables to be integrated. In fact, hydrogen production can itself become a major source of electricity demand – up to 50 per cent of the total by 2050 in some scenarios.
As a result, more and more often electricity is recognised as the greenest carrier of energy, capable of decarbonising other sectors such as transport, where emissions have increased by a staggering 20 per cent since 1990.
Gas – a partner of electricity as a carrier of carbon-free energy
Gas is also crucial for meeting demand on freezing days – for example, in Germany, the difference between the day of highest and lowest demand was 4 TWh in 2018, almost seven times that of electricity. As a thought exercise, one would need to double the German electricity generation capacity to deliver the same variation using electricity alone.
Paradigm shift from fossil fuel to clean gas
Energy transition
14 February 2020, 14:01
Technologies for emission-free production of hydrogen, such as steam methane reforming with carbon capture and storage, electrolysis and pyrolysis, are already available. They are not cost-competitive in the current market, but this could easily change within a decade, as pilot projects all over Europe spring up and learning curves work their magic.
Market liberalisation put an end to overcapacity – the electricity markets of different countries became interconnected, increasing overall efficiency and reducing costs to consumers by tens of billions of euros annually.
A decarbonised future may seem far away, but to make the journey manageable, there is no time to waste. For example, if we are to decarbonise residential heating by 2050, conversions to hydrogen would likely have to start already in the 2020s. Meanwhile, emission reductions while maintaining the security of supply have to continue and to spread to other sectors. Gas can deliver on both, which makes it an ideal partner of electricity.
While the electricity grid is frequently congested, the European gas grid faces no such issues. Storage of gas is easy and Europe has the world’s highest gas storage capacity in relation to its consumption, some 1,000 TWh in total. By comparison, electricity storage is measured in GWhs.
Germany plans to combine cancellation of emission allowances with coal phase-out
In short, there is an increasing need for flexibility.
Present is prologue
Things used to be simpler. Just a few decades ago, Europe had separate electricity markets served by national, vertically integrated energy companies with the help of a massive overcapacity of oil-, coal- and gas-fired power plants. The environmental burden was high but went largely unnoticed, and the costs to consumers were huge but mostly invisible. Electricity was like any other fuel.
None of the above is to say electrification is a dead-end – quite the opposite. There is virtually no alternative to increasing electricity use if we are to reach Europe’s climate targets. But that’s far from the whole story.
The climate impact of electricity generation has also plummeted. After many twists and turns, EU power generation has reduced its carbon dioxide emissions by almost 45 per cent between 1990 and 2019, vastly outperforming the rest of the European economy. The share of intermittent renewables has risen to 18 per cent of production.
So we know gas is crucial to today’s energy system and that it has many of the qualities electricity lacks. Equally, we know there is no room for net emissions in the long-term future of European energy. This means gas will have to become emission-free. The likeliest option is hydrogen.
High-temperature process heat where electrification is not feasible is another example of a use for hydrogen, as well as heavy road and maritime transport. In residential heating, almost half of which relies on gas today, several pilots are experimenting with conversions of entire gas grids into hydrogen. It turns out that a gas pipeline is no more of a fossil fuel infrastructure than an electricity transmission line is.
Gas – a partner of electricity as a carrier of carbon-free energy | Fortum
The complementarity manifests in a number of ways. Take transmission. If we compare two energy transmission methods, a gas pipeline and an electricity transmission line, the former is able to transfer 30 times more energy with the same amount of euros invested.
The role of gas in today’s Europe has much to do with flexibility. Roughly 70 per cent of gas demand is weather dependent. The weather itself affects the energy system in many ways.
Full decarbonisation could require increasing hydrogen’s share of final energy use from a rounding error now to well over 30% by 2050.
The change won’t end here. One important lesson learnt in Europe’s path towards decarbonisation has been that building just solar, and wind will not suffice. Problems of market design, the security of supply, overall costs, investment uncertainty, grid congestion, multinational grid planning, local resistance and many others point to a still-high need for other, complementary energy carriers.
The need to decarbonise the European economy raises the bar for the energy sector – how to deliver emission reductions at an affordable cost while keeping the lights on? One of the main answers is likely gas – first, natural gas and eventually clean gas.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/germany-plans-combine-cancellation-emission-allowances-coal-phase-out-sending-important-signal-entire-eu
Germany’s decision sends an important message
Pekka Lundmark: Emissions trading is the best way to take Europe to a lower carbon future
However, the details of the legislation are vague. The legislation does not specify the cancellation methodology nor volume, which creates uncertainty in the market. According to the law proposal, important details such as cancellation volumes will be decided later, based on independent studies.
Listen to the podcast
For example, the decision to end use of coal in Germany is a national overlapping policy with the ETS. Therefore, it leads to freeing up these allowances, which will then be used by other emitters in Europe.
If the allowance market loosens while other factors remain unchanged, coal stands to benefit.
Based on Fortum’s own analyses and surveys of external market analysts, the MSR is not equipped to prevent the waterbed effect, as it operates too slowly and absorbs too few unused allowances from the market. We estimate that 80–90% of the waterbed effect still exists after the introduction of the MSR, depending on certain market assumptions.
Regarding brown coal (lignite), a shutdown schedule and compensation payments have been negotiated on a plant by plant basis. For hard coal, the law foresees reverse auctions for capacity taken off the market according to a timetable set by the authorities.
But why is the cancellation so crucial? In order to answer this question, one must dig deeper into the functioning of energy and carbon markets.
Some recent public comments have stated that the MSR eliminates the waterbed effect almost entirely, and therefore the MSR is able to tackle any excess allowances resulting from overlapping policies.
As the carbon budget is common to the whole system, reduction of emissions in one country or in one installation tends to lead to emissions rebounding somewhere else in the system. This phenomenon is called the "waterbed effect" or internal carbon leakage.
Germany has in any case sent an important signal to other member states by deciding to cancel the unused emission allowances due to the coal phase-out. This is of high European political importance for the further development of the EU ETS and an example of making responsible and sustainable climate policy that results in real emission reduction.
Coal phase-out and voluntary cancellation combined create a strong impact
The same applies to other overlapping policies in the sectors covered by the EU ETS (e.g. national taxes, subsidies, etc.).
Germany plans to combine cancellation of emission allowances with coal phase-out, sending an important signal to the entire EU
The German government plans legislation on coal phase-out. Simultaneously, Germany plans to cancel corresponding emission allowances. Germany’s pioneering policy may be an important part of the development of Europe’s  emissions trading system.
MSR
Cancelling allowances also means a financial loss for Germany in the form of lost auction revenue. The cost can be high, in single-digit billions, but it simply reflects the true cost of an overlapping policy. Without any cancellation the same cost would be spread to other member states through lower auction prices.
The EU ETS is a carbon budget
In an oversupply situation, an amount corresponding to 12–24% of the oversupply is removed from the market and transferred into the MSR. On the other hand, the MSR increases supply when the system has a deficit of allowances.
For the EU ETS, this means that demand for emission allowances will rebound immediately elsewhere in the system. As the operation of the MSR is based on an annual indicator only, it fails to catch the excess allowances.
Germany plans to combine cancellation of emission allowances with coal phase-out, sending an important signal to the entire EU | Fortum
07 February 2020, 10:57
However, this claim misrepresents the way energy markets and the MSR operate.
It is encouraging that the German coal law proposal states the intention to cancel the unused emission allowances corresponding to the coal phase-out. If these are not removed from the market, this will do nothing but shift the emissions to other operators in Germany or in other EU ETS member states.
More about ETS
The MSR cuts the supply of allowances available to the market if the system is oversupplied. An oversupply is indicated by the total number of allowances, an indicator published by the EU Commission once a year.
Market stability reserve brings complexity into ETS
EU ETS is a market-based cap-and-trade system. This means that the system has a fixed amount of emissions allowances, which are gradually released to the market. The amount of allowances decreases annually at a predictable pace set by the Linear Reduction Factor (LRF).
Each year, installations (such as power plants, factories etc.) in the system must acquire and surrender emission allowances corresponding to their verified emissions. As the banking of allowances between years and trading periods is allowed, in practice the EU ETS caps the cumulative emissions of the system exactly like a carbon budget.
In January 2020, the German government proposed legislation on phasing out coal in power generation. The government plans to implement the full coal exit law within the first half of 2020. This is by far Europe’s largest coal phase-out plan.
From 2023 onwards, the allowances in the MSR will be permanently cancelled according to predefined rules. Consequently, the ETS cap is no longer entirely independent of market development.
Germany’s decision has international implications. Carbon dioxide emissions from burning brown and hard coal in Germany amounted to 160 million tons in 2019, corresponding to about 20% of the total German emissions. The German share of the total emissions covered by the European Emissions Trading System (EU ETS) was 20–25% during 2013–2019. Any national policy overlapping with ETS by such a large participant in the EU ETS has the potential to jeopardize the whole European system.
While the MSR operates based on a figure published once a year, the power market is optimised on a continuous basis. For example, when coal-fired power generation is closed down, it will be replaced by generation that can ramp up at will, namely generation that also consumes emission allowances, such as other coal- or gas-fired plants.
Carbon - the best performing commodity in the world
The introduction of the Market Stability Reserve (MSR) into the ETS in the beginning of 2019 made the system more complicated.
The rebound happens in two main ways: firstly, coal and gas plants elsewhere in Europe will ramp up. Secondly, gas loses some of its competitiveness against coal, meaning carbon emissions “leak” from gas to coal. This is because the emission allowance market is a key driver in the competition between gas and coal.
cannot prevent the waterbed effect


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog/forenergy-blog/emissions-trading-best-way-take-europe-lower-carbon-future
Emissions trading encourages lowest cost investments in emissions reduction first
Fortum's President and CEO 09/2015–06/2020
The Coal Commission, established by the German government and widely representing society’s various interest groups, suggested that coal use be phased out by 2038. Germany’s coal-fired electricity output in 2017 was about 43 GW. The Commission is suggesting a phase-out of the output, with a maximum 30 GW in use in 2020, 17 GW in 2030, and no coal-fired electricity production whatsoever after 2038. It also suggests removing an equal amount of emissions allowances from the markets so that emissions trading is not undermined and so that the emissions are not transferred to other countries. Decisions on implementation are expected by the end of the year.
If the aim is to accelerate the reduction of emissions already under the EU ETS, the annual reduction factor must be increased. This will happen in 2021, when the factor increases to 2.2% – which it is a good start – but Fortum thinks the emissions cap should be tightened faster and that the increases should be bigger. This would lead to a faster decrease in emissions in earnest.
Better results by expanding emissions trading
Limiting global warming to 1.5 degrees, as referenced in the International Panel of Climate Change (IPCC) report, requires measures to reduce emissions in all areas of society.
In my opinion, it is really important that we engage in a broad discussion on the ways by which Europe can transition to low-carbon energy production in the decades ahead. We at Fortum strongly support the goal of a carbon-neutral Europe by 2050. At the same time, Europe’s competitiveness must be ensured, and its key enabler is affordable energy. The EU and its member countries must together agree on the path to realising the transition to a carbon-neutral society in a controlled manner, without compromising security of supply. Unfortunately, there is no shortcut to success – no matter how much we wish there were.
Europe’s biggest coal user, Germany, is seeking a comprehensive, national solution to end the use of coal in energy production. At the same time, Germany has decided to close its nuclear power plants as soon as 2022. Coal and nuclear power together account for over half of the country’s electricity production, i.e. the scale is huge. In fact, a key question is how to realise the transition without compromising the security of electricity supply and affordably priced energy. Likewise, it must be ensured that social justice is realised in coal-based power production areas already suffering as a result of the structural change.
Well-functioning, market-driven emissions trading is the most economical way for society – and for every consumer – to realise the transition to a low-carbon energy system. The idea of emissions trading is simple: an annually decreasing cap is set on emissions, and the polluter pays. In fact, for a long time we at Fortum have urged EU decision makers to take actions to strengthen the emissions trading system (EU ETS).
Emissions trading is the best way to take Europe to a lower carbon future | Fortum
Emissions trading is the best way to take Europe to a lower carbon future
There is room for national measures, like taxes, investment support schemes, and bans, but they should target sectors that are outside the emissions trading scheme, like transportation, agriculture, and building-specific heating. On the other hand, it isn’t expedient to set national targets for sectors within the sphere of the emissions trading because the market and the reduction target are European-wide. It is important to note that nationally-enforced closing of individual power plants does not automatically reduce total emissions; instead, they enable increased emissions elsewhere. For example, banning the use of coal in energy production in 2029 in Finland doesn’t, in principle, reduce European emissions, because it doesn’t reduce the emissions cap set at the European level. So it is crucial that if these kinds of national measures are implemented, their impacts on the emissions trading system must always be offset by removing a corresponding amount of emissions allowances from the market and cancelling them. This guarantees that national decisions lead to actual emissions reductions and not just the transfer of emissions from one country to another.
The EU ETS covers electricity production, district heating, industry, and Europe’s internal air traffic, which together account for about half of Europe’s greenhouse gas emissions. A common emissions reduction timetable and the total annual emissions reduction – 1.74% annual reduction of year 2015 level – have been agreed upon in the EU. Thus there is one price, determined by supply and demand, for emissions within the sphere of the system. As the availability of emission allowances decreases from year to year, the price for emissions increases. Every player under the EU ETS has to decide whether to pay for their emissions or to invest in reducing them. Market-driven emissions trading thus ensures that the cheapest ways to reduce emissions are utilised first, no matter in which sector or country they are located in.
Fortum’s stake in Uniper is just under fifty per cent, and, as mentioned above, the company is responsible for about 9% of Germany’s coal-fired power. Coal accounts for about 30% of Uniper’s capacity in all countries; the remaining 70% is emissions-free hydro and nuclear power, and flexible gas-based power production. We are currently in talks with Uniper’s management on strategic and operative collaboration arrangements between our companies. Reducing emissions is naturally one of the main themes in these discussions. However, as an independently operating listed company, Uniper negotiates with German officials about the continuation of its own plants and communicates the decisions related to them on its own.
Obviously, no matter how much we would like to fast-forward to a low-carbon future, we can’t. The transition will take time, and it must be done in a way that enables us to secure the supply of energy also when the sun doesn’t shine or the wind blow, and to keep costs reasonable for everyone. I hope that the political decisions made in different countries, in the EU and globally, support this goal, and that together we achieve a low-carbon energy system using reasonable means and at reasonable costs.
Also, all the other European countries where Uniper has coal-based power production have the political will to stop using coal. The goal set in France is for 2022, in Great Britain 2025, and in the Netherlands 2029. Finland is the only European country to have enacted legislation on discontinuing the use of coal in energy production.
The concern raised by environmental NGOs about the use of coal in energy production has been in the spotlight in Finland in recent weeks. Fortum has been challenged about the health impacts of coal power, and we also have been asked about the timetable specifically regarding the shutdown of our associated company Uniper’s coal power plants. The discussion about the issue is warranted because coal power plants account for 16% of greenhouse gas emissions in Europe and 19% globally. Uniper’s share of Germany’s coal power is about 9%.
Another important way to expand the emissions trading coverage would be geographically. The EU should work actively to ensure that as many significant polluters as possible elsewhere in the world would also start emissions pricing. This is actually already happening in many countries, and integrating the systems with the EU’s emissions trading would open very attractive ways to prevent carbon leakage and ensure the equal competitive position of European industry.
Expanding the coverage of emissions trading would be a great way to do this because the more emissions that fall within the emissions cap, the simpler it is to reduce them. A possible immediate expansion target would be the heating and cooling of buildings, which would increase the emission trading volume by one fourth. Something that should be looked at farther into the future is integrating all other emissions – and perhaps carbon sinks – into the same market-driven system.
The EU and its member countries must together agree on the path to realising the transition to a carbon-neutral society in a controlled manner, without compromising security of supply.
Uniper makes its operative decisions independently
The ultimate goal should be for the most comprehensive global emissions trading as possible. EU emissions account for roughly 10% of the world’s total emissions, so international solutions are really needed.
Germany seeks a social, comprehensive solution to end coal use
12 April 2019, 15:16


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/emissions-trading-best-way-take-europe-lower-carbon-future



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-podcast/carbon-best-performing-commodity-world
Carbon - the best performing commodity in the world | Fortum
16 September 2019, 07:00
Join
ForTheDoers Podcast
Emissions come at a price - so they must also come with a price
Has the EU carbon market entered a new era?
EU ETS harnesses the power of market forces to reduce greenhouse gas emissions. In practice, the European Commission sets a cap = carbon maximum for the EU and allocates emissions permits to companies. These permits can be used to cover business-related emissions, banked for the future - or sold to others.
Related blog posts:
Why did the Telegraph magazine call carbon the best-performing commodity in the world? Because of the European emissions trading system, ETS. The system has tripled its allowance price within a year, which is quite exceptional in any market. So what is EU ETS, and why is it so crucial in solving climate change?
Paulina Modlitba
when they explain and discuss EU ETS together with our host


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/emissions-come-price-so-they-must-also-come-price
There is a trading scheme in place within the EU. During the economic recession consequent, low demand for allowances created a huge oversupply. If any it showed how important the cap & trade properties are for the system to work efficiently. Now, this has been changed. But even though the scheme has been developed, it’s yet to be aligned with the ambition to become climate-neutral by 2050 as that ambition still needs to be converted into hard targets at the EU level. That, I would say, it’s necessary.
Footprint network statistics show that 60 percent of the world’s ecological footprint consists of CO2 emissions, with the energy sector as the largest contributor. That means that every reduction within the energy sector also has a positive effect in other areas. Prioritising our efforts to change where it matters the most would place the global energy sector as one of the key sectors for transformation. And there are actually several different ways to put a price on the emissions.
Given the challenge we face, we can’t really afford not to be as cost-efficient as possible.>
Emissions come at a price – so they must also come with a price | Fortum
Emissions come at a price – so they must also come with a price
Cap & trade, where ideally the emissions cap is decreased in such a way that the climate targets are met, creates a market for the emission allowances. Any given reduction will then take place where it’s most cost-efficient, no matter where or in which sector.
In our globalised world the emissions from something produced in one country are often attributed to the country where the end consumer is, but the price tag for the emissions connected to it is not. In a global cap & trade system, those emissions would end up on the product’s price tag, regardless of where it is sold. That would make it possible for us as consumers to assess the ecological footprint of a product merely by its price tag. The larger the footprint, the higher the price. A global cap & trade, or interconnected regional trading schemes, would not only be the most cost-efficient way to reduce emissions, but it would also help you to do more sustainable choices.
29 July 2019, 09:00
When you bought that new fridge, did you give any thought to how you affected the climate? Or how many grams of carbon dioxide per kilometre was that flight you took on your holiday and does it matter? Human activity leaves a mark, and our ecological footprint has increasingly become the way to visualise how our lifestyles and our consumption affect the environment. But is it possible to translate that ecological footprint into the most effective signal there is – price?
Is it possible to translate that ecological footprint into the most effective signal there is – price?


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/has-eu-carbon-market-entered-new-era
Overall, then, there simply is no particular price level at which the EU ETS starts having an impact. The impact of the price of carbon is visible at all price levels, all the time, and a higher price always pushes the EU economy in a more climate-friendly direction.
Why is the Emissions Trading System the EU’s flagship policy to combat climate change? One perspective is that almost all resources, including those available for reducing greenhouse gas emissions, are limited. For example, in power generation we trust the market mechanism to ensure that customers only pay for as much as is needed to satisfy demand at any given moment, and not a cent more, leaving resources available for other uses.
Why is the Emissions Trading System the EU’s flagship policy to combat climate change?
Market Analyst
This understanding is erroneous, however, as the time horizons of the bans on thermal coal use, for example, and the MSR, are fundamentally different. In reality, the MSR will only withdraw allowances up to the point when the total number of EUAs in the market is above 833 million tonnes. According to consensus forecasts, this limit will be reached by 2025, the earliest year when the first coal bans, now in planning, are set to take effect. Hence, as feared, the emissions abated by these overlapping policies would simply result in emissions being increased somewhere else inside the ETS, with no net emission reductions.
Potential for emission cuts inside the ETS exists in myriad places and as a whole is difficult to estimate, but to give a sense of the scale, in the power and heat generation the potential from coal-to-gas switching alone is to the tune of 10 percent. Although, as a caveat, this requires high volumes of gas available in Europe – otherwise price gains in EUAs will simply spill over to the price of gas and switching from coal to gas becomes more difficult. Admittedly, the causal chains are complex, but at any event, a stronger ETS will always direct power generation in a climate-friendly direction.
Overlapping policy measures undermine the steering effect of emissions trading
Has the EU carbon market entered a new era? | Fortum
One has to remember that deep down, the EU ETS is a political tool for limiting CO2 emissions and a perennial threat to its potency comes from the same political sphere that gave birth to it. Of particular concern are overlapping policies. By these we mean, inter alia, national bans on particular fuels, targeted at production facilities already covered by the EU ETS. Overlapping policies do not lead to emission cuts on a net basis. Instead, the emissions saved at one location simply move to another inside the ETS, making these policies a poor method of fighting climate change.
In practice, how does a carbon price reduce emissions? One of the most important mechanisms is the effect of the EUA price on the European power generation. As a rule of thumb, one euro in the price of carbon translates into 87 cents in the cost of producing electricity using coal but only 41 cents in the equivalent costs in gas-fired generation. This way, a more expensive EUA benefits a relatively low-carbon gas at the expense of high-carbon coal. Obviously, EUAs have no effect on the generation costs of renewables or nuclear at all, thus boosting their competitiveness against fossil fuels.
In addition to power and heat, the EUA price is now felt more widely also in other industries covered by the EU ETS. This is because allocations, the other main supply source of EUAs, cover a smaller and smaller part of total emissions, forcing more and more market actors to come to the market to cover their needs, exposing them to the carbon price and extending the impact of the EU ETS wider and wider inside the European economy.
A look into history reveals that the EU carbon market is extremely sensitive to overlapping policies also at the EU level. For example, the draft energy efficiency directive, published in the summer of 2011, started a chain of events during which the European emission allowance price fell from 16.50 euros per ton all the way to 6.50 and did not substantially recover in almost seven years.
The European Emissions Trading System was long considered something of a failure, as the post-2008 recession along with certain policy decisions brought demand for emission allowances – and prices – to the doldrums. Now the situation has changed. The price of a European emission allowance (EUA) has risen from 7.81 euros per ton at the start of the year up to 20.90 euros at the time of writing, a 170-percent gain. This is the highest price in ten years.
Overlapping policies – both at the EU level and nationally – still represent a major threat to the EU ETS. This is not to mention the political bandwidth wasted on “climate policies” that have no positive effect on the climate.
Despite the rapid price movements and a tightening market, it ought to be remembered that the ETS is still a political construct and as such vulnerable to political interference. The benefits of the mechanism nevertheless overwhelming; the emission reductions achieved using the ETS take us closer to our climate goals in the most cost-effective way and can also serve as a useful model for the rest of the world.
Sometimes it is argued that overlapping policies are not as detrimental to the ETS anymore as they were before due to the existence of the MSR. According to this train of thought, the emissions saved by national policies will simply be withdrawn from the market into the MSR and therefore will not be emitted somewhere else.
How does emissions trading help the climate?
The ultimate reason for the stronger price is the Market Stability Mechanism (MSR), set to begin operating at the start of 2019. The MSR will effect a 40-percent reduction in the number of EUAs coming to the market compared to the current year, a dramatic shift to which the market is now reacting.
In the context of combatting climate change, the market mechanism can make sure that emissions are cut exactly where it is most cost-effective. This is achieved by setting an emissions cap and selling allowances to the highest bidders and forming a market price of CO2 below which it makes sense for market actors to start reducing their emissions.
27 August 2018, 11:21


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/future-transportation-electricity-and-hydrogen
of the lithium-ion battery materials.
New battery technology is needed for electrifying motoring and for producing electricity with renewable energy. But the environmental impacts of batteries concern to many. EV batteries contain valuable metals, the availability of which is scarce and the demand growing. Modern battery technology, however, enables
ForTheDoers Blog: Hydrogen economy will come - sooner or later
Hydrogen can be used directly also in cars with fuel cells in which hydrogen reacts with oxygen, producing electric energy and water. The electric energy is fed to electric motors – so, in essence, hydrogen cars are electric cars in a way, but without a huge battery. Fuel-cell efficiency is also high: about 60% of the energy is used to move the vehicle, while the efficiency in traditional combustion engine cars is less than 30%. Norway and Sweden, among others, already have hydrogen buses in test use in transportation.
Plenty of development is underway also in the Nordic countries, where there is an urgency to reduce transportation emissions. LUT University, among others, is currently researching possibilities to produce fuel by using electricity to break down water molecules into oxygen and hydrogen, and then the hydrogen and carbon recovered from the air are combined into hydrocarbon, i.e. fuel. For example, methanol produced in this manner is well-suited as a fuel for ships.
The working group for fossil-free transport, led by Finland’s Ministry of Transport and Communications, suggests that cutting transportation emissions to half by 2030 would require Finland alone to have as many as 700,000 EVs on the roads. So we – and all of Europe – have a lot of catching up to do in electrifying passenger car transportation.
Climate change mitigation will not succeed without reducing also transportation’s greenhouse gases. Transportation accounts for about one fifth of Finland’s emissions, with passenger cars accounting for close to half of that. Finland’s target is to cut transportation’s greenhouse gas emissions by fifty per cent by 2030 and to zero by 2045. Electricity is proving to be the best way to achieve carbon-neutrality in passenger transportation.
Read more about future of transportation
The charging network for EVs also has grown rapidly in recent years. In addition to public charging stations, Finland has seen rapid growth in household charging stations thanks to, e.g., subsidies given to housing co-operatives. It’s easy to travel with an EV: the car can be charged while it is parked, and even the fee for the charge can be paid with an app.
Read more about hydrogen’s potential as a future fuel:
Hydrogen as a solution for land, sea and air transportation?
Recycling EV batteries – but how?
Future of transportation – electricity and hydrogen | Fortum
The number of electric vehicles on Finnish roadways has increased in recent years by almost 90 per cent annually; in 2020 there were already more than 40,000 EVs and plug-in hybrids in use. In Europe, EVs accounted for just under four per cent of all passenger cars in 2019, but the popularity of EVs varies significantly by country. For example, fewer than one per cent of all cars in Poland and Greece are EVs, while Norway already has more than 230,000 EVs in registered use – more per capita than any other country.
At the moment, the hydrogen-based so-called e-fuels are still too expensive to compete with fossil fuels. A Fortum-commissioned study by Copenhagen Economics estimates that industry and long-distance transportation will not transition to e-fuels on a broader scale until around 2030. However, e-fuels are expected to have an important role in heavy-duty transportation in the long term. In the future, cruiseliners will navigate from port to port using clean hydrogen energy, the emissions of which are just water.
the recycling of over 80%
The electrification of motoring also reduces energy consumption. EVs require less energy than traditional passenger cars because, unlike internal combustion engines, they don’t generate heat loss. EVs are about 300–400 per cent more efficient than vehicles powered by fossil fuel.
EV batteries and their charging networks are already a credible alternative to traditional combustion engine vehicles in passenger transportation and even in local bus transportation. However, hydrogen has many competitive advantages in meeting the needs of long-distance, heavy-duty transportation – smaller mass in relation to stored energy, quick refilling, and long-range. Using hydrogen in heavy-duty transportation is not at all a far-fetched utopia – there are already 11 manufacturers offering hydrogen-powered buses.
Transportation produces about 40% of the Nordic countries’ greenhouse gases, and only about 12% of the energy used in transportation is fossil-free. In passenger cars, the emissions reduction solution seems to be electric motors, but even the most efficient electric batteries are still inadequate for the needs of trucks, ships and aeroplanes. Something more – hydrogen, for example – is needed for these transportation modes to be emission-free. Electricity can be used to produce emissions-free hydrogen from water. Clean hydrogen can also be further refined into transportation fuels that have no carbon footprint. Could this be the solution? What does the electric future of transportation look like?
The recycled raw material from batteries is utilised in the production of battery chemicals, thereby reducing the environmental load. In the lithium-ion battery handling process, plastics and metals, like aluminium and copper, are separated into their own fractions and recycled. After mechanical processing, valuable metals, like cobalt, nickel and manganese, are recovered from the battery cells’ black mass.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/why-does-europes-pathway-clean-energy-go-through-natural-gas
Hydrogen production itself takes a lot of electricity, but since the hydrogen system will be more flexible because of hydrogen gas storages, it can consume electricity flexibly when there isn’t a shortage of it. This is how hydrogen production – just as natural gas does now – will facilitate the additional building of wind and solar energy.
In the long term, carbon emissions must also be eliminated in flexible gas-based electricity production. One of the most promising alternatives is replacing natural gas with hydrogen.
Why does Europe’s pathway to clean energy go through natural gas? | Fortum
The natural gas available in Finland can be used directly in electricity production and heating. Natural gas can also be further refined to liquefied natural gas (LNG) and compressed natural gas (CNG).
Finland, along with other Nordic countries, can also play an important role in a hydrogen economy. The good wind conditions of North offer low-cost electricity for hydrogen production. The development of gas thus holds interesting prospects also for the Finnish economy.
Additionally, natural gas is used to heat about half of European households, and a big share of industry is powered by gas. More gas than electricity is consumed in Europe – overall, Europe’s gas consumption is as much as 10-fold the electricity consumption of the Nordic countries. So gas is an essential part of Europe’s energy system.
Natural gas, gas consisting of primarily methane, is a gas that is created underground when biomass decomposes. Natural gas, i.e. methane, is the cleanest of fossil fuels; its CO2 emissions are about half of that of coal and just one-third of brown coal emissions.
Moreover, Europe is the world’s leading producer of biogas. Biogas, used in heating, electricity production and, increasingly, also as a transport fuel, offers a solution for cutting agricultural methane emissions and recycling organic waste. However, the production potential of biogas is limited compared to hydrogen, for example.
What is biogas?
What is natural gas?
What is hydrogen and how it can solve energy challenges?
Short-term storage is possible with, for instance, hydropower, but especially in Northern Europe, seasonal storage of energy will be needed for months at a time in the future. One solution for this is Power2X, i.e. converting electricity to energy form ‘X’. Here’s an example of how the method works: when there is a surplus of solar or wind energy,
In the short and long term, replacing coal with natural gas is one of the most effective climate actions – since 2014, the use of natural gas in European electricity production has increased by about 40 per cent, while emissions have decreased by 25 per cent during the same period. In addition to reducing emissions, natural gas ensures that fluctuations in wind and solar energy availability don’t jeopardise the availability of electricity.
In the everyday life of people and companies in Central Europe, gas is seen and felt at a different level than in Finland. The amount of electricity produced must always match the amount being consumed. In the Nordic countries, hydropower is abundant and helps in maintaining balance. But in continental Europe, gas-fired power plants are used to offset the fluctuations in wind and solar energy production.
Biogas, used in heating, electricity production and, increasingly, also as a transport fuel, offers a solution for cutting agricultural methane emissions and recycling organic waste. However, the production potential of biogas is limited compared to hydrogen, for example.
FAQ Gas
In Europe, natural gas is used much more and on a wider scale than in Finland. Natural gas is used to heat about half of European households, and a big share of industry is powered by gas. Europe’s gas consumption is as much as 10-fold the electricity consumption of the Nordic countries. The majority of natural gas is used for household heating.
Gas-fired power plants are flexible and can quickly produce the needed amount of electricity, e.g., in freezing weather or when the wind isn’t blowing or the sun isn’t shining. Gas power makes a sufficient amount of balancing electricity available, so more fluctuating renewable energy, like wind and solar power, can be built.
Germany has been a European frontrunner as a catalyst to a hydrogen economy. The country is an important hub in terms of natural gas, renewable energy and industry, and it will need a lot of electricity and hydrogen to reduce its emissions.
In Finland, natural gas is used, especially in combined heat and power production and in the process industry. Household use of gas is concentrated to Helsinki, where gas stoves are used in cooking. The use of natural gas also as a transport fuel is on the rise.
In the Nordic countries, biogas is used the most in Sweden and Denmark. Biogas is used in heating and electricity production, but a growing application is also transportation because biogas has the lowest emissions of transport fuels.
Biogas is a 100% renewable energy form because it can be produced from virtually any organic matter, such as biowaste, wastewater sludge, manure, and industrial surplus waste. The biggest potential is in field biomass produced from inedible parts of crop plants, among others.
The conversion to clean gas is a big change, and it also means the gas distribution networks need to be reformed. However, the same pipelines can be used to transfer clean gas instead of natural gas. Studies have shown that it is feasible to use the existing gas network in Europe to achieve climate targets, and it will also save hundreds of billions of euros. In addition to the pipeline network, some of the natural gas storages can easily be converted for hydrogen use, which is a prerequisite for the emergence of a large-scale hydrogen economy.
In addition to flexible electricity production and consumption, hydrogen offers a good way to reduce emissions in applications where electrification is difficult, but the use of fossil fuels should be discontinued. Examples include heating, the chemical industry, heavy transportation, and steel manufacturing. In these sectors, hydrogen can replace oil, coal and natural gas.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/how-material-scarcity-takes-us-towards-cleaner-world
Materials will be treated as resource-scarce and renewable energy abundant
The first biorefinery that will use the Chempolis fractionation technology is under construction in India by Assam Biorefinery Private Limited (ABRPL). It is a joint venture where both Fortum and Chempolis are minority shareholders. The main products of the biorefinery will be bioethanol, furfural and acetic acid. The raw material is bamboo, fast-growing grass that will be sustainably sourced from farmers in the surrounding area. India has ambitious bioethanol targets, which is a key driver for the investment. At the same time, it provides a way to prove the concept for future Bio2X biorefineries. The biorefinery is expected to start operation in 2022.
Straw-based fibres are the key to the success of the Bio2X concept, as well as using all the fractions from straw – cellulose, hemicellulose and lignin – for high-value products
VP, Biobased Solutions, Fortum
Well-founded R&D and technology are essential
Sustainable materials will require more biomass resources in the future than they do today. Agri biomass will double the available biomass globally and the related employment in rural areas has a high impact on social responsibility.
. Chempolis has developed a sustainable biorefining technology that can use agricultural waste as raw material and process it into high-value products with great material efficiency. Infinited Fiber, in turn, can use recycled textiles and also straw-based fibres as raw materials to produce textile fibres.
development programmes. They have ranged from the Best SHOK programme during 2013-2016 and the ForBest programme, focusing on fractionation technologies, in 2018-2020, to the current
Bio2X has carried out extensive R&D work with several partners and in the
Getting ready in an uncertain environment
Bio2X is a development programme that aims to bring to market products made from biomass, especially straw, that can replace environmentally harmful materials in a number of applications. It is built on three key pillars:
While there will be an abundance of renewable energy available, the resources used in materials will be increasingly scarce. The existing materials on the market need to be circulated to the extent it is possible. In addition, the materials loop must be progressively complemented by materials from renewable resources, namely biomass. This means moving from using biomass for energy production to using it for materials. It should be done as resource-efficient as possible since processing biomass into materials and recycling requires a lot of energy.
Photo: Chempolis
High-value products from biomass
The market and demand for increasingly sustainable raw materials is there. Straw, being agricultural residue, can be used without compromising land use or food production. It is a unique biomass source that Bio2X, the global biorefinery pioneer in this field, is tapping into together with partners, customers and investors.
Steps towards bio-based materials
The first straw-based products, namely textile fibres made from cellulose, were introduced in 2019. In 2021, a whole
was developed for a global fashion show. While they have spearheaded the development, Bio2X is currently focusing on developing other fractions as well.
Another ongoing project is a biorefinery development in Germany that aims to produce high-value products from all main biomass fractions of straw. The focus is on building an optimal product portfolio with several partners, customers and project development, as well as developing a reliable straw supply. The plan is to develop the project as a joint venture and bring along investors who have a strong focus on environmental, social and governance (ESG) topics.
How material scarcity takes us towards a cleaner world | Fortum
Infinited Fiber Company
straw-based fashion collection
However, policies, regulations and markets are not yet optimal for it. Despite that, there is an urgency to act now because the world does not wait. An active approach ensures that when the market and policy environment will one day support this paradigm shift, the bioeconomy is running at full speed. Bio2X is being developed to answer the needs of this new bio-based world.
Several building blocks to execute the programme are already in place.
The drivers of today's bioeconomy are sustainability and a significantly higher degree of processing of not just wood, but a wide range of various other biomass. The bioeconomy has an important role in the journey towards carbon neutrality, reducing the use of non-renewable resources and maintaining global biodiversity.
In addition, Bio2X has invested in the technology companies
programme that is running from 2020 to 2024 in partnership with several companies and research institutes. It covers all the fractions and aims to replace several non-renewable, fossil and other unsustainable raw materials.
The foundation for Bio2X has been laid


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/flexibility
Climate change is forcing the world to decarbonise quickly. Yet, at the same time, energy consumption is increasing. The technologies needed for a clean energy system is already available, but how do you find the right balance and ensure that there is always a sufficient supply of energy available at a reasonable cost? A key component is an innovative and flexible energy system.
A flexible energy system balances seasonal changes
The production and consumption of energy vary depending on the time of year. People use more energy in the winter as hom…
In July 2020, the most commonly used reference for electricity prices in the Nordic, the Nord Pool spot price, hit an al…
At Fortum, we believe that these flexible ways to produce electricity can be combined with innovative solutions like improved battery technologies and smart solutions that optimise consumption and power needs on the user side. In the future also hydrogen conversion and different storage solutions will come into play.
Renewables growth will slow down without the support from electrification
The fight against climate change calls for quick decarbonisation. At the same time, the need for energy keeps growing as…
Hydropower’s role and significance in the Finnish electricity system has changed over time. When the Imatra hydropower…
Understanding how the power market creates social welfare and utilises flexibility is essential for the implementation of a carbon-free future
Energy flexibility is everyone's cup of tea
Frequency dip in the grid? Data centres to the rescue!
FORTUM BUSINESS PRESS RELEASE 18 January 2022
 

Fortum and Telia have signed a collaboration agreement to conne…
Flexibility enables a clean energy system
Why should you as an energy consumer care about flexibility? One key reason is that it can help you to save money without you even noticing. Your household can participate in the flexible energy system by adding smart charging, and - if you don’t have district heating already - heat pump solutions to your home. These solutions automatically optimise usage and improve the flexibility of the energy system on the consumption side without any losses in comfort. There are also many other things you can pay attention to in order to use energy more effectively.
Read more about flexibility
Read about our Battery Solutions
In focus: Energy Flexibility
Save money and energy effortlessly
Flexibility is needed to balance weather-dependent energy production – such as wind and solar – and help mitigate sudden increases in demand. We need a balance between dispatchable production, weather dependent production and flexible resources. For example, when the wind does not blow or the sun does not shine, we fill the supply gap with hydropower in the Nordics and gas-fired power generation in Central Europe. This way, we ensure that there is always a sufficient supply of energy available at a reasonable cost.
Why do we need hydropower?
Energy for a cleaner world
What keeps me motivated, curious, and forward-looking is that I’m working in a social welfare business. Power market p…
Energy storage is one of the great challenges of the energy transition, and as electrification accelerates, battery technology must also become sustainable.
Flexibility landing page
Flexibility
Batteries and hydrogen – balance boosters of the energy system
Traditionally, energy production has followed consumption, meaning that end users consume as much energy as they need an…
Why are power prices now much higher than last year, and does it matter?
I have been involved in energy storage and battery systems for 10+ years now, and I even did my doctoral thesis on batte…
In focus: Energy Flexibility | Fortum
The share of renewables in EU27 electricity generation has already grown close to 35%, but for renewables expansion to c…


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/renewables-growth-will-slow-down-without-support-electrification
For renewables expansion to continue at full speed and replace fossil fuels in the power mix, the system integration aspect needs to be put into the spotlight. The gap that is left by exiting fossil production needs to be filled with a variety of sources of flexibility – and the key to them is electrification. Besides solutions for short-term flexibility, such as utilising EV batteries for balancing, electrification can provide the means for longer-term flexibility, especially via hydrogen production. Despite the great potential it offers, electrification – or the share of electricity in final energy use – has not seen any significant growth over the last decade. Therefore, it needs to be properly lifted in the climate agenda, preferably in the form of either EU-wide or national electrification targets, recognising the additional value of the flexibility. Without a proper kick-start to flexible electrification, we risk facing a slowdown in renewables growth.
Wind & Solar
52
When I decided to focus my studies on energy economics and modelling almost 25 years ago, obviously, many things were quite different than they are today. And I am not even talking about the Covid-19 pandemic. An important milestone back then was the Kyoto Protocol, which perhaps fell short in terms of concrete and needed actions, but it definitely managed to carry the international momentum to work together against global warming.
Ever since ambitious renewables and climate targets have been discussed, there has always been the question of system stability and system integration. In other words, where do we get the electricity when the wind is not blowing, or how to finance the new investments when so-called cannibalisation starts destroying the business case? Obviously, this has not prevented the renewables boom so far, but it is becoming evident that the acid test for renewables is still ahead of us.
11
Head of Trading Analysis in TAO Market Intelligence, focusing on market horizon power and commodities analysis
Read more about flexibility
Renewables growth will slow down without the support from electrification | Fortum
But there is another crucial difference, at least in my perception, when comparing today’s situation to 25 years ago. And that difference is “the light at the end of the tunnel”. In 1997, the renewable electricity production within the EU27 countries, excluding hydropower, amounted to as low as 35 TWh. This mainly consisted of biofuels, as wind production was at 7 TWh and solar electricity production was basically at zero. Fossil fuel-based electricity production, on the other hand, amounted to 1300 TWh. Based on the common-sense judgment of a young student, the task of replacing fossil-fired power production with renewables not only seemed daunting – it felt unrealistic. And, of course, I was not the only one who felt that way. When I joined the industry a few years later, I recall encountering widespread scepticism towards the prospects of wind power becoming a serious source for electricity production.
Now, looking back at the past quarter of a century, we all know that global carbon emissions have continued to rise and have already changed the climate. In fact, the temperature rise since the 1980s has been so rapid that the official three-decade temperature averages can be thrown into the trash bin. In order to understand whether a specific winter during recent years was actually mild or normal, you need to compare the temperatures against the climate-trend-adjusted normal. Comparing against the official average for 1980-2010 would give you a biased result. Just take a look at the graph below to see my point.
Time to kick-start the flexible electrification
1990, 1991, 1992, 1993, 1994, 1995, 1996, 1997, 1998, 1999, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018
19 May 2021, 10:38
54
To the flexibility front page
From wind power scepticism to rapid expansion of renewables
The share of renewables in EU27 electricity generation has already grown close to 35%, but for renewables expansion to continue at full speed and replace fossil fuels in the power mix, the system integration aspect needs to be put into the spotlight. The gap that is left by exiting fossil production needs to be filled with a variety of sources of flexibility – and the key to them is electrification.
Figure 2. % Share of wind and solar and of fossil-fired generation in EU27 total electricity generation.
Figure 1. Global average temperature by NASA Goddard Institute for Space Studies - https://data.giss.nasa.gov/gistemp/graphs_v4/, Public Domain, https://commons.wikimedia.org/w/index.php?curid=24363898
Share in EU27 Electricity Generation
Source: Eurostat.
The share of renewables in EU27 electricity generation has already grown close to 35%. But it is important to notice that this number includes a substantial amount of flexible hydro and biofuel based production. Even though we have seen a massive expansion of wind and solar in the last two decades, the share of these intermittent sources in the EU’s total electricity production is still below 20%. At the same time, the fossil-fired production – with a predictable and stable production pattern – has remained strong, as it accounts for 40% of the EU’s power generation. The numbers reveal that renewables expansion has enjoyed an environment where plenty of flexible power production has been available, helping to integrate the growing renewable production in the power system. But now, several indicators, including balance cost, grid problems, nuclear down-regulation, and cannibalization, suggest that the system integration is increasingly becoming an issue.
Today, luckily, the situation is quite different. Wind, solar, and biofuels have all grown substantially and together account for more than 600 TWh of the EU’s power generation. Considering the long lead times and perhaps somewhat stiff image that is sometimes attributed to the power sector, the expansion of renewables has been so rapid that it lures one into thinking that power sector decarbonisation is all but a done deal. However, there is reason to be cautious about such a conclusion.
% Share of wind and solar and of fossil-fired generation in EU27 total electricity generation. Source: Eurostat.
49
47
Fossil generation
44
51
53


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/flexibility/energy-flexibility-everyones-cup-tea
Energy flexibility is everyone's cup of tea | Fortum
Traditionally, energy production has followed consumption, meaning that end users consume as much energy as they need and production volume is adjusted to meet the demand. However, there are many ways to balance consumption, too. By taking part in enhancing the flexibility of the energy system, consumers are not only contributing to grid stability and reducing their electricity bills. Flexibility is important from an environmental perspective, as well. In a flexible system, the share of renewable energy sources such as wind and solar power can be increased, because there are resources to compensate for reduced production on cloudy and calm days.
Heating
Electric and hybrid cars
Staying warm while balancing demand peaks
district heating
In many cases, a simple change in schedule is enough to help balance the grid and, at the same time, make use of the variable price tariffs commonly available in many countries. Private households with hot-water tanks can time the heating of the water to occur during the night hours when the demand is lower.
are becoming more and more common. They can also play a part in a flexible energy system. The battery of the car needs to be charged and ready to go in the morning. But does it matter whether it is charged before three in the morning or at five a.m.? Probably not, so the charging can be slowed down or interrupted for a moment if the electricity is needed elsewhere.
. Heating plants must anticipate demand peaks such as the morning when everyone wants to shower at the same time. If the demand peak is high, production with higher emissions may be needed to cover it and a back-up plant has to be started up.
In the Nordics, the electricity grid is built so that it can handle the capacity needed to heat homes in the winter. In warmer countries the infrastructure is not always as developed, and extreme weather phenomena such as exceptional cold spells can cause heavy strain on the grid. Electricity grids also need flexibility to operate optimally, and at some point, the capacity of the grid may reach its limits. In such situations, flexibility-improving solutions may be more sensible than increasing grid capacity to answer occasional demand peaks.
two-way connection
already has in use a smart charging system for electric cars at the company’s head office. The system is also piloted in Norway with Fortum Consumer solutions, with which Fortum has also carried out a heat pump pilot project in Sweden. In the future, Fortum and Fortum Spring will focus on consumption flexibility through partners. This means that we will provide optimisation services to, for example, heater manufacturers.
In a smart system, this can mean a few seconds here and a minute there, in a way that keeps the grid in balance through the night. The heaters are also controlled with an accuracy of seconds or minutes to keep the grid frequency stable. The water will be hot in time for the morning shower, and there is no inconvenience at all to the inhabitants.
Energy companies, such as Fortum, have online services in which people can monitor their energy use and the price they pay for it. In some countries, the rates vary throughout the day and night, and night prices are generally cheaper as there is less demand. Some smart internet connected systems can already be used to control hot-water tanks or heat pumps and schedule their heating. Electric vehicle charging is also a major contributor to energy consumption flexibility, and smart concepts exist to control it remotely, as well.
Flexibility keeps the grid healthy
between the car and the grid, so that electricity can also move from the car to the grid, when the car is not needed. This will turn electric vehicles into a grid-connected storage solution that can be used for grid balancing purposes but also to balance consumption peaks.
So when should I charge my car?
In the future, it will be possible to create a
Demand-side flexibility can also be applied in
The absence of flexibility has, in some countries, led to brown-outs: when traditional production facilities’ or power line limits have been exceeded, electricity has been cut off completely from some areas to keep the entire system from collapsing. This is naturally something we do not want to see. While flexibility-enhancing solutions help us cope with such situations, they also help us prevent them by allowing us to have more renewables in the grid.
is another component of a flexible energy system. A house is, in essence, a heat storage. If it is heated with electricity, cutting the heating off for a few minutes will not drop the inside temperature but it can help balance the total consumption vs. production of the energy system. These kinds of short-term adjustments can make a significant difference in maintaining the stability of the grid and ensuring that the consumption and production are in balance.
We at Fortum continue to develop flexibility solutions that provide the needed balance in the energy system without causing inconvenience to people or households. Join us in creating a more flexible, resilient and reliable energy system!


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/batteries-and-hydrogen
In the Nordic countries, the basis consists mainly of nuclear and hydropower. Fast-growing wind and solar power provide the variable element of the system, and hydropower is used to balance changes in production and demand. The district heating systems producing both heat and power provide seasonal flexibility in especially Sweden and Finland.
Batteries and hydrogen – balance boosters of the energy system | Fortum
End goal: carbon-neutral energy systems
Batteries are still an expensive way of storing electricity, although the price continues to drop. However, to function as a large-scale, stand-alone solution, their capacity needs to be significantly increased and the costs further reduced. Development in the field is fast and new innovations are continuously developed.
Connecting battery-based storage solutions to the energy grid is also used to handle demand peaks and possible grid capacity restraints. There is already a grid-connected storage solution in place in
Solutions that can provide increased flexibility go hand in hand both with increasing shares of wind and solar and improved energy efficiency. However, it is good to bear in mind that security of supply becomes even more important in the era of electrification. Here, plannable production plays an important part, not only because of the amount of energy it provides, but also for the needed effect and ancillary services essential for an electrical grid to physically function.
03 May 2021, 11:07
A balanced, efficient energy system consists of several different energy sources (e.g., wind, solar, nuclear, hydro & gas) with different properties that complement each other. Security of supply calls for steady production with a planned output, complemented with weather-dependent renewables and solutions for balancing supply and demand when necessary. All three types of production are needed to provide cost-efficient energy that covers the needs of the end users.
Forshuvud
. Such solutions are particularly suited to fast-growing suburban areas, where the need for extra capacity may increase too quickly for the local grid’s capacity. Using stored energy while upgrading the grid ensures that there is enough power to meet end consumers’ needs also during peak hours.
In the upcoming decades, hydrogen is expected to play an increasingly important part in the energy system, also as a storage method. Currently, the energy loss in the process of producing and storing hydrogen, then reverting it back into electricity again is too large for commercially viable use. Storage solutions that utilise the higher price volatility connected to increased wind and solar in the energy system are part of the solution to decrease productions costs of hydrogen for industrial applications. The electrolysis process will also be made more efficient through technology development and production on an industrial scale.
hydropower plants, and so far, the solutions have shown great results. Fortum’s first project connecting power production with batteries, Batcave, was in Järvenpää back in 2017.
The fight against climate change calls for quick decarbonisation. At the same time, the need for energy keeps growing as fossil fuels will be replaced with electricity-powered solutions across industries. How do we ensure that there is enough sustainable, affordable energy to meet the needs of tomorrow’s society? Part of that answer lies in adding more flexibility solutions to the energy system.
Hydropower can be supported with batteries to reduce the response time significantly. Batteries can be combined with hydropower to produce a balancing solution that can respond very quickly and provide sufficient capacity at a commercially viable cost. Fortum is piloting such projects in Sweden, at
Communications Manager Sweden
Energy storage is one way of increasing the flexibility of the energy system. As the production of weather-dependent energy – wind and solar – fluctuates, stored energy can be used to cover demand peaks. And when demand is low, but production volumes are high, the energy produced by these intermittent renewables can be stored for later use.
Existing resources and future vistas
Existing data centres’ UPS (uninterrupted power supply) systems can be applied to balance demand peaks in the grid. Their main function is to handle short outages, but most of the time, they are merely there waiting for the need to materialise. Data centres can sell their capacity on the frequency market. It can be bought, for example, a day in advance to cover a few hours’ anticipated increase in energy use. This is a good way to tap into an existing resource.
Batteries to the rescue in demand peaks
Hydropower provides excellent electricity storage possibilities, as water reservoirs can store energy for a long time and in large quantities. Hydropower can react quite quickly to changes in electricity demand and it is used extensively in the Nordic countries for this balancing purpose, making it possible to use large amounts of wind and solar while keeping the system fossil-free.
In Sweden and France, hydro and nuclear serve in this role, whereas Norway has its hydro and Iceland runs on hydro and geothermal energy. These countries’ power systems have been essentially carbon-neutral for decades already, while many other European countries still rely on gas or coal to provide both flexible and plannable production. Hence, it is almost impossible to overestimate the significance of hydrogen as the driver of the European energy transition.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/04/fortum-installs-innovative-battery-solution-landafors-hydropower-plant-sweden
, Head of Volvo Car Service Business.
Fortum installs innovative battery solution at Landafors hydropower plant in Sweden | Fortum
The purpose is to improve the ability to offer fast frequency reserve regulation to the power markets. The pilot also aims to find out how much capacity the batteries need to have left to function in this new “second life” role, where response time is so important.
“This solution of using batteries that no longer serve their original purpose is an important opportunity. Extending the life of these batteries before their material is recycled has major positive effects on both the environment and the economy. It strengthens renewable hydropower’s role in the energy system.”
”Volvo Cars has big ambitions with regards to the circular economy and we are putting great effort in finding new business models that enable us to maximise battery usage over the course of their entire life cycle. This project is in line with those objectives and will offer us new insight about the batteries’ lifespan and how they can be used outside of our cars,” says
“Our goal is to use and test a variety of modern battery solutions to improve the functionality of our energy system. It is a high priority for us,” says
Susanne Hägglund
Per-Oscar Hedman, Communications Director Sweden, Fortum, +46 70-214 75 45
Today the Nordic electricity market is primarily balanced with CO
Fortum installs innovative battery solution at Landafors hydropower plant in Sweden
-free hydropower production, which has the ability to regulate electricity over the course of a few seconds to several months. However, there is sometimes a need in the power system for faster and more flexible regulation than what the hydropower plant’s turbines can handle. This need will become more common as more weather-dependent production, primarily wind power, enters the system. Using batteries that can react in milliseconds, followed up by the turbines’ slower build-up, will improve the hydropower plant’s ability to meet these future demands in the electric grid.
, Vice President, Hydropower at Fortum’s Generation division.
To contribute to a sustainable battery value chain and to lower the environmental impact of batteries, Fortum also offers the possibility to recycle lithium-ion batteries and recover the scarce metals by applying low-CO2 recycling technology.
In development collaboration, Fortum, Volvo Cars and Comsys have created an innovative battery solution that is now being installed at Fortum’s Landafors hydropower plant on the river Ljusnan in Sweden. The solution will also use batteries from plug-in hybrid cars and other batteries to extend the life of the hydropower turbines and the batteries themselves.
21 April 2021, 12:02 EEST
Toni Kekkinen
This is Fortum’s second pilot project using batteries as energy storage at its hydropower plant. In Landafors, a number of out-of-service batteries from Volvo Cars plug-in hybrids are used. Even if the batteries no longer have enough capacity to function in a vehicle, they can still be useful in electrical storage. A total of 48 batteries will be connected with a combined storage capacity and power of 1 MW/250 kWh. The solution is developed and built by the power electronics specialist Comsys, a cleantech company in Lund, Sweden.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2019/05/new-fortum-batteries-enhance-renewable-energy-capacity
16 May 2019, 09:00 EEST
Fast changes at hydropower plants shortens their expected lifetime as mechanical parts are worn down. The batteries will reduce wear and tear on the hydroelectric plant’s turbines and generators normally caused by quick changes in power.
“The fact that there has to be sufficient amount of well-functioning and precise regulation capacity in Nordic power system, the new batteries, will reinforce the regulation power in the Nordic power system. At the same time, we are improving an already green and sustainable energy source,” says
, VP Hydro.
When the batteries were tested during spring, the results showed that the batteries are performing satisfactory frequency response both in terms of speed and endurance.
Fortum has activated its previously announced batteries at the Forshuvud hydropower plant located near Borlänge and Dalälven in Dalarna, Sweden. For the first time, batteries will now be used in the electricity grid to support hydropower and improve the regulation power. The plant has been equipped with a large amount of lithium-ion batteries with a total storage capacity of 6,2 MWh and a maximum power output of 5 MW.
At the same time, the use of other renewables is increasing rapidly in the Nordic countries. Sweden is currently preparing for a transformation of its energy system and a broad political agreement has set a target of 100 percent renewable energy by 2040. The agreement also states that the transferability of Sweden’s energy to its neighboring countries must increase.
New Fortum batteries enhance renewable energy capacity
Thanks to the batteries, frequencies in the grid will be superinduced or drawn back faster and altering power in a matter of seconds. This compensates for increasingly fast changes in the production of electricity caused by, for example, wind power. The batteries will utilize and enhance the hydropower plant’s role as a regulator and take better advantage of capacity regulation, which is one of the main benefits of hydroelectric power.
“This is a unique solution. It means that the supply of energy will be more secure and more sustainable. Fortum always aims to invest in innovations that reinforce our hydroelectric powerplants and that strengthen green energy. We will evaluate this project and our priority is that this technique will be used in other power plants throughout Sweden,” says
The installation in Forshuvud is based on the experience Fortum gained two years ago when it started to experiment with this concept at the combined heat and power plant in Järvenpää, Finland. Approximately three million euros has been invested in this project.
Tatu Kulla, Head of Business Development. Fortum Trading and Asset Optimisation, +358 400 294 499
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 16 May 2019
Fortum has boosted its hydropower plant at Forshuvud through an innovative combination of hydroelectric power and a large set of lithium ion batteries. This innovation means hydropower in the Nordic region becomes an even more reliable and powerful asset in building the future renewable energy system. The batteries will also help reduce the risks of network disturbances as well as reduce wear and tear on the hydropower plant.
, Fortum's Head of Business Development.
Hydropower is the backbone of the Nordic renewable energy system. In Norway, hydropower accounts for 96 percent of power generation, whilst in Sweden it accounts for approximately 50 percent.
New Fortum batteries enhance renewable energy capacity | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/power-markets-social-welfare
Manager, Short-term Analysis
), the introductory chapters are an essential read for anyone interested in the power markets, and the latter chapters provide information also for the more mathematical enthusiasts. The point is that social welfare in the power market is not just an ideal and a long-term strategic thing for the power market participants, it’s also a matter of fact – hour by hour. And, suitable to the spirit of our time, algorithm-driven.
Just as with social welfare, the viewpoints to energy system flexibility are many – from cost-efficient adaptability to demand fluctuation, security of supply and the power system, and predictability enabling planning on both the supply and demand side. What I want to highlight is that the main part of flexibility is produced and consumed in the wholesale market. There are two figures of note here. First, in the Nordics the size of the day-ahead auction is well proportional to consumption, Nordic electricity sold via Nord Pool was 358 TWh in 2020*. Second, the predictability of the next-day market level demand is over 97%. These figures show that even as the discussion around flexibility often concentrates around very short-term needs related to security of system and balancing the unpredictable deviations of e.g. wind, the vast majority of the market is still sufficiently predictable to be traded in auctions based on social welfare optimisation.
In the Nordics the vast majority of electricity is traded via day-ahead auction of energy, often called the spot market. Everyday buyers and sellers tell the marketplaces how much volume they are able and willing to offer or purchase, and this information is given to an algorithm, EUPHEMIA, Pan-European Hybrid Electricity Market Integration Algorithm. What the algorithm is doing is selecting offers from Finland to Portugal so that “The social welfare [...] generated by the executed orders is maximal.” This quotation is from
Social welfare is at the core of the market
*) Besides Nasdaq and Nord Pool, Nordic derivatives are traded at EEX and ICE, and physical power at EPEX Spot. In 2020, the combined (buy and sell) EPEX Spot Nordic volumes were 12 TWh for day-ahead and 1.7 TWh for intraday.
nordpoolgroup.com
The increased price fluctuation in 2020 and 2021 still is not directly hinting at any major problems. BUT, there are signs that the inclusion of new supply and demand having a different profile and geographical distribution is not getting easier. On June 29th we saw 10 different area prices for 13 Nordic price zones which highlights the challenges.
Source: SvK Kontrolrummet
Understanding how the power market creates social welfare and utilises flexibility is essential for the implementation of a carbon-free future | Fortum
21 July 2021, 09:53
What keeps me motivated, curious, and forward-looking is that I’m working in a social welfare business. Power market participants all have their individual priorities, but they can only thrive by constantly adapting to the needs of society and helping society to renew. For me, working on short-term markets and mostly in the spot market, the meaning of social welfare is also much more tangible. It is matter of fact for each day and for each hour.
In the previous MI articles, my colleagues have presented the expected changes in electricity demand, highlighted the importance of system integration in renewable energy growth, and addressed the expectations from the power system by looking at the Texas case. As a short-term analyst my focus is on the current functioning of power markets and my story is based on related observations.
The market has absorbed the huge wave of renewable production into it since 2010 – in the Nordics mainly in form of wind. This new capacity has been more intermittent than the production it has replaced. Looking at the data, so far the inclusion has been successful, in my opinion. As an example, we can look at two days in February and see how flexible hydro balanced the day-to-day change equivalent to Swedish nuclear production!
Euphemia public description
Naturally, social welfare in the transition towards clean energy is much more than short-term energy prices – where my focus is. Nevertheless, I strongly believe that maximal utilisation of a well-functioning energy market creates the best conditions for innovative and efficient solutions for CO2 reductions and utilisation of flexibility. And this applies to both demand and supply. The story of day-ahead auction is so far a success story and it is developing.
kattelus
Who drives the wholesale market?
MI Monthly is a blog series produced by Fortum’s TAO (Trading and Asset Optimisation) unit. In this monthly LinkedIn blog, we explore the various aspects of energy markets and the balancing of energy systems through the lens of our market intelligence. Each monthly blog will be published in the writer’s profile: please feel free to take the conversation forward and share these blog posts.
Flexibility is the key enabler for power market to serve society efficiently
The discussion around electricity prices is often concentrated on production. When there are price peaks, the focus of the analysts and the public is often on producers’ pricing. For me, this is just a part of the story. When understanding the market mechanism and EUPHEMIA, it can be concluded that the buy-side behaviour is just as significant. During winter 2009-2010 in Finland, the spot price reached 1400€/MWh for several hours. I still remember that market analysts quite quickly concluded that this was very unlikely to happen again under similar conditions. Why? Because the demand side could have more efficiently adjusted their processes and bidding to the market. Since 2010, when the extreme daily average price in Finland was ~500€/MWh, we have seen only a few days over 100€/MWh; this is a clear indication that market and participants together increased the flexibility. We will surely see similar changes in market behaviour in future – e.g. when further electrified industry and RES producers need to adjust actions to their exposure to market prices.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/why-power-price-now-much-higher-last-year-and-does-it-matter
A recovering world economy is hiking up electricity prices – here’s how
Large electricity consumers and producers can use various financial instruments to lock future power prices to a certain level – this activity is called hedging. In practice, this means that both buyer and seller know the price of the sold or procured electricity beforehand, and the impact of fluctuating wholesale prices is limited.
Even though the power prices at the moment are higher than what we in the Nordics are accustomed to and based on the current forward prices of electricity, the market expects prices to remain high during the winter period, however, the market also expects the power prices to soften next year, as European gas prices and the Nordic hydro reservoir situation are expected to normalise.
Other key reasons for the very high Nordic spot prices are this year’s dry weather in the Nordics (precipitation is only 80-85% compared to normal levels) and less wind than is typical. As there hasn’t been that much rain and wind – this has resulted in both lower wind and hydropower generation – which also has contributed to the increased price of electricity.
At the moment, the market has set the forward price for the next year at 48 €/MWh which means that the market expects the situation with the current price levels to be temporary.
Why are power prices now much higher than last year, and does it matter? | Fortum
As the pandemic has eased, the economic recovery has been strong and a bit faster than expected, especially in China. The very strong Chinese power demand growth is clearly back on track. Due to this, the Chinese power supply is having a hard time meeting demand.
As a result, the Chinese power sector is using a lot of the Liquefied Natural Gas (LNG) from the global LNG market. In addition, LNG demand has also been very high in other parts of the world; in India, South Korea, and Brazil. At the same time, Europe’s cold spring left the gas storages empty and low winds in the autumn have created an increased demand for conventional power generation on the European continent.
Both electricity consumers and producers can secure their electricity prices, which reduces the impact of the price variation and provides more predictability of the cost. For consumers, this typically means using a fixed price electricity agreement for a longer period, say 1-2 years.
29 September 2021, 13:31
I guess that the most interesting question for many of us is, that what does this mean for my own or my company’s energy bill?
On 5 July 2020, the daily average spot price for electricity at Nord Pool was 0.72 €/MWh – the all-time low – while it is currently above 88 €/MWh (29 September 2021).
In July 2020, the most commonly used reference for electricity prices in the Nordic, the Nord Pool spot price, hit an all-time low. This was mainly due to Covid-19, the shutdown of economies, and the heavy rainfall in the Nordics. Now, less than 12 months later, the spot price is almost 50 times higher. The spot price for each hour of a day is set in a daily auction where buyers and sellers of electricity are bidding for the next day.
To me, this indicates that the market is working – when the market fundamentals change, like demand for electricity or the prices of fuel, we see corresponding changes in the power prices also here in the Nordics.
Kalle Kuokka is heading Fortum's financial trading unit. He is responsible for Fortum's commodity derivatives trading and electricity sales for large energy consumers.
What’s the impact on consumers’ electricity bills?
I have been involved in the power markets for two decades. There have always been ups and downs, but the current strong price recovery has been quite exceptional. You have to go back to the beginning of the century to find a somewhat similar situation.
In addition, the power transmission cable from Norway to Continental Europe (to Germany) - “the Nordlink” - came online less than a year ago and increased the possibility to export power to Continental Europe. And soon, the “North Sea Link” cable to the UK will come online, further improving the power flow between the regions. In combination with the low level of water in the Nordic hydro reservoirs, these two large cables have brought Continental and Nordic power prices closer to the same level although the Nordic price levels are still well below, for example, Germany. Further transmission capacity between the Nordics and Continental Europe should over time-align the Nordic and Continental prices.
Further, the Nordic wind power boom will continue for a while, and the new Finnish nuclear power unit (Olkiluoto 3) will be commissioned next year, which puts downward pressure on Nordic power forward prices.
In the Nordics, the dry summer and new interconnectors also playing their part
The Covid-19 pandemic and related lockdowns in the major European economies during the second and third quarters of 2020 resulted in a clear drop in power demand in Europe, although, the impact on Nordic power demand was rather limited. As a consequence of the worldwide lockdown of economies also decreased demand for energy-related commodities; oil, gas, coal, and the European emissions allowances (CO2 price).
All this, combined with a lower-than-normal supply of LNG, dwindling domestic production and insufficient import of pipeline gas to Western Europe, means that gas storage levels in Europe have remained low. Therefore, European gas prices have skyrocketed to all-time-high levels. This has resulted in very elevated Continental European power prices because gas-fired power generation sets the price level in those power markets. Moreover, CO2 allowance prices have gone up because of EU’s tightened climate goals and the decreasing number of CO2 allowances in the allowances auctions, which puts upward pressure on Continental European power prices.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/why-do-we-need-hydropower
Why do we need hydropower? | Fortum
Operations Finland Manager, Trading and Asset Optimisation
Graph 1. Wind power production (MW) in Finland in March 2021 (Fingrid)
These days, hydropower is to a significant extent responsible for producing the balancing power that is needed. A hydropower turbine typically has a wide control range, and the fuel has been stored in reservoirs, i.e. regulated lakes. Big water systems have so much stored energy that it’s possible to balance even longer-lasting fluctuations in wind power production. So far, no other energy production form has a similar ability as hydropower to store energy and produce balancing power. In fact, there currently aren’t many alternatives to hydropower, even though new solutions are constantly explored. In order to be successful in halting global warming, it is vital to enable the construction of renewable energy while securing hydropower’s position. According to a survey by the Finnish Wind Power Association, there are about 21,300 megawatts of public wind power projects in Finland, and about 3,400 megawatts of projects under construction will be commissioned within the next 2-3 years. So the demand for balancing power will be increasing even more.
Why is hydropower still so significant for our electricity system?
24 August 2021, 11:39
How much balancing power is needed?
The primary global challenge of our time is the climate crisis. Global warming must be halted, and carbon neutrality must be achieved quickly, as was highlighted also in the recent IPCC report. Electrification will impact transportation, industrial processes, the heating of buildings, and more. To achieve this goal, we increasingly need wind and solar power. In addition to zero carbon emissions, hydropower has many other excellent characteristics, the most significant of which is its good balancing capacity compared to other production forms. In order to be able to connect renewable, weather-dependent production to our electricity system, the electricity system must have enough balancing power to balance the wind and solar production volumes to meet demand. In the electricity system, the production must be equal to the consumption at all times – every second and fraction of a second. Hydropower is at its best when balancing production with consumption.
Hydropower’s role and significance in the Finnish electricity system has changed over time. When the Imatra hydropower plant was commissioned in 1929, it was Finland’s biggest hydropower plant – and it remains the biggest with its 192-megawatt capacity. Upon commissioning, it was believed that the Imatra hydropower plant was the only electricity production plant that would ever be needed in Finland. The dedication speech noted, among other things, that the power plant’s electricity production would be enough to supply Finland forever. Today, the Imatra hydropower plant’s production covers the annual electricity consumption of about 60,000 single-family homes heated with electricity. Imatra’s share of all electricity produced in Finland is about 1.5%, and hydropower produced in Finland covers only about 15% of electricity consumption in Finland. It should be noted that Finland is not self-sufficient in terms of electricity production; about one-fourth of all the electricity we use is imported.
Hydropower’s balancing ability will be needed also in the future
The Finnish transmission system operator Fingrid publishes on its website information about wind power production on an hourly level. The graph below presents Finland’s wind power production in March 2021. More than 2 gigawatts of wind power capacity has been built in Finland. Production fluctuates between the rated output and essentially zero output, depending on the wind conditions. The graph is an excellent illustration of the current situation. In March, wind power production fluctuated between 2,200 megawatts and under 200 megawatts on several occasions. Low wind-power production volumes can last several days or just a few hours, after which the production jumps to the other extreme. Is this fluctuation a lot or a little? The output of the upcoming Olkiluoto 3 reactor is 1,600 megawatts, so even the capacity of this huge nuclear power plant wouldn’t be enough to balance these production fluctuations.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/flexibility/flexible-energy-system-balances-seasonal-changes
As decarbonisation progresses, Central Europe will have to replace natural gas and coal with renewables. Production of hydrogen through electrolysis will likely be part of the solution. Excess production from wind and solar will then be used to produce hydrogen. Hydrogen could be used in many ways, for example as a replacement for natural gas. It can also be converted back to electricity even though losses occur at every step of the process. As processes are developed further and technology costs fall, we may see hydrogen taking a key position in the energy mix.
Looking ahead
Gas power is the main source of flexible power in Central Europe
In Central Europe, natural gas is currently the most prominent energy form used to balance supply and demand. Similar to hydro, gas storages are filled up in the summer and emptied during the winter. The gas is not only used for power generation but also in the industrial sector and for producing heat. The share of renewables steadily continues to increase in Central Europe, but fossil-fired power plants still step in when wind and solar generation is low.
Utilities use models to predict the future demand for both electricity and heat. In the short perspective, weather is the largest uncertainty. In the longer run, electricity demand is expected to increase significantly due to the electrification of the transport sector and several industrial sectors as well as population growth. At the same time, the share of renewables and thereby less predictable energy in the system will continue to grow. While hydropower will remain the backbone for balancing the Nordic energy system, the challenge is much greater in Central Europe. In the Nordics, hydropower will enable continued significant increase of intermittent renewables to meet new demand.
The Nordic countries stand out from the rest of the world with a large share of flexible hydropower thanks to their geography with high mountains, rivers and lakes. Hydro reservoirs make it possible to store huge amounts of energy for later use. In the spring and summer, the snow melts and reservoirs fill up. During the winter or on a day when there is no wind or sunshine, the energy stored in the reservoir can be used to meet the demand. The annual consumption of electricity in the Nordics is close to 400 TWh, and more than half of that is covered by hydropower (220 TWh). The hydro reservoir act like huge batteries and can store 125 TWh of energy.
New interconnectors between countries contribute to the integration of European power markets. This makes it possible to transfer electricity across long distances. The Nordic countries are connected to Germany, Poland, Estonia, Russia, Netherlands, Lithuania and soon the UK. Depending on need and availability, electricity is either exported or imported. For example, on a windy day in Germany, power is exported to Sweden and Norway, but when the wind stops the flow switches direction as water stored in Nordic reservoirs is used to meet the demand.
Developing the grid so that, for example, windier regions can support those where wind power is less productive would also be a step towards better energy security. New IT solutions, such as smart charging of EVs, will make the demand side of electricity more flexible without any impact for the end user. Energy storages solutions such as batteries are likely to remain expensive. But it all comes down to having sufficient plannable power generation as the basis of the system, so that the whole does not become too unpredictable. Households, factories and businesses must be able to trust that there is enough energy at all times of the year, in any weather.
A flexible energy system balances seasonal changes | Fortum
Hydropower is the key enabler for more wind and solar in the Nordics
The production and consumption of energy vary depending on the time of year. People use more energy in the winter as homes are heated to keep away the cold – especially in the Nordic countries, where the winters can be very cold. In warmer countries it is the opposite: peak electricity demand can occur during a hot summer day due to wide-spread use of air-conditioning. Intermittent power sources such as wind and solar need to be balanced since they do not always produce electricity when it is needed.
Energy consumption changes according to season, day of the week and even the time of day, as people turn on their various devices and kitchen appliances at the same time in the morning. The energy system needs to be able to respond to these changes and provide sufficient energy at all times. This means that production volumes must be adapted or energy storage solutions used to keep the balance. There is more solar power produced during the summer and more wind power in the winter. What they have in common is that the production varies significantly and can only be predicted as long as weather forecasts are reliable.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/frequency-dip-grid-data-centres-rescue
We at Fortum Spring are actively seeking new partnerships and customers. We also welcome discussions with equipment manufacturers and data centre operators beyond the Nordics in Northern Europe, Ireland, and the UK. There are still some issues concerning market regulation that we would like to see improved in order to expand our operations, though. Furthermore, the equipment used in data centres in these areas is not always quite compatible for feeding electricity into the grid. However, based on my own experience, I feel confident in saying that technological advancement never stops, and the adoption of more suitable batteries is surely to happen in the future.
There are a few different demand-response markets in the Nordic countries. The one I find most interesting is FFR, the fast frequency market, which was opened in 2020. Fast frequency reserve is a fairly new market product, and we were involved in piloting it. It is used for controlling the frequency dips in small inertia situations of the power grid. The market is run by Nordic transmission system operators, which have traditionally been quite development-oriented and keen to explore new innovations. The Nordic energy system is inherently quite flexible, thanks to large amounts of hydropower, but I am glad that the grid companies are still pursuing new solutions to further improve flexibility.
This is where the opportunities can be found. If the UPSs are connected to the grid, they can be used for balancing purposes when they are not needed by the data centre. Here, too, they act as reserves and are used only when there is a dip in frequency, not continuously. Using the UPSs this way causes no inconvenience to the data centre’s servers – they continue getting power and the stored data remains well secured. For the data centre, selling this reserve capacity turns the UPSs from an unavoidable cost into a revenue-generating asset.
Another way in which data centres contribute to the energy system is by providing heat. Running vast numbers of servers produces waste heat, which can be collected and fed into a district heating or local grid. This means making use of a resource that would otherwise dissipate into air or water and, at the same time, providing heat that would otherwise have to be produced by another means, such as fossil fuels.
17 November 2021, 13:55
The energy system contribution of data centres comes from their UPS reserves. UPS stands for uninterrupted power supply, and its purpose is to ensure that the servers at the data centre continue receiving electricity even if there is a power outage. Since power outages are quite uncommon in countries with the level of infrastructure that attracts data centre operators, these power reserves are seldom needed and mostly lie idle.
Making use of data centre UPSs is a mutually beneficial approach. Data centre operators get paid for having their UPSs in reserve. Even if they are not needed within a given time frame, the operators get their fee for having them on stand-by. An aggregator, such as Fortum Spring, contracts the reserve capacity. Our team has created a cloud-based service platform for connecting devices and combining their capacity, which it then sells to grid operators or other parties, such as distribution network operators or the electricity market.
I have been involved in energy storage and battery systems for 10+ years now, and I even did my doctoral thesis on batteries supporting electricity grids. I guess you could call me a battery geek. For me, the current boom in various energy storage applications has been a long time coming, and the rise of data centres supporting electricity grids has been a regular topic among energy storage experts for many years. Why are data centres so interesting?
Business Development Manager, Trading and Asset Optimisation
Frequency dip in the grid? Data centres to the rescue! | Fortum
Everyone wins
Traditionally, data centres have been viewed as a strain on the energy system rather than as an asset or opportunity. However, they have excellent potential in frequency regulation, demand-side flexibility, and heat production. They use electricity and produce data processing capacity while generating heat – both end products that are vital for society.
Tapping into unused potential
It is a simple fact that the volume of data and the need for storing it is growing exponentially, so the role of data centres will only increase in the future. Since we need them to run our increasingly digital societies, why not make the best use of the side streams they offer?


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/strategy/decarbonisation-joint-effort
Second life batteries, expertise and a can-do attitude – innovation boosts hydropower plant
Our partnership cases
Harnessing unused potential for a flexible energy system
Fortum partners with a variety of companies and organisations across Europe. We co-create solutions that help us take longer, faster strides towards carbon neutral society. By sharing ideas, expertise and resources, we can accomplish more.  In a changing world, collaboration is key.
The world of energy is a complex ecosystem. Many different players – energy producers, industries, consumers  – contribute to creating a balanced, sustainable energy system. Now, in the midst of energy transition, it is all the more important that we work together to reach our shared climate goals.
Decarbonisation is a joint effort | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/strategy/decarbonisation-joint-effort/second-life-batteries-hydropower-plant
Finding the best partners
Overcoming obstacles
So, what did we accomplish with these second life batteries? We were able to modernise the Swedish Landafors hydropower plant’s turbines and extend their life. Hydropower is used to regulate the electricity system, and the battery solution allows for faster, more flexible regulation. This is more and more important as the share of weather-dependent renewables in the energy system increases.
Fortum, Volvo Cars and cleantech company Comsys came together to create something new from something old. The three companies created an innovative solution combining used batteries from electric vehicles into one great battery. The solution, installed in Landafors hydropower plant, enhances the plant turbines’ capability to regulate the grid and extends their lifetime.
Used batteries that no longer have sufficient capacity to work in electric vehicles can still have up to ten years of useful life as part of a solution such as this one. After that, the materials can be recycled. Giving batteries a second life in the service of hydropower is an excellent example of circular economy in action. At the same time, the batteries extend the lifetime of the hydropower plant’s mechanical parts because the turbines don’t wear out at the same pace.
It all started with the traditional Swedish “fika” – the coffee break. Alessandro Ferraris from the Hydropower & Flexibility team and Erik Tutzauer from the Innovation and Venturing team got to discussing ways in which batteries could be used to support hydropower production. Alessandro had an ongoing project with brand new batteries to support a hydro power plant, while Erik had on ongoing innovation project looking into how to scale up and scale down used car batteries to fit other business services. The two identified the opportunity to co-create and the result was the idea to build second life batteries to lower costs and reuse existing assets in hydro power.
All this was made possible by partnerships with Volvo Cars and Comsys. There were challenges and obstacles along the way, to be sure, but there was also a shared will to solve them. All three companies were treading on uncharted ground, but each team had a can-do attitude, as well as the curiosity and ambition to keep going. As Erik Tutzauer from the team says: you fall down 100 times and you get up 101 – and that is how you achieve success.
The world of energy is a complex ecosystem. Many different players – energy producers, industries, consumers – contribute to creating a balanced, sustainable energy system. Now, in the midst of energy transition, it is all the more important that we work together to reach our shared climate goals.
Decarbonisation is a joint effort - Read more partnership stories
As for the future, there is an interest in investing in more similar systems. There is also potential within Fortum for other applications of second life batteries. We will evaluate this project carefully, learn from it but also look into new possibilities with our partners. We will continue to explore opportunities to reuse existing assets as much as possible, setting an example of responsible resource use – together with our partners.
An innovation is born
Comsys was a natural choice for this role, as the company has extensive international reach and relevant capabilities. They were also willing to invest time and resources in the project. Comsys’s proprietary products served as a basis for developing the solution for integrating the batteries. We expected very good quality from their work and were not disappointed.
At this point, it was time to look for suitable partners. “When we started to look for suitable partners, we wanted to find those who both have the right skills but also could have a strategic interest in collaborating further with us,” says Catarina Naucler, the project owner in Fortum Innovation team.
Second life batteries, expertise and a can-do attitude – innovation boosts hydropower plant | Fortum
First, we needed someone to provide the used batteries in sufficient numbers. We entered top management level discussions with Volvo Cars and found common ground to start the project with them. But having the batteries was not enough. Fortum is not a battery manufacturing company, so we also needed a partner with experience and expertise for building the larger battery out of the smaller ones.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/our-company/strategy/decarbonisation-joint-effort/harnessing-unused-potential-flexible-energy-system
since 2015.
With the cooperation with Telia Helsinki Data Center, Fortum can harness its flexible energy capabilities into Fortum Spring.
llari Alapera
Increasing electrification of societies and constantly increasing amount of intermittent renewable energy in the power system creates challenges for grids all around the world. Electricity production and consumption must be in balance at all times, and we need electricity every moment of every day, but how can we ensure constant renewable energy supply even on cloudy or windless days?
Business that creates flexibility for energy markets is called Demand response business. Fortum has been building and developing its demand response business
In general, energy production needs to get more flexible, in order to be able to move ahead in the energy transition. Climate change is a global challenge that calls for cooperation not only between governments, but between companies and energy providers in the private sector as well. Traditional production forms can help to accommodate the changes in electricity production and demand, but other means are also needed.
Partnership with Telia's Helsinki Data Center sets an example on how data center operators can be active participants in energy systems and help drive the transition to clean energy forward.
Currently there are more than 7,500 data centers around the world, with the number growing fast. In the U.S. alone, about 2% of the total energy is used by data centers.
"Fortum Spring is a virtual battery that brings flexibility to the energy market. In the case of unusual energy needs, Fortum Spring is there to provide energy to its customers", says
The second benefit is the ability to leverage often unused power systems for new revenue streams for Telia.
"Luckily, our UPS systems are unused almost all of the time. Previously these costly investments were not turning in revenue as they were just a consistency system for the actual data center. With the integration of Fortum Spring, we've been able to use the battery and generator investment to participate in the energy market, helping to make the data center as a whole a profitable investment", says Alapera.
"Each UPS battery in the Helsinki Data Center is equipped with a Fortum Spring demand response controller, but the UPS is ultimately always in charge. It assesses its status and availability to provide the service, if called upon by Fortum Spring. The whole process happens in just milliseconds", Alapera explains.
How do the data center operators benefit from participating in the energy network? Participating in demand response brings two benefits to Telia.
Harnessing unused potential for a flexible energy system | Fortum
Harnessing the power flexibility of Helsinki Data Center
Despite being connected with Fortum Spring, the security and performance of the data center is never compromised. The center's UPS batteries decide if they are capable of providing energy to the grid, and always prioritize the data center operations. This means that the center never runs out of power.
Data centers need to operate around the clock with no interruptions, even in the case of a larger power shortage. To do that, they are equipped with comprehensive back-up power units, also known as uninterrupted power systems (UPS).
"The potential for using data centers to provide flexibility to energy systems in the future is huge. We're very proud to be pioneers in this field at Helsinki Data Center together with Telia, and show the way for others on how to leverage unused systems in decarbonizing our societies", adds Alapera.
, Head of Fortum Spring.
Turning unused UPS systems into revenue
Global future potential is growing fast
"Some time ago we realized the unused potential of data centers around the world. When it comes to providing energy to the grid in the moments of unusual demand, data centers can really help. They have a lot of reserve and back-up power units that can be connected to the energy grid, such as large batteries and generators", Ilari Alapera says.
First, the cooperation helps Telia to decarbonize the society. As a responsible company with environmental values in its strategy, this is an opportunity to contribute for a more sustainable world.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/cleaner-world/how-do-data-centres-impact-climate
Fortum and the City of Espoo, Finland, have committed to carbon-neutral district heating during the 2020s in the network that operates in the Espoo, Kauniainen and Kirkkonummi regions. The development work has since been accelerated with an intermediate goal to discontinue the use of coal in 2025. The accelerated project for carbon-neutrality in 2020's is called Espoo Clean Heat.
Data centres already account for about three percent of the world’s total energy consumption, and the growth will continue as digitalisation advances. Finland and other Nordic countries can offer data centres reliable, carbon-neutral electricity that significantly reduces the climate impacts of the data centres.
Espoo Clean Heat -project
How do data centres impact climate? | Fortum
Data centres generate a lot of heat. Typically, the heat generated by servers is wasted because it can’t be re-used. However, in Finland and other Nordic countries a major share of the waste heat can be recovered and used to heat commercial buildings and homes through the district heating system. The Espoo Clean Heat project supporting the City of Espoo’s climate targets is a good example of a win-win situation. A big, new data centre would significantly accelerate Espoo’s emissions reduction; the waste heat generated by the data centre could replace the remaining coal that is still being used for heating.
Digitalisation of societies will help to achieve the 1.5 degree climate target. Digitalisation reduces carbon emissions: e-invoices have lower emissions than paper invoices, virtual meetings reduce the need for travel, a sharing economy leans on digital services, artificial intelligence and big data optimise the energy efficiency of buildings, and so on. However, the use of data and cloud services also increases energy consumption. Electricity is needed not only to transmit data, it’s also needed to cool the data centres that house the servers.
Data volumes, digitalisation, and cloud services are growing everywhere. More and more data centres are needed to accommodate this, and data centre operators are looking for the best locations to build them. Since new data centres will be built in any case, why not attract them to Finland? They offer cities a unique opportunity to reduce emissions from heating and support the economy.
Big climate-friendly data centres are significant investments in cities and in the economy and wellbeing of Finland overall. International data centre companies’ investments in server facilities in Finland are, at best, of the same scale as Finnish forest industry investments. In addition to the labour force needed during construction, big data centres provide permanent jobs for hundreds of people. Data centre companies also generate tax revenue for municipalities.
Fortum, Espoo, and Kirkkonummi data centre project advances climate targets


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/newsroom/forthedoers-blog/new-eu-regulations-promote-recycling-battery-materials
We would like to see the battery waste generated in Europe recycled in Europe. This would allow better monitoring of process quality to ensure that batteries are recycled efficiently and in an environmentally sound way. This is by no means a given – there are still legacy recycling facilities that use thermic processes with a large CO2 footprint. Fortum’s process is designed with low CO2 footprint and high recovery rate as key targets. It is important to us that we can say our materials are sustainably recovered – and also that the processes are optimised for safety.
There is an availability dilemma, though. In the early stages after the new regulation takes effect, the amount of recycled content extracted from used batteries will not be enough for all new batteries produced. This means that we must find additional sources, for example from production waste of the mining industry.
Creating a sustainable, innovative battery industry is one of EU’s goals. To that end, the EU Commission is reforming the regulatory environment around batteries. With the electrification of transport, increase of renewable energy and stronger focus on circular economy, a new framework is needed that covers the environmental and social aspects of the industry throughout the life cycle of the batteries.
We at Fortum welcome the new battery regulation, as it promotes the recycling of batteries and applies the concept of circularity to a much higher degree than before. A key aspect for the battery recycling business is the new obligation to use a certain percentage of recycled content in new batteries. This will create a new market for sustainable battery materials, which is something we look forward to.
New EU regulations promote the recycling of battery materials | Fortum
Clear rules needed for efficient and sustainable recycling
Urban mining and extracting valuable raw materials from old landfill waste also present possibilities for returning critical raw materials into use. I see significant potential in both this approach and in using production waste. The final form of the Battery regulation remains to be seen, but I am hopeful that the EU recognises this potential as well. The source of waste, whether it is manufacturing or post-consumer waste, or originating from batteries or other products, should not be the defining factor here. If the waste, any waste, has been recycled, the material should also be valid to fulfill the criteria for the mandatory recycled content.
Battery recycling continues to develop in tandem with the development of new batteries. At Fortum, too, we will continue to develop our processes as new kinds of batteries and chemical compositions emerge. It is our vision to be a significant European player in battery materials recycling. By applying new technologies to create environmentally friendlier solutions, we take the idea of circularity into practice.
Together with the new waste legislation, the reformed battery regulation may make the rules of recycling clearer throughout Europe. Currently, there are different interpretations on, for example, transporting end-of-life battery waste between countries.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/newsroom/forthedoers-blog/repowereu-and-its-impact-green-energy-transition
The Commission calculates that between now and 2027 the implementation of REPowerEU would require an additional €210 billion investments and most of those will have to come from member states and the private sector.
* The blog post was originally published by
REPowerEU increases the complexity of EU regulation and includes overlapping policies and sometimes contradictions with other EU regulation and targets. Some examples: the ambition to reduce energy demand versus electrification of the society, and setting strict criteria for additionality and temporal and geographical correlation in green hydrogen production versus ambitious plans for European hydrogen economy. In general, the package seems to result in increasing micromanagement of the European energy and climate policy.
… but also many cons
However, the Commission has proposed also some innovative instruments like using the revenues (EUR 20 billion) from auctioning allowances from the market stability reserve (MSR) in the emissions trading system (ETS). Such an instrument is questionable as MSR has been designed as a market driven instrument to balance the supply and demand of allowances in the carbon market and not as a political tool.
Speeding up the permitting process for renewable energy projects is one promising practical step. However, I’m a bit hesitant on how widely the EU regulation can promote this and how much is finally in the hands of the national and local authorities.
Fostering green energy transition?
Several pros…
CLIC Innovation
Financing is the key
REPowerEU and its impact on the green energy transition | Fortum
REPowerEU is a welcome response of the Commission to the geopolitical situation. In addition to phasing out its dependence on Russian fossil energies, it aims to accelerate Europe’s transition to renewable energies, to diversify supply sources, and to thereby improve Europe’s energy security and autonomy. If implemented properly, the acceleration of the energy transition can bring economic benefits to the whole of Europe, companies will become more competitive while greenhouse gas emissions will be reduced.
REPowerEU is a politically coloured package that relies essentially on the fast development of intermittent renewables in EU’s electricity production. Whilst representing a main bulk of the necessary additional capacities, renewable energy is unable alone to deliver the level of security of supply needed to guarantee system stability. It is important that other forms of CO2-free technologies are recognized such as nuclear or hydro that can back-up new renewables in a way that provides flexibility in a climate-neutral fashion. Also other important emission reduction technologies like CCS/CCU and district heating have not been recognized in REPowerEU.
The European Commission continues releasing extensive legislative and strategic packages one after the other: Fit for 55, Hydrogen and Gas Package, REPowerEU.
The REPowerEU package was a quick reaction to the war in Ukraine and the energy crisis that revealed the strong dependence of the European Union on Russian energy. REPowerEU is a plan for saving energy, producing clean energy and diversifying the European energy supplies. It is backed by financial and legal measures to build the new energy infrastructure and system that Europe needs. The key question is: is REPowerEU able to foster the green energy transition?
The distribution of financial support will mainly use existing instruments – that is good. The Recovery and Resilience Facility (RRF) is at the heart of the REPowerEU Plan implementation, providing additional EU funding. Member States should add a REPowerEU chapter to their Recovery and Resilience Plans to channel investments to REPowerEU priorities and make the necessary reforms.
It is positive that the EU climate ambition – both short and long term – is not put into question in the package. The path to reaching the targets remains however undefined and the strong focus on renewables and energy efficiency targets risks overlapping with the headline climate target and also may water down the effectiveness of the EU emissions trading system.
My answer to my question in the beginning is: yes. Overall, the RePowerEU provides opportunities to ramp up clean energy projects and provides additional financing and thus speeds up the green energy transition. All this however requires that REPowerEU together with other legislative proposals will be finalized promptly and with a market driven and technology neutral approach.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/forthedoers-blog/sustainability-collaboration-exceptional-circumstances
Coal exit proceeds, climate targets cover the entire value chain
Our coal exit is proceeding well. Within less than one year, we have been able to announce the accelerated coal phase-out of six of our coal-fired power plants in Germany and the UK compared to the original timetable. By 2030, Fortum will phase out or exit about 8 GW of coal-fired power generation. The energy transition and the transition to carbon neutrality rely on clean power and gas, such as hydrogen.
We will also strengthen and grow in CO2-free power generation. Our target is to build 1.5–2 GW of new renewable energy capacity by 2025. During the year, we announced our first joint wind power project of 380 MW in Finland together with Uniper. During the first quarter of 2022 Fortum won the right to build two solar projects in India with total capacity of 800 MW.
I’m glad to say that there haven’t been any pandemic-related interruptions in our energy production or challenges in maintaining operational safety. We continued to focus on supporting both the physical and mental wellbeing of people in these exceptional conditions. Special emphasis was put on supporting the teams and managers in remote and virtual work. The implementation of a Hybrid Work Model consisted of training and coaching more than 800 managers and employees.
Biodiversity is among our sustainability priorities. For the year 2021, we set our first Group-level target for biodiversity and increased our internal communication on the subject. The biodiversity target was achieved and we carried out 13 major voluntary measures that improve the living conditions of species and strengthen populations. During 2022, our target is to develop a science-based strategy to measure and enhance the biodiversity impacts of the Group’s operations and new developments.
Supporting physical and mental wellbeing
Fortum’s sustainability report is available on our website.
As we have finalized Fortum’s sustainability reporting 2021, I find it important to reflect on the exceptional year and sustainability collaboration between Fortum and Uniper. Together, we reassessed the sustainability priorities of both companies by utilising the same methods. We share the majority of the material topics, but there are also some slight differences that stem from, for example, nature of our operations and the emphasis of public discussion in different countries.
Together with Uniper, we also initiated the alignment of several key safety processes. Fortum launched new Safety Ground Rules to help keep safety on everyone’s agenda at all times and to improve Fortum’s safety performance.
2021 was the first full year with Uniper consolidated as a subsidiary of Fortum. We now have the Group’s sustainability data for key performance indicators available in one information system. As Fortum Group, we are well-positioned to respond to increasing reporting responsibilities. These include for instance EU Taxonomy-related reporting and the reporting requirements coming with the Corporate Sustainability Reporting Directive.
Sustainability collaboration in exceptional circumstances | Fortum
Looking at the dire situation, we all feel the need to help. The people in Ukraine need humanitarian aid. Fortum Group’s donation to the Red Cross is directed to support humanitarian relief actions in Ukraine and for refugees in the neighbouring countries.
However, our climate targets remain. Our target is to be carbon neutral in our European generation already in 2035 and in our operations globally in 2050 at the latest, in line with the goals of the Paris Agreement. We also developed a new target for the reduction of indirect Scope 3 greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions, which play a significant role in our total greenhouse gas emissions. I think this is an important step forward in our climate work.
Diversity and inclusion are key to our long-term success as a company in all our markets. The diversity, equity, and inclusion (DEI) survey conducted by Boston Consulting Group and United Nations Women showed that there are improvement areas. However, we have also made progress. Fortum was the best among the Finnish listed companies in the European Women on Boards (EWoB) Gender Diversity Index, ranking at 22/668. Fortum also had the biggest improvement in gender diversity in top management positions among the Finnish companies. This is something to be proud of.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/newsroom/forthedoers-blog/how-does-fortum-manage-electricity-price-risk
In terms of Fortum’s hedging activities, it’s worth keeping in mind that our own electricity production and our own power plants are always behind all our derivatives agreements. We hedge only as much as we are able to deliver with certainty in all circumstances.
Own power plants behind Fortum’s derivatives agreements
For example, when an electricity producer knows the future price of its product, thanks to hedging, it can better forecast its future cash flow and plan its operations and investments.
Hedging is a long-term activity. For example, Fortum started selling the 2023 production already several years in advance. The hedging ratio then gradually increases over time towards the target level before the time of delivery. So the final hedge price is thus the average of individual trades made at market price over the longer term. In 2020, the electricity price on the wholesale market was about EUR 25/MWh for 2023; this year, it has been as high as EUR 284/MWh. In the recent rollercoaster market, we have actively and significantly decreased our hedging position on Nasdaq to curb the collateral requirements.
Fortum hedges electricity prices to minimise market risks
Wishes for a crystal ball
The energy markets are in an unprecedented situation, the root cause of which is the war. Russia’s attack on Ukraine and the use of energy as a weapon has led to an energy crisis in Europe. Prices for energy commodities, including electricity, have soared many times over. The situation is causing difficulties for consumers, businesses and also energy producers. For example, the 2023 derivatives price of Nordic electricity has increased sixfold since Russia’s attack. We did not anticipate that, and the current market regulation is not designed for this kind of market.
There is heated debate about electricity markets, the sufficiency of electricity supply and the financial situation of energy companies. Recently, the keywords have been the derivatives exchange and the collaterals payable there. In this blog, I shed some light on how and why Fortum operates in the derivatives exchange.
How does Fortum manage electricity price risk? | Fortum
The key principle behind Fortum’s hedging activities is to minimise market risks. Explicitly: we do not engage in speculative trading. Hedging is done several years in advance to ensure future cash flows at a predictable level.
which is described in more detail here
Electricity producers and consumers value the predictability of the electricity price. Most electricity producers sell their future production in advance, an activity that is called electricity price risk hedging. In practice, hedging involves locking in the electricity price in advance through derivatives on the Nasdaq Commodities power exchange or through bilateral agreements. At the moment, more and more hedging is being done through bilateral agreements with other companies. Hedging on the exchange requires cash collateral, the logic of
We regularly publish the hedging ratios of our Nordic production in the interim reports. In our most recent interim report, for instance, we said that 60% of our 2023 production is hedged at EUR 37/MWh. Fortum’s principle is that not all production is hedged. This is so that we can ensure our ability to also deliver all the electricity we have hedged – even at times when there is less hydropower available or a power plant is offline.
Throughout the turmoil of recent months, many have wished for a crystal ball that would reveal the market’s next twists and turns. Alas, there is no such crystal ball, so we have to deal with the uncertainty of the markets. We hope for the best, but prepare for the worst. This preparedness is reflected in the aid packages for energy companies planned by the Finnish and Swedish governments. They strengthen financial resilience in the midst of volatility and provide security for any new twists and turns on the rollercoaster.
The very high collateral requirements of the electricity exchanges are particularly challenging for electricity producers. Fortum is one of the biggest electricity producers in the Nordic market, so this issue is especially important to us. With a large production portfolio comes large collateral requirements. At their peak, our collateral requirements were about 5 billion euros based on the closing prices on 26.8.
Fortum hedges both its production and its purchases, but the hedging volume of production is significantly higher. There is a big difference in the amount of electricity production to be hedged and the quantities of electricity sold to consumers at a fixed price, and therefore the sales and purchases are not netted, as is the case with some smaller electricity companies, for example.
In the Nordic countries, the availability of hydropower has traditionally had a significant impact on the price of electricity. In dry years the price is higher, and in wet years the price falls. If we were to rely only on the spot price, cash flow could fluctuate quite a lot. The figure below shows the price Fortum receives for electricity with hedging compared to a situation without any hedging. Without hedging, our financial result would have fluctuated a lot and it would have been almost impossible to forecast cash flow.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/news-and-publications/press-kits/electricity-derivatives-markets
Fortum Corporation has agreed with its majority owner, the Finnish State (ownership 50.76%), on a bridge financing arrangement with which the company aims to ensure access to sufficient liquidity resources if power prices and, with it, collateral requirements continue to rise significantly on the Nordic commodities exchange Nasdaq.
Most consumers and companies want to know how much they will be paying for electricity in the upcoming months or years. Likewise, electricity producers want to ensure that they will be compensated enough for their production in the future. A derivatives exchange makes this possible.
The purpose of the collateral is to compensate other parties for expenses incurred in the event that a member of the exchange is unable to meet its obligations, for example due to a bankruptcy.
For example, if a seller has sold at a low price and the market prices rise, the seller must transfer more collateral to the exchange. When prices drop, the collateral is returned to the seller. Upon delivery of the products sold, the collateral related to the trade in question is returned in its entirety.
There is heated debate about electricity markets, sufficiency of electricity supply and the financial situation of energy companies. The keywords in recent days have been the derivatives exchange and the collaterals payable there. In this blog, we shed some light on how and why Fortum operates in the derivatives exchange.
Exchanges are designed to be low-risk marketplaces and to streamline trading between buyers and sellers. In particular, exchanges aim to manage counterparty risks, i.e. to ensure that each participant is able to meet its obligations as agreed. One of the ways exchanges do this is by requiring various types of collateral and/or guarantees from the participants.
Even to start trading on an exchange, cash (collateral, margining) must be transferred to a clearing account defined by the exchange. As transactions are concluded, companies have to transfer additional collateral on a daily basis to meet the current collateral requirements.
A derivatives exchange trades on future output of electricity. Derivatives markets are also called financial markets. Companies use a derivatives exchange to hedge electricity price-related risks. In a derivatives contract, the parties agree on the delivery of a certain amount of electricity at a certain price for a certain period of time. The trading focuses on the coming months and years – even as far as five years into the future. A derivatives transaction doesn’t typically involve the transfer of any physical product – just money. The most significant derivatives exchange in the Nordics is the NASDAQ Commodities exchange.
With the energy crisis in Europe, the price of electricity and various electricity agreements have become hot topics in the media and around the coffee table. And when the discussion is about the electricity price, the discussion rather quickly turns to power exchanges. What are these power exchanges and why are they needed? And why are the power exchanges’ collateral requirements a cause of concern today?
Electricity derivatives markets | Fortum
There are two types of power exchanges:
Because electricity production and demand must be in balance at all times, a trading platform is needed where supply and demand – electricity producers and electricity consumers – meet. This trading platform is called a power exchange.
Fortum has signed a bridge financing arrangement with the Finnish state to cover collateral needs
High electricity prices raise collateral requirements
In power exchanges specialised in physical trading, electricity producers and consumers trade with the aim of the physical delivery of electricity from the producer to the consumer within a span of 24 hours. In Finland and other Nordic countries, most of the physical electricity trading happens in the Nord Pool power exchange.
The sharp rise in energy commodity prices that started in late 2021 has increased the collateral requirements for exchange trading. Electricity sellers and buyers are hedging by selling and buying their future production and consumption years in advance. These transactions were already in place prior to the price increases we are now experiencing.
​​​
For these transactions, companies must transfer collateral (money) to the exchange to match the current price level. The collateral requirements have risen to very high levels and have led to the high indirect costs of exchange trading (tying up money in collateral), which has consequently caused financing, i.e. liquidity, challenges for companies.
Collateral requirements consist of several different components (initial margin, variation margin, etc.), and a big part of them change along with changes in the market price. What’s noteworthy about this is that even if the company doesn’t enter into new derivatives transactions, an increase or decrease in market prices will increase or decrease the collateral requirements.
Why does a derivatives exchange require collateral?
An electricity derivatives exchange is a continuous auction where numerous sellers and buyers meet and the market price is efficiently formed on the basis of bids and offers. The publication of prices increases transparency and provides an understanding of the price level.
How does a derivatives exchange work?
The most significant challenges of exchange trading are the financial requirements and reporting. Joining an exchange requires having enough capital (cash and/or collateral) right from the start as well as the ability to manage daily reporting and financial transactions. For this reason, direct members of the exchange tend to be major companies, banks and service companies specialised in exchange trading.
Electricity derivatives markets


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/newsroom/forthedoers-blog/why-electricity-traded-exchanges
There are multiple benefits to trading on an exchange. When the platform has many participants at the same time (sellers and buyers), finding the market price is efficient. Exchange trading is a continuous auction, with both sellers and buyers making bids. The exchange publishes the bids submitted and the prices of the completed transactions. This increases transparency and makes it easier for the participants to form an understanding of the current price level for different periods in the future. At the end of the day, the exchange publishes the day’s closing price, which companies use to put a bookkeeping value on the electricity derivatives they have purchased.
A derivatives exchange aims to minimise counterparty risks – collateral is key
Communications Manager, Trading and Asset Optimisation (TAO)
In a derivatives exchange, the trading focuses on the coming months and years – even as far as five years into the future. The most significant derivatives exchange in Nordics is the NASDAQ Commodities exchange. Derivatives markets are also called futures or financial markets. In a derivatives contract, the parties agree on the delivery of a certain amount of electricity at a certain price for a certain period of time. A derivatives transaction doesn’t typically involve the transfer of any physical product – just money.
A derivatives exchange offers transparency about the markets’ price level
This may sound laborious and complicated, and it is. So why do companies go through all the trouble? There’s a very straightforward explanation: with collateral requirements, the trading risks are low. The purpose of the collateral is to compensate other parties for expenses incurred in the event that a member of the exchange is unable to meet its obligations, for example due to a bankruptcy. Collateral could perhaps be compared to a security deposit for a rental unit. It is given to the landlord in case the tenant is unable to pay the rent or causes damage to the property. If the tenant keeps the apartment in good condition and pays the rent as agreed, they will get the security deposit back at the end of the lease.
The sharp rise in energy commodity prices over the past year (Figure 1) has increased the collateral requirements for exchange trading. Electricity sellers and buyers are hedging, i.e. selling and buying their future production and consumption years in advance, and these transactions were already in place before the price increases we are now experiencing. For these transactions, companies must transfer collateral (money) to the exchange to match the current price level. The collateral requirements have risen to astronomical levels and have led to the indirect costs of exchange trading (tying up money in collateral) causing financing or liquidity challenges for companies.
Figure 1. Nordic power futures prices have risen sharply this year. Source: Nasdaq Commodities, Bloomberg.
Many electricity producers and consumers value predictability and foreseeability in electricity prices and in risks related to trading. Consumers who have entered into a fixed-rate, fixed-term electricity agreement know the price of the electricity for the agreement period and thus are able to estimate the amount of their future electricity bills. Industrial companies, meanwhile, aim to secure the availability and prices of their raw materials, energy and other production inputs in advance so that they can price their end product and plan their production. It would be impossible for an electricity producer to plan its investments if it only knew tomorrow’s cash flow.
Nord Pool exchange offers trading in tomorrow’s electricity supply
Power exchanges have a place also in the future
Why is electricity traded on exchanges? | Fortum
The majority of the electricity consumed in Nordic countries is bought and sold through the Nord Pool power exchange. Nord Pool is where the trading of physical electricity happens and where the electricity market’s daily prices, i.e. the so-called spot prices, are formed. The power exchange aims to find the lowest possible market price for each hour to meet demand. The spot price varies hour by hour based on supply and demand, and trading takes place each day of the year for the next day’s electricity production. Simplified, it could be said that the electricity purchased today from Nord Pool will come out of the wall socket tomorrow. Electricity retailers handle Nord Pool trading on behalf of households and small companies.
Even to start trading on an exchange, cash (collateral, margining) must be transferred to a clearing account defined by the exchange. As transactions are concluded, companies have to transfer additional collateral on a daily basis to meet the current collateral requirements. Collateral requirements consist of several different components (initial margin, variation margin, etc.), and a big part of them change along with changes in the market price. What’s noteworthy about this is that even if the company doesn’t trade more, an increase or decrease in market prices will increase or decrease the collateral requirements. For example, if a seller has sold at a low price and the market prices rise, the seller must transfer more collateral to the exchange. When prices drop, the collateral is returned to the seller. Upon delivery of the products sold, the collateral related to the sale in question is returned in its entirety.
A derivatives exchange trades on future output
A power exchange is a trading platform where electricity producers and electricity consumers meet. There are two types of power exchanges. In power exchanges specialised in physical trading, electricity producers and consumers trade with the aim of the physical delivery of electricity from the producer to the consumer. The aim of derivative exchanges, meanwhile, is to offer companies ways to hedge electricity price-related risks.
When I took a course on the fundamentals of environmental economics, I learned that efficient markets are the key to maximising the social welfare of society. The electricity market is no exception. Nord Pool aims to find the lowest price for each hour and derivatives trading allows companies to manage price risk effectively. Today’s exceptional market situation has highlighted the challenges of collateral requirements for exchanges in particular, and the market and legislation must be further developed on the basis of the lessons learned. Companies’ trading needs will not disappear – power exchanges will continue to have an important role also in the future.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/newsroom/forthedoers-blog/questions-energy-availability-rely-hydro
More than ever hydropower is important in the Nordics. Security of energy supply has become an increasingly pressing issue in recent months due to the war in Ukraine and the geopolitical landscape. Alternatives for oil and gas imports are sought across Europe, and countries are redrawing their energy strategies to ensure the uninterrupted availability of energy. In the Nordics, the situation is somewhat different, as we have hydropower that we can rely on together with nuclear power and increasing amounts of wind and solar – all CO2-free production forms.
I started in my current role as Vice President, Hydro at Fortum almost a year ago, and hydropower has been my main focus for a couple of years. I must say I feel privileged to work in such an important part of the energy sector. As part of the joint team that we established for Fortum’s and Uniper’s Nordic hydro operations, we operate and maintain 190 hydropower plants across Sweden and Finland. With this new joint team, we have committed and passionate professionals sharing knowledge and ideas to make sure that Nordic hydropower continues to serve as a secure and reliable source of energy. At the same time, we are tapping into the vast potential of digitalisation and making hydropower fit for the future.
Continuously transforming hydropower
Vice President, Hydro
Hydropower as a key part of the energy transition
Renewable and clean energy
vann
Whether we look at the short or longer term, hydropower plays a significant role in energy availability in the Nordics. In the short term, its production can be quickly adjusted to answer changes in power demand.
While hydropower allows for more wind and solar in the energy system, producing hydropower also impacts the river ecology. We review our environmental impacts and seek to develop mitigation measures and to find a balance between environmental improvements and the availability of CO2-free hydropower production. Last year we carried out voluntary biodiversity projects such as dam removals and improvements around our hydropower plants.
In the long term, hydropower balances the intermittency of wind and solar and enables increasing their share in the energy system without compromising security of supply. This makes it a key part of the energy transition. Hydropower is used to ensure the flexibility of the energy system, and to maintain grid stability. It is also a form of energy storage: water reservoirs can be used to store energy for a long time and in large quantities.
We are continuously upgrading and developing our existing hydropower assets. For instance, at the powerplant Forshuvud in Sweden we have installed used electric car batteries from Tesla and at other sites we are operating and commissioning new battery capacity. Combining hydropower with batteries means that we can further boost our contribution to grid stability by providing super-fast frequency regulation. This is becoming increasingly important when hydropower needs to facilitate an increasing amount of weather dependent production.
This year, we continue with our efforts related to biodiversity. We engage actively in dialogue with organisations on local, national, and international level. In Sweden, we work intensively with the national plan for hydropower and aim to achieve at modern environmental conditions. Fortum is a proud co-owner of the Vattenkraftens Miljöfond (the Hydroelectric Environmental Fund), a SEK 10 billion fund (approx. EUR 1 billion) that provides financial support towards the implementation of the national plan.
In questions of energy availability, rely on hydro | Fortum
michael
Digitalization is a hot topic, and this is also the case in hydropower. For us it means using data not only to optimise production to balance different needs, but also using advanced condition monitoring of our plants to enable the detection of potential issues before they have a chance to cause disruption, further securing a continuous supply of clean hydropower to the power system. This is one of many examples of how we are developing hydropower to meet future demands. Of course, we take a long-term perspective: our oldest plants have been delivering CO2-free hydropower to society for more than a century. We want to ensure that they’ll keep doing so for another 100 years by continuously developing them.
Balancing different needs
Joint team to ensure we’re fit for the future


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/societal-work-middle-pandemic
Read more about our Corporate Social Responsibility Programme.
During the past year, we have renewed our support principles. Based on them, we support topics that we know best and that have a clear connection to our business. Our mission is to drive the change for a cleaner world, and we want to support our partners in their work toward this goal. All our work is based on our values – curiosity, responsibility, integrity and respect. Curiosity in collaborating with organisations can mean coming up with solutions together, for example. Responsibility stands for acting in a responsible way and working for the good of the society. Integrity means transparency and respect refers to appreciating diversity, for example.
, the
The pandemic challenged our point of view
Fortum has a long tradition of collaborating with local communities. The past year has been a new phase for our societal work as well as an exceptional time in the midst of a pandemic.
The society is constantly changing, and we must be able to both work in the long term as well as react quickly to the changes happening around us. We had just renewed our programme in the spring when the COVID-19 pandemic hit. During the pandemic, our support has been mainly focused on people, as the pandemic has increased the need for help and support services. At the beginning of the pandemic, we considered who would be in the most vulnerable position in addition to children and the young, and we concluded that supporting the elderly was also important to us in the current situation. This year, also the “Christmas contribution” Fortum usually gives out to support organisations has been directed to support our partners’ operations through our responsibility programme.
The pandemic challenged our CSR programme| Fortum
Support and business go hand in hand
Finnish Association of Mental Health
The Finnish Association for the Welfare of Older People
As the work continues, our impact grows
The year 2020 has been both a new phase in our societal work as well as an exceptional time in the middle of a pandemic. Our work continues both in Finland and in our other operating countries. We have updated our guidelines for support so that the applicants are aware of our focus areas. The work is managed and coordinated systematically. Together with the organisations we follow up on the progress and impact of the work.
In practice, our support is realised through our Corporate Social Responsibility Programme, which covers collaboration initiatives and projects in all our operating countries. The programme focuses on climate (environment and water), material revolution (recycling and waste) and issues related to the wellbeing of people (youth, children and education). These focus areas are also heavily linked to the UN Sustainable Development Goals.
. In Norway, we collaborate with organisations such as
in Sweden. In addition to financial support and working together, we find it important to increase the organisations’ visibility in different channels and drive their own goals. As many people as possible should be made aware of the services and opportunities these organisations offer.
Manager, Corporate Social Responsibility
Fortum has collaborated with local communities for a long time. Clean energy and sustainable solutions are at the core of our business. With profitable and stable operations, we also have the opportunity to participate in non-profit societal work and support NGOs, for example.
Giving support includes both long-term work as well as constantly searching for new means to offer support and help. For example, we are looking into ways in which interested Fortum employees could participate in our partners’ operations on a voluntary basis. We want to implement our work internationally, so that successful concepts can be replicated in other countries, as well. This way, our impact accumulates and grows.
In Finland, we support
, and with
Sykehusklovnene
The Mannerheim League for Child Welfare
as well as the


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/about-us/blog-podcast/forthedoers-blog/what-happened-electricity-prices
This exceptional spring saw electricity prices hit their all-time lowest. Why is that? The pandemic and the restrictions related to it certainly play a role, but are there other important reasons, as well?
So, why has the spot price been at this historically low level?
What happened to electricity prices? | Fortum
So, no reason to hoard electricity now due to Covid-19, but it’s a good time to use CO2-free electricity, for example by driving electric cars, heating the saunas or investing in electricity-based industrial solutions, which help to decarbonise our society.
Covid-19 and the restrictions set to slow down the pandemic certainly play a role. The shutdown of the economies all over the world is driving the decreased demand for energy commodities like oil, gas, and also electricity. Furthermore, less industrial activity has resulted in a decrease in the price of European emissions allowances.
PS: In the future, clean electricity must also be stored; actually it’s one of the keys towards the decarbonised energy system. But that’s another story. Read more about how
Head of Hedging and Pricing, Fortum
persson
The average system spot price in April 2020 was 5.3 EUR/MWh, which is the lowest monthly average spot price ever. As the spot price is a result of the supply and demand balance, the current price indicates that we shouldn’t worry about the lack of electricity right now. The energy companies have been ensuring the security of supply also during these exceptional times.
The most commonly used reference for the power price is the so-called
However, Covid-19 and its consequences are not to be entirely blamed or thanked – depending on your point of view – for the low prices.
First, let’s take a look at the basics of the Nordic electricity market. In the Nordic countries, electricity is traded at the Nord Pool power exchange, which operates much like any other market exchange. The Nordic power market price is a result of the supply and demand balance of electricity in real time and future expectations.
storage is key to the future energy system
. The spot price for each hour of a day is set in a daily auction where buyers and sellers of electricity are bidding for the next day’s 24 hours.
spot price at Nord Pool
Other key reasons for low spot prices in the Nordics have been the heavy rainfall during the last couple of months, combined with windy weather and hence increasing amounts of wind power as well as an exceptionally mild winter. The reservoirs in the Nordic countries contain more water than usual. The wind power production in the Nordic area has increased from almost nothing in 2000 to about 15% of the total Nordic electricity production in 2019.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/distanced-not-alone-fortum-supports-remote-working
Remote working has its challenges, but there are positive aspects to it, as well. Some people find it easier to concentrate at home, and the time saved from commuting can be spent on a leisurely breakfast, for example. I’ve found that a refreshing morning walk is a great way to start the day, and taking my coffee break outside in the sun cheers me up wonderfully now that it’s almost summer and the days are warm. Regular walking meetings in the sun are also a good way to combine outdoor exercise and work.
When the home is also the workplace, it can be difficult to maintain boundaries between work and personal life. Work tasks sometimes seep into free time and winding down after the workday may be difficult. It is important to manage the work-life balance and ensure that there is enough time to relax, enjoy leisure activities, and sleep sufficiently. This means we must pay attention to scheduling and self-management.
Working from home instead of at the office should not mean working alone. Colleagues are an important community for most people and being detached from that community can be very straining. Things that may seem trivial, such as chatting for a few minutes at the coffee machine or sharing a laugh in the hallway, are suddenly much more meaningful. When someone has a bad day, having a friend to vent to can really help – and successes feel much better when shared with a colleague.
It is not only our minds that are under stress, our bodies are too. Working conditions at home may not be as ergonomic as those at the office, where desks and work chairs are set at the perfect height for each user and the lighting is optimised. At home, we may be sitting on the sofa with our laptops or at the kitchen table. Many of us get so caught up in what we are doing that we forget to take breaks and stretch our legs. Those of us who normally use public transportation to come to work are no longer walking from the bus stop or train station, so we are getting less exercise.
Mind and body both need attention
Self-management is one of the principles of our Open Leadership approach. Recognising our own strengths, challenges, and personal preferences helps us adjust our ways of working. Open Leadership also stresses continuous learning, which is vitally important to our shared success. Open Leadership is a combination of belief in our people, wanting what is best for them, and expecting them to deliver results. It is based on a growth mindset that welcomes challenges and seizes opportunities to learn from feedback as well as from others’ successes. Right now, we are doing our best to offer everyone at Fortum a working environment that allows us all to thrive – even in exceptional times.
Manager, well-being
Fortum provides its personnel with a variety of tools to help us feel better physically and mentally. Our Energise Your Day wellbeing programme offers a variety of tools and support for wellbeing while working remotely, and the Take a Break concept offers a weekly home workout. Ergonomic guidance helps set up the workspace in a way that minimises physical discomfort and helps to keep us going. We also have external partners who provide things like individual and team coaching, exercise programmes, and videos. Our eLearnings include material on Mind Management, intelligent working habits, and more.
Open Leadership turns challenge into success
For more than a year, people around the world have coped with the exceptional circumstances brought on by the COVID-19 pandemic. Our everyday lives have changed in many ways, as contacts and travel have been restricted. Millions of people have worked remotely from their homes for months on end. This is the case also at Fortum. Our highest priority is to keep our people safe and, at the same time, to ensure business continuity. To this end, we have adopted new ways of working and support for remote work.
We encourage people at Fortum to maintain active contact with colleagues. And not just by having work-related meetings: coffee breaks, little chats, and moments to catch up are just as important, if not more so. It is important to keep in mind that we are part of the same team, supporting each other. In the managers’ role, this is naturally emphasised. With uncertainty about the pandemic and the wellbeing of oneself and loved ones causing stress, asking how team members are doing and really listening to them is more important than ever.
Distanced but not alone – Fortum supports remote working | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/Jyvaskylan-Voima



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/Helen



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/references/BIR_R%C3%A5dalen



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/fukushima-daiichi-nuclear-power-plant-treating-nures
Fukushima Daiichi Nuclear Power Plant: Treating with NURES® | Fortum
NURES® Publications are free to download, but we would like to better serve you by getting the contact information of those interested in our products. Please fill the following form and you will be redirected to our downloads page.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-waste-management/bores
BORES® removes boron efficiently
Installation
Effective process with minimalistic system structure
Ion exchange media
Use of BORES® results in minimal amount of secondary waste.
We also can offer water treatment with BORES® as a service.
Simple and Robust
Productivity and transformation
Key benefits for customers:
Considerable savings in disposal cost
Clean
BORES® can be used to treat all of the system waters containing boron (e.g. fuel pool waters, boron concentrate waters etc.)  as well as the evaporator concentrates of a plant.
BORES® produces radiochemically clean and dry alkaline borate or boric acid. Boric acid can be disposed or re-used as conventional, non-radioactive waste.
Cost efficient and robust treatment process
BORES® systems are always tailored according to customer’s needs. BORES® delivery may include
BORES® - A solution for treating liquid radioactive waste | Fortum
Conceptual and detailed design
Delivery of treatment system
Zero boron discharge to waterways
Support for operation and maintenance
In the simple, efficient and robust treatment process of BORES®, a very high decontamination factor for boron can be achieved.
Services for Nuclear and Radioactive Waste Management
BORES® – Technology for Boron Separation
BORES® is simple but effective process with less components and equipment
Tailored solutions to maximize customer value
BORES produces radiochemically clean and reusable materials
A solution for separating boron from radioactive liquid waste. BORES® technology is a trusted process for recovering boron from not only operating wastes (e.g. evaporator concentrate) but also power plant process water during decommissioning.
Pressurised water reactors (PWR) use boron to control reactivity. Many operating nuclear power plants of this type have strict limits for boron releases to waterways. Fortum BORES® (Boron Removal System) water treatment solution was developed to treat and recover the boric acid from PWR power plants.
Waste Management


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-waste-management
As both nuclear power plant and nuclear waste facility licensee and operator, Fortum has unique experience in devel­oping safe and economical disposal solutions for different radioactive waste types.
Fortum offers optimisation of nuclear waste management practises in a numerous areas.
As both nuclear power plant and nuclear waste facility licensee and operator, we have unique experience in optimising strategies and solutions for nuclear waste management. We can help our customers to significantly reduce the waste volumes and waste management costs at nuclear power plants by optimising the entire process from waste collection to final disposal.
Our nuclear waste management capability areas:
• Nuclear waste management strategies
Storage and Disposal
Services for Nuclear and Radioactive Waste Management | Fortum
Radioactive Waste Disposal
Expertise over the nuclear waste lifecycle
Nuclear and Radioactive Waste Management, Planning and Optimisation
• Testing and piloting
• Liquid waste purification
• Safety engineering for nuclear waste facilities
• Nuclear decommissioning waste management
• Waste solidification
For more than 30 years, Fortum has been a forerunner in nuclear waste management. We have developed innovative solutions for radioactive liquid purification and waste solidification as well as gained hands on experience in waste management. Fortum provides products and services in regards to Nuclear waste. Read more about our offerings below and contact our experts for more information.
Reduced waste volumes and waste management costs
Fortum awarded contract for decommissioning of VTT's nuclear research reactor in Finland
We offer nuclear waste management solutions for new builds, operating nuclear power plants and plants under decommissioning. Tailored to customers' needs, the scope of our delivery can vary from small scale consultancy assignments to turnkey deliveries of waste management solutions.
Forerunner in nuclear waste management


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/radioactive-waste-storage-and-disposal/radioactive-waste-disposal
We provide safety cases and other expert services for the final disposal of Low and Intermediate Level Waste (LILW). By operating and developing our own repositories for low-and-intermediate level waste at Loviisa Nuclear Power Plant, Fortum has gained decades of practical experience about safe, efficient and cost-effective disposal solutions for low-and-intermediate level waste. We want to help our customers to ensure the safe and economical disposal of low- and intermediate-level waste.
Separate spaces for low and intermediate level waste
Near-surface disposal
Licencing
Fortum offers design and consulting services on a whole range of disposal methods. As both nuclear power plant and nuclear waste facility licensee and operator, we have unique experience in developing safe and economical disposal solutions for different radioactive waste types.
Radiation safety analysis
From the near-surface to deep geological
Operational safety analysis
Minimised O&M-costs through the NPP site integration and lack of O&M after site closure
One option for the disposal of very-low and low level solid radioactive waste is to store the waste in near surface disposal facilities. Fortum has long experience on waste with a very low level of radioactivity in its own near surface disposal facility at Kumla Sweden. Additionally, Fortum has participated in different near surface disposal projects and executed safety cases and analyses e.g. for radioactive waste landfill sites in Finland.
Our main offering related to different types of repositories (deep geological and near surface):
LILW disposal facilities are located underground on the NPP site. Design of LILW disposal facilities are optimised taking into account site’s overall waste management strategies, incl. planning and defining of waste routes and waste logistics
Final disposal of spent nuclear fuel
Design of a low and intermediate level waste final repository
Safety case & long-term safety
Radioactive Waste Storages
Radioactive Waste Disposal | Fortum
Basics of the Fortum’s LILW concept
Safety case: documentation demonstrating the long-term safety of the disposal
Fortum has strong capabil­ities to support customers with design of interim storage for spent nuclear fuel as well as for low-and-inter­me­diate level radioactive waste storages.
Facility includes both engineered and natural barriers
In addition to operating our own facilities, we have served several external customers to design and develop their waste disposal solutions for all types of nuclear waste. Our world-class expertise covers both the disposal of low-and-intermediate level waste (LILW) and high level waste (HLW, spent nuclear fuel). We have expertise from designing different types of final disposal solutions such as near-surface disposal and deep geological disposal. We have compiled several safety cases and other analyses for the final disposal of different types of radioactive waste.
Disposal of low-and-intermediate level waste (LILW)
Minimised occupational exposure through the separated spaces for low and intermediate level waste
The cornerstone in the design of final disposal is to ensure and study the long-term safety. We have participated to compilation of several safety cases demonstrating the long-term safety of the radioactive waste disposal.
NPP organisation operates the LILW disposal facilities
Cost analysis
Commissioning services
Services related to disposal of spent fuel
Fortum has strong capabilities to offer engineering and project implementation services for final disposal of spent nuclear fuel. We are one of the two owners of the Finnish Posiva, the spent nuclear fuel disposal company that will start the operation of the deep geological repository in mid-2020s, as the first organization in the world. Over the years, Fortum as an owner has overseen Posiva’s project from early on, all the way through the siting, design and constructions phases to the current point, where commissioning and operation are being planned and pilots for closure and post-closure are ongoing. Fortum has also been actively involved in the final disposal project by providing technical support to Posiva in several areas of expertise.
Minimised effort to get public acceptance through integration with the NPP site
Fortum has strong capabilities to offer engineering and project implementation services for final disposal of spent nuclear fuel. We are one of the two owners of the Finnish Posiva, the spent nuclear fuel disposal company that will start the operation of the deep geological repository in mid-2020s, as the first organization in the world.
Our expertise covers both the disposal of low-and-intermediate level waste (LILW) and high level waste (HLW, spent nuclear fuel). We have expertise from designing different types of final disposal solutions such as near-surface disposal and deep geological disposal.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/radioactive-waste-storage-and-disposal/radioactive-waste-storages
Conceptual design of radioactive waste storages
Fortum has successfully operated its interim storage facilities for spent nuclear fuel and low-and-intermediate waste at Loviisa Power Plant around 40 years. During this time, we have accumulated considerable amount of expertise both from the design and the operations of the waste storages. Our approach aims to enable safe storage without forgetting cost efficient, easily adaptable and customisable interim storage processes and design. Thanks to our long history of waste storages, we have also gained experience about implementation of plant modifications for interim spent fuel storages. As a specialty, we have experience in high density fuel racks.
Safety engineering with ADLAS®
Air plane crash protection applied.
No penetrations from fuel pools below the water surface. Reduced risk of leaks.
Cost efficient considering both construction and operating costs
Our main offering related to interim storages:
Interim storages for all radioactive waste
Radioactive Waste Storages | Fortum
The key features and benefits of Fortum’s Spent fuel interim storage concept are introduced below:
Compatibility with final disposal: easy transfer of fuel out from the spent fuel storage
Construction licensing documentation including PSAR
Safe, functional and cost efficient ground for final disposal
Our services cover design of interim storage both for spent nuclear fuel and for low-and-inter­me­diate level radioactive waste (LILW). We have decades operation experience of the waste storages.
Feasibility studies supporting decision-making
Procurement support
Redundant ultimate heat sink applied. Lessons learned from Fukushima taken into account.
Simulations and safety analyses (radiation modelling and shielding calculations, radiation safety analyses, criticality analyses, PRA, thermohydraulical analysis with Apros®
Feasibility studies e.g. of wet pool storages and dry cask storages
Fortum offers technical support and consulting services for design and developing interim storages for radioactive waste. We have strong capabilities to support customers with design of interim storage for spent nuclear fuel as well as for low-and-intermediate level radioactive waste storages.
Design of new build interim wet pool spent fuel storage
Our services include a comprehensive technical and economic feasibility studies. We can support in decision-making by compiling conceptual design of different site-specific storage concepts, such as a dry cask storage and a wet pool storage.
Fortum has designed wet storages for its fully-owned Loviisa Nuclear Power Plant and for its co-owned Olkiluoto Nuclear Power Plant in Finland. In addition, Fortum has made conceptual design for interim storage for the Hanhikivi Nuclear Power Plant newbuild project.
Our approach aims to enable safe storage without forgetting cost efficient, easily adaptable and customizable interim storage processes and design. We want to ensure that the solutions for interim storages enables compatibility with final disposal.
Easily adaptable to different needs
Adapts well to complete nuclear fuel cycle, including final disposal.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/radioactive-waste-storage-and-disposal
Our nuclear waste storage and disposal capability areas
• Safety engineering for nuclear waste facilities and repositories
• Near-surface disposal at ground level or in caverns below ground level
• Long-term safety of the disposal
Services for Radioactive Waste Storage and Disposal | Fortum
As both nuclear power plant and nuclear waste facility licensee and operator, we have unique experience in optimising strategies and solutions for radioactive waste management. We can help our customers to significantly reduce the waste volumes and waste management costs at nuclear power plants by optimising the entire process from waste collection to final disposal. Read more.
Fortum has  developed innovative and reliable solutions for radioactive waste storages and repositories. In its fully-owned Loviisa NPP, Fortum has almost over 40 years of  experience on designing and operating interim spent fuel storages and final disposal facility for low and intermediate-level radioactive waste. Additionally, Fortum will be amongst the first nuclear power companies to start the final disposal of spent fuel. By providing the waste storage and disposal related services we want to share our world-class expertise and help our customers to ensure the safe and economical waste management and final disposal of radioactive waste. See our product offering below and read more of our expertise.
Comprehensive waste storage and disposal services
• Interim storage of spent fuel
Fortum offers design and expert services for nuclear and industrial customers who need to ensure the safe treatment, storage and disposal of nuclear waste. We have wide experience from different types of interim storages and final disposal repositories. Regarding the final disposal we have been involved in both near-surface disposal, disposal of low-and-intermediate level waste as well as final disposal of spent nuclear fuel projects.
• Final disposal of spent fuel with Posiva (deep geological disposal)
• Low and intermediate-level radioactive waste disposal
Services for Radioactive Waste Storage and Disposal


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-waste-management/nuclear-and-radioactive-waste-management-planning-and-optimisation
Development of radioactive waste management strategy
Fortum has over 40 years of experience on safe, sustainable and cost-effective radioactive waste management at its nuclear facilities. Through that long operator history, we have developed comprehensive expertise on all areas of nuclear waste management. The expertise provides us excellent capabilities to plan and optimise the waste management of a nuclear facility or the processes of another industry treating or handling radioactive waste.
Long experience on optimisation of radioactive waste management
Fortum's expert knowledge in Waste Management
Radiation safety in nuclear/radioactive waste management
Based on our experience on handling all different kinds of waste categories, materials and activity levels, we can optimise your waste management routes from characterisation and sorting of waste to treatment, recycling, storing and final disposal of the waste.
Fortum has over 40 year’s extensive nuclear operator experience and unique knowledge of treatment and handling of activated and contaminated nuclear waste. We are able to develop the optimised waste management strategies from safety, sustainability and life-time cost-efficiency perspectives for nuclear facilities in different phases of their life-cycle. Based on our experience on operational waste, decommissioning waste, the treatment of liquid waste and nuclear waste disposal, we can help you to optimise your waste management.
Nuclear/radioactive waste management consultation
We have expertise and solutions for volume reduction of radioactive wastes and we are able to provide engineering services to plan and implement interim storage and final disposal of wastes in the most optimised way.
Nuclear waste route planning
Characterisation of nuclear/radioactive waste
Nuclear and Radioactive Waste Management, Planning and Optimisation | Fortum
Waste management during nuclear decommissioning
Waste reduction and logistical optimisation
Fortum offers optimization of nuclear waste management practises in the following areas.
Waste management cost estimation and optimisation
Nuclear legacy waste management
During over 40 years we have developed and optimised our waste management practices. We can provide a holistic view on radioactive waste management strategy and plan waste management practices and solutions in the most optimised way both radiation safety and life time cost wise.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/04/fortum-awarded-contract-decommissioning-vtts-nuclear-research-reactor-finland
"At Fortum, we have been working persistently to develop solutions for responsible nuclear waste management. In the future we can utilise the experiences from this project and establish efficient ways of working for both our own power plants and the international market," she continues.
Markus Airila
"We are proud to join VTT in this first nuclear decommissioning project in Finland. The dismantling works start in 2022 and the works will be completed by the end of 2023,” says
Fortum has more than 40 years of experience in designing, licensing and operating nuclear facilities and supplying related services and technologies. Our expertise covers the whole  life-cycle of nuclear power plants from new builds to decommissioning and final disposal of nuclear waste.
, Head of Decommissioning and Waste in Fortum's Nuclear Services.
The decommissioning works include planning, preparatory measures, dismantling of the reactor and waste management including final disposal. As the reactor has been designed for research and educational use, the amount of decommissioning waste and the associated radioactivity will be relatively minor.
"For us at VTT, this contract is a key milestone towards implementation of the decommissioning along the highest standards. Especially Fortum's experience in nuclear power plant operation and nuclear waste management complements our own competencies in an essential way,” says
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 8 APRIL 2020
, Project Manager at VTT.
Anni Jaarinen, Head of Decommissioning and Waste, Nuclear Services, +358 40 825 7217,
Fortum's Nuclear Services
Fortum has been awarded a contract from VTT Technical Research Centre of Finland Ltd to decommission the FiR1 research nuclear reactor in Espoo, Finland. This is the first nuclear decommissioning project in Finland.
Fortum awarded contract for decommissioning of VTT's nuclear research reactor in Finland | Fortum
08 April 2020, 07:00 EEST
Safety is an absolute priority during the planning and execution of the plant's decommissioning. Decommissioning will be carried out under the oversight of the Radiation and Nuclear Safety Authority of Finland (STUK).


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/power-plant-services/nuclear-services/nuclear-waste-management/lockit-nuclear-waste-solidification
Main waste streams are ion exchange resins and sludge
High volume incorporation of different types of waste
LILW disposal facilities are located underground on the NPP site.
See more details below on Fortum’s waste related concepts, as well as the services we offer related to solidification, interim storage and different types of repositories (underground and near surface). Contact our experts for further discussion on how we could best assist you handling the waste at your site.
Read what WNN noted about the liquid waste facility startup
LOCKIT® Solidification
Nuclear Waste Storage, Repositories and Solidification | Fortum
Services related to disposal of spent fuel together with Posiva Solutions
News release
LOCKIT® recipe accommodates up to 60% of waste volume – an international record.
The recipe development started in 1980s and it is continuously further developed to optimise the performance of the matrix for new waste fractions
The processes are operated from a control room
Over 50% waste content without diluting the matrix quality
The tests of exposing the matrix to underground water have shown that the matrix has not weakened since 2012
Fortum’s waste solidification technology (LOCKIT®) enables cost effective solutions for low- and intermediate- level waste solidification. The technology and know-how is a result of over 30 years of operational experiences and continuous development from the Fortum owned Loviisa NPP.
Expert know-how in recipe development
Repositories
Basics of the Fortum’s concept
Minimised occupational exposure through the separated spaces for low and intermediate level waste
Fortum's expert knowledge in Waste Solidification
Quality control program for your daily solidification operation
The solidification matrix is based on cement and blast furnace slags
Waste content of the solidified product is 40%-60%
WNN article
The solidification plant is an independent unit and designed to handle all of the liquid waste generated during NPP operation and decommissioning. It also handles the liquid waste originating from interim storage of spent fuel.
The cement matrix, developed by Fortum, is more than twice as efficient as the traditional matrix
The cost is practically the same as in traditional cementation
Fortum’s LILW disposal concept and disposal related engineering services
What makes the LOCKIT® cement matrix special
Loviisa liquid waste facility starts operation
Our main offering related to different types of repositories (underground and near surface)
The solidification matrix is suitable for all types of LILW
We provide comprehensive quality control program and training to ensure the successful operation of your solidification plant.
Waste and binders are dosed and mixed directly in the final disposal package
LOCKIT® – Nuclear Waste Solidification
What we do at our own solidification plant in Loviisa
We at Fortum provide solutions for the whole waste lifecycle of an NPP, based on what we also apply ourselves. In our Loviisa NPP, the plant's liquid waste is solidified into cement and packed into concrete waste containers. The solidification is designed to process low- and intermediate-level liquid waste generated during the operation and decommissioning of the two-unit Loviisa plant. This waste primarily consists of ion exchange resins used in the purification of process water as well as sludge from the bottom of the evaporator concentrate tanks and evaporator concentrates. The waste is then taken to the low and intermediate level waste (LILW) repository below the plant site alongside all of the other LILW waste created during the operation and, in the future, decommissioning of the plant.
Cementation recipe is tailored according to your waste stream – high boron content does not affect the quality of the solidification product.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/02/solidification-plant-fortums-loviisa-power-plants-liquid-radioactive-waste-starts-operation-0
A total of about 900 m3 of intermediate-level radioactive ion exchange resins and evaporator concentrates for solidification have accumulated throughout the Loviisa power plant’s history. Now the solidification of this stockpile will begin in full scale. The goal is to get all the liquid waste processed before the Loviisa unit one reactor’s operating licence expires in 2027. When the decommissioning of the power plant starts, the liquid waste generated in the purging of the system and in the dismantling work will be processed in the solidification plant.
“The waste will be cemented directly in final disposal containers, which, after intermediate storage, will be deposited into the final repository for power plant waste, located on-site in the power plant area. The advantages of cementation include fire safety and the concrete’s ability to effectively absorb radioactive materials. The waste can be handled in small batches, making the process safe and easy to control,” Buddas says.
Solidification plant for Fortum's Loviisa power plant’s liquid radioactive waste starts operation | Fortum
ONLINE NEWS 17 February 2016
The solidification plant is included in the Loviisa power plant’s operating licence, and licensing process was handled as a plant modification. The solidification plant operates as an independent facility in its own building in the power plant area, so the separate safety assessment conducted by STUK was more extensive than for a typical plant modification. STUK found the design, construction and commissioning of the solidification plant to be safe and in accordance with regulations.
, Deputy Director, Loviisa Nuclear Power Plant.
Thomas Buddas, Deputy Director, Loviisa power plant, tel.
In 2015, the load factor at Fortum’s fully-owned Loviisa nuclear power plant was 92.9%. On an international scale, the load factor was among the best in the world for pressurised water reactor power plants. The plant produced a total of 8.47 terawatt hours, which is approximately 13% of Finland’s total electricity production. The Loviisa power plant employs approximately 500 Fortum employees and 100 permanent contractors. In 2015, Fortum invested EUR 80 million into the Loviisa nuclear power plant.
Solidification plant for Fortum's Loviisa power plant’s liquid radioactive waste starts operation
+358 50 455 3710
The Finnish Radiation and Nuclear Safety Authority (STUK) has on 15.2.2016 granted Loviisa nuclear power plant’s solidification plant a permission to start full operation. The plant will solidify the liquid radioactive waste generated during operation and decommissioning of the Loviisa power plant. This waste primarily consists of ion exchange resins used in the purification of process water as well as bottom sludge from evaporator concentrate tanks. The solidification process is highly automated and the process is controlled from a control room at the solidification plant.
“Loviisa power plant’s solidification plant is a pilot plant; its planning and successful implementation is the result of the long-term development efforts by Fortum’s own competent personnel. The plant’s commissioning phase started in 2006; during the test runs, the solidification recipes were developed and tested and the manufacturing method for the final disposal containers and the resin transfer systems were improved,” says
17 February 2016, 15:57 EET


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2016/02/solidification-plant-fortums-loviisa-power-plants-liquid-radioactive-waste-starts-operation



SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/06/fortum-and-uniper-sweden-sign-agreement-dismantling-project-oskarshamn-and-barseback-nuclear-power-plants-sweden
Anni Jaarinen, Head of Decommissioning and Waste, +358 40 825 7217,
Nuclear decommissioning is a growing business and Fortum has now been awarded contracts both in Sweden and Finland.
“Our expertise in conventional dismantling technologies and methods coupled with 40 years of experience in the nuclear industry, enable us to provide responsible, cost-efficient and reliable solutions and services for nuclear decommissioning projects," says Head of Decommissioning and Waste
sergey
Fortum and Uniper Sweden have signed an agreement on a dismantling project at Oskarshamn and Barsebäck nuclear power plants in Sweden. Fortum was awarded the agreement in a competitive bidding process.
Fortum and Uniper Sweden sign an agreement on a dismantling project at Oskarshamn and Barsebäck nuclear power plants in Sweden | Fortum
Uniper SE is a Fortum subsidiary. Together Fortum and Uniper can create value for all stakeholders and take a leading role in the European energy transition.
continues.
ilyukhin
“This is the first nuclear dismantling project for us in Sweden and we are excited to contribute to the decommissioning of Oskarshamn and Barsebäck nuclear power plants and look forward to the cooperation with Uniper Sweden,” Project Manager
Uniper is performing large scale decommissioning of four nuclear units in one common programme. The now awarded dismantling project includes dismantling of the turbine auxiliary systems, feed water systems and moisture separator reheaters. The work will be carried out at two power plants and altogether four units in Sweden: Oskarshamn units 1 and 2, and Barsebäck units 1 and 2. The duration of the agreement is about one year, and the work is estimated to be completed in the summer of 2021.
FORTUM CORPORATION PRESS RELEASE 9.6.2020
Sergey Ilyukhin
Sergey Ilyukhin, Project Manager, +358 40 352 4511,


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/02/fortum-and-fermi-energia-complete-licensing-model-study-smr-deployment-estonia
Download PDF
Fortum and Fermi Energia have completed a licensing model study for SMR deployment in Estonia. The SMR deployment study discusses the possible main elements of a generic licensing process in a nuclear newcomer country, such as Estonia. The study focuses on the construction licence phase and makes suggestions regarding a possible licensing model. While the study considers specifically a newcomer nuclear country, such as Estonia, many of the findings can be considered as applicable in SMR deployment projects worldwide.
Tallinn Declaration on the Future of SMR Licensing
“Fermi Energia is very pleased with the cooperation with Fortum and the result of the study. Having presented the study to US, Canadian and Finnish regulators, it is the basis for practical progress. The study forms the basis for a common Declaration on SMR Licensing by nine companies and organisations, including Vattenfall, Fortum, Synthos of Poland, Nuclearelectrica of Romania, and others enabling the development of industry consensus. In Estonia, we look forward to cooperation with Fortum in supporting the government with proposals on implementation of the study results”,
09 February 2021, 15:00 EET
“To make SMRs a reality, international harmonisation of safety requirements is hugely important. This requires that we extend and deepen the work currently underway by several international organisations”, says
Olli Kymäläinen, Head of Newbuild and Upgrades Services, Fortum, olli.kymalainen(at)fortum.com
The licensee is always responsible for the safety of the nuclear plant, and the regulator must independently ensure its safe operation. Assuming that the same SMR type has already been licensed and constructed in a country, the licensing process in subsequent countries can be made significantly more efficient through maximum utilisation of the existing safety case and Preliminary Safety Assessment Report (PSAR), as well as the corresponding regulatory safety assessment from the earlier licensing case. Therefore, it would be beneficial if the legislation and regulation would only set safety targets compatible with international practices (such as IAEA), but avoid setting detailed, prescriptive requirements that could lead to design changes. Ideally, deviations from the reference design would be limited only to the local site and environmental conditions. The safety assessments of the licence applicant and the regulator should be based on a graded approach, prioritising deviations from the reference design and safety significant items. The study provides also examples on the objectives and methods of the different safety assessments.
, Head of Newbuild and Upgrades Services at Fortum.
“We have been working with Fermi Energia on SMR licensing since early 2020 and look forward to continuing our cooperation to shape the nuclear industry”, he adds.
Fortum and Fermi Energia complete licensing model study for SMR deployment in Estonia | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/sustainability/climate-and-resources/climate
Read more about climate-related opportunities
Transforming our own operations to carbon neutral is a strategic priority for us. In 2021, Fortum’s specific carbon dioxide emissions (Scope 1) from total energy production in 2021 were 312 gCO
emissions of major utilities in Europe
-free power generation and green hydrogen.
/kWh. Below chart shows the specific CO
Sustainability: Decreasing environmental impacts | Fortum
Climate-related risks
Read more about climate-related risks
emissions of major utilities in Europe.
Changes in our operating environment are driven by global megatrends that remain valid: climate change, technology development, active customers, and resource efficiency. Europe is aiming for climate neutrality by 2050, and Fortum has set its climate targets accordingly.
Specific CO
Climate change mitigation and adaption require political commitment and ambitious actions from different players in society. Greenhouse gas emissions need to be reduced in all sectors, not just in electricity, but also, e.g., in heating, cooling, industry and transport. Electrification and sector integration mitigate climate change, when electricity, replacing other energy sources, is produced and supplied by low-emission and renewable energy sources. Transition to a low-emission power system also enables the decarbonisation of other sectors through the coupling of CO
Climate-related opportunities
/kWh. Our carbon dioxide emissions from total energy production in Europe were 231 gCO
Climate change mitigation


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/11/customer-takes-om-own-hands-recommends-fortum-enext-service-supplier
New cost-efficient O&M model to turn around profitability
Fortum eNext has been responsible for the operation and maintenance of the Hamm CCGT power plant in Germany since 2007. After fifteen years of close and good partnership, in September 2021, the customer made a strategic decision to take the O&M of the plant into its own hands.
“The cooperation has always been very good, as Fortum understood our needs as the operator of the power plant very well. Over the years, we never had any difficult technical discussions. I was always able to trust Fortum’s proposals, because we basically had the same understanding of things. Our decision was certainly not because we were unsatisfied, but because we saw this as part of the optimisation of the whole power plant process,” explains Dr.
, currently responsible for Fortum’s third-party O&M sites and who worked as Power Plant Manager in Hamm in 2010–2019.
Making use of the industry’s best knowledge and technology, Fortum eNext has operated the plant with the aim to ensure high availability, efficiency, and reliability, and with the highest standards in safety and sustainability. Plant personnel has been trained and the current setup built and refined over the years; the staff is very committed to the ways of working that were developed together. The integrated management system (IMS) adopted by Fortum and supported by a tailor-made IT system and digital tools, enables the efficient and flexible operation of the plant. In addition, Fortum has also provided a centralised technical support team to assist and manage various requests from the site.
“If an operator for any reason isn’t able to take care of the O&M right from the start, Fortum is a very good partner. If you need a service supplier to do it, Fortum is always the right choice. That’s something I recommend, because I’ve been on both sides. It’s very easy for us to say yes, two thumbs up!” Dr. Martin Buschmeier concludes.
Sign up for the Mobilisation Guide
Ways of working developed over the years
In September 2021, Trianel Gaskraftwerk Hamm GmbH & Co. KG, owned by 28 German, Austrian, and Dutch regional electricity companies, decided that the time was ripe to gradually take over the operation and maintenance of the joint CCGT power plant located in Hamm, Germany. The customer said it’s very easy for them to recommend Fortum eNext to others in need of O&M services.
Continuity is very important
Martin Buschmeier
Learn about standardised steps for mobilising a power plant
Customer releases
Successful change for the times
, Power Plant Manager at Hamm.
In 2014 the power plant faced serious profitability issues due to decreased electricity prices. The future depended on finding a way to cost-efficiently keep the power plant in operation to cater to the demand peaks whenever high electricity prices were forecasted. In practice, this meant becoming very fast in the changeover between ramping the production up and down.
Read about case Hamm, Germany
Customer takes O&M into own hands – recommends Fortum eNext as service supplier | Fortum
Fortum will not leave the site overnight, but will continue to provide technical support for as long as needed. In the future, the Hamm power plant will continue contributing the needed generation capacity to the regional power supply system and provide a flexible and reliable backup power source to accommodate the fluctuations of renewable energy sources.
Mikko Ryky
“The plant started out as a base load plant, which was run red as much as possible. Then suddenly everything changed, so we had to develop a completely new way to operate and maintain the plant at the other extreme and be extremely flexible. The change that this team was able to make has been tremendous, and I consider it one of the highlights,” says
“The best practices and strong O&M culture that we developed here have served as a reference to other third-party power plants that Fortum is currently operating, as well as for the operations of Fortum’s own plants,” says


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/about-us
At Fortum eNext, our goal is to help you improve your power plant's operations without compromising on environmental commitments. We advice how you can achieve the best return for your power and heat investments, and provide you with comprehensive services in the field of turbine and generator maintenance and smart energy solutions.
Fortum eNext to design, install and operate Dublin's first low-carbon district heating network
Fortum eNext Smart Operations
It is possible to affect power plant’s efficiency and costs - explore our full-scope Operation & Maintenance (O&M) approach
Fortum eNext Environmental Performance
Are you looking to optimise your regional energy systems and incorporate low-carbon ways of producing heat? Let us help you meet your carbon reduction targets.
Long-term O&M (operation and maintenance) services and mobilisation
Efficient asset lifecycle management with non-OEM approach
Your partner for winning performance and decarbonisation
Watch our story and see how we can help you use your power for good.
We know turbines and generators! A full range of capabilities from site service, engineering and workshops to modernisations at your use.
Subscribe to our newsletter
Here are the services we offer:
Fortum eNext Turbine and Generator Services
About Fortum eNext | Fortum
Keep informed on Fortum eNext news and updates.
Fortum eNext supports power and heat producers in maximising the availability and performance of their assets. Building on the heritage and know-how of running and optimising our customers’ and our own operations, we offer expert services in power plant operations, maintenance, and modernisations. As an independent service provider we handle equipment originally supplied by a wide selection of different OEM's, bringing in our extensive engineering expertise. We see our customers' situation from the owner’s perspective, striving for the most economical and technically best suitable solution for each case.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2022/08/fortum-turbine-and-generator-services-completes-gss-acquisition
Fortum Turbine and Generator Services offers power producers a full range of services for steam and gas turbines, generators and automation and protection systems. The services are complemented by two dedicated workshops in Finland and Sweden, designed for full-scope maintenance services for turbines and generators. We have a strong market position in the Nordic countries and over 150 professionals working with Turbine and Generator Services mainly in Finland, Sweden and Germany.
Fortum Turbine and Generator Services completes the acquisition of Generator Service Sweden AB’s business | Fortum
, Managing Director of Fortum TGS.
“The investment strengthens our position in providing full-scope generator services in our main markets in northern Europe and accelerates the realization of the growth strategy for Turbine and Generator Services business,” says
Fortum Turbine and Generator Services
GSS employs 18 people. The company is based in Västerås, Sweden, next to Fortum TGS workshop that is designed for full-scope generator maintenance services. The acquisition strengthens Fortum TGS service capabilities to offer generator stator works even further.
Vesa Kylmälä
Read more about our workshops
Dedicated workshops for full-scope turbine and generator maintenance services
Fortum Turbine and Generator Services (TGS) has today completed the earlier announced acquisition of Generator Service Sweden AB’s (GSS) business. GSS is a third-party maintenance, repair and retrofit service provider specialized in generator stator winding and core stacking services.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/power-plant-services/enext/news-and-articles
Would you like to receive our news and updates delivered to your email?  Subscribe to our newsletter.
Fortum eNext news and articles
What's new in the energy field? Welcome to follow up our journey to help you use power for good. You can read the latest eNext news as well as explore our blog posts and articles for thermal power plants.
Fortum eNext news and articles | Fortum
42 results found
Hanna Miettinen
Building a simulation model of a Geothermal Power Plant
6 results found
Fortum eNext and operators of Forsmark and Ringhals nuclear power plants enter into a service agreement to guarantee availability of nuclear power in Sweden
Sauli Salomaa
Blog posts
Fortum eNext News and Articles
Fortum eNext to rewind two generator rotors and stators of a fleet of radial steam turbines for a customer in Sweden


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/blog/enext/building-simulation-model-geothermal-power-plant
Summer Trainee, Smart Operations
In conclusion, it has been an educational and interesting summer. Despite some challenges, like Covid-19 and the consequential remote working, I learned to use the Apros simulation software. My colleagues have been a tremendous help, and I am still learning new things about it. Despite having little data to go on, creating a geothermal model has been successful. Developing a more specific model for a real geothermal power plant is now feasible. The foundation is set.
We operate your plant safely, sustainably and economically
hanna
Geothermal power is a local, low-carbon energy source. It does not use fossil fuels. It is profitable to build near regions with volcanic activity. A geothermal power plant is built by drilling holes in prospective regions with underground reservoirs of fluid. The fluid is a mixture of hot water, steam and impurities. The composition is heavily dependent on location. The geofluid is under high pressure.
The steam and water mixture is flashed and separated into steam and brine, as shown in Figure 1. The steam goes to the turbine and the brine to reinjection. In some cases, the brine is flashed more than once to maximise the benefit from it. The brine and condensed steam is reinjected or released above ground.
Training simulators can be extremely beneficial in countries and projects where the new technology training for operators and engineers must be conducted on-site. My main task during my summer job at Fortum was to develop a generic simulation model of a Geothermal Power Plant. Developing geothermal operation and maintenance (O&M) capabilities aligns well with the Fortum eNext strategy on decarbonisation.
miettinen
27 October 2020, 12:27
Foundation for developing a model for a real geothermal PP set
My main task during my summer job at Fortum was to develop a generic simulation model of a Geothermal Power Plant with an Apros simulation software. The Apros software was developed by Fortum and VTT (Technical Research Centre of Finland Ltd). It is used to realistically simulate the dynamic behaviour of thermal power plants and their control systems. The work was a real learning process, as I had no prior experience with Apros software, and this geothermal technology had not been previously modelled with Apros. The primary goal of my work was to prove that geothermal power can be modelled with Apros. My secondary goal was to create a generic model that can be used as a base for commercial applications – like operator training simulators and engineering simulators.
Dynamic modelling with Apros simulation software
Read more about digital tools supporting modern O&M
The current state of the model is such that it can be used to study changes in production well parameters (incoming steam pressure and temperature), component malfunctions (e.g. stuck valve), leakages in steam pipes and steam turbine degradation (e.g. due to corrosion from impurities). Development opportunities include the addition of impurity calculations, more accurate automation and wider simulation scenarios. The final target is to develop a training simulator for an actual geothermal power plant.
Figure 1. Operation display for a generic geothermal power plant
A geofluid reservoir that has been tapped into will gradually decrease in pressure and temperature. When brine is reinjected relatively close to the reservoir, it is replenished. This will slow down the decrease in pressure and fluid production. Geofluid is also full of impurities. These impurities often include hydrogen sulphide, silica, chloride and sodium. The quality of the geofluid is dependent on the location. Without reinjection, these impurities are released above ground and into the atmosphere.
For the modelling I used open source data from geothermal power, generic engineering information on water/steam cycles and some more specific details from an Icelandic geothermal expertise and services company Deilir Technical Services. The current model has three wells, two steam separators, a turbine, a condenser and a cooling tower. Figure 1 shows the operation display of the Apros model. A geothermal power plant does not have fuel. The heat from the earth warms the fluid, which is then put into a water/steam cycle. This is seen below in Figure 1.
Building a simulation model of a Geothermal Power Plant | Fortum
Geothermal power plant basics
Training simulators can be extremely beneficial in countries and projects where the new technology training for operators and engineers must be conducted on-site. The simulators can also be used for engineering applications to reduce downtime and increase availability, e.g. by studying plant behaviour in plant disturbances. Making this basic Apros model of a geothermal power plant is a prelude to developing a training simulator for a mobilisation phase. Developing geothermal operation and maintenance (O&M) capabilities aligns well with the Fortum eNext strategy on decarbonisation.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/06/fortum-enext-and-operators-forsmark-and-ringhals-nuclear-power-plants-enter-service-agreement-guarantee-availability-nuclear-power-sweden
Forsmark and Ringhals are nuclear power plants in Sweden operated by Forsmarks Kraftgrupp AB and Ringhals AB, both mainly owned by Vattenfall, a major producer of nuclear power in northern Europe. In 2020, nuclear generation represented around 30% of Sweden’s electricity production. In order to maintain the units’ high availability, the operators partnered with Fortum eNext to secure qualified repairs nearby and balancing for a total of 8 generators at Forsmark units 1 and 2 and at Ringhals units 3 and 4.
14 June 2021, 15:51 EEST
The reactors at Forsmark and Ringhals are a special type of boiling water reactor designed by Asea-Atom, and the generators are based on the original ASEA design with water-cooled rotors. Fortum eNext is the only independent service provider in the Nordics to provide the knowhow and the balancing facility with water needed to service this type of rotor. Fortum’s two balancing units are located in one single facility in Västerås, Sweden. The smaller unit balances rotors from 1,300 kg to 30,000 kg and the larger from 30,000 kg to 110,000 kg. An adjoining engineering office and workshop houses repair and modernisation operations.
The agreement covers five years’ availability of the balancing bunker with option to prolong it, as well as modernisation of the balancing facility and special equipment to provide cooling-water to the rotor and enabling electrical measurements of the rotor at operational speed. The agreement also includes regular training of the workshop’s staff. The operators will provide a rotor for training purposes, and once a year the rotor will be taken out and re-installed; twice a year Fortum will run and balance the rotor.
Fortum eNext has agreed with Forsmarks Kraftgrupp AB and Ringhals AB on five years’ availability of Fortum’s balancing facility to ensure competent maintenance of the special water-cooled rotors on short notice.
service and balance the Forsmark FRR2 water-cooled rotor
Fortum eNext and operators of Forsmark and Ringhals nuclear power plants enter into a service agreement to guarantee availability of nuclear power in Sweden | Fortum
From the risk management point of view, the significance of having a local competent service provider has become even more evident during the Covid-19 pandemic. Maintaining the competence is equally in both parties’ interest.
In April 2020, we told about a deal to
“This is a true win-win case. With this deal the operators of Forsmark and Ringhals ensure access to a service provider in Sweden, a provider who is able to make repairs of the rotor and balance it with water-cooling on short notice. We are very pleased to be able to offer this service to them. Moreover, this gives us the opportunity to maintain and develop our knowhow on this very special water-cooled type rotor for nuclear applications,” says Senior Product Manager


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2020/04/forsmark-nuclear-rotor-refurbished-generate-co2-free-electricity-many-years-come
All three Forsmark reactors are boiling water reactors designed by Asea-Atom, and the generator is based on the original ASEA design with water-cooled rotors. It is among the very few 2-pole rotors for NPP’s in the world. This generator has a rating of 680 MVA , and the rotor weight is 57.7 tonnes, length approx. 11 meters, diameter 1.15 meters and operating speed 3000 rpm.
A steady source of CO2-free electricity
Over a period of ten years, the owners have invested in an extensive investment programme at Forsmark to prolong the service life of the reactor and to increase the output. The plan is to operate the units for many years to come. In order to maintain high availability of the NPP, it is necessary to be able to perform refurbishments and repairs of the rotors.
“We are very proud that Forsmarks Kraftgrupp trusted our competence and capabilities in the delivery of this kind of service. The availability of the existing NPPs in Sweden is crucial and having a supplier nearby is worthwhile to minimise downtime,” Jonas Holmgren says.
“We have vast experience working with large generators, including the water-cooled type for nuclear applications. Fortum also owns a workshop where newly built ASEA turbo-generator rotors were balanced in the past. This type of balancing facility with water is quite unique,” says
Fortum eNext will service and balance one of the water-cooled rotors for Forsmark nuclear power plant units 1 and 2.
Jonas Holmgren
Forsmark nuclear rotor refurbished to generate CO2-free electricity for many years to come | Fortum
Forsmark nuclear rotor refurbished to generate CO2-free electricity for many years to come
For this order, the FRR2 rotor, Fortum eNext will manufacture and replace a cracked rotor slot wedge. Inspections and replacement of insulated bushings will be performed at the same time. Finally, the rotor will be tested and balanced with water in the balancing facility.
Climate change and the transition to a low-carbon energy system means that reliable, emission-free power generation is more important than ever. Both companies share the same vision of a clean-energy future and, as a CO2-free energy production method, nuclear power plays a key role in their strategies.
, Key Account Manager at Fortum eNext.
07 April 2020, 12:56 EEST
The company investigated alternatives for qualified suppliers to secure long-term access to external support and turned to Fortum eNext for the refurbishment of the spare rotor for Forsmark units 1 and 2.
Forsmark NPP, owned by Forsmarks Kraftgrupp AB and where the energy company Vattenfall is the majority owner, is the most recently built nuclear power plant in Sweden; the plant was commissioned in the 1980s. The total power output is 3,280 MW with an annual production of 25 TWh, which is approximately one sixth of Sweden's total electrical energy consumption.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/09/fortum-enext-rewind-two-generator-rotors-and-stators-fleet-radial-steam-turbines-customer-sweden
“The fact that Fortum had previously dealt with this equipment was important. They are local and have the required engineering competence to perform this type of maintenance work here in Sweden. Based on our experience from previous collaboration, we felt that Fortum eNext was the natural partner,” says
“The ability to do calculations on the generator’s electromagnetic side is the key here. When you work on an older machine, the calculations have to be replicated because the exact same materials are no longer available. So we have to update the design and calculate the complete generator according to today’s material and requirements,” says Senior Product Manager
The turbo-sets at the plant are of the radial type, where one turbine is connected to two generators. These radial steam turbines are no longer manufactured and, due to the special design, it is also quite difficult to replace them with a new steam turbine and generator. However, from an economical and sustainability point of view, renewing the turbine and generator is advantageous, because they are reliable and very much appreciated in paper mill plants in particular because extracting steam for the process is easy.
After the rewind, the generators will be able to be in service for many more years.
Fortum eNext knows this type of equipment very well and was selected to rewind two rotors and stators.
Södra Cell is one of the world’s leading producers of market pulp. The company had initiated a program to extend the lifetime of the power plant at the Mörrum pulp mill by at least 15 years. Having looked at several different options, they concluded that investing in the existing facility would be the best solution for them. Among other actions, this meant upgrading the plant’s turbines and generators.
Ulf Wilhelmsson
02 September 2021, 15:19 EEST
Södra Cell had decided to prolong the lifetime of its existing power plant at the Mörrum pulp mill and selected Fortum eNext to rewind the generator rotors and stators of the plant’s radial steam turbines.
The generators were dismantled in May, and the works are now ongoing at Fortum’s workshop in Västerås. But the project got under way earlier in the spring with the designing of the new stator windings and the purchasing of materials.
from Södra Cell.
“Fortum eNext has invested in the generator workshop and facility in Sweden because we think it is important that we can offer this type of competence locally in the Nordics. Checking and refurbishing or replacing parts is important, but the main thing is the rewind. When the rewind is done properly, the stators and rotors will be more or less like new,” says Senior Bid Manager
Fortum eNext to rewind two generator rotors and stators of a fleet of radial steam turbines for a customer in Sweden | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/recycled-plastic-granules/recycled-pp
Recycled PP | Fortum
Recycled PP
Fortum Circo® PP series materials are a sustainable choice for Polypropylene applications. Our materials are manufactured with a state-of-the-art process at Fortum’s plastics refinery from local, separately collected plastic packaging waste of consumers (PCR). The materials are safe to use, and the climate change impact is less than half that of common virgin materials.
Fortum Circo® PP fits a wide variety of applications, such as
Wide process window in injection moulding applications
Interested in the technical information of Fortum Circo® PP?
EuCertPlast
Construction materials
Good chemical resistance
Light weight
Good impact strength
Home electronics
REACH and RoHS compliant
Injection moulding grades are available with two different MFIs: 11g/10min and 22g/10min. The properties of the materials are comparable with virgin grades of PP-c, and the materials can usually be used without difficulties. Both grades are also available with enhanced processing capabilities that can withstand elevated process temperatures for a prolonged time and have better stability and a smaller weight variance in the final products.
Natural grey
Good electrical insulation properties
Low friction


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/download-data-sheets-pp
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic granules, PP | Fortum
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic granules, PP
Fortum Circo® PP granules are made from post-consumer packaging materials from the Nordics with a state-of-the-art process.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/recycled-plastic-granules/recycled-hdpe
Tough and durable
Good performance even at low temperatures
Weldable and sealable
Fortum Circo® HDPE fits a wide variety of applications such as
Interested in the technical information of Fortum Circo® HDPE?
Good fatigue resistance and heat resistance
Construction pipes & sheets
Semi-rigid
Fortum Circo® HDPE series materials are a sustainable choice for High-Density Polyethylene applications. Our materials are manufactured with a state-of-the-art process at Fortum’s plastics refinery from local, separately collected plastic packaging waste of consumers (PCR). The materials are safe to use, and the climate change impact is less than half that of common virgin materials.
Recycled HDPE
Sports & leisure
Blow molding
Recycled HDPE | Fortum
REACH compliant
Extrusion grades of our HDPE series are recommended for blown moulding pieces, pipes, profiles, sheets and thermoforming. Fortum Circo HDPE materials have an MFI of 1.5g/10min, and they can be processed with a wide process window and are also suitable for high throughput demand. Fortum Circo® HDPE-1001 Light Grey is developed for bottle applications. It has improved melt strength and stability, is suitable for thin-walled applications, e.g., coex applications with decreased gel formation. There is smaller weight variation in the final product.
Packaging & containers
Electrical insulation properties
Natural grey or light grey


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/download-data-sheets-hdpe
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic granules, HDPE
Fortum Circo® HDPE granules are made from post-consumer packaging materials from the Nordics with a state-of-the-art process.
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic granules, HDPE | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/recycled-plastic-granules/recycled-ldpe
Sealable
Blown film
Blown film grades of Fortum Circo® LDPE are most suitable for replacing your virgin blown film materials for mono or coex. It is suitable also for extrusion products, such as irrigation pipes, profiles and flexible sheets. Injection moulding applications are also possible, thanks to the wide and flexible processability of our raw materials. The MFI of our LDPE materials is about 1g/10min and they are well suited for high production rates.
Excellent at extrusion
Agriculture
Interested in the technical information of Fortum Circo® LDPE?
Fortum Circo® LDPE fits a wide variety of applications, such as
Fortum Circo® LDPE series materials are a sustainable choice for Low-Density Polyethylene applications. Our materials are manufactured with a state-of-the-art process at Fortum’s plastics refinery from local, separately collected plastic packaging waste of consumers (PCR). The materials are safe to use, and the climate change impact is about half that of common virgin materials.
Bags & industrial films
Good performance in low temperatures
Recycled LDPE
Post-Consumer & Post Industrial Recycled (PCR & PIR) plastic
Natural grey, light grey & black
Recycled LDPE | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/download-data-sheets-ldpe
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic granules, LDPE
Fortum Circo® LDPE granules are made from post-consumer packaging materials from the Nordics with a state-of-the-art process.
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic granules, LDPE | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/recycled-plastic-granules/fortum-circo-pp-t
High flexural modulus
With PP-T series materials, the components in the mould cool faster compared to non-filled materials. It is possible to produce more parts per hour, which cuts production costs and time. The mineral filling provides higher stiffness and rigidity, high impact strength, increased chemical, heat and deformation resistance, as well as better dimensional stability. And it is easy to produce a fine surface quality with good scratch resistance.
Good fatigue and heat resistance
Injection molding
Low friction and shrinkage
Tough
100% recyclable
Fortum Circo® PP-T | Fortum
Fine aesthetics
Automotive parts
Fortum Circo® PP-T fits for a wide variety of applications, such as
Interested in the technical information of Fortum Circo® PP-T?
Natural grey  - or choose your color
Fortum Circo® PP-T is a talc-filled compound of our recycled polypropylene with improved properties, offering higher stiffness and rigidity. With our upgraded and sustainable PP-T, you can replace virgin engineering materials, like those you’d find in automotive applications, with an environmentally friendly option.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/download-data-sheets-pp-t
compounds, PP-T
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic compounds, PP-T
Fortum Circo® PP-T is a talc-filled compound of our recycled polypropylene with improved properties, offering higher stiffness and rigidity.
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic compounds, PP-T | Fortum


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/fortum-circolab
Our plastic experts are there to support you at all stages when implementing a new recycled plastic compound material to produce more sustainable products.
The test stage produces the first version of the product with the new material compound to test the functionality and the visual and technical properties.
Fortum Circo®Lab is a co-creation programme for raw materials development. The programme aims to create a recycled plastic compound tailored to the customer's product and production. We work with the customer to assess and determine their needs, the common goals, and where and how recycled plastic can best be utilised in customers' products.
Concept
In the CircoLab process, the technical and environmental properties of the material are improved to fit more technical applications. The technical properties of recycled plastic, such as strength, processability, colour and other features, are reshaped and customised to develop a sustainable, tailor-made material compound.
Support
Fortum Circo®Lab
Trial
During the concept stage, the initial specification for the raw material is made and the production concept is created.
Production
This is how the Fortum Circo®Lab process flows
BACK TO FORTUM CIRCO MAIN PAGE
Fortum Circo®Lab is a co-creation programme for raw materials development, aiming to support customers in implementing recycled plastic into their production. In the Fortum CircoLab programme, Fortum Circo® recycled plastic material is customised into a compound tailored to the customer's needs and products.
Once the material has been approved in trial phase, the production and upscaling the volumes can take place in controlled manner.
Co-creating sustainability with customers
Fortum CircoLab
Fortum Circo® recycled plastic compounds can also be tailored to your specific needs and requirements
Each development project begins with an initial analysis, where the product features and performance are analysed.
“Fortum Circo® recycled plastic compounds are developed in close collaboration with customers in order to create the precise raw material compound that meets the requirements of the final product.”
Prototype
Development
Analysis
Kari Aaltonen, Product Line Specialist, Plastics, Fortum
Fortum Circo®Lab | Fortum
Learn more about Fortum Circo compound series available
Iteration is an important part of the material development programme. In the development phase, recycled plastic is tailored into a specific compound based on your needs.
Bio oil for heat production


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/lca-study-download
There are differences in plastics when it comes to sustainability. The origin of the feedstock material and the way the plastic waste is treated plays a key role in the sustainability.
the environmental effects of Fortum Circo recyclates
Download Fortum Circo® LCA study to learn more about:
Fortum Circo® Life Cycle Assessment Study
the benefits of using Fortum Circo recyclates compared to virgin granulates
Fortum Circo® LCA study | Fortum
how does Fortum Circo contribute to UN’s Sustainable Development Goals
Download the LCA Study by filling in your contact information


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/recycling-waste/fortum-circo/quality-and-sustainability
Our recycling process is protected to prevent the leakage of micro-plastics and it complies with ISO 9001 and ISO 14001 standards. Our process also has
Implementing circular economy actions and reducing climate change are goals that most companies have in today’s world. The most valuable materials are the ones that hold value and can be used more than just one time.
Interested in the environmental impact of Fortum Circo?
The core of our Fortum Circo recyclates is post-consumer plastic waste, which is separately collected and delivered to our plastic recycling process. We handle all waste at our own state-of-the-art plant and monitor the quality of the plastics through the whole recycling process. Near-infrared technology-based sorting and separating of the different plastics guarantees consistent quality of the recycled raw material.
Quality and sustainability
certification.
As a recycled plastics manufacturer we have the whole recycling process in our own hands and can thus ensure the sustainability at every stage of the process.
Utilizing recycled plastics instead of virgin plastics saves resources and decreases carbon footprint. The climate change impact of Fortum Circo recycled plastic basic granulates is on average only half of that of virgin granulates. Our new cellulose fibre-reinforced compound, which combines post-consumer recycled polypropylene with softwood cellulose fibre, is even more sustainable, as its carbon footprint is neutral.
Quality and sustainability | Fortum
Sustainable and transparent production process
The origin of feedstock material and the processing of plastic waste play a key role in the sustainability of production. Our mechanical recycling process consists of several steps, including washing, drying and compounding processes.
From waste to new valuable raw material
Fortum Circo is made with no compromises: it is a safe and reliable raw material that fits a wide variety of applications. Fortum Circo® is sustainable in every sense.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/battery-recycling/end-of-life-services-for-lithium-ion-batteries
We are experts in handling hazardous substances. We transport, handle, and recycle used and damaged batteries safely and in accordance with local regulations.
Lithium-ion batteries that have reached the end of their life are classified as hazardous waste. Used batteries must be packed separately from other materials. In particular, severely damaged batteries require special expertise in handling, as they can be extremely flammable. We guide our customers through the whole process to ensure that all the relevant rules and regulations are applied.
We recycle lithium batteries at our recycling plants in Finland. Our efficient and low-carbon recycling process ensures that the valuable raw materials contained in the batteries are recovered and used as recycled raw material for new batteries.
Back to Fortum Battery Solutions
What do we offer?
We use a combination of mechanical and hydrometallurgical technologies to recycle the battery materials. With our cutting-edge, low CO2 battery recycling technology, we recover the valuable battery materials for reuse in the production of new batteries.
Safe solutions for transport and storage
We offer guidance in assessing the condition and the packaging of the battery if needed. We also provide the equipment for transporting and storing the batteries, and we take care of the necessary documents.
We collect and receive used and damaged lithium-ion batteries from companies, ranging from EV batteries to lithium batteries used in industrial applications. If the condition of the battery is a concern, we will guide you in assessing the condition and in packaging the battery for transport. We collect the batteries according to the agreement, and we also provide the packaging for transport as well as the equipment for storing the batteries if needed.
Recall campaigns
With an entirely in-house process – from collection to recycling – we ensure that batteries are treated and recycled in a sustainable way and that the valuable raw materials are recovered for reuse.
When a lithium-ion battery reaches the end of its life, it requires expert handling that meets legislative safety requirements. As a hazardous waste expert, we provide companies with a safe, easy, and cost-effective service for the handling, transporting, storing, and recycling of lithium-ion batteries.
With a wide network of logistics partners, we can provide reliable and optimised logistics services for our customers. As experts in handling hazardous substances, we take care of cross-border transportation and logistics safely and in accordance with local regulations.
End of life services for lithium-ion batteries | Fortum
Convenience
Customer-optimised logistics services in Europe
We have the expertise and experience to help customers with challenging electric vehicle battery recall campaigns. We are committed helping our customers find the most effective, reliable, and safest solution for battery recycling.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/services/battery-recycling/recycling-solutions-for-battery-manufacturers
Olaf Bongwald, CEO, Valmet Automotive
We recover the valuable battery metals through our hydrometallurgical process and produce sustainable recycled raw materials: nickel, cobalt, and manganese sulphates, and lithium hydroxide for reuse.
Efficient recycling of battery material
Read more about our co-operation with Valmet Automotive
We provide a unique service offering for battery manufacturers across the battery production value chain. Our services include the sustainable recycling of battery production scrap as well as hazardous waste management of challenging waste streams.
Sustainable recycled raw materials
Expertise in hazardous waste treatment
"We consider it as part of our corporate responsibility and an essential part of our commitment to sustainable production that we not only produce the batteries themselves in a C02-neutral way, but that we also take care of the best possible solutions for recycling the batteries. In Fortum we have found the perfect partner for this."
Recycling solutions for battery manufacturers | Fortum
We combine low-CO2 mechanical and hydrometallurgical processes to ensure efficient and sustainable recycling of battery production scrap.
We have over 50 years of experience in hazardous waste management. We help battery manufacturers to dispose of challenging waste streams, such as solvents, slurries, and liquids in safe and environmentally sound way.
Reliable recycling and hazardous waste management are a crucial part of ensuring smooth production in battery manufacturing. With our own mechanical and hydrometallurgical battery recycling facilities and hazardous waste treatment plants, Fortum is the perfect partner for battery manufacturers.


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/media/2021/08/fortum-and-valmet-automotive-co-operate-sustainable-recycling-battery-materials
Previously the text stated that: In addition to battery material recycling in Finland, the co-operation between Valmet Automotive and Fortum also includes waste management at the Uusikaupunki car plant.
“We are proud to collaborate with Valmet Automotive, a leading player in the battery systems manufacturing industry,” says
Frank Volk, Senior Manager, Corporate Communications, Valmet Automotive, +49 172 378 1569,
volk
FORTUM CORPORATION BUSINESS PRESS RELEASE 19.8.2021
, CEO, Valmet Automotive.
19 August 2021, 09:00 EEST
Valmet Automotive’s growing production volumes at the Salo plant and the start of production at the new battery plant in Uusikaupunki later this year emphasise the importance of a sustainable solution for material recycling. The scrapped non-conforming materials are collected at the Valmet Automotive plants and transported by Fortum for safe and efficient recycling.
In addition to battery material recycling in Finland, the co-operation between Valmet Automotive and Fortum also includes waste management of hazardous materials at the Uusikaupunki car plant. Both companies are also exploring possibilities to extend the co-operation to Valmet Automotive’s locations in Germany in order to be closer to key players to offer sustainable services in the fast developing EV sector.
Tero Holländer,  Head of Business Line, Batteries, Fortum Recycling & Waste, +358 40 861 5071,
frank
Olaf Bongwald
valmet-automotive
"We consider it as part of our corporate responsibility and an essential part of our commitment to sustainable production that we not only produce the batteries themselves in a C02-neutral way, but that we also take care of the best possible solutions for recycling the batteries. In Fortum we have found the perfect partner for this," says
Fortum and Valmet Automotive co-operate in sustainable recycling of battery materials | Fortum
The recycling co-operation also contributes to the development of a circular economy and sustainable development based value chain, for which both Fortum and Valmet Automotive have received funding this year through the EU Battery Industry Innovation Project IPCEI.
, Head of Business Line, Batteries, Fortum. “Our collaboration will enable us to recover raw materials from their battery production process in the most sustainable way, allowing for critical metals to be fed back into Finland’s battery value chain to create new EV batteries.”
*Business Press Release corrected on 20.8.2021
Fortum and Valmet Automotive, one of the leading producers of battery systems and largest vehicle contract manufacturers, have entered into a cooperation to ensure the safe and sustainable recycling of all non-conforming battery materials from Valmet Automotive’s battery plants in Salo and Uusikaupunki.
Fortum and Valmet Automotive co-operate in sustainable recycling of battery materials


SOURCE: https://www.fortum.com/products-and-services/fortum-battery-solutions/recycling/second-life
Second-life solutions for batteries
Want to learn more about the second-life solutions? Contact us!
Second life solutions
After a decade or more of use, a lithium-ion battery is no longer suitable for its original purpose. However, the battery often still retains enough capacity to serve in so-called second-life functions, such as stationary power storages for wind or solar power plants.
Second-life solutions for lithium-ion batteries
Second-life solutions for lithium-ion batteries | Fortum
Fortum is piloting so-called second-life solutions for batteries, where used EV batteries are used as stationary energy storages after they are no longer fit for their original purpose.
Second-life solutions for batteries
We are currently piloting several second-life solutions for used batteries. One of them is an innovative joint project with Volvo Cars and cleantech company Comsys in Sweden, where used batteries from electric vehicles are combined into one great battery. The solution, installed in Landafors hydropower plant, enhances the plant turbines’ capability to regulate the grid and extends their lifetime.
+46 70 380 5479